Page 1 of 1574
The third and latest (2022) edition of this dictionary and thesaurus of contemporary figurative
language and metaphor has been updated to better reflect the language of groups, social media,
and social change. The work seeks to identify language used figuratively in everyday
contemporary English, along with its distinguishing collocates. The first entry is ablaze, and the
last entry is Zuckerberg (the Russian Mark Zuckerberg, etc.). Each entry is tagged by what
cognitive linguists sometimes describe as target and source; in general, each entry seeks to
highlight a physical basis. Tags include ones like shape; direction; weight; trips & journeys; past
& present; feeling & emotion, etc. The compiler is a lifelong EFL teacher of adult military
students in Saudi Arabia, and his interest in figurative language arose during his work. The result
reinforces that language used figuratively based on our lives and experiences is common and
important in all types of communication. For example, a “tug-of-war” from the experience of our
childhood can describe a struggle with radar on a plane that results in hundreds of fatalities, and
a “conversation” nowadays often suggests much more than simply a talk between two people.
The work has implications for ESL / EFL teaching, which tends to focus on the literal meanings
of words, usually the first sense in a dictionary. Clearly, more attention should be paid to other
senses of words, and this work will help to identify and classify them. This is a reference for ESL
/ EFL teachers, curriculum developers, materials writers, and teacher trainers. However, it has
also been found useful as a dataset by linguists and computer experts interested in metaphor
detection, natural language processing (NLP), artificial intelligence (AI), and social-media
analysis. Preliminary short discussions based on the work include (1) 60 + common metaphors
(2) Collocation (3) Epithets (4) Persons (5) The “container” metaphor (6) Grammatical
metaphor, fictive verbs, etc. (7) Past, present and future (8) Allusions (9) Euphemisms (10)
Gestures and bodily reactions (11) Shapes and parts-whole (12) Animacy (13) Persistence,
survival and endurance (14) Quotations (15) Synonyms and opposites (16) Lessons and exercises
(17) To the ESL / EFL teacher, which focuses on how the dictionary and thesaurus impacts the
knowledge and experience base of the ESL / EFL teacher and (18) An alphabetized list of the
thesaurus categories.
Page 2 of 1574
A Dictionary and Thesaurus of Contemporary Figurative
Language and Metaphor 2022
by Joseph Gagen Stockdale III
May 3, 2022
Page 3 of 1574
Table of contents
1. Dedication 4
2. Introduction 5-9
3. 60 + common metaphors 10-16
4. Collocation 17
5. Epithets 18-19
6. Persons 20
7. The “container” metaphor 21
8. Grammatical metaphor, fictive verbs, etc. 22
9. Past, present and future 23
10. Allusions 24
11. Euphemisms 25-27
12. Gestures and bodily reactions 28
13. Shapes and parts-whole 29
14. Animacy 30-32
15. Persistence, survival and endurance 33-35
16. Quotations 36-38
17. Synonyms and opposites 39-41
18. Lessons and exercises 42-43
19. To the EFL / ESL teacher 44-48
20. An alphabetized list of the thesaurus categories 49-55
21. The dictionary of collocations 56-1153
22. The thesaurus / categories 1154-1574
Page 4 of 1574
Dedication
To my father—a teacher and a theater man. I thought of you every time I added a word or
expression to the category of theater in the thesaurus.
And to my students—Emiratis, Hondurans, Mexicans, Moldovans, Ukrainians, Kosovars—past,
present and future.
But this work is especially dedicated to the adult military students I taught in Saudi Arabia,
starting in 1983 and ending in 2017.
The lyric from Mutanabbi that you taught me will beat in my heart as long as my heart beats.
I know the desert well,
The night, the mounted men.
The battle and the sword,
The paper and the pen.
Joseph Gagen Stockdale III
Page 5 of 1574
Introduction
I compiled this work with my adult Saudi Arabian military EFL students in mind. The third
entry in this dictionary—about-face—is something I've seen my students do many times on the
maidan, or parade ground, in Dhahran, in the Eastern Province of Saudi Arabia. A literal aboutface, not a figurative one. The literal tends to come first in English language teaching and
learning, and in our dictionaries, but the figurative usage can be right behind, if only taught. Of
course, the figurative meaning of about-face relates to reversal: a government can do an aboutface on something such as a policy.
In my classroom, when I would casually mention that a hurricane had an eye (resemblance), or a
bed had a foot and a head (orientation), and not only the earth but also a school had an
atmosphere (environment), my students would often react with astonishment and dismay.
"English is crazy," one of my students said, memorably. A Harbi. Or a Mutairi, maybe.
And yet, those same students had no problem exemplifying figurative uses of words. When I
taught a group of students the figurative use of magnet, and gave them a little time to think about
it, one student shot his hand into the air and pronounced, "Makkah is a magnet for Muslims."
I highly praised him—a Zahrani, I recall…
The key for such exemplifications lies with collocation. With magnet, the important collocating
preposition is for: X (be) a magnet for Y. This little formula with its collocating preposition
allows students to create their own, novel exemplifications.
I remember once teaching basic English in a dusty classroom overlooking a parade ground
ringed by date palms, in the early days of personal computers. The vocabulary item I was
teaching was window. I introduced the word in the usual, literal way, but I also mentioned that
TV shows could be a window (portal) to other countries and cultures. This was in the old days
before smartphones.
And a bearded naval officer—a Qahtani?—shot his hand into the air and said, slyly, "Windows."
It took me just a second to get it. Well, of course! Microsoft Windows!
Another time, I remember teaching a lesson on shopping that included the word mall. This
provided me the opportunity to speak for a brief moment about mall rats, girls and boys who go
to malls to flirt. Saudi Arabia has malls, girls, and boys, of course, but flirting is not supposed to
Page 6 of 1574
occur, and premarital sex can be a death sentence. Not only that, but in Saudi Arabia comparing
a man to an animal of any type is potentially a deadly insult.
After the lesson, a cadet approached me and confided in a whisper, "My brother is a big mall
rat!"
I loved how he modified the phrase with big!
In fact, it was my Saudi students that got me interested in the figurative and metaphorical use of
language in the first place. They would talk to me of Islam as a path, refer to the character of a
person or nationality as being straight and crooked, insult people as snakes, devils, dogs, and
pigs, and compliment me on my "white" heart. In Riyadh, the center of the country, I taught in
view of a prominent ridge called "The Camel's Nose" in Arabic. When I taught in Jeddah, in the
western part of the country, I learned from my students that the city was known as "The Bride of
the Red Sea," and it was from Arabic poetry that I learned expressions like, "Her face gleamed
like the moon on the 14th of the month."
I have not thought of pigs, hearts, geographical place names, cities, and the moon in the same
way since.
It's interesting to reflect that there are no actual pigs in Saudi Arabia, the cradle of Islam where
the Qur’an forbids the eating of pork. And yet, you hear the word all the time there, not in its
literal sense as the animal, but as an insult. And that is how it is entered and categorized in this
work. Animals are commonly related to insults, just as they are commonly related to character
and personality and many other things, including predation and epithets.
I'm sure you can think of many examples.
"If you are not a wolf, a wolf will eat you," is a proverb I learned in Saudi Arabia.
I like the figurative world because it is connected to the natural world, a world I admire, and not
just through the window of an automobile. It includes creatures from childhood like monsters
and witches, as well as words that come from "grown up" subjects like astronomy, history,
physics, and medicine. In the figurative world, words still refer to older technologies and
practices like sailing, mills, farming, and hunting, and somehow I understand them. The
figurative world maintains allusions to literature, to the Iliad and the Odyssey, Dickens, Mary
Shelley, and the Bible. In the figurative world, drumbeats still carry a message, a simple object
such as a coin or a chain can express a fundamental relationship, a pancake can express a shape
or configuration, and a “tug of war” between an aircraft and its crew can have real consequences,
resulting in hundreds of fatalities. Troop buildups on a border can be described as a “geopolitical
Page 7 of 1574
game of chicken.” A bubble can symbolize a pandemic. Layers of Swiss cheese can symbolize
protection from a pandemic. Waves sloshing in a bathtub can symbolize transmission during a
pandemic.
Figurative language offers synonyms, antonyms, and makes connections. You can be up to your
neck or up to your eyeballs in something. Take your pick! If you have a problem, you can tackle
it or punt. Both those words come from American football. Or, you can kick the can down the
road, something I often did as a boy. You can stroll / coast / waltz / or sail to success. You can
say, “That ship has sailed,” or you can say, “That train has left the station,” depending on
whether you are into ships or trains. When it comes to resolution and conclusion, you can bury
the ghosts, or put something to rest. If you wish to avoid or separate yourself from something,
nautically you can steer clear of it, or give it a wide berth.
And the figurative world makes just makes sense. Is it any surprise that words and expressions
from the field of education often relate to assessment? Alcohol to restraint and lack of restraint?
The family to relationship? A crutch to help and assistance? The theater to attention? Gambling
to fate, fortune and chance? A boat or a horse to control? Religion to messages? Sleep to
consciousness and awareness? The tongue to speech? Health and medicine to condition and
status? Targets to weapons? Weight to substance? Clothing to concealment? Chess to strategy?
A table to negotiation, or inclusion? A door to access? Affliction to wounds and scars? Love and
marriage... to pursuit, capture and escape?
That last tends to surprise and delight those who haven't thought of it before.
The figurative world is a great way to organize words and phrases to produce language that
really sounds natural, the type of language that we seldom if ever teach from our textbooks, and
that our students often surprise us with by acquiring on their own, outside our classrooms. It is
the difference between “I understand” which we teach and “I see” or “I get it” which we don’t.
As English language teachers, we tend to think of the future as a grammar lesson. But the future
can also be thought of as movement, direction and even as a container. The future is forward.
And if the future is forward, then the past is… behind! The same for progress. Achievement is
up, decline is down. The same for proper conduct. Direction is very relevant to numbers. Sales
are up! Down! Soaring! Plummeting! Sky-high! Rock-bottom! Through the roof!
Not to mention that the future may relate to the horizon.
Saudis will spend the night out in the desert on full-moon nights, and spend a night out around a
bonfire in the winter. Like Russians, they enjoy searching for mushrooms in season, except in
their case they are hunting for desert truffles. In Saudi Arabia a young man might walk miles to
get from one place to another. While walking, he will notice the ashes of old campfires, and the
Page 8 of 1574
footprints of those who have walked the path before him. He will pay attention to the weather,
and to the light. If he is out past sunset and has planned ahead and carried some wood, he might
light a fire for warmth or companionship, and notice other such lights on the horizon, or across a
valley, and he will notice the stars in the sky. Such a person will already know the physical bases
of words like trail, fire, footprint, beacon, weather, and star and will feel the shock of
recognition in their figurative and metaphorical usages.
The figurative and the literal can become controversial, as the following examples attest:
• A few days after 9/11, President George W. Bush’s use of the word crusade was widely
questioned when he said to the nation: “This crusade, this war on terrorism, is going to
take a while...”
• In 2011 in the US, the elected politician Gabrielle Giffords and others were shot after
Giffords' district had been targeted on a map with cross-hairs by an ideological opponent.
In a coda, in 2019, Roger Stone apologized to Judge Amy Berman Jackson for posting an
Instagram photo of her next to a rifle scope’s crosshair. She said, “Roger Stone fully
understands the power of words and the power of symbols... There’s nothing ambiguous
about a crosshairs.” And in a coda to that coda, in 2022 a court heard a case involving
that original cross-hairs symbol and The New York Times.
• In 2020, after the Trump campaign called on volunteers to monitor the vote, Sheryl
Sandberg, the COO of Facebook, said, “I think what people are worried about in this ad
is that he says ‘army of supporters’... We believe the language ‘army of supporters’ is not
really calling for an army but is calling on people who are normal campaign volunteers.”
• In 2021, President Trump, after losing his bid for reelection, said, “And they’re not taking
the White House, we’re going to fight like hell...” His supporters would later storm the
U.S. Capitol, resulting in his second impeachment and trial, with much debate about
political speech. “Are we going to put every politician in jail, are we going to impeach
every politician who has used the words fight figuratively in a speech? Shame!” said
Senator Rand Paul. Said Michael Van Der Veen, from the floor of the Senate at the
impeachment trial, “The reality is, Mr. Trump was not in any way, shape or form
instructing these people to fight, or to use physical violence. What he was instructing
them to do was to challenge their opponents...”
Figurative usage is not just important in politics. Wall Street "mines" newspaper articles and
tweets for the figurative usage of words like abyss—as in "Greece is at the edge of a financial
abyss”—which can spark declines in the market. In language, the idea of substance can be
associated with weight, and cognitive linguists have conducted experiments based on the idea
that the actual thickness and weight of something, like a paper file, can influence people's
attitudes about the substance of a person.
Page 9 of 1574
Metaphor is nothing new: the ancient Greeks discussed it. Wilfred Funk, Litt. D., in his book
Word Origins (published by Grosset & Dunlap, New York, 1950), wrote, “Up and down are two
other strange words that tie into the mysteries of space and even of religion and our human ideas
of values,” in the chapter entitled “word oddities,” and he goes on to explain and give good
examples. In 1836, Ralph Waldo Emerson wrote, “Light and darkness are our familiar
expression for knowledge and ignorance... Visible distance behind and before us, is respectively
our image of memory and hope.” (Nature, Chapter 4, “Language”). Cognitive linguists speak of
metaphors like these as BAD IS DOWN, GOOD IS UP, KNOWLEDGE IS VISION, PAST IS BEHIND EGO,
and FUTURE IS IN FRONT OF EGO.
For students learning English, this dictionary should help them learn the figurative uses of words.
The entry word is, in most cases, a basic one. The collocations are rarely more than two or three
words, slightly harder, and the exemplary fragments and sentences are a bit harder yet. This basic
English (to include figurative language) is the foundation for all those other Englishes: academic
English, aviation English, business English, medical English, military English, scientific English,
technical English, English for Peace and Conflict Studies, etc.
It took decades for the fruits of research on collocation to get into our curriculums, materials, and
dictionaries. The Oxford Collocations Dictionary finally appeared in 2002, and the revised and
updated version of the military curriculum I taught for so many years in Saudi Arabia—the
American Language Course (ALC) created by the Defense Language Institute (DLI)—currently
contains many excellent exercises based on collocation. Both were a long time coming. It is my
hope that the next big effort for the ALC/DLI and in language teaching in general will be to
incorporate the figurative uses of words into curriculums, textbook exercises, and learner’s
dictionaries.
Page 10 of 1574
60+ common metaphors
These metaphors are based on the work and represent a lot of language. The bolded words are
categories in the thesaurus and the italicized words have entries in the dictionary. The first
metaphor relates the hand to attainment and possession. A hand, of course, can relate to many
other things: see the category hand in the thesaurus for the many things a hand can relate to. But
the hand relating to attainment and possession is a common metaphor.
1. The hand can relate to attainment and also to possession: “It was in my hands, but it slipped
through my fingers and now it is forever out of my grasp / reach.”
2. Sleep can relate to consciousness & awareness: “The government is sleeping, and our
politicians need to wake up.” So can the eye: “A minority of clear-eyed scientists saw it
coming. Still, non-scientists were blindsided, and, when the catastrophe occurred, it was a
real eye-opener.”
3. Royalty often relates to the superlative: Burger King; Mattress King; Aretha, the Queen of
Soul; “aristocratic wine at democratic prices” (an advertisement); “Banff, the Canadian
National Park, is the crown jewel of the system.”
4. A name relates to reputation: “Life is for one generation; a good name is forever.” “You
have blackened our name.” “That company has a good name.”
5. A horse can relate to control & lack of control: “We need to rein in galloping / runaway
inflation.” “Hydroelectric dams harness the power of rivers.”
6. Mining can relate to searching & discovery: “I began to dig into the old case and uncovered
some interesting facts. Not all the leads panned out. It was in the old police case file,
however, that I struck gold.”
7. The family commonly relates to relationship and to division & connection: “Intelligence
officers have always held an orphan / stepchild position in the military compared to the
favorite son status of tacticians and logistics officers.”
8. Language from the military and weapon categories is often linked to conflict and
accusation & criticism: “Facing sniping from his own party and a fusillade of criticism from
the opposition, he has fired a broadside in his defense.”
9. The theater often relates to development, and also attention, scrutiny & promotion, and
performance: “It is only the first act of the legal drama, but already the spotlight has
focused on jury selection. The trial promises to be quite a show.”
10. Chess often relates to strategy: “It’s a geopolitical chess game and the pawns in the struggle
have no idea what the endgame will be.”
11. A table can relate to position, policy & negotiation: sit down at the table; on the table; off
the table; come back to the table; turn the tables. Also inclusion & exclusion: a seat at the
table.
12. Movement and direction can relate to action, inaction & delay and progress & lack of
progress: “We’ve got to move, and we’ve got to move forward, not sideways or backwards.”
13. The center & periphery often relate to society: mainstream; center; fringe, on the margins.
14. Height can relate to importance & significance and primacy, currency, decline &
obsolescence and superiority & inferiority: “LeBron James is literally and figuratively a
Page 11 of 1574
towering figure at the height of his career, at the very pinnacle of success, head and
shoulders above his rivals. And while his star may now be at its zenith, it must be that every
star will set.”
15. Journeys & trips can represent life. After college, you set out / embark on a course. You
encounter crossroads or forks in the road and choose your direction. You might follow in
someone else’s footsteps or blaze your own trail. You will cross that bridge when you come
to it, encounter obstacles in your path and take shortcuts and detours. Milestones along the
way might include marriage, children, and promotions. Life can be a hard slog, and some fall
by the wayside. But hopefully you will be happy and content when you reach the end of the
road, especially if you are one of those who took “the [road] less travelled by.”
16. A line often relates to behavior: “You are out of line. You have crossed the line. You are
over the line. You have crossed a red line.”
17. An animal can relate to predation, especially a lion, wolf or shark: “Famine still stalks the
inhabitants of the Sahel.” “If you are not a wolf, a wolf will eat you.” “His critics are circling,
they can smell blood in the water, and they are out for blood.”
18. Smell often relates to evidence and corruption: “I began sniffing out government corruption.
And when I got wind of the business deal, I immediately detected something fishy.
Something stank, and by the time I had finished my investigation, the stench filled my
nostrils.”
19. Affliction can relate to a creature (like a ghost) and health & medicine and to a mark (like
a scar): “He was never able to exorcise the ghosts of Afghanistan, heal his emotional
wounds, and the mental scars of his service are still livid, raw and itchy.”
20. A weight or a burden can relate to oppression: “I was weighed down by a heavy load of
debt that I knew I would never be able to get out from under, and the repossession of my car
was the last straw.”
21. Health & medicine can relate to the condition & status of something: The economy is on
life support / moribund / weak / recovering / healthy / robust, etc.
22. Ruins can relate to destruction. “Even though my company had collapsed, and my
reputation was in ruins, I began to rebuild.”
23. Water can relate to the size and force of movement: “The number of asylum seekers began
as a trickle or stream and is now a flood. A groundswell of immigration is threatening to
inundate the border, and those opposed to migration are characterizing it as a tsunami.”
24. Rain, a storm, a wind, or natural disasters like an avalanche, a landslide, an earthquake,
or tsunami, and great forces like a volcano, a river, the sea, a fire, a wave and water often
relate to amount and effect: an avalanche / blizzard / firestorm / flood / deluge / landslide /
tidal wave / tsunami / storm / surge of criticism, protest, etc.
25. Direction and height can relate to behavior and character & personality: “An upright man
always takes the high road and does not get down in the gutter or in the mud with his
enemies of low repute. To such a man, morality is straightforward, and his opposite is a
snake, taking a twisted path.”
26. Astronomy can relate to the idea of primacy, currency, decline & obsolescence: “One
boxer’s star is rising, the current champion’s star is at its zenith, while the former champ’s
star is setting.”
Page 12 of 1574
27. Books & reading can relate to development: “When I graduated from university, it was
time to close the book on that stage of my life, turn the page, and start a new chapter in my
life.”
28. Food & drink often relates to consumption: “I developed a taste for exploration as a young
boy. I gorged on the books of explorers, I devoured them, I drank in / lapped up / gobbled up
adventure stories and digested their lessons learned, and my appetite for them was insatiable.
Soon I began taking little voyages of my own about the neighborhood and developed a taste
for freedom. In fact, I became a glutton for it.”
29. Sports & games commonly relate to competition: the contest of measure and
countermeasure (warfare); the space race; we are ahead of them; we must not fall behind;
they are outpacing us and we will have to do better to keep up; when it comes to global
warming, there will be winners and losers; she is jockeying for position; he is the frontrunner, etc.
30. A season can relate to growth & development and decline: “I am in the autumn of my life;”
nuclear winter; the Arab Spring...
31. The day can relate to past & present and future: in the old days; back in the day; those
days; yesterday; these days; nowadays; a new day; in the coming days, “hopes and dreams for
a better tomorrow.”
32. Hygiene is related, too often in a sinister way, to violence and concealment & lack of
concealment: a military “cleanup” operation; ethnic cleansing; “wash the filthy scum off the
streets,” whitewash, sanitize, scrub, launder, etc.
33. Water (swimming and drowning) often relates to survival & endurance: “My first semester
at college, I felt like I was I out of my depth and drowning. I was just treading water, barely
able to keep my head above water and stay afloat. Letters from home were a real lifeline.
Things are much better now.”
34. Equilibrium is often related to disruption: “The company has shaken up the industry and
rattled the major players by overturning accepted assumptions and norms.” It is also related
to fairness: “The idea will tilt the balance and create an unequal playing field.”
35. Temperature can relate to feeling, emotion & effect: “Relations between the two countries,
previously frosty, have begun to thaw, but they can in no way be described as warm yet.”
36. Direction up or down can relate to feeling, emotion & effect: “You look downhearted.
Cheer up! I can see you need a lift. Let’s do something to raise your spirits.”
37. A clock and the time of day can relate to timeliness & lack of timeliness. So can a window:
“We had better hurry. The clock is ticking. It’s no longer early in the morning, it’s late in the
day. We’re in a race with the clock now, and the clock is winding down. Our window of
opportunity is closing fast.”
38. Natural obstacles can relate figuratively to obstacles & impedance: headwind; shoal;
morass; mud; quagmire; quicksand; thicket; logjam; snag, etc.
39. A desert or oasis or jungle or swamp or island or sea and other geographical features are
often used figuratively to describe an environment. “Too many urban areas are food deserts
with little access to fresh food.” “It’s a jungle out there, be careful.” “The area is an island of
affluence in a sea of squalor.” “We must drain the swamp of Congress.” The air, the
Page 13 of 1574
atmosphere and the climate can be used to talk about environment in general. “There is
tension in the air / atmosphere, and a climate of fear.”
40. A plant and farming & agriculture are often related to growth & development:
“Christianity found fertile ground in the Philippines, where the seeds the missionaries
planted took root and flourished / flowered / bore fruit.”
41. Standing, sitting & lying can relate to many things, including dominance & submission,
and resistance, opposition, & defeat, and also action, inaction & delay. These meanings
are often combined in a series: “We can’t take this lying down. Why are we just sitting on
our hands? We can’t stand by any longer. It’s time to stand up and make a stand.”
42. Health & medicine; addiction; love, courtship & marriage; and religion can all relate to
enthusiasm: “I’m crazy about dragonflies”; “Adrenaline junkies risk life and limb at the X
games for their sports”; “To meet a walrus is to fall in love with a walrus” (a walrus
researcher); “It’s a bit of a disease” (Jay Leno on his vehicle collection); “Mountains are
truly cathedrals” (the great “Big” Jim Whittaker, climber). The opening line of Norman
Maclean’s book A River Runs Through It reads, “In our family, there was no clear line
between religion and fly fishing.”
43. The Galapagos Islands have become an epithet for the biodiversity of endemic species. The
fascinating Yemeni island of Socotra has been called the “Galapagos of the Indian Ocean.”
Alaska’s Pribilof Islands are known as the Galapagos of the North. In Unesco’s World
Heritage Site citation, Lake Baikal in eastern Russia is referred to as the Galapagos of
Russia. The Hawaiian Islands Marine National Park has been referred to as the American
Galapagos, and the Haida Gwaii have been referred to as the Canadian Galapagos.
44. Allusions from the Iliad & Odyssey relate to the following: attraction (siren); affliction
(hector); subterfuge (Trojan horse); journeys & trips (odyssey); message (Cassandra);
protection & lack of protection (Achilles’ heel), superlative (epic and Homeric), and
alternative & choices and danger (between Scylla and Charybdis). This vocabulary will
live in the language long after the details are forgotten.
45. Alcohol can relate to several things: activity (ferment); behavior (binge, drunk, and
inebriate); concealment & lack of concealment (bootleg and bootlegger); consciousness
and awareness) (black out); control and lack of control (drunk); feeling, emotion & effect
(hangover, intoxicate, intoxicate, intoxicating, sober, and sobering); mixture (cocktail); and
restraint & lack of restraint (binge, drunk, and inebriate). You don’t have to be a drinker to
be “drunk on power / success.”
46. Falling can relate to fate, fortune & chance. If you are on thin ice, you might fall through
the ice and drown. Likewise, when you go out on a limb, the limb might break and then you
will fall to the ground and die. If you are hanging on to your job by a thread, that thread
might break. If you are walking a tightrope, you might fall off and die. If you are teetering on
the edge of a precipice, you might fall and die. The sky can fall. If your head is on the
chopping block, the blade could fall on your neck and your head will roll. That blade might
be the Sword of Damocles. Or perhaps you are waiting for a shoe to drop or fall.
47. Cards can relate to fate, fortune & chance: “The cards were stacked against Rubin Carter
from birth. He was dealt a hand nobody could play. But by the luck of the draw, a
sympathetic judge was selected to try his final case of habeas corpus.”
Page 14 of 1574
48. A euphemism is often used for death. Expressions include pass away; the fallen; lose
(through death); resting place, etc. A set of sinister euphemisms relate to killing: liquidate;
encounter; “He was disappeared”; remove; take down, etc.
49. Money can relate to obligation: “The grateful nation owes a debt of gratitude to the
sacrifices of its military. We can never fully repay those who paid the ultimate price for our
freedom.”
50. Money is often related to cost & benefit. “I made a costly mistake, I paid a price for my
mistake, it took a toll on me, but in the end I profited from it, though it took years and years
before I understood what exactly the payoff was.”
51. Society can relate to a person like a leper, castaway, outcast, pariah, and hermit. Such
people might find themselves separated from the mainland, on an island, in the wilderness,
left out in the cold, outside of the tent, on the fringe, on the far shore, etc.
52. Noise and movement are often related to activity: The factory floor was a beehive of
activity, swarming with workers, with machines large and small humming and buzzing.
53. Gesture can relate to feeling, emotion & effect: “The latest college admissions scandal has
some people shaking their heads, others rolling their eyes, and a few wringing their hands.”
54. Cloth can relate to division & connection: “We are used to traveling around on an
interwoven, tight-knit, seemingly seamless system of highways. But some strands have
become frayed.” So can a rope: “A nation is bound / tied together by its system of roads.”
55. Containers can relate to situations: “I got into trouble, I was in a tight spot, trapped,
desperate to get out.” However, a situation is more and more considered to be a place: “I was
in a tight spot where I couldn’t figure a way out.”
56. Love, courtship & marriage can be connected to attraction & repulsion and to pursuit,
capture & escape: “She was the darling of Wall Street, she had no problem wooing and
seducing eager investors—including ex-generals, one ex-president, Henry Kissinger, and two
nationally important families—and she had the media swooning.”
57. Sound can represent conflict: “His comments caused an uproar and howls of protest, with
many clamoring for an apology, and outcries for his resignation.” Actual warfare, past and
present, is associated with sound.
58. An explosion or a weapon from the military can represent danger: On a bad day academia
can be a minefield full of booby traps, trip wires and hidden landmines.”
59. Verbs of hitting, slamming and lashing are often related to the force of a storm like a
hurricane or tornado: “The hurricane battered the island with a horrific storm surge,
pummeled inland areas with winds and rain, and knocked out the power grid before moving
on to clobber the mainland.”
60. Direction (up and down) can relate to hierarchy. “When I started out in my job, I started out
at the bottom. I was low man on the totem pole, and literally everyone in the company was
over me. With hard work and perseverance, I began to rise up. I began to climb the career
ladder. When my superiors realized I wanted to take care of those under me, and not just
please my higher-ups, I rose even higher. Today I am not at the top of the pyramid, but I am
very happy where I am, and I am ready to assume additional responsibility.”
Page 15 of 1574
61. Religion often relates to message: He has used his bully pulpit to preach the gospel of
American exceptionalism, and his crusade has been wildly popular, particularly when he
preaches to members of the choir.
62. Sensation can relate to feeling, emotion & effect: “That guy is irritating, he rubs me the
wrong way.” “Yeah, he can be abrasive. But you’re too sensitive, you need to develop
thicker skin.”
63. An animal often relates to conflict: You can bristle, get your back up, and stand your
ground. You might then go head to head and butt heads, or lock horns with someone. You
might be out for blood, smell blood, and draw blood. Or you might give ground, turn tail and
run, or lie down and roll over.
64. Attention, scrutiny & promotion can relate to explosion, light & dark, and sound. Most
Americans, and every child, delight in these three things simultaneously every Fourth of July.
Not necessarily dogs, or recent combat veterans. And so our internet influencers skyrocket to
success and things blow up on the internet.
65. For the younger generation, situation, time, and development have become a place. This
recognizes the ubiquitous use of “where” but in no way explains it.
66. A very contemporary language of justice and activism has arisen in the United States and
spread around the world. I have identified the following eight tropes: (1) Raising
consciousness, personal affirmation, ways to be positive, to reclaim previously demeaning
terms: “Stepping or leaning into one’s own truth,” “lived experience,” “Get woke, stay
woke,” agency, “Now that’s what I call fierce!” etc. (2) Physical and mental malaise, pain,
and danger: Black pain, the exhaustion and danger of driving while black, “low income and
marginalized students will suffer the most,” “the trauma of life that makes one want to fight,”
etc. (3) Presence and absence, visibility and invisibility, and erasure: “White people don’t see
us,” “They have been rendered invisible,” whitewashing, etc. (4) Like (people like us /
groups) and look like (look like me, etc.): “There aren’t a lot of people that look like us that
are on the air, there aren’t a lot of people with our voice and our experiences,” etc. (5) Space:
occupy space, reclaim or retake space, safe spaces, welcoming spaces, exclusive spaces for
women, gay spaces, etc. (6) Attention: “We’re a small minority, we had to make some
noise,” “Say it loud and say it proud,” “Say their names,” knee (take a knee), etc. (7)
Empowerment and representation: more hip-hop at Coachella, taking control of the
narrative, etc. (8) Inclusion and its controversies: questioning others’ Blackness, who gets to
use the N word, controversy over the expression of joy, performative allyship,
appropriation, tokenism, representation vs. equity, whether or not the fetishization of Black
hair trivializes Black people, “the contradictions and problems inherent to the politics of
representation,” etc.
This sort of language is collected and categorized in the thesaurus at inclusion & exclusion:
society. It acknowledges language like the following:
“I was exhausted with the culture of country music not ever creating space for people
who look like me. Both artists and fans are shut out from the industry, so I felt like it was
important to create a space where we felt safe and welcome.”
Page 16 of 1574
That’s Holly G on why she created The Black Opry, an online platform. From “How Black
women reclaimed country and Americana music in 2021” by Andrea Williams, Marcus
Dowling, and Jewly Hight, NPR, December 14, 2021.
Page 17 of 1574
Collocation
Why compile a dictionary of collocations for words used figuratively, and not just a thesaurus?
As Susan Hunston noted in a personal communication, “The crucial point that metaphoric uses
are distinguished by collocation has...been made, most notably by Prof Alice Deignan of Leeds
University.” Of course, every word is characterized by its collocations, and collocation is key for
use. But the collocations of words used figuratively and literally can differ.
Pitfall, entered in this work in hunting, and danger, and also walking, running & jumping, is
an interesting word and worth discussing in terms of collocation. Like many words, most of us
will only encounter this word in its figurative sense. People around the world still hunt and trap
for a living, but most of them use more modern methods. I can only imagine that it takes a lot of
work and time to dig a pitfall, unlike the fictional pitfall from “The Most Dangerous Game” by
Richard Connell, a short story I taught as the ESL co-teacher of a high-school language-arts
class. What I know about these old methods of catching animals comes from films like Chang: A
Drama of the Wilderness (1927) in which animals were most definitely harmed, or a book like
Dersu the Trapper by V.K. Arseniev, when he writes about ludevas, or game fences. As he
explains it, instinct impels an animal towards water or a salt lick. A game barrier prevents the
animal from going in the direction it wants to go. So the animal walks along the fence,
eventually coming to an opening in the fence it can get through. It is there that the trapper has
dug the pitfall, and the animal falls in.
The main collocating verbs for a literal pitfall would be dig, cover, fall into and fill in: a hunter
must first dig a pitfall and then cover it and hope that an animal falls into it, and when he leaves
the area, he should fill in the pitfall so as not to deplete the stock of game in a wasteful manner.
Like the word hole, adjectives might be deep or shallow. In a series with and or a comma linking
it to similar words, an attested example is “pitfalls, deadfalls, and snares.” Trap, pitfall, and
snare are often used figuratively, but deadfall seems to have fallen by the wayside.
For a figurative pitfall, important collocating verbs are: identify, avoid, navigate and skirt. This
makes sense as a series. Skate around, an attested example, makes me question the writer’s
mental image of an actual pitfall, even if skate is being used figuratively. A figurative pitfall can
await the unwary. Common adjectives for a figurative pitfall are almost always classifying: a
medical / clinical / diagnostic / constitutional / legal pitfall. (Our curriculums tend to do a
horrible job of teaching classifying adjectives.) Or adjectives relate to significance: biggest /
greatest / main / major / important pitfall. Or possibility and frequency: a common / possible /
potential pitfall. A common preposition for “pitfall + preposition” is in: pitfalls in diagnosis /
evaluation / interpretation / management, etc.
Similar words used figuratively to express danger include: bomb, booby trap, landmine, line of
fire, minefield, powder keg, and tripwire, all from the military domain. A less used but perfectly
apt word is “third rail” which refers to trains, electricity, and electrocution: “Social security
reform / gun control is the third rail of US politics.”
Page 18 of 1574
Epithets
Most of us learned epithets like “Rosy Fingered Dawn” (The Iliad) and “The Whale Road” and
the “The Swan Road” (Beowulf) in high-school literature courses. In the early 1900s, when
whaling, walrusing and sealing were still big industries, writers would refer to important and
powerful men as the “great whales of their profession.” Times have changed. Nowadays, we use
epithets like “Mick (a blue terrier) is the Michael Jordan of the dog-show world” and “We know
that Bolivia / Afghanistan can become the Saudi Arabia of lithium” and “Majid Abdullah, the
Pele of the desert...” and “The fight against Tamil rebels was Sri Lanka’s Vietnam.” In this work
epithets are recorded in the dictionary, and they are collected in the thesaurus in the category
epithet.
Epithets commonly occur in the form, “the X of Y.” Mick (a blue terrier) is the Michael Jordan
of the dog-show world. The Pribilofs are known as the Galapagos of the North.
Alternatives include “(the) Adj + X.” The adjective might be an adjective of nationality. The
Haida Gwaii Islands have been referred to as the Canadian Galapagos. The Hawaiian Islands
Marine National Park is the American Galapagos. “He studied counterinsurgency at Duntroon,
the Australian West Point.” Or the adjective might be a color. In the early 19th century, in
northwestern Illinois, lead was referred to as gray gold. In the 19th century the white gold was
guano, in the 21st century it is lithium. Oil is frequently referred to as black gold, and so are the
wonderful Khawlani coffee beans, picked red but dried until black, in Saudi Arabia’s Jazan
province. And it is possible that the blue gold of the future will be bulk water shipments to arid
countries. Cobalt has also been referred to as “blue gold.”
Yet another pattern is “(the) Possessive s + X.” The coral Triangle has been called the Ocean’s
Amazon. “Why Eritrea is called Africa’s North Korea.” Hubei Province is China’s new Ruhr
Valley. The Bali bombing was Australia’s 9/11.
Epithets are commonly introduced by called: Why Eritrea is called Africa’s North Korea (The
Economist magazine); West Virginia has been called the Saudi Arabia of coal; the Great Bear
Rain Forest is often called the Amazon of the North; Cerén is sometimes called the Pompeii of
the New World (El Salvador); Borneo and its forests are sometimes called the lungs of Southeast
Asia.
Or there is the variation with so-called: Kamuzu Academy in Malawi is the so-called “Eaton of
Africa.”
Or considered (to be): the Andrea Doria is considered the Mount Everest of wreck diving;
Chulachomklao Royal Military Academy is considered to be Thailand’s West Point.
Described as can be used: the campaign is often described as the Stalingrad of the East (Battles
of Kohima and Imphal in World War II).
Or dubbed: Northern California’s Salinas Valley is often dubbed America’s salad bowl;
Xiyuangualu lychees were dubbed “the king of fruit”; Travis Patriquin has been dubbed the T.E.
Lawrence of Iraq.
Page 19 of 1574
Known is quite common: he is known as Korea’s Great Gatsby for his lavish lifestyle (Big
Bang’s Seungri); the Pribilofs are known as the Galapagos of the North; Ibrahim Rugova was
known as the Gandhi of the Balkans; Bhutan, once known as the hermit kingdom of the
Himalayas; the crash landing became known as the Miracle on the Hudson (Flight 1549).
Or refer to can be used: Unesco’s citation refers to Lake Baikal as the “Galapagos of Russia”; El
Paso is often referred to as the Ellis Island of the Southwest.
Finally, said to be: the Palestinians are sometimes said to be the Jews of the Arab world.
Note the tendency for the use of the passive, and the various adverbs of frequency.
Epithets often relate / compare (1) people to people (Ibrahim Rugova was known as the Gandhi
of the Balkans) (2) geographical places and areas to geographical places and areas (Pipeline on
the North Shore of Oahu is the Mount Everest of surfing waves) (3) institutions to institutions
(Kamuzu Academy in Malawi is the so-called “Eaton of Africa”) and (4) events to events (the
Kuta Beach bombing was Australia’s 9/11).
Epithets can be quite thought provoking and the points of similarity (and dissimilarity) are
always open for discussion and debate.
Consider Vietnam used as an epithet. That war has been compared to Egypt’s intervention in
Yemen, which occurred at the same time; Soviet intervention in Afghanistan in the 1980s;
British involvement in that same country in 2006; and the Sri Lankan Civil War (1983-2009).
Both Colin Kaepernick and Meghan Rapinoe have been described as their generation’s
Muhammed Ali.
Such diverse peoples as Indo-Caribbean immigrants, Palestinians, Chinese, and Latinos have all
been characterized as Jews, respectively of the Caribbean, the Arab world, the Far East, and of
the 21st century. While the primary meaning relates to diaspora, nuances are certainly involved
in every case.
Epithets for geographical places are quite common. Beautiful cities are often compared to a
pearl: Manila, the Pearl of the Orient; Dubrovnik, the Pearl of the Adriatic, etc. One of my
favorite epithets is the one for Lake Baikal, “the Blue Eye of Siberia.” On the BBC news world
map, you can just see it to the east of the larger Black and Caspian Seas and the smaller Lake
Balkhash. My eye never fails to note it due to its beautiful epithet. In every respect it is an
amazing lake. It even has archipelagoes. I would love to visit the Blue Eye of Siberia one day.
Finally, epithets often relate to royalty: Aretha Franklin, the Queen of Soul; Pat’s King of
Steaks; John George Bartholomew, the Prince of Cartography. Or to the family: Mohammad Ali
Jinnah, the father of Pakistan; James Brown, the Godfather of Soul.
Page 20 of 1574
Persons
A name for a person can figuratively relate to many things, especially a role. These names come
from a number of domains.
A person might relate to an occupation. A butcher is associated with oppression, warfare, and
slaughter, even though the friendly butchers at the supermarket where I buy my meat seem to be
perfectly normal, friendly and helpful folks. We should all be a good steward of the land, even if
we don’t work on ships, trains, or airplanes. You can be an ambassador without being a member
of the State Department, as Mike Tyson was when he visited China to promote boxing.
“Adjuncts are the field hands of education” doesn’t mean that adjuncts literally labor in the fields
and pick crops. It means that they stoop to gain employment, get their hands dirty teaching actual
classes, do all the heavy lifting, have little control over what they are paid, work seasonally, and
usually have to travel a lot.
The names for members of a family used figuratively is a large category, no surprise, as the
family is basic to every society. Some of the connotations seem as if they came from 19th
century England as written about by Dickens, or from fairy tales. An orphan is bereft: “We need
to develop orphan drugs for orphan diseases.” A stepchild is neglected: “Intelligence officers
have always held a stepchild position.” The favorite son is favored: “Obama was welcomed to
Ireland like a favorite son.” The stepmother is evil and hates the poor stepdaughter: “The EU is a
heartless stepmother trying to drive Greece out of the family.” Mother and father commonly
relate to creation: “Cokie Roberts, a founding mother of NPR” and “Ibrahim Rugova, the father
of Kosovo...” Is it any surprise that twin represents connection? “The South’s familiar twins,
temperature and humidity...”
When we talk about society, we often use the words outcast, leper or pariah for those who are
shunned and marginalized. Or castaway, like those poor unfortunates on Tromelin Island in the
Indian Ocean. Or hermit, for those who voluntarily or involuntarily withdraw, like the Japanese
hikikimori, or modern-day hermits.
Persons who are mentioned in regards to the future and making predictions include fortuneteller,
oracle, prophet, soothsayer, and seer.
From the experience many of us had in our grade school and tweens and teens come babysitter,
bully, coach, chaperon, cheerleader, den mother, golden girl / boy and grownup.
And many persons come from the domain of religion: acolyte, choirboy, convert, crusader,
devotee, disciple, evangelist, guru, heretic, iconoclast, martyr, missionary, oracle, prophet, and
soothsayer. A subset of these persons relate to message, no surprise, as every religion has its
message.
All of the italicized words in this section have their entries in the dictionary, along with their
collocations and exemplary sentences or fragments.
Page 21 of 1574
The “container” metaphor
An expression like, “He has love / hatred in his heart for...” serves to remind us that the heart can
be thought of as a container, just like a pitcher or a glass, based on the preposition in.
We have cognitive linguists to thank for identifying the container metaphor, and any ESL / EFL
teacher will recognize its explanatory worth for idioms related to the heart, such as “I poured my
heart into the job,” “I poured my heart out to her,” “She fills my heart with joy and laughter,”
“The government wants to instill / put fear into the people’s hearts,” “They have goodness / hate
/ joy in their hearts,” “We’re going to hold / keep Lori Piestewa in our hearts forever,” etc.
Idioms like these do not seem so arbitrary, random or odd when we think of the heart as being a
container.
A situation is often thought of as a container: I got in / into trouble and I don’t know how to get
out. I’m in the doghouse at work. I got in hot water with the boss. We’re in a tight spot.
Feelings and emotions can be thought of as being inside a container: Don’t hold it in. Don’t
bottle it up. Pent-up frustrations can lead to violence. Open up. Let it out. I felt drained / empty. I
felt a sense of emptiness (depression).
The container metaphor, while extremely interesting and useful, is not perfect. For example, the
mind is a container in an expression like, “What do you have in mind?” or “He is close-minded,”
or “Try to keep an open mind.” But the mind can be more like a platform in an expression like
“What’s on your mind?” This can be discussed with students.
Page 22 of 1574
Grammatical metaphor, fictive verbs, etc.
Angela Downing, in English Grammar: A University Course (Third Edition), devotes Chapter 27
to grammatical metaphor. She explains what that is, and gives good explanations for
restatements that are not “typical.” She also gives excellent examples in that chapter, such as
“Our evening walk along the river took us to Henley” and “August 12 found the travellers in
Rome” (her examples) in which take and find are not used in their normal senses. Based on her
work, I have included the following categories:
Fictive communication verbs include: say, tell, read, and telegraph. “The sign said, “Do not
enter.” “The data told us there was a problem.” “His watch read 2 PM” “The film telegraphs to
the audience that...” Read especially collocates with gauges and dials. There are many more
verbs like these.
Fictive motion. These verbs include go, run, and follow and are used for things like paths, trails,
rivers, roads, ropes, etc. that are essentially lines. Of course, there are many more such verbs. In
her wonderful article, “Fictive motion in the context of mountaineering,” Ekaterina Egorova
identifies over 70 fictive motion verbs from the world of mountaineering.
Fictive position. These are verbs that relate to position: stand, sit and lie. “The house sat on a
hill,” “A lamp stood in the corner,” “The city lies in a valley.” They make a nice teaching set and
can be taught as alternatives when we teach the “there” construction lesson.
Fictive meeting & seeing includes verbs like meet, encounter, find, see, and witness. This takes
care of Downing’s examples, “August 12 found the travellers in Rome,” and “The last decade
has witnessed an unprecedented rise in agricultural technology.” An attested example included in
this work is, “23 May saw over 250 climbers trying to summit Mount Everest.” Clearly, the use
of find, see, and witness collocates with a date or period of time at the subject position.
Fictive possession includes verbs like capture, grab, grip, hold, possess, and seize. “Now that
we have captured your imagination, don’t make us come after the rest of you” is a clever TV
advertisement from the Eastern Band of the Cherokee Indian Nation promoting tourism.
Fictive transportation verbs include ones like take, carry, transport, bring, etc. This is how I
have categorized “Our evening walk along the river took us to Henley.”
The Part of speech category collects words not used in their traditional part of speech, including
nominalizations of verbs, a very important feature of grammatical metaphor, according to
Downing. Five contemporary and popular examples include “It looks bad” / “That’s not a good
look”; “When will she reveal her secret?” / “When will she make the big reveal?”; “What you
request will be difficult to fulfill” / “That’s a big ask,” ; “Chris Boswell doesn’t panic” / “Chris
Boswell doesn’t do panic” ; and “The company failed” / “It was a stunning fail (aeronautical
software).”
The idea of grammatical metaphor helps us notice, explain and teach these usages.
Page 23 of 1574
Past, present and future
We tend to think of the past & present and the future as lessons on grammar. But there are
plenty of figurative and metaphorical ways to express the past, present and future, and they are
all worth thinking about and mentioning to students.
A day can represent past, present and future. When we speak of the present, we can speak of
these days and nowadays. And when we speak of the past, we can say those days, or the old
days, or back in the day. When we speak of the future, we can say, “Tomorrow...”
The past, present and future is often thought of as movement based on a point of view. The
statements, “Winter is approaching / coming / on the way” and “the big day has arrived” imply
that things in the future come towards us. And that might be along a road: “When you don’t
know what’s coming down the pike, you worry.” We commonly use this idea for scheduled
events like deadlines, holidays, anniversaries, birthdays, seasons, etc. The idea is also expressed
in statements like “We will have to stay here for a time to come” and “There might be problems
in the coming months.”
But it can also seem like it is we who are moving toward the future: “We are approaching /
coming up on the fifth anniversary of...,” etc. And “we” can be extended to inanimate things we
would ordinarily never think of moving: “The region is heading towards war.”
Sometimes our forward movement makes it seem like we have all embarked on journeys &
trips: “Nobody knows what is on the road ahead.” “Your job will get easier down the road.”
And time can relate to things, like the horizon: “War is on the horizon.” Or a crystal ball and
fortune teller, especially in relation to predictions. The past can relate to a clock: “We don’t want
to turn back the clock.” Or a time capsule. Or a fossil or dinosaur for something or someone oldfashioned.
Like the idea of heart mentioned above, we can think of the future as a container: “Nobody
knows what is in the future.” “I wonder what the future holds.”
Way back in 1836 Emerson wrote, “Visible distance behind and before us, is respectively our
image of memory and hope.” (Nature, Chapter 4, “Language.”) No doubt he was thinking of
expressions like “Looking back on my life...” or “I’m looking forward to the wedding...” This
sounds very much like the PAST IS BEHIND EGO and FUTURE IS IN FRONT OF EGO metaphors of
today’s cognitive linguists.
I developed a special interest in Saudi Arabia in teaching language relating to the past, present
and future. That is because, like many places in the world, Saudi Arabia is modernizing swiftly
but unevenly. The past, present and future can all seem to exist in the same place at the same
time. Generations, tribes, areas of the country, and even young men of the same age who grew
up in the same place and tribe may be more modern, or less modern. As a teacher I donned the
role of an elder, and would often make my students laugh by referring to myself as a fossil, or a
dinosaur.
Page 24 of 1574
Allusions
In this work a list of allusions in contemporary use can be found at allusion, allusions to history
can be found at history, and allusions can also be noticed in the epithet category.
Adjectives that we often use for size are allusions: behemoth, Brobdingnagian, colossal,
gargantuan, Goliath, leviathan, Lilliputian, Olympian, Pharaonic, jumbo, etc. On National
Public Radio, I recently heard a commentator refer to Joe Biden as a political behemoth, which
created an image in my mind that made me laugh. The word jumbo comes from the name of an
Ethiopian elephant exhibited in the US and Canada by P.T. Barnum.
Other allusions come from old stories and children’s stories. The Goldilocks fairytale has given
us the modifier Goldilocks with the meaning of “just right” or “the sweet spot”: the Goldilocks
economy / place / principle / zone, etc. Cinderella relates to success in a phrase like “The school
has become a viral Cinderella story.”
Several allusions to Homer and the Iliad and the Odyssey can be found in this work in the
category Iliad & Odyssey. Five of them are very common: odyssey (the Mars Odyssey); Trojan
horse (viruses, worms and Trojan Horses in computing); Achilles’ heel (the knees are the skiers’
Achilles’ heel); epic (an epic day of surfing at Waimea Bay); and siren (seduced by the siren call
of technology). These allusions will be remembered long after the details are forgotten of where
each ship came from and who slew whom in what order.
In these strange times of fake news and the internet, it is interesting to consider contemporary
allusions to fantasy & reality: curiouser and curiouser; El Dorado; heffalump (creature);
Kafkaesque (adj), never-never land; quixotic (adj); rabbit hole; Twilight Zone; and Walter Mitty.
Three of these allude to Alice in Wonderland.
And contemporary allusions to oppression include: draconian; Gestapo; inquisition; Lord of the
Flies; McCarthy; McCarthyism, McCarthyite; Orwellian; pitchfork (oppression); procrustean;
reign of terror / fear; and witch-hunt.
Allusions reflect our more-or-less shared knowledge, memory, history, culture, and education.
Explaining allusions gives us a chance to teach and talk about many things besides just grammar
and vocabulary, including the biography and history of Jumbo the elephant.
In a North Carolina teacher-training class, an old biddy exhorted us to “go out and be the Johnny
Appleseed of books!” I took her exhortation to heart and am grateful to her for her advice.
In Saudi Arabia I was constantly amazed at what my Saudi military students knew and didn’t
know when it came to allusions.
Page 25 of 1574
Euphemisms
In this work a list of current euphemisms can be found in the category euphemism. We
commonly use euphemisms for death, sex, the body and bodily functions, and mental illness.
Euphemism is part and parcel of the technology we now cannot live without: “cookies,” “The
marketing industry calls them beacons or tags, critics describe them as being spy pixels,” etc.
And in US politics: “The Affordable Care Act,” even if many can’t afford it, and the cheery
sounding “Build Back Better Act”—would anyone build back worse? Of course in the military
and policing. The old political correctness movement is responsible for a whole host of
euphemisms: “crippled,” perfectly acceptable back in the day, has morphed to handicapped,
challenged, inconvenienced, and differently abled, along with the attendant discussion and
controversy along the way. People rail against the use of “retarded,” except, perhaps, at the
Supreme Court, where a legal determination of retardation will save a murderer from execution.
The photographer Thomas Joshua Cooper has noted, “The cardinal points are always,
historically, metaphors...” In the early part of the 20th century, “to go West” meant the
destruction of a thing or the death of a person. A member of a tank crew in World War I wrote,
“It’s a mile to your objective now, but it’s a mile of thrills... A one-pounder in a hedge scares
you with several well-placed shots before it ‘goes west’ [is destroyed].” Paul De Kruif, in his
book about public health titled Men Against Death, published in 1932, wrote about two doctors
who had died: “In 1912 it [Rocky Mountain spotted fever] had sneaked into [Dr. Thomas B.]
McClintic ... The Montana doctor, McCray...woke up with bloodshot eyes and an ache in his
bones. In ten days McCray had gone West to join McClintic.”
Why west? What was the origin of this euphemism? I am speculating, but I think it might have to
do with the idea of migration in its most broadest sense, of moving on. In the 19th century,
America was on the move, settling the continent to the Pacific. There were many dangers,
including disease, weather, violence, and accidents, especially drownings at river crossings. In
Ordeal of the Union, Allan Nevins tells of the son of John James Audubon comforting a dying
cholera victim on a wagon train in the Rio Grande Valley. “What hurts you, Ham?” Audubon
asked. “My wife and children hurt me, Mr. John,” the man replied. Even if the pioneers survived,
they might never be seen or heard from again back East. It would have been like they went West
and died.
Nowadays, nobody uses the euphemism “to go West” to mean that somebody has died or
something as been destroyed. “South” and “north,” however, continue to be used figuratively:
each one with numbers, and the former in respect to failure, accident & impairment and
decline. In this work, interesting quotations relating to the cardinal directions as metaphors can
be found at direction (symbol).
Contemporary euphemisms for death include: “He has passed (on).” We mourn his passing.”
“He is no longer with us.” “He has gone away (too soon).” “He is gone.” “We salute the fallen.”
“He gave his life.” “He lost his life.” “The suspect is deceased.” “He succumbed to the injuries
on the way to the hospital,” “He was pronounced,” etc. That last is astonishing, as it simply
drops the predicate adjective dead, as though mentioning that word would be impolite.
Page 26 of 1574
Very sinister euphemisms relate to hygiene. I taught English in Kosovo, and the phrase, “Ethnic
cleansing” always makes me shiver. If you make the trek to Ibrahim Rugova’s grave—a
beautiful, peaceful spot high up on a hill overlooking Pristina on one side and the countryside on
the other, where there is a park where mothers bring their babies and children to play and where
the elderly sit—on the walk up your will noticed a plaque commemorating the victims of a
massacre. Such plaques are ubiquitous across Kosovo. And on a street alongside that park, there
is a villa with a plaque identifying the villa as a place for the rehabilitation of torture victims...
While looking up at a window, I thought I saw a curtain move, and my hair turned greyer. Once,
on the walk down, I noticed a parked UN van and stopped to examine the sign on its side. The
van belonged to a forensic team that located the graves of executed Kosovars and tried to
identify the victims. The U.S. Fulbright Scholar at the university once said to me, “Why is there
a statue of a KLA guy with a Kalashnikov downtown? Why can’t they just get over it and move
on?” All I could think was, “Back home we’re still fighting the Civil War.”
The military is well known for euphemisms. When a military airplane crashed through the roof
of a civilian warehouse here in the U.S, a military spokesman said, “We have secured the
armaments package, which will be properly disposed of. Safety is our utmost priority.” An
aggressive reporter got him to belligerently admit that the “armaments package” consisted of live
rounds and missiles, which thankfully had not gone off in the fire. It is worth noting that
Americans troops have not been bombed from the air by enemy airplanes since the Korean War.
We have been very very lucky.
In the extraordinary documentary film A Sniper’s War the following exchange occurs: “What
does it mean ‘to do your job’?” / “To get rid of their snipers and gunners, so that our infantry can
move ahead.” / “What does it mean ‘get rid ‘ of them?” / “To eliminate. To kill.” In a report
about an ISIS cell, a reporter said, “The other two suspected members of this ISIS cell, by the
way, they are already off the board. Uh, the ringleader... was killed in a drone strike in 2015, and
the other was captured in Turkey, where he was tried, convicted and sentenced to prison...”
In the U.S., the police are a paramilitary organization, with corresponding language, as
exemplified by an extract from a press release: “The officer involved in this particular OIS was
wearing his BWC, which captured the OIS as it occurred... In the coming days, the... Department
will be releasing our second Critical Incident Community Briefing, explaining what occurred
during the OIS on July 5, 2019.” From such language you would never guess that the press
release concerned the case of a 17-year-old girl who was shot to death after being pulled over for
speeding. (An OIS is an officer-involved shooting and a BWC is a body-worn camera.)
Similarly, a police spokesman recently told reporters, “Our special assignments unit, also known
as the SWAT Team, responded and attempted to work towards a tactical resolution of the
incident...” During this “incident,” nine cops were shot or hit by shrapnel in an ambush, two
people died, and a baby was rescued from a doorstep.
Even public officials grow sick and tired of their euphemisms. Police Chief James Cervera of the
Virginia Beach Police Department said the following at a press conference, after a mass shooting
on May 31, 2019.
Page 27 of 1574
“Right now we have a lot of questions. The whys, they will come later. Right now, we have more
questions really than we have answers. We are a little more than two hours into this event. And
we use the word event, that’s a cop term, this devastating incident that happened, that none of us
want to be here talking about, this devastating incident which is going to change the lives of a
number of families from our city.”
Page 28 of 1574
Gestures and bodily reactions
In 1836 Emerson wrote, “supercilious [means] the raising of the eyebrow (Nature, Chapter 4,
“Language”). Using his pattern, we could say that attention means the turning of the head,
confusion the scratching of the head, surprise the popping of the eyes, etc.
Every culture has its gestures, and gestures are an important nonverbal way to communicate.
Gestures can relate to such basic meanings as signaling yes and no, or signaling a moving car to
stop for you. I once noticed a book at a yard sale with the interesting title How To Speak Italian.
Curious because it was so thin and one of my brothers lives in Italy, I picked it up and opened it
up. It simply consisted of photographs of Italians making gestures, with text explaining what
those gestures meant. I laughed, because it does seem to me that the Italians have a lot of unique
gestures.
But gestures, and the meaning of those gestures that are lexicalized in language, are not shared in
every country. A person who reads, “He received the thumbs up on his proposal” must know that
“thumbs up” refers to a positive judgment to understand the message. A person who reads, “His
statement left a lot of people scratching their heads” must know that the gesture relates to
incomprehension, even though no one actually does it. A person who hears, “I’ll keep my fingers
crossed,” must know that that gesture relates to hope and fate. Or that “to roll up one’s sleeves”
means to get to work (not every culture wears clothing similar to ours.) Language associated
with gestures or a bodily reaction can confuse even those within the same country. For example,
a Northerner in the US might take a second to process the meaning of a statement like, “When I
heard what happened, I got chill bumps,” as said by a person from the southern Appalachians.
And gestures and particularly bodily reactions are often used to express emotional effect. If the
performance of a person in a play was wonderful, I might say it was breathtaking or it took my
breath away. If it was boring, I might say it was a big yawn. If it was horrible for some reason, I
might say it made me retch.
The importance of gesture in communication is an important part of the online experience. In
text language, smh stands for “shaking my head,” and in 2015 a face-with-rolling-eyes Emoji
became available. LMAO is an example of hyperbole.
Everyone nowadays should be knowledgeable about gestures. The thumbs-up symbol does not
mean the same thing in every culture. In recent years the okay sign—the sign formed by making
a circle with the thumb and index finger, has become an Alt-right meme. Using it in certain
contexts nowadays can have repercussions. In academia, eye-rolling can be considered a sign of
patriarchy and a micro-aggression, which causes some to roll their eyes. In different cultures,
winking can have a meaning you might not suspect. Pointing at a person or snapping your
fingers may or may not be appropriate.
For a listing of gestures and bodily reactions that have been lexicalized in American English, see
gesture and bodily reaction in the thesaurus. It is quite a large category and a rather important
one, I think.
Page 29 of 1574
Shapes and parts-whole
How is a graph like the landscape? Well, both have peaks and valleys and plateaus. In addition, a
graph can have a spike, and the line might be in in the shape of a bell curve, or characterized as
carrying a long tail. Peaks, valleys, plateaus, spikes, bells and tails are not just things, but shapes.
In the dictionary I use, the horn of an animal is the first sense. “Shaped like or suggesting” is the
seventh sense. The tenth sense is geological: a horn is a geological feature. The Matterhorn,
geologically speaking, is a horn. In case you are wondering, the musical instrument is the eighth
sense. And that is the sense that we always teach.
Many simple words we teach have the meaning of “resembling or having the shape of” or
“suggesting” or “regarded as like.” Examples are everywhere.
The alphabet: A-frame; T-bone; T-bar; V-neck; Z-drag.
Traffic and roads: bottleneck; dogleg; hairpin, T-intersection, U-turn, washboard (road).
Body shapes: heart (heart-shaped face); hourglass figure / waist; pear (pear-shaped body).
Parts of the body: A plane has a nose, tail, and belly. A bed has a foot and a head. A chair can
have legs, a back and arms. Needles, potatoes, coconuts, and hurricanes all have eyes. A
mountain range has foothills.
Words relating to shapes often appear in geographical place names: the banana belt; the Parrot’s
Beak (Cambodia and Guinea); the boot of Italy; the Wakhan Corridor; the Eye of the Sun (in
Monument Valley, Arizona); the Horn of Africa; the Florida panhandle; Ribbon Reef; Table
Mountain (Cape Town); the Coral / Afar Triangle; Wave Rock (western Australia), etc.
Younger teachers might not know what the washboard in a washboard road refers to. But I can
remember my mother using one, as well as an electric wringer, and a clothes line.
While I was teaching a high-school ESL lesson based on the map, a Honduran girl told me,
“Chile is shaped like a chili.” It was something I had never heard before and have never
forgotten. Truly, the students teach the teacher.
In the dictionary I use, the very first main entry is A, and the first sense defines it as a letter. The
second main entry is also A, and the first sense defines it as a shape. It is like that for every letter
thereafter. The letters are not just letters, they are shapes.
Here’s a wonderful riddle: What has bridges, canals, cavities, clefts, fissures, floors, isthmuses,
lakes, mounds, orbits, pipes, pits, roofs, tubes, and walls, but is not anything related to the earth
or a building? A hint: the answer is closer than you think. Answer: the human body! This riddle
makes us realize that the body has many parts resembling terrain features and infrastructure.
“Long lines of women, bent double like inverted capital Ls, work their way slowly across the
fields...” That’s a line from “Marrakech” by Eric Blair. I can see them.
Page 30 of 1574
Animacy
Anthropomorphism has been a feature of literature for ages. Anthropomorphic animal stories are
as ancient as Aesop and include favorites like White Fang by Jack London and “Rikki-TikkiTavi” by Rudyard Kipling. Only once in Saudi Arabia, many years ago, did a very literal-minded
student rebuke me for telling an animal story. “An animal can talk?” he said frowning, raising an
eyebrow. I am pretty sure his classmates told him to shut up, and I finished telling the story.
Traditionally in English things like a ship could be referred to as she. “Shelf life” is a relatively
old term, and products have been referred to as a family and “first generation / second
generation” for quite a long time. But the idea that technology is not only alive but sentient used
to be relegated to science fiction. One thinks of HAL from the 1968 film 2001: A Space Odyssey.
Well, 2001 has come and gone, and almost anything can be animate and sentient nowadays. The
first obituary for a non-human being that I ever read was written by Henry Fountain way back in
2010 and appeared in The New York Times newspaper under the title, “ABE, Pioneering Robotic
Undersea Explorer, Is Dead at 16.” I can still remember how surprised and delighted I was by the
conceit. Extension? Now inanimate objects, like wheat, can have “biographies.” And nothing
prevents a creative writer from writing an autobiography of... a flea (1887). The Island of
Missing Trees by Elif Shafak, I read in a review, includes a sentient fig tree that partly narrates
the story of two lovers.
Now technology is dumb, smart, or brilliant and can even teach itself (AI). One goal of the
Internet companies has been to habituate everyone, especially children, to address machines as
though they were people. They have given their virtual assistants names like Siri, Alexa and
Cortana and encouraged us to ask them questions, as if that were normal. They have succeeded
completely.
“Roaring Meg (an English Civil Wars-era mortar) resides at Goodrich Castle...” “Recent
investigation has found that the annual Great Whirl in the southwest Arabian sea has an average
life span of 198 days.” “So where did you find this comet, where is it living?” “We climb where
the avalanche lives.” “A cave breathes...”
Devotees, enthusiasts and experts, naturally enough, seem more prone to this kind of
personification than the rest of us.
• Laird Hamilton has said, “Jaws doesn’t like a north swell,” and he ought to know.
• Colin Tudge wrote, “I met one in full bloom early one sunny July morning in the
Cambridge University Botanic Garden.” Tudge was referring to a handkerchief tree.
• In the same way, Linda Mapes wrote, “The tree first came into my life along with John
O’Keefe, a biologist...”
• Dr. Jeffrey B. Johnson, a Boise State volcanologist and National Geographic Explorer
studying the Masaya Volcano in Nicaragua, explained, “Volcanoes like to speak in lowfrequency sounds that humans can’t perceive called infrasound. So we developed sensors
that we can deploy to listen to the volcanos talk to us.”
Page 31 of 1574
• An official at the Smithsonian’s National Air and Space Museum in Washington, DC,
once said, “So the decision was made a number of years ago to take him off display and
put him in storage... To have that step forward, just slightly, gives him more of a
presence.” He was talking about Neil Armstrong’s spacesuit!
• Dr. Catherine Walker from the Woods Hole Oceanographic Institution said the following
about an iceberg: “I always watch A23 because we’re the same age. It calved in 1986 and
it’s started to wiggle recently.” (“How a colossal block of ice became an obsession” by
Jonathan Amos, BBC, 15 Jan 2022.)
• In 1989, after a deranged person tried to kill the Treaty Oak in Austin with poison, Texas,
thousands of kids addressed letters to the tree with messages like, “We’re sorry this
happened, get well soon.”
• In 2021, an adult homeowner in Kensington, New Hampshire, had to have the largest
sugar maple in the state cut down because it had begun to rot and threatened her roof. She
said, “She’s just at the end of her life. She is finally being euthanized. It’s unsafe and it’s
not fair to her to let her stand out there and not be as beautiful as she always has been.
I’m sad to see her go. It’s very emotional.”
• Finally, “Typically a sled dog will tell you, when they’re ready to retire. People always
say, well dogs can’t talk, and that never makes sense to me, because I feel like they
actually talk very clearly about what they want and what they need if you’re listening.”
(Blair Braverman, dogsledder, about her dogs.)
I suspect that I am not the only person in the world to have said, “Thank you” at the automatic
bank teller machine after withdrawing a little cash, or to have secretly feel relieved and grateful
when “approved” appears on the machine that reads my debit card, or to mutter, “Okay, okay,”
when the bossy self-scanner at the store tells me to make sure I have picked up my change, as if I
would ever forget! That same scanner, which ends up saying, “Thank you for shopping at X,”
might just be responsible for the sad death of “You’re welcome.” Just the other day the
supermarket employ scanning my groceries at the checkout counter muttered “Come on, come
on” when the scanner was momentarily unable to read a bar code of a particular item. Her tone
was both irritated and imploring. I was waiting. There were people behind me.
It is common to give inanimate and non-human objects agency. A common pattern is as follows:
“I hadn’t planned to write a book on this topic, but the topic chose me.”
• The extraordinary Bernard Tomic said, “Tennis chose me. It’s something I never fell in
love with.”
• The last line of Jim Bouton’s “gripping” baseball book, Ball Four, is: “You see, you
spend a good piece of your life gripping a baseball, and in the end it turns out that it was
the other way around.”
• Seize has a similar idea, in an expression like, “This idea that math was beautiful seized
Paul Dirac.”
• In the film Xiu Xiu, the Sent Down Girl, Xiu Xiu asks Lao Jin, “Are you really going to
spend your entire life raising horses?” and Lao Jin replies, “They raise me, too.”
Page 32 of 1574
• “Some say that humans domesticated wheat; others that wheat domesticated humans.”
(“Flour Fixated” by Bee Wilson, London Review of Books, 24 September 2020.)
• David Benioff and DB Weiss, the writers of Game of Thrones, said, “When George
Lucas built [Star Wars], he built us too.”
• In a similar vein, and nicely qualified: “If it’s possible for a place to save a life Sils-Maria
saved Nietzsche’s.”
• The great actor Peter O’Toole said, “The part chooses me, I don’t choose it.”
• A Japanese saying has it, “With the first glass a man drinks wine, with the second glass
the wine drinks the wine, with the third glass the wine drinks the man.” Many of us have
been there before!
• Another proverb like that, common in Saudi Arabia, says,” A miser does not own money;
money owns the miser.”
• I like what Winston Churchill said when he urged that the House of Commons, bombed
in the war, should be re-created as an exact replica: “We shape our buildings and
afterwards our buildings shape us.”
• In New Zealand and Bangladesh, rivers have been recognized as living entities and
granted the same legal rights as persons.
There must be a bit of the animist in all of us. Colin Tudge’s quote above about “meeting” a
handkerchief tree makes me think of what Fran James, a Lummi Indian, said about gathering
bark from a cedar tree for a basket. “We talk to the trees. We say, ‘OK, we need some of your
bark to help us; we’ll make something beautiful.’ You have to talk to it and thank it for giving
you the bark. You have to go with a good heart. You can’t be cranky and fussy.” V. K. Arseniev
once recorded Dersu on an early phonograph and played it back to him. Dersu listened,
unsurprised to hear his own voice, and said, “Him talk true, not leave one word.”
See the dictionary entries for born and live and die (non-human).
On NPR, a person was talking recently about his favorite song. He said, “I’ll say I probably
listen to this song a few times each week, whether it’s in the car or just telling Alexa to play it.
There’s a story...” Suddenly, the voice of Alexa broke in: “Sorry. I don’t know that one.” And
the interviewee went on, “I’m sorry, that was Alexa that said that, um...” before continuing to
talk about his favorite song. This was not a toddler or a pet humorously upstaging an
interviewee. This was Alexa. Interestingly, Alexa’s intrusion seemed to have made the
interviewee lose his chain of thought and forget about the story he was about to tell. (“An NPR
Listener Shares His Signature Song,” NPR, Weekend Edition Saturday, July 20, 2019.)
The first obituary I read for a machine was in 2010. The first time I heard a personal assistant
intrude into a nationally broadcast radio show was in 2019. What’s next?
Page 33 of 1574
Persistence, survival and endurance
Isn’t it interesting that people who have never hunted or trapped and who have never seen an
actual pitfall much less dug one or filled one in still use the word? That medical textbooks list
“pitfalls” in treatment? The use of a word like pitfall is a perfect example of how older
technologies and activities and periods of life have disappeared yet persist in the language.
In 1870, railroading was the second largest occupation in the US, behind farming, and grist mills
used to dot our streams and rivers. Things have certainly changed! Even so, the category of
figurative language from the category train and farming & agriculture is huge, the term “grist
for the mill,” is still popular, and “term-paper mills” proliferate on the internet. Few send letters
or postcards nowadays, but NPR still has “audio postcards,” and a book like Deacon King Kong
by the great writer James McBride can be described as a “love letter to New York City.”
Honestly, who sends love letters nowadays?
At one time in our history the horse was king of the road and bicycles, electric trains and cars
shared the road with them, not vice versa. On May 3, 1908, a headline in The New York Times
screamed: “J. B. SCHUCHMAN HURT IN A RUNAWAY / Horse He had Just Bought for
Speedway Parade Dashes into a Trolley Car. / JUDGE THROUGH A WINDOW / Lands in the
Lap of Little Girl Passenger and Both Are Cut by Glass—Horse Breaks His Leg.” Nowadays in
New York City about the only reminders from that era are fading ghost signs on brick walls with
messages like: TO LET / CARRIAGES COUPES HANSOMS VICTORIAS LIGHT WAGONS
/ HORSES BOARD BY THE MONTH.”
Things have changed. Yet everyone still uses and understands language associated with horses. I
was lucky as a boy: my grandfather had a horse, and I have fond memories of riding him along
country roads and swimming him through the leech-infested pond below my grandpa’s shack.
You have to cling on tightly to the mane of a horse when riding bareback, especially when the
horse arises out of the water up a steep bank. Words like runaway and reins and bridle and
saddle and gallop are used figuratively nowadays in a sentence like, “We have got to find a way
to rein in galloping inflation,” but for me those words will always have a psychological reality. It
is not easy to be a small boy in control a very large wayward horse. I know that.
After 1958 more people crossed the Atlantic by plane than boat, yet figurative language related
to boats will always persist: the spaceship and spaceport pay homage to sailing ships, and our old
space shuttles were named for famous ships associated with great explorers: the Challenger,
Discovery, Atlantis, and Endeavour.
Today, when we think of wireless communication we think of the internet, not Marconi and
wireless telegraphy. But “Internet communication has its roots in the wireless rooms aboard the
great ocean liners,” as Kat Long has noted. I used to have a fading yellow and black Western
Union telegram I sent my parents from the Queen Elizabeth in a folder I labeled “My favorite
things.” It may still be there. In January, in 1971, at Fort Knox, Kentucky, I took lessons in
Morse Code with many others; the military phased out most training in it long ago, but a boxer
can still telegraph a punch, or a movie a plot point. The telegraph lives on in the language, and
Page 34 of 1574
the SOS—three longs and three shorts, whether pounding a rock on a wall, or blinking your
eyes—is still relevant to this very day, for those who still know.
Religiosity has had its ups and downs in the US and elsewhere, but figurative language relating
to religion will never disappear, no matter how secular the world becomes. And this especially
relates to topography: in every country there is a Devils Backbone (Espinazo del Diablo),
Courthouse (Majlis al Jinn), Falls, Highway, Pulpit, Throne, etc. And every religion has
contributed words to English: fetish (West Africa), taboo (South Seas); Delphic, muse, oracle,
Pandora’s box, soothsayer (pagan); karma, juggernaut, sacred cow, guru, mantra, avatar
(Hindu); mecca and hegira (Islam); kowtow (Confucianism); mantra (Buddhism), etc.
We Americans pride ourselves on our anti-monarchical revolution but we still and forever will
link the idea of royalty with the superlative in epithets like “Aretha Franklin, the Queen of
Soul,” “Burger King,” “Mattress King,” and the prom / 4H king and queen. I once attended a
country-themed restaurant in Atlanta with family members. My brother-in-law held his young
son up to a portrait of Elvis Presley and told him, “Say hello to the King.” We all laughed. Many
persons associated with royalty are used figuratively, less obvious ones including whipping boy
and handmaiden. Just because we had a revolution doesn’t mean we reject royalty.
At one time spitjack was a job category and there was a dog, Canis vertigus, that was actually
bred to turn a spit. Nowadays inserting a spit, once a common task, is a lost art. But the verb
skewer will always exist, in the sense,” We skewered him at the comedy roast.” Of course, there
are many words used figuratively that come from the category of food & drink. Likewise, there
were once hundreds of job categories related to the manufacture of cloth that are anachronistic
now in my adopted state of North Carolina. And yet, figurative language associated with cloth
persists.
Above, I mentioned my mother using a washboard. A washboard, a tub, and a then-modern
electric wringer sat on the porch of a house I once lived in as a boy. Once I got my arm stuck in
that wringer and had to be taken to the hospital. The pale scar on the inside of my arm just below
my left elbow is a reminder that a part of me went through the wringer...literally! After my
mother had scrubbed the laundry on the washboard, and wrung it in the electric wringer, she
would hang it on a clothesline to dry. As a boy, I was literally clotheslined once while riding my
bicycle, and when I got bigger and older the same thing happened on the football field, and
“clothesline injuries” are an important part of emergency medicine. Finally I would watch her
iron out the wrinkles with an electric iron. In the very old days before electricity, a clothes iron
was filled with coals from a fire, and the woman would moisten a sheet by spitting water on it.
Most of us don’t go through this process anymore to clean our clothes. But these words
associated with laundry and many others persist. And so we try to iron out the wrinkles in a plan
and politicians come up with a “laundry list” of reforms to deal with the problems of the day.
In ancient times, when I was a boy, I can remember drinking from a public water cooler when
that was a boon, to be able to slake my thirst with free, thirst-quenching, life-giving water. Who
drinks from a public watercooler anymore? Nowadays, office people buy their own brands and
flavors of water, and everyone from joggers and hikes to athletes and soldiers drink from
Page 35 of 1574
camelbacks. After the scandal of Flint, Michigan, who would trust water from a watercooler?
Not to mention that, in this time of COVID, everyone is working from home, and this will no
doubt continue post-pandemic. Who needs a watercooler to as a gathering place to communicate
with anyone when we can simply text one another? And yet, cultural critics still talk about
“watercooler shows” and “watercooler gossip.” As a practice, meeting for a cold, free cup of
water at a watercooler and exchanging gossip is as dead as the dodo. But, like the dodo, it lives
on in our language. It lives on. It lives. For all of our acceptance of the new, trendy contempospeak language, maybe we should acknowledge and pay a bit of homage to the old language that
has persisted.
Page 36 of 1574
Quotations
There are many wonderful quotes relating to or utilizing metaphor and figurative language.
Following are six that are meaningful to me.
1. “Words are signs of natural facts... Right means straight; wrong means twisted. Spirit
primarily means wind; transgression, the crossing of a line; supercilious, the raising of
the eyebrow. We say the heart to express emotion, the head to denote thought... / An
enraged man is a lion, a cunning man is a fox, a firm man is a rock, a learned man is a
torch. A lamb is innocence; a snake is subtle spite; flowers express to us the delicate
affections. Light and darkness are our familiar expression for knowledge and ignorance;
and heat for love. Visible distance behind and before us, is respectively our image of
memory and hope. / Who looks upon a river in a meditative hour and is not reminded of
the flux of all things? Throw a stone into the stream, and the circles that propagate
themselves are the beautiful type of all influence...” (Nature, Chapter 4 (Language), by
Ralph Waldo Emerson, 1836.)
I like the above because in a short space Emerson lists beautifully and concisely so many
metaphors. The “circles that propagate themselves” is entered in this dictionary at ripple.
A related word is splash. Both words are metaphors for effect that relate to water.
2. “It was doubtless an ingenious idea to call the camel the ship of the desert, but it would
hardly lead one far in training that useful beast.” (George Eliot’s The Mill on the Floss.)
The above quote reminds me that, while a metaphor identifies something that two things
have in common, plenty of things are still different. A ship does not have long eyelashes,
has not been branded, does not roar, gurgle, bellow, foam from the mouth to the point of
producing airborne balloons of saliva, attract huge spiders, produce delicious and healthy
milk and meat, etc. “The camel is a ship?” a Saudi military student remarked to me once,
disapprovingly.
And people will see things differently, as in the parable of the “Blind men and an
elephant.” Data has been compared to a gas (the cloud); water (data stream); and a solid
(data mining). Bitcoin servers have been described as both farms and mines. The spread
of COVID-19 is often thought of as a wave, and Dr. Roger Shapiro nicely extended that
to a wave in a pool that sloshes around, back and forth, leaving and returning. The myth
of Sisyphus can mean different things—difficulty, futility, or something that never
ends—and the adjectives promethean and quixotic can have quite different connotations:
as I get older, my sympathy for Quixote increases, and I think of him as less crazy and
more of an inspiration. The title of Dickens’ great book is commonly misappropriated:
See “Please, Liberals: Stop Abusing ‘A Tale of Two Cities’” by Reid Cherlin, The New
Republic, Jan 2, 2014. It is not always clear which meaning or connotation is meant.
Many say we should view the problem of drug addiction as a public health issue, not as a
war on drugs, and yet the phrase “public health campaign” has always had a warlike ring,
and the metaphor of disease as an enemy has come to the fore in the era of COVID-19.
Page 37 of 1574
Should we really single out the donkey for ridicule and use it as an insult? I don’t think
so. “Without a donkey, my wife and I are forced to be donkeys” is something farmers say
in Ethiopia. Does the octopus really deserve its iconic depiction in political cartoons as a
global strangler? No. I once floated about one for half an hour on a shallow reef in the
Red Sea, and its fascinating shape-shifting and color-changing is something I will never
forget. Is a frilled shark, or a sturgeon, really horrific looking? Some think they are
beautiful.
But even if the similarities between two different things are not always obvious, or are
tenuous, or even upset me, I almost always find them worth thinking about. In my
opinion, allusions to Joe McCarthy, Machiavelli, and Hector do little justice to those
men. The idiom “to hang somebody out to dry” has come to mean abandon, but nobody
hangs up their laundry and abandons it. Gibbeting fits the idea much better. “Yemen was
Egypt’s Vietnam” makes me think of a host of dissimilarities, but I must admit, upon
reflection, that there are plenty of similarities, such as the time period, and the proximity
of safe havens across a border.
The title of Leon Talley’s memoir, The Chiffon Trenches, shows just how “ingenious” a
metaphor can be, how much ground, time and human condition it can cover, from the
bloodiest battlefields of Passchendaele and Verdun to...well, to Vogue Magazine. In one
popular video cute ten-year-old Nandi Bushell is a “beast” on the drums, while in another
a Marine Corps rammer identified only as “Wolf” is a “beast” on a howitzer mission.
Both are “beasts.” Roland Huntford described the Ross Ice Shelf as “that rolling Sahara
of snow,” which sounds odd at first, but there are many comparisons that can be made
between the Sahara and the Antarctic. For example, hydrating in both environments can
be a huge problem: Antarctica is a polar desert. Huntford was writing specifically about
the lack of terrain landmarks. The question is always, as Nathaniel Mackey stated, “How
different can two things be and still have something in common?”
Steve Inskeep of NPR severely strains the notion with his “Patrons still receive service at
flooded riverside restaurant in Thailand,” NPR, Morning Edition, October 8, 2021,
although I’m sure he had his reasons. Not too many of us are like the divorce-court judge
who is interested in “whether a dog is more like a lamp or a human being.”
3. “I looked at The Sixteenth Round as puttin’ a letter in a bottle and throwin’ it out over
those 36-foot-high walls into the ocean of life, like a bobbin’ bottle, and hoping upon
hope that somebody, somehow, someday, will see this bobbin’ bottle in the water, take
this bottle up, read my message, and come to help me. And that’s what happened. That’s
what happened.” (Rubin “Hurricane” Carter. From “The Hurricane Tapes,” Ep6.
Muhammad Ali and Bob Dylan, BBC Sounds.)
This strikes me as a particularly beautiful, eloquent and heartfelt use of figurative
language, using one extended metaphor.
Page 38 of 1574
4. “Yeah, I generally think this is a fairly minor deal. At the same time, it could actually
backfire on Bill Barr. Because, if he thinks it’s necessary to pre-spin this, that means that
there’s something in there that needs to be pre-spun. And if he’s too heavy handed about
that, it can actually just throw gasoline on the daily media feeding frenzies that we have
[inaudible].” (The commentator Jonah Goldberg on “Before Mueller Report Is Released,
Republicans And Democrats Take Sides,” NPR’s Morning Edition, April 18, 2019.)
I love this quote for its contrast to the one above it. To paraphrase a line from Kipling’s
short story, “The Phantom ‘Rickshaw”: “Men occasionally break down and become as
mixed as their metaphors.”
5. Elisabeth Moss: I just did it, and just kind of went as big as I could and threw it all at the
wall knowing the only mistake we could make was not going far enough. And so we just
went for it... / Rachael Martin: Did he ever have to pull you back. I mean did it ever feel
too far, or were you like, “Nope...” / Elisabeth Moss: I had turned it up to eleven and then
realized I had to go even higher... (“In ‘Her Smell,’ Elisabeth Moss ‘Turned It Up To 11,’
Then Turned It Up Some More,” Morning Edition, NPR, April 19, 2019.)
In the above, Elisabeth Moss is speaking about her performance in the film Her Smell. I
like it because it is a good litany of clichés relating to commitment & determination.
One has to respect commitment in an actor. But when it comes to such declarations, I like
what Alex Lowe said: “There are two kinds of climbers. Those who climb because their
heart sings when they’re in the mountains, and all the rest.”
6. “It can’t surprise us that our language began with metaphors. Words are being made
today under our own eyes in precisely the same fashion. Witness the terse and vivid terms
that the gangsters coin: gun moll, for the racketeer’s girl-friend; hot seat, for the electric
chair; stool pigeon, for the traitor who acts as a spy for the police.” (Word Origins and
Their Romantic Stories by Wilfred Funk, Litt. D., 1950.)
This is a good reminder that language is constantly evolving, and what sounds novel and
contemporary today will sound as dated as Funk’s examples in twenty years.
Page 39 of 1574
Synonyms and opposites
As teachers, we are accustomed to mentioning synonyms, opposites, and patterns like succeed /
fail / give up / try again. We can do the same with figurative language, and this dictionary and
thesaurus will help.
1. You can launch, roll out, unveil, take the wraps off a product, or drop it (inauguration).
2. You can leave somebody in your wake. Or in your dust. Or in your slipstream. These are
entered at competition: movement. The first relates to boats and water. The second to
land and horses. The last to planes and air.
3. The opposite of tone deaf is... pitch perfect. A person can also strike all the right notes, or
have a tin ear (music).
4. If you achieve something, people might sing your praises, but more than likely your
achievement will be unsung (achievement, recognition & praise).
5. Something can be a stone in one’s shoe or a burr in one’s saddle (affliction).
6. You can hew to a line or... go against the grain. Both phrases relate to wood
(sanctioning, authority & non-conformity / tree).
7. You can be on the cusp of something, or light years away from it (proximity:
astronomy).
8. You can face a problem or turn a blind eye to it or look away. You can kick the can down
the road or push something (like a decision) down the road. You can tackle a problem or
punt or try to run out the clock. Or, you can throw your hands up in the air or engage in
handwringing (confronting, dealing with & ignoring things).
9. You can give a hand, lend a hand, or pitch in (help & assistance).
10. You can try to save your neck or your skin or your scalp (survival, persistence &
endurance).
11. Socially, you might find a place at the table or under the tent. Or, you might find
yourself outside in the cold, frozen out, in the shadows, on the fringes of society, out of
the mainstream, in exile, in the wilderness, on the far shore. You might find yourself to
be a castaway, hermit, leper, outcast, outsider, pariah, untouchable, a ghost. Good luck
with that (social interaction, society, and inclusion & exclusion)!
12. A new job might be a plum position or a poisoned chalice.
13. In bad times your life might be on hold, and you might find yourself in purgatory or in
limbo. In a drought or a dry spell. You might feel adrift, in the doldrums, unable to make
headway, going in circles, rudderless. Chasing your tail. Standing still. In a blind alley.
Or mired, sidetracked, stuck, stalled, in a rut and spinning your wheels. Going nowhere,
or backwards and lagging behind. Losing ground. Stumbling or taking a step backward
(progress & lack of progress).
14. Or, you can be on a roll with lots of momentum and traction, advancing, getting ahead,
going forward, making headway, gaining ground, leaping or vaulting ahead.
15. Somebody can add fuel to a controversy, pour gasoline on it, fan it, or provide oxygen for
it. Something can become an accelerant.
Page 40 of 1574
16. You can be up to your elbows /neck / eyeballs, in over your head, drowning, buried alive,
immersed, enmeshed, entangled, or ensnared in something like debt or some other
situation. I hope things get better for you (involvement)!
17. You can hold your employees’ feet to the fire or light a fire under them. You can nudge,
push, prod, goad, cudgel, hector, or bully them, lean on them, twist their arms, strongarm
them, hold a gun to their heads, crack the whip, ride herd over them, etc. Just don’t
expect them to attend your birthday party (coercion & motivation)!
18. You can stroll, coast, waltz or sail to success (attainment). Something you do might be a
cakewalk, a stroll in the park, a picnic. Or a Gallipoli, a long hard slog, a trail of tears
(difficulty, easiness & effort).
19. If you are searching for something, you might hit pay dirt or fool’s gold (success &
failure / mining).
20. A division might be the favorite son or stepchild / stepdaughter / orphan of its parent
organization (family).
21. You can say, “That ship has sailed” or “That train has left the station.” Both relate to
timeliness & lack of timeliness. The two cliches always make me think of that scene
from Austin Powers: International Man of Mystery: “Your dad loved her very much. If
there was one other cat in this world that could have loved her and treated her as well as
your dad, then it was me. But, unfortunately, for yours truly, that train has sailed.”
22. You can try and throw somebody off the scent, throw somebody off the trail, or cover
your tracks. This language all relates to pursuit, capture & escape, and hunting.
23. The president might try to bypass, go around, sidestep, or make an end run around
congress.
24. In terms of interest and responsibility, something can be in your wheelhouse, in your
lane, or up your alley. Or not.
25. You can bury or exorcise the ghosts or put something to rest / bed / sleep. Bury the
hatchet or close the book on something. Put it behind you, let it go. Move on. Emotional
and psychological wounds can heal or scab over. These phrases relate to reconciliation,
resolution & conclusion. Just don’t forget, a buried hatchet can always be dug up.
26. In terms of sports & games, you can drop the ball, fumble, miscue, drop the baton, strike
out, or score an own goal. Or the opposite: hit a home run, hit a grand slam, hit it out of
the park, get your project through the uprights or across the goal line. In which case, you
might just want to take a victory lap. Or spike the football.
27. If you pull the plug on something like a project, it can go down the drain, pipes, or tubes.
28. You can be the father, godfather, midwife, architect or author of something like a plan or
policy or program.
29. Urban warfare (MOUT) versus desert warfare can be described as a different animal / a
different beast / or a different kettle of fish.
30. The Arctic might be a factory or a kitchen for weather. Both relate to creation &
transformation. Many of the new terms people use nowadays to talk about race have
been cooked up in the kitchen of sociology.
31. You can “cut corners” or “take a shortcut.” Or, the opposite, you can “go the extra mile”
or “go out of your way.” All relate to journeys & trips. Enjoy your hike!
Page 41 of 1574
32. “If you wanna win it, ya gotta bring it.” “I left it all out there on the floor along with my
guys.” (This connection is made at commitment & determination: coming, arriving,
staying, leaving & returning.)
33. You can grow up in your father’s shadow. Or in his reflected glory. Hopefully the latter,
but both are based on light & darkness.
34. You might feel like you are on a slow boat to China, or you are going full speed ahead.
Both relate to the speed of a boat.
People often pair conventional language with a cliché, almost like a translation, and will even
triple up on cliches, like a boxer peppering his opponent with jabs: “We must oppose him, we
must stand up to him.” “This looks like an inflection point, a turning point.” “What’s the next
shoe to drop, what happens next?” “What would justice have looked like in your view, what did
you want to happen here?” “They want to fill in the blanks, connect the dots, and figure out
what’s going on.” “There is a possibility we could see another pandemic in our lifetime. No one
can run the odds about what kinds of numbers that looks like, you know, how likely that is...”
“The groups close ranks, they circle the wagons...” “Out-of-step, against-the-grain, differentdrummer types...” “It’s a race against time, it’s a race against the clock to get these animals
(stranded pilot whales) refloated.”
Page 42 of 1574
Lessons and exercises
1. A lesson and exercise might focus on words related to health & medicine used
figuratively with the meaning of condition and status. Write the following on the board:
the peace process is dead and buried; the economic recovery has been robust; businesses
are ailing; the soccer team is on life support; small businesses are hurting; earnings have
been anemic; the economy remains badly wounded; the pace of economic growth is
moribund; reform is dead; the economy is healthy. Ask students to identify (or underline)
the words relating to health & medicine and also identify or underline the non-human
subjects. Discuss. Ask the students to organize the vocabulary on a cline from robust to
dead and buried.
2. Create a simple matching exercise to illustrate a simple pattern of figurative usage that
links problems (flaws & lack of flaws, etc.) to amelioration & renewal: If there is a
wrinkle in the plan, then we must iron it out. If an idea is stale, we need a fresh one. If
there is a security hole, we must patch it or fill it in. If our project encounters some bumps
in the road, we must try to smooth them out. If an argument is shaky, we had better
support or buttress it (or it might completely collapse and lie in ruins). If our skills have
grown dull, we need to sharpen or hone them. If a situation is explosive, we must defuse
it. If our wheels are spinning, we must find a way to gain traction and get unstuck. If the
wheels are turning very slowly, we will want to find a way to grease them. If we are
feeling a great burden, then we must find a way to get out from under it. If our society
suffers from a particular sickness, we must find a cure or remedy for it, etc.
3. Words and phrases for increase & decrease / number include: rise; explode; shoot up;
soar; grow; skyrocket; jump; go / shoot through the roof; peak, and sky-high. Words for
decrease include: plummet; dip; slide; drop; plunge; fall; tumble; and sink. We
commonly use these words and phrases when we talk about numbers, prices, and rates.
These words make a good simple category exercise. Write the words and phrases in
alphabetical order on the board and ask students to categorize them as “increase” or
“decrease.” If your classroom has a smartboard with “Vortex” software, create two
vortices labeled “increase” and “decrease” and call on a student to slide each word into
the correct vortex. My students in Saudi Arabia liked Vortex exercises, because if the
student standing in front of the classroom at the board slid a word to the wrong vortex, it
was spit out to his consternation and the delight of the other students. Ask students about
important rates and prices: the crime rate; the price of bread and medicine; the age of first
marriage, etc. Are they low, high or sky high / through the roof? How have they changed
over time? How do they compare with other countries or geographical areas?
4. We tend to think of comparison of adjectives and adverbs as grammar lessons. But much
vocabulary has within it the idea of comparison. So, visit the thesaurus and peruse the
entry for increase & decrease. Select words that your students already know and thus
can be recycled. In addition, you can select vocabulary you think your students might
already know, or might be interested in knowing. Using the vocabulary you have chosen,
practice comparing adjectives in the following way: (Teacher) “I stepped on the gas pedal
and the car accelerated. What does accelerate mean?” (Student) “To go faster.” (Teacher)
“The moon is waxing.” (Student) “It’s getting bigger.” (Teacher) “The moon is waning.”
Page 43 of 1574
(Student) “It’s getting smaller.” (Teacher) “The price of bread is dropping.” (Student)
“It’s cheaper.” (Student) “It’s not as expensive.” (Student) “It’s less expensive (than it
was). Teacher: “What happens when you add fuel to a fire?” (Student) “It gets bigger.
(Student) “It gets hotter.” (Teacher) “Don’t eat too much or your stomach will balloon!”
(Student) “Get bigger!” (Teacher) “We need more tanks in the battle, because tanks are a
force multiplier. What does a force multiplier do?” (Student) “It makes us stronger.”
(Student) “It makes us more powerful.”
5. We tend to think of the superlative as a series of grammar lessons and test questions
based on form, but there is plenty of language (including proverbs) that embodies the
notion of (comparative) worth and the superlative, and it can be gleaned in the thesaurus
in the category worth & lack of worth and superlative. Every monkey is a _____ to its
mother. One man’s trash is another man’s _____. Speech is silver but silence is _____.
The jackal is a _____ in his own country. Who was or is the Pele of Saudi Arabia? Name
a superlative fruit. Which bird sings the most beautifully? What does it mean when I say
(pick any sports figure) was or is the GOAT? [Saudi students who know the literal
meaning of a goat but who don’t know what the acronym means are always delighted by
this, and will use it to make double and even triple entendres to chaff their friends!]
Which car is the thoroughbred of cars? Do you think that the lion is the king of beasts?
Questions like these enliven routine grammar exercises.
6. To focus on all the ways to talk about the future, including the idea that the future is a
container, ask students to select a piece of paper from a container. The container would
be analogous to a fortune cookie, and the piece of paper would have a fortune written on
it. Each student would get a little message about what lies in his future, what is ahead for
him, what is on his horizon, what is down the road, the fate that is approaching him, etc.
This exercise can lend itself to humor. Of course, such an exercise might not be
appropriate in some contexts and cultures. I personally wouldn’t do this exercise in Saudi
Arabia, no matter how comfortable I felt with my students.
7. The following is a simple fill-in-the-blank exercise that focuses on some of the figurative
language associated with fire: extinguish (verb); conflagration (noun); die out (verb);
spark (noun); die down (verb); ashes (noun). “The region is a tinderbox, and it will only
take a _____ to set the whole area on fire. The result will be a _____ that will burn out of
control and that no force, not even United Nations Peacekeepers, will be able to _____.
The fire will eventually _____, but I doubt it will ever completely _____. We can only
hope something positive will eventually arise from the _____.”
8. The following matching exercise focuses on the expressions that can be found in the
thesaurus at gesture: “Was the movie boring?” “Yes, it was a big yawn.” / “Did the
announcement surprise people?” “Yeah, it raised eyebrows.“ / “Did he speak freely about
what happened?” “No, he was tightlipped.” / “Is he willing to do it? “No, he needs a
nudge.” / “Did you captain approve your request?” “No, he gave it the thumbs-down.” /
“Well, it’s time to get to work.” “Yes, it’s time to roll up our sleeves.”
Page 44 of 1574
To the ESL / EFL teacher
1. Because figurative language is such an integral part of common, everyday language, we EFL
/ ESL teachers should teach the terms literal and figurative at the beginning level and say
them at least as often as we say noun, verb, adjective, adverb, and collocation in our
classrooms. I don’t use the terms metaphor or idiom, because the former is so closely
attached to literary studies and cognitive linguistics, and the latter is associated with
dictionaries of idioms that include relatively useless and rarely used expressions like “It’s
raining cats and dogs.” A basic question that all teachers can ask about any vocabulary item
they teach is, “Can this be used figuratively?” It many cases, it can and (often) is, and this
dictionary and thesaurus will help those teachers with that question. Just look up the word.
2. To explain figurative usage to our students, we can use the same language that we teach them
in our lessons and that is used to define second and third senses, etc., for words in a
conventional dictionary if we only consult it: “like,” “as,” “similar to,” “equal to,”
“equivalent to,” “comparison,” “resemble,” “suggest,” “has the shape of,” “has the role of,”
“acts as,” etc.
3. “Extra” senses can provide real communicative utility. For example, a simple word like path
can allow us and our students to talk about conduct, easiness and difficulty, and the future,
not simply a walk from point A to point B. Figurative language can be oblique and subtle,
and in my own experience it has allowed me to mention or discuss things with students that
might otherwise have caused controversy and problems.
4. Students (an all of us) will encounter the figurative sense of a word far more often than the
literal sense. Consider the word dinosaur. Literal dinosaurs disappeared from the earth long
before humans: paleontologists study them. And yet, people nowadays will often encounter
the figurative usage of dinosaur that relates to primacy, currency, decline & obsolescence
and to past & present. Magnet is another example, and pitfall. I’m sure you can come up
with your own examples.
5. Just about every part of speech can be used figuratively: nouns, verbs, adverbs, adjectives,
and prepositions, even interjections. Seals are a magnet for sharks. He killed the proposal.
She greeted me warmly. It was a sharp / stinging rebuke. I am with you. Her performance
wowed me.
6. As English teachers, we all know the importance of collocation in vocabulary teaching, even
if we are teaching old-fashioned materials that ignore it. Often there is a collocating
preposition: Makkah is a magnet for Muslims. Or the phrase is pre-modified by a classifying
adjective: a political firestorm; financial doping in soccer; an astronomical rate, a stellar
record, etc. Most curriculums, including the ALC/DLI, do a poor job of teaching classifying
modifiers. Collocation can reveal sets of subjects and objects, and it is an especially good
way to recycle previously learned vocabulary.
Page 45 of 1574
7. Prepositions. In our dictionaries, a preposition’s first sense is always spatial, and that is how
we always teach it. When we teach in front of, we always teach it spatially: “The car is in
front of the bus.” But that same preposition can refer to the future: “She has her whole life in
front of her.” And it can also relate to proximity: “The answer is in front of you.” Three
prepositions relate to allegiance, support & betrayal: “I am for the measure. We stand
behind the new law. I am with you in your attempts to change things.” When it comes to
hierarchy, a person can be above or below another person. To see a list of prepositions and
their non-spatial meanings, look in the thesaurus under prep, adv, adj, particle.
8. We tend to think of the past, present and future as grammar. But the future can also relate to
words like fossil, dinosaur, horizon, crystal ball, time capsule, etc. Or to persons like a
fortuneteller, oracle or prophet. Time is very interesting. For example, time can seem like a
place: “We have been here before” (in the past) and “Where do we go from here?” (in the
future). Time can entail distance: “Spring is just around the corner,” and “The Paris
Olympics are still a long way off.” In one conception of time, “the future is forward and the
past is behind.” See future and past & present and time in the thesaurus for possibilities.
9. Don’t be afraid to think about and teach grammatical metaphor and fictive verbs.
Grammatical metaphor simply provides alternatives to the structures we already teach. You
can say, “There is a lamp in the corner.” But you can also say, “A lamp stands in the corner.”
You can say, “We walked to town along the road” but you can also say, “The road took us to
town.” You can say, “I got home in early May,” but you can also say, “Early May saw me
back home.” You can say, “I had a lot of problems,” but you can also say, “I encountered /
met with a lot of problems.” “There has been...” can be restated as, “We have seen...” Offer
both choices. We tend to teach the former and ignore the latter.
10. When you teach a “bland” verb, try to think of a synonym that is figurative: Can you help
me, can you lend a hand? What did you find, what did you dig up? He betrayed me, he
stabbed me in the back. Be patient, hold your horses. I support you, I am with you, I stand
with you, I stand behind you, I will back you up, I’ve got your back! I understand, I see, I get
it. Don’t be afraid, you must resist him, stand up to him, take him on. Students will
commonly acquire and productively use the figurative equivalent.
11. Never miss a chance to add value to a word. Is it also a shape? What are its parts? Is it a part
of a proper noun? A geographical feature? The name of a company or product? Is there a
euphemism for it? Does the word have an interesting origin and history? Can you use the
word as a springboard for a bit of content?
12. As English teachers, we know all about teaching parts-wholes. Those parts are often
figurative. A chair has legs and a back, a mouth has a roof, a book has a spine. A bed has a
head and a foot. A mountain has foothills. Whole-parts like these are the basis of simple
riddles we learn as children: What has legs but can’t run, a back that can’t bend? And you
Page 46 of 1574
can use the first person pronoun to make such a riddle sound even more opaque and strange:
“I have legs but can’t run, I have a back but it can’t bend... What am I?” Of course, your
students will “turn the tables on you” and insist on stumping you with the riddles from their
culture.
13. Try to think of and include a variety of subjects and objects for the grammar patterns you
teach. Ali / the bookcase is standing in the corner. Sugar / Sara is sweet. Open the door / your
book / your mind. A car / Winter is approaching. I’m allergic to penicillin / people who think
they know it all. A millimeter / life is short. You can arrive at a place. You can arrive at an
answer or solution.
14. Clines are always useful for organizing vocabulary in sets. In “Lessons and exercises” above,
the first lesson involves organizing words relating to health & medicine on a cline. A similar
lesson could be given based on words relating to temperature that relate to emotion. Our
curriculums are good at teaching hot, warm, and cold. Less good at teaching tepid, or
lukewarm, or combinations like boiling-hot and freezing-cold.
15. Sets and series are always useful for organizing vocabulary. Spring is a season, and we
always teach “spring, summer, fall and winter” as a set, but we can also relate that same set
to death & life, or to growth & development. In Saudi Arabia, when I introduced this word
to my students, following the ALC/DLI curriculum, I used to give my adult military students
the following riddle: “A happy dancing young girl in a green dress. A strong young man with
yellow hair. A crying lady in a brown dress. A shouting angry old man with white hair...
What are they?” Answer: the four seasons! Arab students appreciate such personification and
especially appreciate symmetry. The fact that their climate has essentially two seasons does
not make them any less interested in the seasons in my country; the goal of many of them is
to graduate from the program and then be sent to the U.S. for follow-on training (FOT).
Language related to a plant and the life cycle of a fire relate to the same concepts. Sweet,
salty, bitter and sour can relate not only to taste but also to character & personality. Again,
my military students enjoyed and appreciated the metaphoric extension.
16. An easy lesson is to simply think of something you or your students might be interested in.
For example, students studying academic English should be very interested in words and
expressions related to analysis, interpretation & explanation. An engineer might be
interested in the language associated with infrastructure. Some teachers are interested in the
expression of feeling, emotion & effect, and they will find a comprehensive listing of such
language in the thesaurus. My adult military students in Saudi Arabia—the home of the
Arabian horse—always enjoyed idioms associated with the horse, and I was also pleased to
discover many of them shared my enthusiasm for boxing. Of course, they had their favorites!
Nothing is so basic to all people as the hand, so try doing a lesson just devoted to that.
Idioms range from help & assistance to oppression. And it is easy to pantomime
expressions like hand out and give / lend a hand and have the upper / whip hand. Such a
lesson would make a nice lesson in a place like Kosovo, where your classroom might be a
Page 47 of 1574
café, your textbook is you, and where your students—poor as they are—will insist on paying
for your coffee. You want to give a good lesson to students like that!
17. Expressions related to gesture and bodily reaction are easy to pantomime. I went to the
director to get his approval and he gave me the thumbs up. / I didn’t realize that, thank you
for opening my eyes. / That film bored me, it was a big yawn. Pairs like these make easy
matching exercises.
18. As mentioned above, a name for a person (pioneer, acolyte, steward, leper, butcher, warrior
clown, etc.) is often used figuratively. You can find a list at person in this work. All teachers
are aware of the sequence of grammar, and in Saudi Arabia, in military environments, a
semi-insult like bully is a good way to exemplify it. “You are a bully!” Or, “You are a big
bully!” Or, “You are such a bully! Use the negative imperative + noun pattern and you get,
“Don’t be a bully!” Use stop + being + noun and you have “Stop being a bully!” Or
substitute donkey. Donkey is not a vocabulary item in the ALC/DLI, but everyone I taught in
Saudi Arabia know it in English, and its connotation.
19. Use analogies; like metaphors, they compare and make connections. I usually introduce them
in the following form: Stand up is to resist as _____ is to surrender. The center is to a circle
as _____ is to a hurricane. Spring is to a young man as _____is to an old man. A period of
time is to the life of a man as _____is to a book. Articles can be especially problematical and
this is a chance to use them. When students give answers to analogies like these, even when
they gave me the anticipated answer, I always ask them to explain their answers using
complete sentences. Analogies like these can be used at the most basic level and students find
them novel and interesting. A ship is to the sea as _____ is to the desert is one I often gave in
Saudi Arabia. Don’t forget to ask why.
20. Teachers can incorporate figurative language into routine classroom language. If your
students get too noisy, you can say, “Hey, turn down the volume!” or “Lower the
temperature!” or “Cool down” or “Keep cool!” or “Let’s dial it back!” or “Don’t be such a
hothead!” If a student becomes too impatient, you can say, “Hold your horses!” Instead of
asking if a student understands or not, you might ask, “Are you in the dark?” You can used
lexicalized gestures to praise: “I salute you,” “I applaud you,” “I take my cap off to you.”
When a student’s feelings get hurt, you can say, “A military man needs thick skin!” Students
tend to hear, note, and acquire such figurative language, especially if it is repeated day in and
day out. More importantly, though, it gives the figurative nature of language its due.
21. Feel free to say a little bit about the literal meaning for those words we use figuratively. If
you ever teach or explain the figurative use of castaway, for example, you might spend a few
minutes telling your students about those actual poor wretches on Tromelin Island in the
Indian Ocean. At the entry for scuttle I mention two instances where entire fleets of ships
were scuttled. Below the entry for amok is a quote from The Malay Archipelago by Alfred
Russel Wallace about that practice. Below the entry for earthquake (effect) is a rather long
Page 48 of 1574
entry from the same author, which will make those of us who have never experienced an
earthquake think about how incredibly destabilizing it can be. In the entry for whirlwind is an
eyewitness account of a black buran experienced in Lop Nur, Xinjiang, by Sven Hedin. At
blizzard, I have included a short quote from V.K. Arseniev and Dersu about an actual
blizzard, or purga. Below the entry for pioneer (person) in the dictionary, I note Rudyard
Kipling’s stirring poem “The Explorer.” There are always a few students who will find that
poem on the internet and read it, based on your recommendation.
22. Take a page from the quote from Emerson above and use the frames he uses to get your
students thinking about metaphor. “Right means...; wrong means...; the crossing of a line
means...; we say heart to express... ; a cunning man is...; attention is...; an effect is... Words
and phrases for that last are entered in the category effect. They remind us than an effect is
often thought of as a wave in a medium: ripples as in water, with the related word splash;
waves in the air like a shock wave; and sound waves like reverberation and repercussion.
That is the reason for expressions like: “His surprise resignation caused ripples / shock waves
/ reverberations around the world.”
23. Get students to notice language use in longer passages of speech or text. Vocabulary choices
are often predictable. For example, a crime story or crime podcast is bound to have words
used figuratively based on hunting and searching & discovery. Articles about famous
people will usually have figurative language relating to importance & significance. It’s fun
to read an article and identify sets like these.
24. Here’s a good idea to make the figurative and the literal real to your students within the four
walls of your classroom. First, consult the category of books & reading in the thesaurus of
this work. Write “literal” on one side of the board, “figurative” on the other, hold up a book,
and go to work. You might start with spine. You can something like, “Look, do you see this
part of the book here? Well, it’s called the spine. And I have a spine! This is my spine! And I
can break this book’s spine, and I can break my own spine if I’m in a bad auto accident!”
There will be many literal and figurative pairs for you to talk about with your students. The
dictionary of collocations will give you attested examples of use and help you with the
collocations. If you have a flair for the dramatic and a perfect sense of timing, as you no
doubt do, because you are a teacher and you have read this far in the work, you will save
“close the book” with its meaning of reconciliation, resolution & conclusion for the bell,
the smiles, and the break.
Page 49 of 1574
An alphabetized list of the categories in the thesaurus
Consider the category color (2). What can colors relate / refer to? What can colors
represent? When you visit that category in the thesaurus, you will see several subcategories that
might give you some ideas for when you teach your lesson on colors. One subcategory is “proper
name.” On the world map in my classroom in Saudi Arabia, I always enjoyed pointing out the
“color” seas to my military students: the Red Sea; the Black Sea; the White Sea; the Yellow Sea.
In the subcategory “character & personality” you will see the phrase, black sheep. I never failed
to mention my “black-sheep” brother John to my students. In the subcategory “experience” is the
word greenhorn. I always mentioned this, because I knew some students would pick the term up
and chaff / guy one another with it. In the subcategory “feeling, emotion & effect” is blue,
meaning sad. The question, “Are you blue?” never failed to make my students smile. Not
because Arabs are literal minded—they talk about teachers having black and white hearts—but
because the ALC/DLI is so relentlessly literal. And I can do all this in an introductory class,
using the simplest grammar.
Now consider the category feeling, emotion & effect (1). How do we think of feelings,
emotions and effects? How do we talk about those things? There are many subcategories in this
category, and three of those subcategories are larger than the others: “direction,” “sensation,” and
“temperature.” This corresponds exactly to the metaphors cognitive linguists have identified:
HAPPY IS UP. SAD IS DOWN. AFFECTION IS WARMTH. EMOTIONAL EFFECT IS PHYSICAL CONTACT. If
you combine bodily reaction and gesture, you get a fourth large sub-category. The ALC/DLI
includes “to hurt one’s feelings,” which is figurative, based on sensation. I have used many
expressions from this category in my classes, including ones like, “Are you down?” “Cheer up!”
“I will lift your spirits,” “Cool off,” “Don’t be such a hothead,” “Don’t be so thin-skinned,” “A
military man must have thick skin,” “You cut me!” etc.
name #
addiction 2
affix 2
air 2
alcohol 2
allusion 2
amount 2
animal 2
antiques 2
apple 2
arm 2
astronomy 2
atmosphere 2
ax 2
baby 2
back 2
ball 2
balloon 2
baseball 2
name #
basketball 2
bell 2
Bible 2
biology 2
bird 2
birth 2
blade 2
blanket 2
blood 2
boat 2
bodily reaction 2
body 2
books & reading 2
bottle 2
boundary 2
boxing 2
breadth 2
breathing 2
Page 50 of 1574
name #
bridge 2
bubble 2
bullet 2
burden 2
burial 2
canal 2
cards 2
carpets & rugs 2
cat 2
center & periphery 2
chain 2
chemistry 2
chess 2
circus 2
clock 2
cloth 2
clothing & accessories 2
cloud 2
color 2
consumption 2
container 2
control & lack of control 2
cooking 2
corner 2
cows & cattle 2
crashes & collisions 2
creature 2
crime 2
dam 2
day 2
death & life 2
depth 2
desert 2
destruction 2
direction 2
distance 2
document 2
dog 2
doors & thresholds 2
ear 2
earth & world 2
earthquake 2
electricity 2
engine 2
epithet 2
name #
equilibrium & stability 2
erosion 2
exclamation 2
explosion 2
eye 2
face 2
family 2
fan 2
farming & agriculture 2
fatness & thinness 2
fence 2
film 2
finger 2
fire 2
fish 2
fist 2
flags & banners 2
flood 2
flying & falling 2
fog 2
food & drink 2
foot 2
football 2
force 2
forest 2
fortification 2
fountain 2
fox 2
frog 2
fruits & vegetables 2
functioning 2
gambling 2
gate 2
geometry 2
gesture 2
gift 2
giving, receiving, bringing & returning 2
glacier 2
government 2
ground, terrain & land 2
hair 2
hammer 2
hand 2
hardness & softness 2
hat 2
Page 51 of 1574
name
#
head
2
health & medicine
2
heart
2
heating water
2
heel
2
height
2
history
2
hole
2
horizon
2
horn
2
horse
2
hour
2
house
2
hunting
2
hygiene
2
Iliad & Odyssey
2
infrastructure
2
insect
2
island
2
journeys & trips
2
jungle
2
justice
2
key
2
knee
2
knife
2
ladder
2
lap
2
leg
2
letters & characters
2
light & dark
2
lightning
2
line
2
lion
2
love, courtship & marriage
2
magic
2
manufacturing
2
map
2
mark
2
materials & substances
2
meat
2
mechanism
2
memorization
2
mental health
2
middle ages
2
military
2
name
#
mining
2
mirror
2
mixture
2
money
2
moon
2
mountains & hills
2
mouth
2
movement
2
music
2
nail
2
neck
2
nose
2
nuclear energy
2
number
2
object
2
orientation
2
part of speech
2
party
2
path
2
pendulum
2
physics
2
picture
2
pile
2
place
2
plane
2
plant
2
platform
2
position
2
potato
2
predation
2
prep, adv, adj, particle
2
pressure
2
proximity
2
pump
2
puppet
2
purses & wallets
2
puzzle
2
radio
2
rain
2
rat
2
religion
2
riding
2
river
2
rocket
2
roof
2
Page 52 of 1574
name #
rope 2
route 2
royalty 2
rubbing & washing 2
ruins 2
scale 2
school & education 2
sea 2
season 2
sensation 2
sex 2
shadow 2
shape 2
shark 2
sheep 2
shoulder 2
sign, signal, symbol 2
size 2
skeleton 2
skin, muscle, nerves & bone 2
sky 2
sleep 2
smell 2
snake 2
snow & ice 2
society 2
sound 2
space 2
speech 2
speed 2
spider 2
sports & games 2
stair 2
standing, sitting & lying 2
statue 2
stomach 2
storm 2
sun 2
surveying 2
swamp 2
sword 2
table 2
target 2
taste 2
teeth 2
name #
temperature 2
tent 2
theater 2
throat 2
throwing, putting & planting 2
thumb 2
ticket 2
tide 2
tiger 2
toe 2
tongue 2
tools & technology 2
train 2
tree 2
tsunami 2
umbrella 2
verb 2
violence 2
volcano 2
walking, running & jumping 2
wall 2
warehouse 2
waste 2
water 2
wave 2
weapon 2
weather & climate 2
wedge 2
weight 2
wheat 2
whip 2
wind 2
window 2
wolf 2
wounds & scars 2
wrestling 2
writing & spelling 2
zoo 2
ability & lack of ability 1
absorption & immersion 1
acceptance & rejection 1
access & lack of access 1
accusation & criticism 1
achievement, recognition & praise 1
action, inaction & delay 1
Page 53 of 1574
name #
activity 1
admiration & contempt 1
affliction 1
allegiance, support & betrayal 1
allusion 1
alternatives & choices 1
amelioration & renewal 1
amount 1
amount & effect 1
analysis, interpretation & explanation 1
appeal 1
appearance 1
appearance & disappearance 1
appearance & reality 1
area 1
assembling 1
attachment 1
attainment 1
attempt 1
attention, scrutiny & promotion 1
attenuation 1
attraction & repulsion 1
avoidance & separation 1
bases 1
behavior 1
biodiversity 1
branching system 1
campaign 1
center & periphery 1
certainty & uncertainty 1
character & personality 1
characterization 1
coercion & motivation 1
coming, arriving, staying, leaving &
returning
1
commitment & determination 1
comparison & contrast 1
competition 1
complexity 1
comprehension & incomprehension 1
computer 1
concealment & lack of concealment 1
condition & status 1
configuration 1
conflict 1
name #
confronting, dealing with & ignoring
things
1
consciousness & awareness 1
constraint & lack of constraint 1
consumption 1
content 1
context 1
control & lack of control 1
corruption 1
cost & benefit 1
courage & lack of courage 1
course 1
cover 1
creating & transformation 1
curtailment 1
danger 1
death & life 1
decline 1
dependency 1
destruction 1
development 1
development, easiness & effort 1
directing 1
direction 1
dismissal, removal & resignation 1
disruption 1
division 1
division & connection 1
dominance & submission 1
driving force 1
eagerness & reluctance 1
effect 1
empathy & lack of empathy 1
enthusiasm 1
environment 1
epithet 1
equilibrium & stability 1
euphemism 1
evidence 1
experience 1
experimentation 1
extent & scope 1
failure, accident & impairment 1
fantasy & reality 1
farming & agriculture 1
Page 54 of 1574
name #
fate, fortune & chance 1
feeling, emotion & effect 1
fictive communication 1
fictive meeting & seeing 1
fictive motion 1
fictive position 1
fictive possession 1
fictive transportation 1
flaws & lack of flaws 1
force 1
functioning 1
future 1
geography 1
giving, receiving, bringing & returning 1
gossip 1
group, set & collection 1
growth & development 1
guilt 1
haste 1
heart 1
help & assistance 1
hierarchy 1
history 1
hyperbole 1
idea 1
identity & nature 1
importance & significance 1
impression 1
inauguration 1
inclusion & exclusion 1
increase & decrease 1
initiation 1
insult 1
interest 1
involvement 1
isolation & remoteness 1
judgment 1
knowledge & intelligence 1
language 1
leaking 1
location 1
measurement 1
message 1
migration 1
military 1
name #
mind 1
mixture 1
money 1
movement 1
obligation 1
obstacles & impedance 1
occurrence 1
operation 1
opportunities & possibilities 1
oppression 1
orientation 1
origin 1
past & present 1
perception, perspective & point of view 1
performance 1
person 1
place 1
portal 1
position, policy & negotiation 1
possession 1
power 1
predation 1
presence & absence 1
pressure 1
primacy, currency, decline &
obsolescence
1
priority 1
product 1
progress & lack of progress 1
proper name 1
protection & lack of protection 1
proximity 1
punishment & recrimination 1
pursuit, capture & escape 1
readiness & preparedness 1
reconciliation, resolution & conclusion 1
reference 1
relationship 1
repetition 1
representation 1
reputation 1
resemblance 1
resiliency 1
resistance, opposition & defeat 1
responsibility 1
Page 55 of 1574
name #
restraint & lack of restraint 1
revenge 1
reverence 1
reversal 1
role 1
route 1
sacrifice 1
sanctioning, authority & non-conformity 1
script 1
searching & discovery 1
sequence 1
sex 1
shape 1
sight 1
sincerity, lack of sincerity & honesty 1
situation 1
size 1
social interaction 1
society 1
sound 1
source 1
speech 1
speed 1
starting, going, continuing & ending 1
strategy 1
strength & weakness 1
substance & lack of substance 1
name #
subterfuge 1
success & failure 1
sufficiency, insufficiency & excess 1
superiority & inferiority 1
superlative 1
supplying 1
surveillance 1
survival, persistence & endurance 1
suspicion 1
taking & removing 1
target 1
taxonomy & classification 1
throwing, putting & planting 1
time 1
timeliness & lack of timeliness 1
transmission 1
transportation 1
unanimity & consensus 1
violence 1
vocative 1
wants, needs, hopes and goals 1
warning 1
welcome 1
welcome 1
wheat 1
work & duty 1
worth & lack of worth 1
Page 56 of 1574
The dictionary of
collocations
A
ablaze (adjective)
ablaze with passion
his speech began in a quiet smolder and ended ~
ablaze with speculation
the Internet was ~ about why...
set social media ablaze
his murder has ~ (of a young rapper)
set Twitter ablaze
his late-night tweet ~
♦ “A Texas woman ended up burning down her home in a heated battle
with a snake. When the Texarkana resident spotted the serpent in her
garden, she doused it with gasoline and set it ablaze. The flaming snake
slithered into a nearby brush pile, igniting it and the house in a
conflagration...”
activity / initiation / feeling, emotion & effect: fire
about-face (in an about-face)
in an about face
~, the President abandoned his plan to…
in an about face from a year ago
~, Congress voted to expand…
in an embarrassing about face
~, officials acknowledged that…
reversal: direction / military
about-face (other)
about face for Pakistan
his policies, if successful, will mean a real ~
about-face for the government
the request is an ~ (Afghanistan)
about-face from a year ago
the space agency's new policy is an ~
about-face on the bill
he deserves credit for his ~
about face with regard to Israel
he has done an ~
abrupt about-face
the admission was an ~
belated about-face
the ~ won't fool the people (by a government)
ecological about-face
earth has done an ~ (NASA statement)
ideological about-face
the literature of ~ includes…
about-face came
his ~ after…
did an about-face
the military ~
done an about face
he has ~ with regard to Israel (a leader)
♦ “Fall in!” "Attention!" "Left face!" “Right face!” "About face!" "Forward,
march!" “Road guard... post! "Column... halt!" “At ease!” “Fall out!”
(Military commands.)
reversal: direction / military
about-turn (noun)
about-turn on the subject
the government's seeming ~ of Islamic law
diplomatic about-turn
this latest ~ on Syria
sudden about-turn
athletes are shocked and outraged at Wada’s ~
reversal: direction
above (above the fray, etc.)
above the fray
he is trying to stay ~ (a politician)
behavior: direction / height / prep, adv, adj, particle
above (above the law, etc.)
above the law
not even the president is ~
nobody is ~ (judge arrested)
superiority & inferiority: direction / position / prep, adv, adj,
particle
above (hierarchy)
above him in the pecking order
the fit-again Erik Lamela is ~ (Tottenham Hotspur)
hierarchy: direction / position / prep, adv, adj, particle
aboveboard (adjective)
aboveboard
everything I did was ~
♦ This might come from the world of cards, and its opposite might be
underhanded.
subterfuge: cards / direction
abrasive (adjective)
abrasive and annoying
he is ~
Page 57 of 1574
brilliant and abrasive
a ~ engineer named…
character & personality: sensation
feeling, emotion & effect: sensation
absorb (a country, etc.)
absorbed Kyrgyzstan
Imperial Russia ~ and its nomadic tribes
ability to absorb
their language's ~ new words (German)
absorption & immersion: verb / water
absorb (books, culture, etc.)
absorbed books
he ~ by the dozen (self-learning at library)
absorb the culture
a lot of the girls didn't really ~ (US models in Japan)
absorbed a gothic sensibility
he ~ which would imprint itself on his work
absorbed (Islamic) principles and traditions
the young prince ~
absorption & immersion: verb / water
absorb (punishment, etc.)
absorbed the (full ) force
he ~ of the explosion with his body (hero soldier)
absorbed (a lot of) punishment
he ~ in the last round (a boxer)
absorption & immersion: verb / water
absorbed
absorbed into Saudi Arabia
Qatar might well have been ~ (history)
absorbed by the society
they were ~ they invaded (Mongols)
forcibly absorbed
the three Baltic republics were ~ into the Soviet Union
absorption & immersion: water
abundance (amount)
abundance of caution
out of an ~, we are altering the production plan (virus)
♦ This word comes from the Latin unda, or wave. The root is more
obvious in a word like inundate. Still, it’s a nice way to think of the
meaning.
amount / sufficiency, insufficiency & excess: sea / water /
wave
abuzz (activity)
abuzz with activity
the base is ~ (as US leaves Afghanistan)
abuzz with warnings
a nervous Muslim world is ~ of a threat from the West
had people abuzz
the news ~ this morning (politics)
kept this peninsula abuzz
gold mining and logging once ~ with activity
activity: animal / insect / sound
abyss (noun)
financial abyss
there seems to be no way out of this ~
on the brink of a (sectarian) abyss
the country is walking ~ (protests)
on the edge of electoral abyss
his campaign teetered ~, but he is scrambling his way back
fall into an abyss
women ~, and they can't get out (eating disorders)
plunged into a (political) abyss
the country ~ after…
plunges (further) into the abyss
as Greece's blighted economy ~
pulled the (financial) system back from the abyss
the government ~
sliding into the abyss
the country is ~ (economy)
teetering towards the abyss
the city is ~ of bankruptcy
worked his way out of the abyss
he ~ of crime and hopelessness
♦ In an article in The New York Times, "Computers That Trade on the
News," Graham Bowley reports that the word abyss in an article about
the Greek financial crisis caused computers to initiate sell orders. Wall
Street mines such words from news articles and Twitter feeds to analyze
the market.
destruction: ground, terrain & land / mountains & hills
accelerant (noun)
accelerant
Twitter is the ~ for so many to spew outrage
accelerant of (global) conflict
climate upheaval is acting as an ~
accelerants of human misery
jails are ~
described the internet as an accelerant
officials ~ that speeds up radicalization
increase & decrease: fire
accelerate (verb)
accelerating their efforts
states are ~ to ban texting while driving
Page 58 of 1574
accelerate learning
pupils use pedal power to ~
inflation is accelerating
~, the Bureau of Labor Statistics says
outbreak is accelerating
the measles ~
increase & decrease / speed / starting, going, continuing &
ending: movement / verb
accession (noun)
accession number
the ~ is a unique identifier (cultural property)
accession process
the ~ is dead (Turkey and the EU)
♦ “The EU pretends to negotiate, Turkey pretends to reform.” (Turkish
accession to the EU.)
primacy, currency, decline & obsolescence: direction /
royalty
ace (noun)
ace
it was time for me to bring out my ~
ace in the hole
my ~ is that I can…
the fear card is his ~ (national security)
our nuclear arsenal is our ~
strategy / strength & weakness: cards / gambling
accompany (attachment)
accompany the tourist invasion
the economic benefits that will ~
attachment / relationship: journeys & trips / movement /
verb
Achilles' heel (noun)
Achilles' heel
security was our ~ (US AID project in Afghanistan)
Achilles' heel of 3-D TV
clunky glasses were the ~ (remedied)
Achilles' heel of the system
the ~ lies…
Achilles' heel of the West
the Arabian Gulf is the ~ (oil and Iran)
Achilles heel for Chelsea
this is the ~—marking in the box (soccer)
angioplasty's Achilles' heel
the problem is ~ (regrowth of tissue)
company's Achilles' heel
the ~ is that…
skiers' Achilles' heel
the knees are the ~
proved to be his Achilles’ heel
while he excelled in wooing donors, finances ~
strength & weakness: allusion / Iliad & Odyssey
protection & lack of protection: allusion / Iliad & Odyssey
acid (acid debate, etc.)
acid asides
she is famous for her ~ (a comic)
acid blogger
people are disgusted with radio ranters and ~s (civility)
acid debate
the controversy has sparked ~ (religion)
feeling, emotion & effect / speech: chemistry / materials &
substances
acid-tongued
acid-tongued
the ~ comedian (Groucho Marx)
feeling, emotion & effect / speech: chemistry / materials &
substances / tongue
acolyte (noun)
acolyte of big business
he is an ~ and corporate greed
acolytes of (US) capitalism
he is like most ~
Obama acolyte
he is an ~ who… (politics)
tones of an acolyte
he described her in ~
swarmed by (young) acolytes
he was ~ (a film director)
enthusiasm: person / religion
person: religion
acrobat (person)
linguistic acrobats
slang is fine for ~ (who can code-switch)
person: circus / sports & games
ability & lack of ability / difficulty, easiness & effort: circus /
person
acrobatic (adjective)
verbally acrobatic
Clinton was more intelligent, calculating, and ~ (vs. Bush)
comparison & contrast: affix
ability & lack of ability / difficulty, easiness & effort: circus /
movement / sports & games
Page 59 of 1574
acrobatics (noun)
acronymic acrobatics
the artificiality and awkwardness of the ~ (LGBTTIQQ2SA)
verbal acrobatics
there are no ~ to charm (a book review)
vocal acrobatics
a sturdy rhythm section and Olivia W-B’s ~ (music)
ability & lack of ability / difficulty, easiness & effort: circus /
movement / sports & games
act (insincere show)
hard-ass act
beneath their ~ they were just teens (young Marines)
maturity act
kids put on this ~ (high school)
own act
they came to believe too much in their ~ (Hitler, etc.)
hard-to-get act
ditch the ~ (relationships)
ditch the (hard-to-get) act
you should ~
keep up the act
how long can he ~
put on an act
con artists know how to ~
putting on an act
a lot of guys seem nice, but they are just ~
he's lying, he's just ~
everyone in high school is to some extent ~
performance / role: theater
act (performance)
circus act
he's a ~ and he's killing boxing
vagabond act
they morphed their ~ into today's World Tour (surfers)
balancing act
setting limits, encouraging independence is a real ~
juggling act
trying to build a team is a hard ~ (basketball)
difficult act
the King's got a lot more ~ than in the last decade
tough act
their father is a ~ to follow
performance / role: theater
act (clean up one's act)
cleaned up its act
the CIA director said the company had ~ (security)
the city has clamped down on violence and ~
in the 1990s, Manhattan ~
cleaned up her act
she checked herself into rehab, then ~
we thought she had ~, but… (athlete)
clean up your act
you need to ~
amelioration & renewal / behavior: hygiene / verb
act (development)
final act
the hostage drama saw its ~ played out (plane)
the family is trying to interpret his ~ (suicide)
first act
on the world soccer stage, it was a stunning ~ (loss)
the ~ has closed with a tremendous finale (Civil War)
the ~ of the tragedy has been enacted (war)
you've just seen the ~, the finale is yet to come (trial)
last act
and then began the long ~ of his life (a writer)
main act
there was no preparation for the ~ (combat)
this is only the prologue to the ~ (banks fail)
the sideshow became part of the ~ (war)
he quickly became the ~ at the meeting (politician)
second acts
I think there are ~ in life, people can move on but...
development: theater
addict (chess addict, etc.)
chess addicts
the Internet is great for ~
movie addict
an adolescent ~
crossword puzzle addict
he is a ~
bone fishing addict
hard-core yachtsmen and ~s
total (TV) addict
I love TV, I'm a ~
generation of (tanning) addicts
tanning beds spawned a ~
person: addiction
enthusiasm: addiction / health & medicine / person
addicted (enthusiasm)
addicted to his sport
he was so ~ that he rarely spent a weekend indoors
addicted to fly fishing
my friend and I were ~ for wild brook trout
Page 60 of 1574
addicted to a dating game
she’s a gamer, ~ called One True Prince
passionately addicted
he was ~ to Beethoven’s music (Berlioz)
enthusiasm: addiction / health & medicine
addicted (dependency)
addicted to (this kind of) high-paced content
people have become ~ (TikTok)
addicted to economic growth
we are ~
addicted to oil
we are ~ from the Middle East
grow (increasingly more) addicted
as we ~ to modern technology
dependency: addiction / health & medicine
addiction (enthusiasm)
Ives addiction
my ~ started one summer at music camp...
enthusiasm: addiction / health & medicine
addiction (dependency)
adrenalin addiction
~ drives reporters from one hotspot to another
entertainment addiction
corporate greed, ~ and political impotence (the US)
sex addiction
~ is not yet recognized as a psychiatric disorder
get off our (oil) addiction
we need to ~ (dependence on foreign oil)
dependency: addiction / health & medicine
addictive (adjective)
addictive
Thai food is ~
combat can be ~
comment boards are ~, same with Twitter, FB...
addictive (computer) games
~ are a moral hazard to youth (China)
addictive thing
this is an ~ that hurts the students (laptops in class)
♦ A FUNNY CARTOON. In The New Yorker magazine (December 13,
2021), there is a funny cartoon. In the foreground, there is a rabbi,
standing behind a podium, obviously addressing an audience. Behind
him, in a chair, is a boy sitting in a chair with his hands politely folded.
The rabbi is intoning, “We are here to witness Jacob, who screamed at
his Xbox for four hours just this morning, become a man.”
♦ “He had been on the Internet every day since his early teens.”
behavior / enthusiasm / feeling, emotion & effect:
addiction / health & medicine
address (verb)
address the problems
we must ~ that underlie the insurgency
addressed more specific rumors
she ~ as well (cold case)
address stereotypes
be prepared to ~ when you hear them
addressed (such taboo) subjects
he ~ as race and sexuality (Pryor)
addresses this
is there currently any legislation on tape that ~
addresses the (invisible and visible) wounds
the center ~ of war
fictive communication: speech / verb
confronting, dealing with & ignoring things: speech / verb
add up (verb)
added up
she knew in an instant that it all ~ (signs of glue sniffing)
didn’t add up
her story ~
when you just use your common sense, it ~ (a juror)
it just didn’t make sense, just ~
doesn’t add up
it ~, it’s very suspicious (a suicide)
wait a second, this ~, there’s a problem here
just didn’t add up
why would he do that, it ~ (a disappearance)
analysis, interpretation & explanation: number
adhere (adhere to something)
adhere to
they have a code that they ~, blue silence (cops)
adhere to the norms
countries should strictly ~ of international law
attachment: materials & substances / verb
adjacent (rich-adjacent, etc.)
adjacent to the ballroom scene
Billy Porters was ~
Tess Monaghan adjacent
Dream Girl is ~, Tess actually appears (Laura Lippman)
basketball-adjacent
Harlow’s opening medley of ~ bangers (on SNL)
Disney-adjacent
a theater kid and ~ actor (Olivia Rodrigo)
gross-adjacent
is this behavior supposed to be gross (or at least ~), or...
Page 61 of 1574
jazz-adjacent
the song sounds ~, at a minimum, jazzy-ish (Adele)
lockdown-adjacent
2020, for all its ~ loneliness, still had anthems like “WAP”
MAGA-adjacent
no wanting people to shit on my steps doesn’t make me ~
music-adjacent
showcasing various ~ pockets of the city (Philly)
porn-adjacent
a series of soft-core, ~ films, I guess you could say...
punk-adjacent
the critically acclaimed, ~ two-tone bands of... (Ska)
restaurant-adjacent
one ~ business is doing well (equipment liquidator)
“rich-adjacent”
Connell gets into an elite university, where he becomes ~
rock-adjacent
a ~ album with producer...
soul-adjacent
soul and ~ music
sports-adjacent
I wrote a ~ love story (fiction)
inclusion & exclusion: affix
adolescence (noun)
during its (starry-eyed) adolescence
A.I. ~, in the sixties... (technology)
podcasting’s adolescence
in 2014, ~
growth & development: death & life
Adonis (handsome)
Adonis
the chubby man beat the ~ (Joshua vs. Ruiz / boxing)
appearance: allusion
adopt (verb)
adopted the nickname
he ~, “pied piper of R&B” (R. Kelly)
adopted his (slash-and-burn, scorched-earth) politics
Republicans have ~
♦ “We’ve done a couple of different initiatives that we’re super proud of.
One is called “Light Up Chinatown” and we ended up having people
adopt a lantern, and you can go visit your lantern in Chinatown. It
basically brightens up the street for our elders, you know, walking the
streets at night, so that they feel a little bit safer.” (Joanne Kwong,
President, Pearl River Mart, a notable Chinese department store.)
acceptance & rejection: family / verb
adopted (adopted state, etc.)
adopted home
Asheville was her ~
adopted state
my ~ of North Carolina
acceptance & rejection: family
adopted
adopted
they want their pet ideas ~ (conservatives)
adopted as a corporate tool
PowerPoint was ~
acceptance & rejection: family
adrift (adjective)
adrift in the (new multiparty) sea
politicians, ~, now needed campaign funds
seemed adrift
he ~ without the army for structure (a troubled soldier)
spent years adrift
they had ~ in their diaspora (Somalis in Lewistown)
direction / division & connection: boat
course: direction / journeys & trips
control & lack of control / progress & lack of progress: boat
/ direction
adult (development)
adults in the room
the cypherpunk kids versus the ~
adult table
Japan wanted to demonstrate it was an adult sitting at the ~
person: baby
experience: person
growth & development: death & life
advance (in advance, etc.)
days in advance
the killing was planned ~
several days in advance
models predicted the high pressure ~
what is coming in advance
we increased our radar so we know ~ (public health)
time / timeliness & lack of timeliness: direction / distance /
position / prep, adv, adj, particle
advance (a day can advance, etc.)
day advanced
as the ~, it got hotter and hotter
morning advanced
as the ~, the soldiers prepared for battle
Page 62 of 1574
time: direction / movement / verb
advance (verb)
advanced in jumps
his career ~
advanced with giant steps
nuclear science has ~
advanced from guarded to good condition
the twins ~ (operation)
advance their cause through leadership
people who ~ or example
advance the cause
~ of freedom in Africa (US)
advance medicine
the goal of the partnership is to ~, lower costs
advance our (own negotiating) position
as we ~
advanced rapidly
mine technology ~ after World War II
career advanced
his ~ in jumps
science has advanced
nuclear ~ with giant steps
efforts to advance
~ pain research
progress & lack of progress: direction / movement / verb
advance (noun)
advances in medicine
the 20th century saw great ~
breathtaking advance
this is a ~ (legislative act)
great advance
anesthesia was a ~ in surgery
major advance
US physicians made another ~ in endocrinology
medical advance
animal testing has led to many ~s
progress & lack of progress: direction / movement
advance guard
advance guard of the feminists
she belonged to the ~ (the sculptor Kathleen Scott)
driving force: military
aegis (noun)
under his aegis
he insists the newspaper is not ~
~, sales soared (Tim Cook / Apple)
♦ An aegis (pronounced EE-jus) was a breastplate or shield. It means
protection or sponsorship.
protection & lack of protection: military / weapon
aegis (Aegis Insurance, etc.)
Aegis Combat System
the ~ protects ships
Aegis Security Insurance Company
the ~ focuses on Property and Casualty insurance
proper name: weapon
protection & lack of protection: proper name
afford (verb)
afford
doubt is a luxury they can't ~ (soldiers on way to Iraq)
afford to fall
we can't ~ further behind
afford to lose
the President cannot ~ Iraq
afford to remain
we cannot ~ passive spectators to such acts…
afford another Somalia
the UN cannot ~
afford the disruption
we can't ~ that would bring (company policies)
cost & benefit: money / verb
aflame (resemblance)
aflame with fall color
the maple trees are ~
resemblance: fire
aflame (adjective)
aflame
the region is ~ (Middle East)
the Arab world was ~ in March 2011
aflame with (righteous) anger
at some moments we are ~
aflame with outrage
Republicans were ~ (politics)
aflame with violence
in the dying days of apartheid South Africa was ~
aflame with uprisings
YA novels imagine a world ~
still aflame
his curiosity is ~ (a filmmaker)
set hearts aflame
his verses still ~ (the Persian poet Hafez)
set the social medial world aflame
Page 63 of 1574
he ~ after writing... (religion)
set aflame by (recent) comments
the classical music community has been ~ from...
activity / initiation / feeling, emotion & effect: fire
starting, going, continuing & ending: fire
afloat
keep the studio afloat
sentiment alone cannot ~ (MGM / debt woes)
keeping the regime afloat
oil is ~
stay afloat
Iran can ~ without Western investment
he struggled to ~ (low-paying job)
he got us disaster relief to ~ (politician)
the economy is struggling to ~
survival, persistence & endurance: water
after (at a later time)
after King Hammurabi
King Solomon ruled about 700 years ~
after horses
trains came ~ (technology)
♦ Earlier times are before later times, and later times are after earlier
times, based on the time queue. The person who reaches the end of a
trail reaches it earlier than the people following him or her.
sequence / time: direction / position / prep, adv, adj,
particle
afterglow (in the afterglow)
in the afterglow
~ that follows the performance, the audience lingers...
in the afterglow of another championship
a decade later, ~, he said… (an athlete)
in the afterglow of (Obama's) election
she found it easier to run ~ (a politician)
in the afterglow of his (first big) role
he moved into the Chateau Marmont ~ (L.A. actor)
in the afterglow of our (rafting) trip
we relaxed and drank wine ~
in the (mellowing) afterglow of victory
~, they don't seem so fierce (elected women)
in the afterglow of their Tony wins
the films received increased business ~
basking in the afterglow
we're still ~ of the president's marvelous speech
he was ~ of a caretaker’s honeymoon period (team)
♦ A full-page print ad for the Subaru Legacy asks the question, "Can a
drive have an afterglow?" In the foreground is the sedan, parked on a
scenic overlook. In the background is a dramatic vista of the sea and
clouds just after sunset. Of course, the beautiful lingering light is the
actual afterglow.
feeling, emotion & effect: atmosphere / sky
afterglow (other)
afterglow of those visits
the ~ has never worn off (celebrity visits restaurant)
afterglow of victory
the ~ was brief (political reformers)
post-World Cup afterglow
how will the ~ be reflected in attendance (US soccer)
happiness and afterglow
the party is flushed with ~ (elections)
feeling, emotion & effect: atmosphere / sky
afternoon (at a later time)
in the afternoon
~, we built igloos
♦ The forenoon is before noon, in the morning.
sequence / time: direction / position / prep, adv, adj,
particle
aftershock (noun)
aftershocks from 9/11
the ~ forced the company to cuts jobs nationwide (airline)
aftershocks from the (shareholder) revolt
the ~ will be felt across the business world
political aftershocks
the ~ of the 2004 tsunami… (Sri Lanka)
feel the aftershocks
we will ~ of the financial crisis for a long time
amount & effect / effect / feeling, emotion & effect:
earthquake
against (opposition)
against everything
I am ~ he stands for (politics)
against it
the Prime Minister is ~ (a proposal)
allegiance, support & betrayal / resistance, opposition &
defeat: prep, adv, adj, particle
against (up against)
up against
this is what cities are ~ (hacked for ransom)
up against a history
we were ~ of social injustice (prosecuting O.J. Simpson)
obstacles & impedance: prep, adv, adj, particle
age (come of age)
come of age
will this be the year they ~ (team in Champions League)
Page 64 of 1574
growth & development: death & life
age (age of Trump, etc.)
age of Trump
he covered Democratic politics in the ~
age of fiscal belt-tightening
in an ~
age of edit
we are in an ~ (news, films, music, science, memes, etc.)
age of romantic giants
in an ~ he was a titan (Johann Wolfgang von Goethe)
age of social media
in this ~
age of Viagra
this is the ~, and Mr. Trink was its siren (Thailand)
age of technological wizardry
in an ~...
Gilded Age
the sixties were the ~ of rock journalism (excess)
golden age
the ~ of quiz shows of the 1950s
the ~ of the detective story (between world wars)
the Sopranos was the tripwire event that set off the ~ of TV
modern age
the ~ of blockbusters (films)
for the ages
it was a game ~ (an exciting basketball game)
age (of the steamer) lasted
the ~ 150 years (steamboats on the Yangtze River)
♦ “We live in a subscription age and a numbers age... This is a big, big
fight.” (The boxing promoter Eddie Hearn at a press conference for Katie
Taylor vs. Amanda Serrano, referring to DAZN, ticket sales, and social
media buzz, including Twitter.)
time: history
agency (groups)
agency
we want more than representation, we want ~ (an Asian)
language is ~, language is power (Korean girl in US)
agency to speak up for ourselves
we really didn’t have that ~ (a female soccer player)
agency, ferocity and encouragement
inspirational declarations of ~ (the TV series Pose)
her own agency
Baker managed to have ~ (Josephine Baker in France)
female agency
the “Dinner Party” is about ~ (Judy Chicago)
whatever a woman claims she wants is an expression of ~
sexual agency
a patriarchal world view that denied women ~
power and agency
the tech industry is where US workers have the most ~
build ~ in their work lives (through legal resources, etc.)
claiming agency
women are ~ (Judy Chicago / the “Dinner Party”)
denied women agency
a patriarchal world view that ~
have that agency
we really didn’t ~ to speak up for ourselves until now
inclines towards agency
the language around leadership ~ (gender research)
seeking agency
we’re seeking more than just representation, we’re ~
support (individual) agency
as a humanist, a womanist I ~ (Gazelle Amber Valentine)
take agency
reclaim desire and ~ over your sexual experiences (women)
♦ “You get to decide what your life looks like.” (“A Letter to College
Sports” by Cailin Bracken.)
♦ “For Asians, we’re seeking more than representation, we’re seeking
agency. We want to be able to tell our stories and show our characters in
all of our splendor and complexity, because that’s what it takes for
people to actually see us as people... I think Asian Americans are kinda
taking charge of our own destiny.” (Jeff Yang, author of Rise: A Pop
History of Asia America From the Nineties To Now. From ABC, GMA,
“How movies and TV show dehumanize and hypersexualize Asian
Americans.”)
♦ “I asked Frances Borzello, art historian, if there are any examples of
pre-20th Century nudes expressing women’s agency—for example,
portraits commissioned by a wife or mistress of themselves in order to
please or tantalise a partner or lover?” (“Is the nude selfie a new art
form?” by Holly Williams, 18 March 2021.)
♦ “If a player does not want to get vaccinated, we will stand behind him
one hundred percent. Look, players need to have agency when it comes
to what they decide to put in their bodies.” (Benjamin Watson, Vice
President, NFL Players Association.)
♦ “To be agentic is to be confident and decisive.” (Gender research.)
♦ Agency in this sense is almost always in opposition to victimhood.
inclusion & exclusion: society
agenda (noun)
wrecking-ball agenda
they have a ~ that is rooted in nationalism (politics)
hidden agendas
the unwritten rules, ~, and minefields
creepy agenda
it just makes you look like you have some kind of ~
personal agendas
this is stale news being recycled by those with ~
agenda and narrative
they want the city to burn, it helps their ~
fit your agenda
just stating the truth, sorry it doesn’t ~
pursue their (own hidden) agendas
Page 65 of 1574
factions ~ outside of the law
pushing or suppressing agendas
people wonder if the BBC is ~
wants, needs, hopes & goals: speech
agile (adjective)
agile development
~ means constantly making small improvements
agile and adaptive
security must be ~ (terrorism)
agile and responsive
government must become more ~ to business
ideologically agile
he was brilliant, funny, and ~ (a politician)
lean and agile
the company is ~
lean, agile and focused
the company is ~ on building better cars
pragmatic and agile
we must be ~ in pursuit of human rights (diplomacy)
smaller, (more) agile and innovative
~ will survive
remains (as) agile (as ever)
her mind ~
ability & lack of ability: movement
agility (noun)
agility
~ requires quick-minded, flexible leaders (military)
mental agility
~ skills include physical toughness and ~ (military)
tactical agility
~ is first of all a mental state (military)
ability & lack of ability: movement
agnostic (adjective)
agnostic to the prevailing political system
China is ~ of the countries it invests in
agnostic about the ideology
we’re ~ (of groups we investigate for violence / FBI)
agnostic about the use
the guidelines are ~ of experimental medications (no stance)
agnostic approach
an ~, one biased in favor neither of X or Y
brand agnostic
what we’re enforcing now is ~ (any vaccine will do)
genre-agnostic
this ~ young brother was raised on opera, gospel and funk
the ~ indie scene (Lizzo, etc.)
“militantly agnostic”
she takes a ~ approach to UFOs (Leslie Kean)
♦ The technical meaning of this word, like so many other trendy words,
has devolved to mean something like, “Not sure, who knows, unwilling to
commit, non-committal, no stance, undogmatic, don’t care...”
♦ Merriam-Webster’s online entry for this word is excellent.
certainty & uncertainty / commitment & determination:
religion
ago (two days ago / gone by)
two days ago
they left ~
long ago
in the ~, when I was a girl
♦ This means “gone by.”
past & present / time: movement / prep, adv, adj, particle
aground (run aground)
run aground
he was sure the investigation would ~ and find no evidence
run aground on the shoals
the promises have ~ of changing sex ratios
relationship can run aground
the author-biographer ~
failure, accident & impairment: boat / verb
Aha! (Aha! moment)
"Aha!" moment
she says that she had an ~ in 2005 (administrator)
Aha! instant
the ~ in cognitive science, the Eureka moment...
comprehension & incomprehension / consciousness &
awareness: exclamation / speech
ahead (ahead of his time, etc.)
see time (ahead of his time, etc.)
ahead (the future is ahead, etc.)
ahead of her
when you think about what was ~, it’s so sad (tragedy)
ahead of him
he has a great future ~ (athlete)
ahead of us
the single most important task we have ~
we've got a good deal of work ~
our darkest days are ~, not behind us (pandemic)
ahead for you and your baby
you probably have questions about what is ~
challenges ahead
prepare students for the ~ (military school)
Page 66 of 1574
Internet “father” Vint Cerf on ~
choices ahead
he understands the hard ~ (a politician)
days ahead
there are better ~
road ahead
no one knows what lies on the ~ (course of war)
STORMS AHEAD
~ (newspaper)
task ahead
the ~ for engineers and scientists is to…
book ahead
it’s good to ~ (camping reservations)
lie ahead
your best days ~
our best days ~
lies ahead
no one knows what ~
I don't know what ~
we are ready for the struggle that ~ (war)
look ahead
let's ~ to the future
let’s ~, the way you have to in a chess game (Brexit)
as we ~ to the elections coming up in November
looking ahead
~, clouds appear on the horizon (economy)
plan ahead
it's good to ~
♦ “We’re so focused on what’s ahead, we’re not worried about what’s
behind us.” (The boxer Anthony Joshua, speaking about his rematch with
Andy Ruiz Jr. AJ had lost the first match, in a tremendous upset.)
future / time: direction / journeys & trips / position / prep,
adv, adj, particle
ahead (before a future event)
ahead of elections
the increasingly bitter political climate ~ next summer
ahead of the Challenger’s launch
~, analysts could have made hundreds of charts...
ahead of his upcoming trial
he was back in court ~ (Markeith Loyd / Florida)
ahead of Medvedev’s visit
the admission came ~ to Warsaw
well ahead
weather forecasters saw it coming ~ of time
future / time: position / prep, adv, adj, particle
ahead (ahead of schedule, etc.)
ahead of schedule
we are ~
get ahead of the conversation
I’m not going to ~ that will take place (speculation)
timeliness & lack of timeliness: direction / position / prep,
adv, adj, particle
ahead (competition)
ahead of those
Swedish living standards are way ~ in the US
miles ahead
it was ~ of every similar application
million miles ahead
Liverpool are a ~ (of Manchester United / soccer)
two steps ahead
the virus was ~ (of preventative measures)
way ahead
Swedish living standards are ~ of those in the US
light years ahead
she was ~ of her peers
today’s tech is ~ of the old techniques (forensics)
come out ahead
I'm going to beat him, I'll ~ (mixed-martial arts)
puts them ahead
their strategy ~ of other banks
competition: direction / movement / position / prep, adv,
adj, particle / sports & games / walking, running & jumping
ahead (progress)
far ahead
rich countries are ~ of poor ones in adapting to warming
forging ahead
other countries are ~ (aquaculture)
get ahead
never pass up an opportunity to ~
marching ahead
the science is ~ (genetic tests)
move ahead
mentally ill people struggle to ~ in their lives
we must ~ into the future
moved ahead
he cautiously ~ with privatization
moving ahead
his friends were ~ while he was standing still
plowing ahead
we are ~ (difficult medical research)
pressing ahead
the Russians are ~ with fake social media accounts
we are ~ in our efforts (government official)
push ahead
we are trying to ~
Page 67 of 1574
surging ahead
Southeast Asia is ~ (aquaculture)
went ahead
the program ~ and was deemed a success
♦ Don't get mad, don't get even, get ahead.
progress & lack of progress / starting, going, continuing &
ending: direction / movement / prep, adv, adj, particle /
verb
ahead (go ahead)
went ahead with the event
they ~ (in spite of pandemic)
starting, going, continuing & ending: direction / journeys &
trips / movement / verb
ailing (adjective)
ailing
businesses are ~ because of government regulation
ailing economy
companies are feeling the effects of the ~
the government is pumping money into the ~
ailing Macs
she tends to ~ (tech worker)
ailing (housing) market
ending the deduction could cripple an already ~
condition & status: health & medicine
aim (verb)
aim to please
we ~ (a store motto)
aiming for
and that's what we're ~ (making it easy for shoppers)
aimed for a Friday night liftoff
the space agency ~
aim for a fun, less sanitized view
reenactors ~ of the Old West
target / wants, needs, hopes & goals: verb / weapon
aim (noun)
aim
if the ~ is to destroy vehicles, use mines (military)
their ~ is to trigger fear and chaos (political assassins)
their ~ is to survive (peasants)
aims of the campaign
ridding Iraq of WMD is one of the main ~
aim of the ceremony
the ~ is to… (Swazi reed dance)
aim of that operation
the ~ was to… (Russian military in Chechnya)
aim of the symposium
the broad ~ was to report on and discuss the…
aim of a show of force
the ~ is deterrence (military)
aim of storing
Glen Canyon Dam was finished with the ~ water for…
aim of overthrowing
it has the stated ~ the government (an opposition group)
aim in (my) life
before Qeis, I had no ~ (a student)
aim in (this) life
everyone has his own ~, and mine is to be a martyr
nomads' (traditional) aim
the Tibetan ~ of maximizing herd size (vs. slaughter)
terrorists’ aim
if the ~ was to…
intended aim
regulating the forces and means toward an ~ (military)
stated aim
it has the ~ of overthrowing the government
dual aim
the immunizations have a ~ (protect and prevent)
first aim
our ~ was to be competitive at the World Cup…
initial aim
having sex might have been his ~, but… (murderer)
primary aim
a ~ of ED intervention is to.. (domestic abuse)
strategic aim
application of military capability in support of ~s
traditional aim
the Tibetan nomads' ~ of maximizing herd size
ultimate aim
his ~ is to…
unselfish aim
most seem motivated by ~s
one aim
the staff has only ~, turning fantasy into reality
several aims
President Clinton and his advisers had ~
achieve this aim
to ~, we will have to…
target / wants, needs, hopes & goals: weapon
aim (take aim at something)
take aim at (pretty much every) race
his monologues ~ he can
took aim at America
Page 68 of 1574
other veterans of the Russian-Afghan war ~
taking dead aim
his company is ~ at… (a competitor)
target: verb / weapon
aimed
aimed at Muslims
a string of attacks by extremist Christians ~
aimed (specifically) at children
products ~
aimed at the (US) military
protest ~ have waxed and waned (S. Korea)
aimed at the superstitious
attention-grabbing advertisements ~ (muti)
aimed at abortion clinics and their workers
attacks ~ (US)
aimed at Pakistan's foreign community
an assault ~ (on a church)
aimed at modernizing
he announced a series of reforms ~ the bureau
aimed at preventing
mosquito-control programs ~ further cases (West Nile)
aimed at punishing
laws ~ habitual criminals
aimed at reducing
regulations ~ noise pollution
target: weapon
air (air of authority, etc.)
air of authority
you'll carry an ~
air of indifference
she has a calculated ~ (teen girl)
air of invincibility
America's ~ is gone (international basketball)
air of make-believe
diplomacy can have an ~ (protocol, etc.)
air of respectability
toy drives give bikers an ~
air of sophistication
she exudes an ~
air of superiority
he detected an ~
arrogant air
he had a preppie, ~ about him
carry an air
you'll ~ of authority
exudes an air
she ~ of sophistication
appearance: air / atmosphere
feeling, emotion & effect: air / atmosphere
air (environment)
air he breathes
that’s the ~ that he has internalized (Nazi website)
environment: air / atmosphere
identity & nature: air / atmosphere
air (anger in the air, etc.)
in the air
change was ~ (the law)
spring is ~
war is ~
the threat of litigation was always ~ (corporation)
anger in the air
there is much ~
electricity in the air
there is a new ~ (after combat and death)
fear in the air
with the general ~, people are paying off debt, not buying
feeling in the air
the ~ was he couldn’t have done it (charged at courthouse)
environment / feeling, emotion & effect / presence &
absence: air / atmosphere
air (up in the air)
up in the air
the school year ended with her plans ~
where things go from here is quite honestly ~
I think it’s still ~ a little bit (where athlete will commit to)
up in the air whether
it’s still ~... (making a decision)
still up in the air
her quest to land an internship is ~
when they can return to their homes is ~ (wildfires)
remains up in the air
the reason for the Moon Illusion ~
♦ “Up in the air” can link in certain cases to a phrase like, “Nobody knows
how this plane lands” with the idea of resolution & conclusion.
certainty & uncertainty: air / atmosphere / prep, adv, adj,
particle
air (breath of fresh air)
breath of fresh air
she's a ~ (politician)
the blog is a ~ (field notes from scientists)
his lay status is a ~ (new college president)
I thought he was a ~, but it turns out he is an elitist
breath of fresh air for the city
Page 69 of 1574
the mayor has been a ~
breath of fresh air after the scandal
he seemed to be a ~ of Watergate (politics)
unexpected breath of fresh air
their designs were an ~ (fashion show)
brings a breath of fresh air to the magazine
she ~ (new editor)
feeling, emotion & effect: air / atmosphere
amelioration & renewal: air / atmosphere / wind
air (hot air)
hot air
a plan without action is ~
global warming is ~ (an opinion)
just (a lot of) hot air
people talk about mine safety, but it's ~
a lot of hot air
~ blows out of Washington (politics)
full of hot air
he's ~ (a politician)
speech / substance & lack of substance: air / atmosphere
air (into thin air)
disappeared into thin air
she ~ (wanted for a crime)
vanished into thin air
it was like she just ~ (woman vanishes)
appearance & disappearance: air / atmosphere / sky
air (out of thin air)
appeared out of thin air
investors have ~
come out of thin air
ideas just don't ~
emerge out of thin air
the fear of the undead didn't ~
create credit out of thin air
the Federal Reserve can ~
create profit out of thin air
Wall Street can ~
appearance & disappearance: air / atmosphere / sky
origin: air / atmosphere / sky
air (clear the air)
clear the air
they had a meeting to ~ (athlete and coach)
an interview so she could ~ about what happened
if you had any lingering doubts, this should ~
clear the air entirely
wouldn't that just ~ (making documents public)
amelioration & renewal: air / atmosphere / verb
air (expose)
air it out
you don’t have to ~ to the public where everyone can hear
concealment & lack of concealment: air / atmosphere /
verb
airbrushed
too slick, airbrushed, propaganda
many thought the video was ~, to gain support and funding
appearance & reality / concealment & lack of concealment
/ subterfuge: infrastructure / materials & substances
aircraft carrier (turn an aircraft carrier)
aircraft carrier
how long will it take, is it a matter of turning an ~ (change)
♦ “When I became president, one of the things I discovered coming into
office is you’re in charge of a big apparatus... It’s an ocean liner and not
a speedboat... Trying to change policy is really difficult.” (“Barak Obama
on 2020.”)
♦ “It will take time to turn around this metaphorical tanker in midstream.”
(Saudi-Israeli relations)
reversal: boat / military / movement / size
aired (and aired out)
being aired
the divorce is over with no dirty laundry ~
being aired out
these are general grievances that are ~ (the Oscars)
concealment & lack of concealment: clothing & accessories
/ hygiene
airtight (adjective)
airtight alibi
his lawyers say he has an ~
airtight case
prosecutors believe they have an ~
seemed airtight
his alibi ~
flaws & lack of flaws: air / atmosphere
akin (adjective)
akin to body armor
we see vaccines as ~ (Defense Department)
akin to the Super Bowl
in the mountainous nations, the Hahnenkamm is ~ (skiing)
akin to drunk driving
not masking is ~ (COVID)
relationship: family
Page 70 of 1574
alarm (feeling)
alarm
~ as dump sites fill up and overflow...
alarm over the (rotten-egg) odor
there was ~
alarm over (gun) violence
most Americans feel ~
alarm about (the military's) conduct
the case raises ~ in Iraq (atrocity)
rising alarm
~ over gun violence
reason for alarm
stay calm, there is no ~
so there was plenty of ~
raises alarm
the case ~ about the military's conduct in Iraq
feeling, emotion & effect: sound
alarm (warning)
five-alarm
this should have been a ~ fire in the White House, but...
sounded alarms
Doctors Without Borders ~ (famine in Niger)
sounding the alarm
groups have been ~ about the Arab drug problem
warning: sound
albatross (noun)
albatross of debt
the ~ he had been dealing with... (a politician)
albatross for Oakland
the quote has become something of an ~ (“no there there”)
albatross for the industry
the Production Code was an ~ (films)
Afghanistan albatross
Trump inherited the ~
lifelong albatross
a parking ticket can become a ~ (racial inequality)
♦ “John James Audubon’s racism is the albatross rotting around the
necks of those who would hold him in reverence. It is past smelling foul
and beginning to reek.” (“What Do We Do About John James Audubon?”
by J. Drew Lanham.)
affliction: allusion / animal / bird
Alcatraz (Alcatraz of the South, etc.)
Alcatraz of the Rockies
ADX Florence in Colorado, sometimes called the ~
Alcatraz of the South
Angola, the ~ (prison bordered on 3 sides by Mississippi)
comparison & contrast: epithet
alchemist (noun)
alchemist of words
an ~, Melville transformed his often mundane sources
person: chemistry
creation & transformation: chemistry / person
Alexander (Muslim Alexander, etc.)
Muslim Alexander
he conceived for himself an identity as the ~ (Mehmet II)
importance & significance / military: epithet
alight (activity)
alight with posts
social networking sites are ~ from…
alight with (conspiracy) theories
the blogosphere is ~
♦ “We had now fairly entered the Molucca Sea. After dark it was a
beautiful sight to look down on our rudders, from which rushed eddying
streams of phosphoric light gemmed with whirling sparks of fire. It
resembled (more nearly than anything else to which I can compare it)
one of the large irregular nebulous star-clusters seen through a good
telescope, with the additional attraction of ever-changing form and
dancing motion.” (The Malay Archipelago by Alfred Russel Wallace,)
♦ "That night the fire-flies were in countless thousands, in millions, it
seemed... Suddenly, there was a blinding flash which for an instant lit up
the whole countryside, as a large meteor trailed its blazing tail across the
sky... As at the wave of a magic wand the illumination of the insects went
out... Then suddenly in the herbage there appeared a spark again, and in
half a minute the air was again filled with the thousands of elfin lanterns
weaving their ethereal dances." (Dersu Uzala by V.K. Arseniev, in
Ussuria.)
activity: light & dark
alight (fire)
set the region alight
conflicts could ~ (Caucasus)
activity / feeling, emotion & effect / initiation: fire
alive (status)
alive
my business is ~, but not thriving
still alive
the talks are ~ (negotiations)
the two teams are ~ in the playoffs (sports)
very much alive
jazz is ~, in Paris…
stay alive
it's tough to ~ in today's economy (a business)
condition & status: death & life
starting, going, continuing & ending: death & life
alive (alive and well)
alive and well
interagency coordination is ~
Page 71 of 1574
alive and well in the UK
regional stereotypes are ~
remains alive and well
the movement ~
condition & status: death & life
alive (activity)
alive with activity
the night sky, ~ (satellites, an eclipse, etc.)
alive with rats
the alley was ~ that evening...
alive with rumor
residential areas and offices were ~ (following attack)
ever alive
he was a young man ~ to new ideas
activity: death & life
alive (come alive)
come alive
they ~ (characters in a book / book review)
came alive
the Peruvians ~ in the second half (World Cup soccer)
come alive at night
rats ~
came alive in the second quarter
the team ~
come alive with activity
the streets literally ~ (Toronto)
comes alive with young musicians
the campus ~ (summer music program)
came alive with a great tube ride
he suddenly ~ (surfing competition)
comes alive when
he ~ he talks about his passion
activity: death & life
amelioration & renewal: death & life
alive (keep something alive)
keep awareness alive
the need to ~ (of the Holocaust)
keep history alive
part of our mission is to ~ (Trail of Tears)
keep hope alive
doctors have a duty to ~
kept the initiative alive
the administration has ~
keep memory alive
portraits can ~
keep romance alive
it's important to ~ (in a marriage)
keep the spark alive
the dreams of what were ahead helped ~ for me (love)
keep the tradition alive
he does his part to ~ (sumo in Brazil)
survival, persistence & endurance: death & life / verb
all (give something one’s all, etc.)
gave it everything
we ~
commitment & determination: verb
allergic (adjective)
allergic to (small) boats
for those ~ in stormy seas…
allergic to the concept
economists are ~ of fairness (reform)
allergic to him
I'm ~ (the two don't get along)
avoidance & separation: health & medicine
allergy (noun)
allergy to stardom
he has an ~ (a successful actor, to Hollywood)
avoidance & separation: health & medicine
alley (Ambush Alley, etc.)
"Ambush Alley"
fighting in Nasiriya, nicknamed ~ by the Marines (Iraq)
sniper alley
this part of town was called ~ (Sarajevo)
Machine Gun Alley
they called the area ~ (7th Cavalry / Iraq)
RPG Alley
an ambush on a stretch of road known as ~ (Baqouba)
death & life / military: epithet
alley (Bat Alley, etc.)
Bat Alley
bats have been seen flying down ~ (passage in a cave)
Shark Alley
a wave rolled along an area known as ~ (Farallones)
geography: epithet
route: animal
alley (Cyclone Alley, etc.)
Cyclone Alley
Bangladesh sits on "~"
Page 72 of 1574
cyclone alley
Madagascar sits on a type of ~ in the Indian Ocean
Hail Alley
where Colorado, Nebraska, and Wyoming meet is “~”
iceberg alley
the Bonavista peninsula is the province’s so-called “~”
it’s been a busy season in ~ (Newfoundland and Labrador)
A68a has been riding this “~” (Antarctica to South Georgia)
"Lightning Alley"
the corridor is known as ~ (Tampa Bay to Titusville)
tornado alley
spring in ~ (U.S.)
Tornado Alley
~ runs from Texas through Oklahoma and Kansas
area / route: storm / weather & climate
alley (Death Alley / U.S. 61, etc.)
Blood Alley
Death Alley, ~, that's what they call it (a highway)
Death Alley
U.S. 61 is known as ~ (fatal crashes in Missouri)
"hell highway"
killed returning to the reservation on the ~ (Arizona)
expressway to death
National highway 8 is known as the ~ (India)
route: infrastructure
alley (Silicon Alley)
see Silicon Valley
alley (Cancer Alley, etc.)
“Asthma Alley”
the South Bronx is often described as ~ (pollution)
Cancer Alley
they live in a region known as ~ (southwestern Louisiana)
“covid corridor”
the commuter corridors have become the ~ (East Coast / US)
area: health & medicine
alley (up one's alley)
up my alley
now this part is ~ (how to fix a module vs. its function)
right up your alley
you have to read this, it's ~
check this out, it’s ~
experience: infrastructure
all-star (adjective)
all-star team
with an ~ of lawyers representing them (celebrity divorce)
all-star (legal) team
he had an ~ (rich pedophile)
group, set & collection: sports & games
superlative: sports & games
alluring (adjective)
alluring
the pitch is ~ (an educational fad)
attraction & repulsion: love, courtship & marriage / sex
ally (groups)
ally
how to be an ~ and nurture a more inclusive world
with an ally
being transgender can be hard, but made easier ~ (work)
♦ “If you’re a white person, you’re getting to the perimeter, you’re putting
your body on the f****** line right now!” (“Black Protest Leaders To White
Allies: ‘It’s Our Turn To Lead Our Own Fight,’” NPR, All Things
Considered, September 22, 2020.)
inclusion & exclusion: society
ally (other)
ally in curbing the spread
countries hope that technology will be an ~ of the virus
allies in that fight
she didn’t have a lot of ~ (trouble between 2 actors)
not as an enemy, but as an ally
Democrats welcome change, ~ (politics)
conflict / help & assistance: military
along (further along)
further along
in Europe, the outbreak is a little ~ (Omicron variant)
development: distance / movement
altar (at / on / upon the altar)
on such a remote altar
no clergyman would sacrifice his career ~ (Norfolk Island)
at the altar of disruption
today’s tech world worships ~
at the altar of Donald Trump
evangelicals ~
on the altar of (environmental) correctness
he would sacrifice energy independence ~
on the altar of greatness
we are witnessing human flesh ~ (a boxer)
upon the altar of freedom
you have laid so costly a sacrifice ~ (Lincoln)
on the altar of (this nation’s continued) freedom
the country will never forget your sacrifice ~ (Britain)
Page 73 of 1574
on this altar of the gun god
they are really human sacrifices ~ (mass shootings)
on the altar of that peace
~ Venice was to be sacrificed (France and Austria)
on the altar of Radicalism
he sacrificed the South ~ (southern view of Grant)
sacrifice your children on the altar
don’t ~ of bad science (anti-vaxxer propaganda)
sacrifice (energy) independence on the altar
he would ~ of environmental correctness
sacrifice rights on the altar of terrorism
we can’t ~ (facial recognition)
laid so costly a sacrifice upon the altar
you have ~ of freedom (President Lincoln)
sacrifice: religion
amalgam (noun)
amalgam of (different) influences
Turkish cooking is an intriguing ~
amalgam of (changing death-penalty) politics
there is an ~ and concerns about the system
amalgam of speed, timing, work-rate and pressure
he beat Baranchyk with an ~ (Scot boxer Josh Taylor)
mixture: materials & substances
Amazon (epithet / biodiversity)
Amazon of the North
the Great Bear Rain Forest is often called the ~ (BC)
Ocean's Amazon
the Coral Triangle has been called the ~
biodiversity / comparison & contrast / geography: epithet
Amazon (the company)
Amazon
~ has made Jeff Bezos rich
proper name: place
Amazon (epithet / the company)
Amazon of South Korea
Coupang is often referred to as the ~ (online retailer)
worth & lack of worth: epithet
comparison & contrast / size: epithet
ambassador (role)
ambassador of skateboarding
he serves as the ~ (Tony Hawk)
ambassador for the Cherokee
she will be an ~ (Miss Cherokee Fair / Eastern Band)
ambassador for the (Jaguar) brand
she had been the ~ (endorsement / athlete)
ambassador for marine life
whale sharks are a fantastic ~
ambassador for the sport
he is a great ~ (Vitali Klitschko / boxing)
ambassador for UNESCO
she is a goodwill ~ (a famous film actor)
ambassador to the world
Ali is the goodwill ~ (the boxer)
America’s best ambassador
he was ~ (Charles Barkley at the Barcelona Olympics)
brand ambassador
the reality star is a ~ for the popular clothing brand
goodwill ambassador
she is a ~ for UNESCO (a famous film actor)
G-string ambassador
she has acted as the Y2K ~ in the past (Dua Lipa)
de facto ambassador
he serves as the ~ of skateboarding (Tony Hawk)
tireless ambassador
he was a ~ for Beaujolais Nouveau (Georges Duboeuf)
sees himself as an ambassador
he ~ for his sport (Tito Ortiz and mixed martial arts)
self-described (‘edible insect) ambassador’
the ~ promotes the use of insect protein
♦ "I don't even know what an ambassador really was. When I think of
ambassadors I think of living off government money and jet-setting with
girlfriends." (The great boxer Mike Tyson, on a trip to China to promote
boxing.)
♦ “She is now training to become their new ambassador.” (Flerken, a half
African serval cat and half domestic cat, for the Ark Wildlife Park.)
♦ “You are attaching your logo to the athlete and should this enter a legal
realm, every time he goes into a courtroom, that’s your logo walking in
on two legs.” (A sports analyst about an athlete charged with several
counts of sexual abuse. In other words, players are ambassadors for
their teams, whether they want to be or don’t.)
attention, scrutiny & promotion / representation:
government / person
person / role: government
amber (traffic light)
“amber list”
it will not be illegal for Britons to travel to ~ Greece
classified as amber
travel to France, Spain and Greece are now ~ (pandemic)
sanctioning, authority & non-conformity: color / sign, signal,
symbol
ambush (verb)
ambush us
desire can ~, take us by surprise (sex)
Page 74 of 1574
ambush him with the news
so tonight I ~
readiness & preparedness: military
ambushed
felt ambushed
one man ~ by her appearance
readiness & preparedness: military
ammunition (and ammo)
ammunition for critics
this will provide ~
ammo for critics
all this was ~, who believed...
ammunition for lawsuits
it could be used as ~
political ammunition
the "missile gap" provided ~ to air-power advocates
gather (political) ammunition
he asked a foreign leader to help him ~ against an opponent
give ammunition
the video is sure to ~ to critics
accusation & criticism: military / weapon
amnesia (noun)
collective amnesia
a ~ surrounds the Civil War (attitudes to slavery, etc.)
his participation in the ~ that surrounds those wars…
historical amnesia
this will deepen our ~ about the Civil War
the design displays a sense of ~ (a monument)
consciousness & awareness: health & medicine
amputate (remove)
amputate
~ before the infection spreads (poor players at Man U)
♦ “She was in tears over the abrupt amputation of her social life and
turmoil at home.” (A high-school senior talking to her school counselor
via Zoom. The student’s school had been closed due to the Coronavirus
pandemic.)
dismissal, removal & resignation / division & connection:
health & medicine / skin, muscle, nerves & bone / verb
amok (run amok)
ran amok
the regulators sat by while the financial industry ~
the military ~ in Manchuria (Japan)
run amok
this is the result of a system ~ (justice)
♦ “Macassar is the most celebrated place in the East for ‘running a
muck.’ There are said to be one or two a month on the average, and five,
then, or twenty persons are sometimes killed or wounded at one of
them... A man thinks himself wronged by society—he is in debt and
cannot pay—he is taken for a slave or has gambled away his wife or
child into slavery—he sees no way of recovering what he has lost... He
grasps his kris-handle, and the next moment draws out the weapon and
stabs a man to the heart. He runs on, with bloody kris in his hand,
stabbing at everyone he meets. ‘Amok! Amok!’ then resounds through
the streets...” (The Malay Archipelago by Alfred Russel Wallace.)
behavior: mental health
control & lack of control: mental health
amped (strength)
amped up with (plenty of) chilies
the dish is ~
amped up audio system
the car has an ~
strength & weakness: electricity
amped (feeling)
amped up
the importance of the game has both teams ~
he was so ~ that he didn't notice…
amped up on sugar and carbs
kids who are ~ can't learn as well
amped up men
she had no business walking through a mob of ~
remain amped up
after a performance he would ~ (musician)
feeling, emotion & effect: electricity
amplification (noun)
amplification in the media
~ can lead to contagion (names of mass shooters)
algorithmic amplification
~ leads to violence (YouTube)
snap responses, speed, amplification
the social web is architected for ~
increase & decrease: sound
amplified
amplified in a feedback loop
the narrative was ~ by the media (Steele Dossier)
amplified by the media echo chamber
their views are ~ (stock analysts, commentators, etc.)
amplified by the media megaphone
an analyst, his voice ~, can send a stock soaring or sinking
get amplified
conspiracy theories ~ by conservative cable news stars
increase & decrease: sound
amplify (verb)
amplified flaws
the media, desperate to get it out, ~ in the reporting
Page 75 of 1574
amplify those ideas
a conservative media ecosystem helps ~ (alt-right)
amplify their message
they use social media to ~ (extremists)
amplify his message
he counted on his critics to ~
amplify (pro-government) narratives
these networks ~ (the internet)
speaks up and amplifies
the Koori Mail ~ Black voices (Australian newspaper)
increase & decrease: sound / verb
message: sound / tools & technology / verb
amp up (verb)
amped up the discussion
the film really ~ about global warming
amping up their rhetoric
Republicans are ~ (politics)
amped up the violence
high tackles led with the helmet have ~ in football
increase & decrease: electricity
anathema
anathema to the Koch network
tariffs and trade wars are ~
anathema to (many) media outlets and academics
these proposals were ~ (New Consensus think tank)
sanctioning, authority & non-conformity: religion
ancestor (go before)
ancestors of (today’s) potatoes
they are the ~ (Peruvian wild potatoes)
♦ An ancestor is one who has “gone before,” from ante- (‘before”) and
cedo (“go”).
origin / relationship: family
past & present: direction / movement / position
time: direction / movement / position
sequence: direction / movement / position
anchor (noun)
anchor of the (Egyptian) government
the military is the ~ right now (2011)
anchor for the development
the golf course is the ~ (apartments, condos)
anchor babies
opponents of immigration talk about "~"
anchor tenants
malls need ~
western anchor
Nanga Parbat is the ~ of the Himalayas
bases: boat
anchored
anchored in old ways
leadership is still ~ (politics)
anchored to the document text
the selected object is ~ here (text box Microsoft Word)
attachment / movement / division & connection / progress
& lack of progress: boat
ancien regime
ancien regime of Hosni Mubarak
Morsi replaced the ~
creature of the ancien regime
to his detractors he was a ~ (politics)
factions of the ancien regime
negotiations among ~ and Gulf monarchies (Yemen / 2015)
candidates from the ancien regime
~ (Field Marshal Ahmed Shafiq, Amr Moussa, etc.)
past & present / time: allusion / history
primacy, currency, decline & obsolescence: allusion /
history
anemic (adjective)
anemic
earnings have been ~
sales have been ~
economic growth has been ~
turnout was ~ (election)
anemic 1.5 percent
the rate of economic growth slowed to an ~
anemic attempt
their ~s to address the issue
anemic economy
our ~ is a result of higher taxes (politics)
anemic (job) growth
he produced very ~ (a leader)
anemic recovery
poverty is on the rise in the recession and the ~ continues
anemic response
people are upset by the military's ~ to the provocation
strength & weakness: health & medicine
condition & status: health & medicine
angel (Angel of the Battlefield, etc.)
Angel of Arnhem
her British patients nicknamed her the ~ (Kate ter Horst)
Angel of the Battlefield
Clara Barton was known as the ~ (Civil War)
“Angel of the Confederacy”
Page 76 of 1574
she has been remembered as the ~ (Sally Louisa Tompkins)
“Angel of Dien Bien Phu”
the US press gave her the name ~ (Genevieve de Galard)
military: epithet
epithet: creature
angel (Angel of Death, etc.)
Angel of Death
Josef Mengele, the ~ (Nazi doctor at Auschwitz)
“Angel of the Gap”
Australia mourns ~ (Don Ritchie, who prevented suicides)
death & life: epithet
epithet: creature
angel (the Los Angeles Angels, etc.)
Guardian Angels
Gardiens de Nuit is a French version of New York's ~
Hell’s Angels
~ member sentenced to 14 years in prison for...
Los Angeles Angles
the ~ are in the American League West (MLB)
proper name: creature / religion
angel (appearance)
princess or angel
I want to be Britney Spears, no more ~ (Halloween girl)
appearance: creature / religion
angel (snow angel)
snow angels
kids create ~ in the snow
it's a great place to make ~ (Dubai mall)
made a snow angel
she ~ and posted it on YouTube (Johannesburg)
make a snow angel
they go outside and ~ after a sauna (Finland)
♦ A New England Patriots football player was once fined $10,000 for
making a snow angel after scoring a touchdown.
♦ In The Miracle Season, two small girls—“fearless, generous souls”—
are shown making mud angels. Their mothers could not have been
happy when they got home!
shape: creature / religion
angel (behavior)
angels
in fairness, the North Koreans have been no ~
angel of vengeance
he sees himself as kind of an ~ (The Power of the Dog)
perfect angel
he's a ~ with everyone but us (a 15-month-old)
behavior / character & personality: creature / religion
angel (superlative)
voice of an angel
she has the ~ (a singer from Isan)
lost an angel
Macedonia and the Balkans ~ (Tose Proeski)
♦ When the Macedonian pop star Tose Proeski died in 2007 at age 26 in
a car crash in Croatia, Archbishop Stefan, the head of the Macedonian
Orthodox Church, said, "Macedonia and the Balkans lost an angel." It
was a sentiment felt across the Balkans.
superlative: creature / religion
angel (angel-faced)
angel-faced child
the ~ who tells lies
appearance: creature / religion
angel (guardian angel)
guardian angel
tell my son I will always be his ~ (suicide note)
the ~ of Nazare (Sergio Cosme / jet ski driver / surfing)
Chen Si is the bridge’s self-appointed ~ (stops suicides)
♦ People query Google Search with questions like: How do I know I have
a guardian angel? and How do I talk to my guardian angel?
help & assistance / protection & lack of protection:
creature / religion
angel (trail angel, etc.)
lay-away angels
generous acts of kindness doled out by so-called ~
search angel
she is a self-described ~ (helps adoptees find birth parents)
trail angel
~s provide water, food, even lodging for hikers
~s figure out where hikers are likely to run into trouble
~s are a tradition on long-distance footpaths (AT, PCT)
~s left 30 1-gallon jugs of water and a note
a ~ left a cooler stocked with soda, water and beer
♦ Lay-away angels are anonymous people who pay for Christmas items
put on lay-away at stores. Trail angels leave water, food, and other
supplies along trails like the Appalachian Trail for the through hikers, who
are not able to carry much.
help & assistance: creature / religion
angel (help and assistance)
angel
she was an ~ to so many of us (exoneration lawyer)
Antonio Brown’s angel
Tom Brady has been ~ (two NFL athletes)
angel, benefactor, Godsend
Tom Brady was his ~ (to Antonio Brown / NFL)
♦ Mini-Me: [writes] Are you a clone of an angel? / Foxxy Cleopatra: Ohhh
how sweet. No, my mini-man, I’m not. / Mini-Me: [writes] Are you sure
you don’t have a little clone in you? / Foxxy Cleopatra: Yes, I’m sure. /
Mini-Me: Would you like to? (The film Austin Powers in Goldmember.)
Page 77 of 1574
help & assistance: creature / religion
angle (from an angle)
from every angle
I have considered the issue ~
from a new angle
these conclusions help us look at the tragedy ~
from ten different angles
I wanted to think through these issues ~ (a writer)
considered the problem from every angle
I have ~
look at the tragedy from a new angle
these conclusions help us ~
perception, perspective & point of view: geometry
analysis, interpretation & explanation: geometry
animal (different animal, etc.)
different animal
urban warfare is a ~ than fighting in the open
the new style of aggressive ad is a ~ (Internet)
two (very) different animals
the map of the Pacific before and after Cook are ~
unique animal
considering public education, Maine is something of a ~
unusual animal
NCTC is kind of an ... (counter-terrorism center)
completely different animal
a virtual lab is totally different from a classroom, it's a ~
much different animal
the US military is a ~ than the Taliban forces
very different animal
the Bundesliga is a ~ from the Premiership (soccer)
♦ Bill Whitaker, ABC Correspondent: “This is your first Broadway
production. This is a different animal.” / Anne Teresa De Keersmaeker,
Belgian choreographer: “What you call it, an animal?” (From a delightful
60 Minutes interview about West Side Story, February 16, 2020.)
♦ “Neither fish nor fowl...”
♦ see also beast (different beast, etc.)
taxonomy & classification: animal
animal (political animal, etc.)
narrative animals
we are ~, we love a good story (Guillermo del Toro)
political animal
he's a ~ and will probably go along with Israel (politics)
Karl is not a ~ (a law enforcement leader)
I see myself as not a ~ in this job (DNI)
identity & nature: animal
animal (party animal, etc.)
playboy and a party animal
he had a reputation as a ~ (a soccer player)
behavior / character & personality / restraint & lack of
restraint: animal
animal (insult)
animal
an ~ decided to take her life (murder of coed)
animals come out
all the ~ at night (the film Taxi Driver)
rabid animals
they are ~ that should all be put down (looters, arsonists)
wild animals
they threw my boy in a cage with those ~ (prison)
animals tormented him
those wild ~ until he became mean as they were (prison)
♦ “The thought that he was waiting for some woman to attack her and do
what he wanted to do... I was just thinking, what a horrible animal, vile
animal, he is...” (The sister of a murder victim.)
♦ “The animal that did this is no longer on this earth.” (Police solve a cold
case. The murderer had died in 2013.)
affliction / insult: animal
anodyne (adjective)
anodyne drone
the ~ typing away in her silent cubicle
anodyne title
an article with the ~ “The Value of Science in Prediction”
anodyne and fuzzy
the language of these bills is ~ (culture wars)
so anodyne
that letter was ~ and insignificant (yet caused controversy)
tend to be anodyne
its public comments on due process ~
♦ An anodyne is a drug that soothes pain.
feeling, emotion & effect: health & medicine
amelioration & renewal: health & medicine
anoint (verb)
anointed his (long-time) ally as his successor
he ~ (Nursultan Nazarbayev)
anointed him as the candidate
the Democratic establishment has ~ (Joe Biden)
anoint him as the Democratic nominee
Biden appealed to Sanders backers to ~
anoint a political heir
he wants to ~
anointed him one of the beautiful people
People magazine ~
sanctioning, authority & non-conformity: religion / verb
Page 78 of 1574
anointed
anointed the (art world's newest) star
he has been ~
anointed as the Party’s standard-bearer
he was ~ (Hubert Humphrey)
get anointed
how exactly did he ~ as the voice of Black America
sanctioning, authority & non-conformity: religion
answer (noun)
answer
the ~ is in front of us
the answer is
~ reform and an awake electorate
answer to social issues
criminalization is frequently America’s ~
fictive communication: speech
answer (Britain’s answer to Bill Gates,
etc.)
North America’s answer to Machu Picchu
Chaco Canyon is ~, only older (drought, etc.)
Britain’s answer to Bill Gates
he was once seen as ~ (Mike Lynch / Autonomy)
Britain’s answer to Ry Cooder
guitarist Justin Adams has been called “~”
Britain’s answer to the Tea Party
UKIP has been described as ~ (US)
China’s answer to Lord of the Rings
while it might be easy to describe Condo Heroes as ~...
China’s answer to Twitter
Weibo, ~
Russia’s answer to California
#Sochifornia, ~ (Sochi)
♦ “It’s America’s answer to Shakespeare.” (“OK: How Two Letters Made
‘America’s Greatest Word’ NPR, All Things Considered, November 20,
2010. Guy Raz interviews Allan Metcalf, author of OK: The Improbable
Story of America’s Greatest Word. The interview and the excerpt from
the book are fascinating!)
♦ Both are in the same state of decay; both were the sites of thriving
civilizations; both experienced drought and were essentially
abandoned... (Comparisons between Machu Picchu and Chaco Canyon,
“North America’s answer” (equivalent). From “Ancient Culture Prompts
Worry for Arid Southwest,” NPR, All Things Considered, July 9, 2007.)
comparison & contrast: epithet
antediluvian (old)
antediluvian hangover
it’s an ~ from far-off days (a judicial matter)
antediluvian opinions
Irwin suggested that Churchill held ~
antediluvian policy
its ~ of opposing women priests (job advert for vicar)
♦ Lord Judge, former lord chief justice: In my opinion, the time has
arrived when the requirement for the physical presence of a child—
witness or victim—within the court building should be regarded as an
antediluvian hangover from laughable far-off days of the quill pen and the
ink well.” (BBC, World at One, “An antediluvian hangover.” A child could
be asked questions via video conferencing.)
past & present / time: Bible / religion
primacy, currency, decline & obsolescence: Bible / religion
antenna (noun)
antennae
I walk around with my ~ up, ready for trouble (gang)
antenna for (racial) slights
he has no ~ (Nigerian immigrant in US)
consciousness & awareness: tools & technology
anthem (noun)
anthem
it's been an ~ ever since (Aretha sings "Respect")
anthem of African Americans
it became the ~ (“Say it clear, say it loud...)
anthem of a (celebrity) campaign
Dylan’s “Hurricane” was the ~ to release Rubin Carter
anthem of (female and black) empowerment
the video is an ~ (Beyonce’s “Formation”)
anthems of the (Civil Rights) movement
some of her songs became ~ (Nina Simone)
anthems for women
~ to accept themselves (Lizzo)
anthem among Pentecostals in the Appalachians
the song became an ~ ("There ain't no grave…”)
angry young man's anthem
"Custer Died for Your Sins" was an ~
rousing anthem
it’s a ~ of encouragement and hope (“Keep On Pushing”)
rock anthem
"Born to Run" is one of the best ~s ever
swamp anthem
a raucous version of the ~ “Sabine Turnaround” (Cajun)
booty-call anthem
Adele’s first ~ (“Can I Get It?)
date-rape anthem
it’s been referred to as a ~ (an old Christmas song)
strip-club anthem
the song was a ~ called “Money Maker”
feminist anthem
her single has been hailed by some as a ~ (“The Man”)
secret national anthem
Page 79 of 1574
the ~ of an entire generation (“You forgot the color film”)
♦ “It became the national anthem of African Americans.” (“Say it clear,
say it loud, I am black, and I am proud.” Sung by Nina Simone.)
♦ “This story is part of American Anthem, a yearlong series on songs that
rouse, unite, celebrate and call to action. Find more at NPR.org/Anthem.”
identity & nature / representation: music
anthemic (adjective)
anthemic single
the album’s ~ “FREEDOM” (Jon Batiste)
identity & nature / representation: music
comparison & contrast: affix
antibody (noun)
“antibody response” within the government
there was an ~ (rejection of lab-leak theory)
attraction & repulsion / protection & lack of protection:
health & medicine
anticlimax (noun)
sad anticlimax
his last campaign proved a ~ (an admiral)
development: theater
antidote (noun)
antidote to adversity
a cheerful disposition and a sunny smile are the ~
antidote to the boredom
provide an ~ of teaching numbers, months, etc.
antidote to criminality
empathy is the ~ (versus idea of "bad seed")
antidote to cynicism
this book is an ~
antidote to the (poisonous) doctrine
he was an ~ of extremism
antidote to violence
violence is not an ~ (capital punishment)
antidotes to hatred and intolerance
caring and sympathy are the best ~
antidote against self-pity
our callousness was an ~ (hospital ward)
antidote for stress
a break from work is a necessary ~ (vacations)
view (Tibetan) Buddhism as an antidote
some Han Chinese ~ to the materialism and greed…
♦ In "Seldom Disappointed," the great Tony Hillerman writes about the
seemingly callous banter and traditions of badly wounded soldiers on a
hospital ward in Europe during WWII. For example, a soldier has his right
arm amputated and when he returns to the ward he is greeted by his
comrades as "Lefty!" Hillerman makes the point that, while such behavior
seems "barbarous," it is, in fact, an antidote to self-pity.
amelioration & renewal: health & medicine
antique (adjective)
antique
it seems so ~ now… (a sentiment)
primacy, currency, decline & obsolescence: antiques
past & present / time: antiques
antique (noun)
antique
the revenue system is an ~ (economy)
turned the telegraph into an antique
the telephone ~
primacy, currency, decline & obsolescence: antiques
past & present / time: antiques
anvil (shape)
anvil top
a cumulonimbus mass with a dramatic ~
anvil storm clouds
those majestic ~ that form on a hot summer’s day
shape: tools & technology
anxiety (noun)
class anxiety
the raw nerve of English society, ~
social anxiety
ways to conquer ~
financial anxiety
the film is strikingly fraught with ~ (Sex and the City)
crucible of anxiety
how to handle the ~ (college admissions)
irritation and anxiety
students express ~ (rising tuition, fewer classes)
devoured by anxiety
she is ~ when she’s not working (magazine editor)
♦ “Years later, I have ptsd, I have panic attacks I go to therapy. Finally
I’m ready to talk about it and finally heal.” (Gabby, about a sexual
assault.)
♦ “Every culture possesses what Edward Shorter, a medical historian at
the University of Toronto, calls a ‘symptom repertoire’—a range of
physical symptoms available to the unconscious mind for the physical
expression of psychological conflict.’ In parts of India, patients are said to
suffer from dhat syndrome: they complain of impotence and have the
delusion that they are losing their semen. In Nigeria, students who can’t
retain information and report feeling a burning sensation in their heads
are sometimes given a diagnosis of ‘brain fag.’ The illnesses are
reinforced by a local belief that the symptoms are a sign of authentic
suffering, worthy of expert attention and care.” (“The Apathetic: Why are
refugee children falling unconscious?” by Rachel Aviv, The New Yorker,
April 3, 2017.)
feeling, emotion & effect: mental health
apart (division)
apart
they reunited after years of being ~
Page 80 of 1574
wide apart
the two sides remained ~
grew apart
we ~ (divorce)
division & connection: prep, adv, adj, particle
avoidance & separation: prep, adv, adj, particle
apartheid (separation)
political apartheid
we’ve got ~ in this country (US politics)
division & connection: allusion / history
ape (verb)
aped the materialism
regimes which ~ of irreligious others (Sayyid Qutb)
behavior / repetition: animal / verb
apex (highest point)
at the apex of the boom
he invested ~
apex (of the fad's popularity) came
the ~ when…
reached its apex
their rivalry ~ last year (two athletes)
growth & development: direction
primacy, currency, decline & obsolescence: direction
apex (achievement)
apex of their profession
women can still have kids and reach the ~
at the apex of her career
she is ~
achievement, recognition & praise: direction
apex (apex animal, etc.)
apex animal
the tuna is an ~
apex predator
mankind is the ~ on earth
orcas are ~s
so-called ~s, like sharks, groupers and jacks
~s have no natural predators of their own
hierarchy: direction / position
apocalypse (noun)
retail apocalypse
the ~ speeds up (brick and mortar vs. online stores)
After The Apocalypse:
America’s Role in a World Transformed (Andrew Bacevich)
♦ An online BBC article about a shortage of semiconductors entitle “How
will ‘chipageddon’ affect you” prompted Timbob to snark, ‘Surely
“Chipocolypse” would have been better than ‘Chipageddon.’”
♦ “The Subscription-Pocalypse Is About To Hit” by Brian Moritz, Nieman
Lab, Predictions For Journalism 2019. His thought is, there are just too
many things to subscribe to, so people will begin to cut back.)
♦ “This could be ‘the year of the gas-pocalypse’ analysts tell the Los
Angeles Times...” (“Pained By Prices At The Pump? They’re Likely To
Go Even Higher” by Mark Memmott, NPR, The Two-Way, January 6,
2012.)
♦ A national shortage of Kraft Velveeta cheese at the start of 2014 was
referred to as a cheesepocalypse.
♦ Poppy Apocalypse; Poppypalooza... (In 2019, a super bloom of desert
poppies saw the town of Lake Elsinore, California, descended on by an
army of blissed-out tourists equipped with cell phones and selfie sticks
and earbuds. They parked alongside an interstate, blocked local roads,
trampled everything, climbed trees to get the best photos, and fell down
hills. A dog was bitten by a rattlesnake.
destruction: allusion / Bible
apogee (at an apogee)
at its apogee
the British Empire was ~
at his creative apogee
when he was ~…
growth & development / primacy, currency, decline &
obsolescence: astronomy / direction
apogee (noun)
apogee of chic
Paris is the ~
apogee of his career
the film was the ~
apogee of excellence
the Grande Armee reached its ~ (1805-1807)
apogee of fame
Grant reached a new ~ (after victory at Chattanooga)
apogee of a trend
we have simply reached an ~ (minimalism in fashion)
movement's apogee
it was the ~
ascent, apogee and decline
sport compresses life's natural trajectory of ~
reached its apogee
the island ~ in the early Christian era
growth & development / primacy, currency, decline &
obsolescence: astronomy / direction
apoplectic (adjective)
apoplectic
I am ~, at a loss for words (abuse of children)
apoplectic about her definition
the man was ~ of marriage (gender inclusive)
apoplectic (with rage) at what
he is ~ he hears on television (street protests)
apoplectic over the impact
Page 81 of 1574
exhibitors are ~ of Netflix (independent theaters)
apoplectic with what
he would be ~ is going on today (dead father)
had diplomats apoplectic
his phone call with the President of Taiwan ~
went apoplectic
the Internet ~ (over a provocation about race)
makes him apoplectic
it’s one of those little things that ~
feeling, emotion & effect: health & medicine
apostasy (noun)
referred to criticism as apostasy
he ~ (Papandreou)
♦ “Papandreou referred to criticism of some of his individual policies by
PASOK members as ‘apostasy’—a word that in its original Greek form,
apostassia, carries a strong theological undertone from the days of
Byzantium, when emperors, ruling by Divine Right, were judged
‘infallible,’ thus making their critics ‘heretics’ or ‘apostates.’” (Balkan
Ghosts: A Journey Through History by Robert D. Kaplan.)
sanctioning, authority & non-conformity: religion
apostle (Apostle of the Sioux, etc.)
Apostle of the Sioux
he was known as “The ~” (the Swiss Martin Marty)
message / transmission: epithet
apostle (person)
apostle of LSD
he essentially became the ~ (Timothy Leary)
apostle of niceness
he is the ~ (a poetry critic)
apostle of positive thinking
he is an ~
message / person: religion
message: person
apostle (Twelve Apostles, etc.)
Twelve Apostles
the ~ are a popular attraction (Victoria, Australia)
proper name: religion
apparatus (government)
security apparatus
he disappeared within the state ~
big apparatus
you’re in charge of this ~ (the president of US)
♦ “When I became president, one of the things I discovered coming into
office is you’re in charge of a big apparatus... It’s an ocean liner and not
a speedboat... Trying to change policy is really difficult.” (“Barak Obama
on 2020.”)
♦ “How long will it take, is it a matter of turning an aircraft carrier?” (To
change or reverse diplomacy and foreign policy.)
operation: government / mechanism
appetite (whet the appetite)
whet audiences' appetites for films
movie trailers ~
whet people's appetite for spending
museums try to ~
whet the appetites of fans
the ad campaign is designed to ~ (TV)
whet the appetites of investors
the company's performance will not ~
whet appetites for a rematch
their fight ~ (boxing)
increase & decrease: blade / knife
appetite (appetite for fur, etc.)
appetite to return
will audiences have an ~ to the teachers (post-COVID)
appetite for adventure
baby boomers who have an ~
appetite for electricity
the nation’s ~
appetite for fur
Russia's growing ~ (new wealth)
appetite for gold
India's seemingly insatiable ~ (jewelry, dowries, temples)
appetite for (royal) gossip
the tabloids' ~
appetite for a (ground) invasion
commanders have little ~
appetite for (our) money
a government that has an endless ~ (taxes)
appetite for oil
we must reduce our ~
appetite (of the European rich) for porcelain
the ~ was insatiable
appetite for pornography
the ~ seems to be insatiable
appetite for profit
their ~ sharpened by years of drought (farmers)
appetite for scores
our voracious ~ that we can use to rank our kids (ed)
appetite for sensationalism
the ~ (on part of broadcast media)
appetite for (crime) stories
the American public has an insatiable ~ about blacks
appetite for success
Page 82 of 1574
he had an ~ (a poet)
appetite for timber
China's voracious ~ is deforestating Siberia (Russia)
appetite for cars, cell phones, appliances and services
the ~ increases daily (China)
appetite for gambling
North Carolinians appear to have a strong ~
appetite for skateboarding
the local ~
India's (seemingly insatiable) appetite
~ for gold (jewelry, dowries, etc.)
nation's appetite
the ~ for electricity
considerable (public) appetite
there is ~ for stories of feuds in the entertainment industry
endless appetite
a government that has an ~ for our money (taxes)
insatiable appetite
India's seemingly ~ for gold (jewelry, dowries, temples)
little appetite
commanders have ~ for a ground invasion...
very little appetite
in the US there is ~ for government restriction
local appetite
the ~ for skateboarding
low (sexual) appetite
my boyfriend has a very ~
political appetite
there is no ~ for banning assault weapons (in the US)
public appetite
the Y has increased the number of debates to feed the ~
there is considerable ~ for stories of feuds
sexual appetite
my boyfriend has a very low ~
strong appetite
North Carolinians appear to have a ~ for gambling
voracious appetite
our ~ for scores that we can use to rank our kids (education)
for the last few years, China has had a ~ for bauxite
China's ~ for timber is deforestating Siberia
control over his appetites
he has no ~ (sex)
appetite (for consumer goods) increases
their ~ daily (China)
have (no) appetite
I ~ for confrontation
feed the (public) appetite
the Y has increased the number of debates to ~
reduce our appetite
we must ~ for oil
satisfies the appetite
nothing ~ for allegory quite like a zombie film
suppress the appetite
perils and jitters ~ for private and corporate risks
♦ “People often suppose that penal systems recruit sadists. But cruelty is
an appetite that grows with feeding...” (The Fatal Shore by Robert
Hughes, from the chapter “Norfolk Island.”)
consumption: food & drink
appetizer (noun)
appetizer
this is just the ~, the main course will come later (battle)
development: food & drink
applaud (verb)
applaud the administration
I ~ for doing that (politics)
applaud his decision
many people ~
applaud her
her fans ~
applaud women
I ~ like Hou who beat on against the current (chess)
achievement, recognition & praise / sanctioning, authority
& non-conformity: gesture / sound / verb
applauded
applauded and denounced
they launched a movement that has been both ~
achievement, recognition & praise: gesture / sound
sanctioning, authority & non-conformity: gesture / sound
apple (proverb)
apple
a stone from the hand of a friend is an ~ (Morocco)
red apple
a ~ attracts stones (Turkish)
perception, perspective & point of view: apple
apple (Golden Apple / education)
Golden Apple
she received a ~ (a teacher in North Carolina)
achievement, recognition & praise: apple / sign, signal,
symbol
apple (bad / rotten apple)
bad apple
one ~ spoils it for everyone else
Page 83 of 1574
~s tend to find one another
don’t let a few ~s spoil it for the rest of us
“bad apple” argument
I don’t buy the ~ (war, combat and atrocities)
rotten apples
there are ~ in every barrel (bad cops)
work of (a few) bad apples
the Pentagon said the abuse was the ~ (military prison)
character & personality: apple / fruits & vegetables
corruption: apple / food & drink
apple (the apple doesn’t fall far from the
tree, etc.)
apple
those ~s long ago fell from the Marxist tree (ideas)
♦ The apple doesn't fall far from the tree! (Often said of fathers and
sons.)
product: apple / fruits & vegetables
relationship: apple / fruits & vegetables
approach (winter is approaching,
etc.)
date is approaching
the application ~
end is (fast) approaching
the ~
war is approaching
~ in the Arabian Gulf
deadlines are approaching
holiday shipping ~
♦ "When you don't know what's coming down the pike, you worry." (A
businesswoman, speaking about government regulation.)
future / time: direction / movement / verb
approach (a number, etc.)
approach 100,000 deaths
as we ~ from the virus here in the U.S.
attainment: number
approach (a better approach, etc.)
potshot approach
I don’t like that kind of a ~ (politics and criticism)
take-no-prisoners approach
the ~ to justice
confrontational approach
his ~ was rejected as a relic of the past (coach)
creative approaches
the competition rewards ~ to... (research)
straightforward approach
her ~ startles many (on pediatric safety)
Carroll's rah-rah style and Stoop's more ~ vary sharply
we take a ~ to business (honesty, integrity)
old and new approaches
NASA will pursue both ~ simultaneously
pillar of the (US) approach
another ~ is to minimize civilian casualties
direction: movement
approach (the approach of summer, etc.)
with the approach of summer
its staff swells to 400 ~
future / time: direction / movement
approaching (adjective)
approaching elections
the US has called the ~ unfair
approaching spring
melting snow and ~ brings thoughts of…
future / time: direction / movement
appropriation (groups)
appropriation of (urban) youth culture
this is an ~ (the word “bae” and corporate social media)
cultural appropriation
~ and preferential treatment (#BlackTikTokStrike)
Mexican restaurateurs in France see it as ~ (French tacos)
(cultural) appreciation, not (cultural) appropriation
Miss EmpowHer waist beads are ~
♦ “Appropriation, the most misappropriated word in the English language
at this time. Stuff and nonsense.” (greatpix about the
#BlackTikTokStrike.)
♦ “Moccasin maker Minnetonka is publicly apologizing for making money
off of Native culture.” (Moccasin, Minnetonka and indeed Minneapolis
and Minnesota all come from native American languages.)
inclusion & exclusion: society
aquifer (noun)
huge aquifer
I had this ~ underneath of stories (Stephen King)
♦ “I had this huge aquifer underneath of stories that I wanted to tell and I
stuck a pipe down in there and everything just gushed out. There’s still a
lot of it, but there’s not as much now.” (Stephen King: The Rolling Stone
Interview.)
source: water / ground, terrain & land
amount: water
archipelago (noun)
archipelago of (fortified) camps
they moved them into an ~ for political reeducation
archipelago of enclaves
in Kosovo, most Serbs live in an ~ (Strpce, etc.)
archipelago of Jewish museums
Europe is a vast ~ (Jeffrey Goldberg)
Page 84 of 1574
archipelago of black sites
he had been tortured in the CIA’s ~
saw themselves as a small archipelago
they ~ of decency in a rising sea of moral pollution
♦ Japan, Indonesia and the Philippines are archipelago nations.
♦ The crews of the ill-fated Franklin expedition, searching for a Northwest
Passage, perished in the Canadian Arctic Archipelago.
♦ Alfred Russel Wallace pickled orangutans in barrels and collected
butterflies in the Malay Archipelago.
♦ The Solomon Islands archipelago saw fierce fighting during World War
II.
♦ Lakes and even rivers can have archipelagos: Lake Baikal contains an
archipelago. What a wonderful place that would be to visit!
configuration: sea / island
architect (as verb)
architect a life
~ that feels full, genuine, rich and beautiful (influencer)
architect them
he is able to take all my ideas and ~ (fashion industry)
creation & transformation: infrastructure / part of speech /
verb
architect (creator)
architect of apartheid
a statue of Hendrik Verwoerd, the ~ (South Africa)
architect of change
she was a legendary ~ (a feminist)
architects of the doctrine
the ~ remain its strongest defenders (military)
architect of (Iraq's) program
"Dr. Germ," the chief ~ for biological weapons (BW)
architects of the Final Solution
Eichmann was one of the ~
architect of the war on terrorism
he is the ~
deal's (chief) architect
after the ~ was eased out… (hospital merger)
chief architect
after the deal's ~ was eased out… (hospital merger)
creation & transformation: infrastructure / person
person: infrastructure
architected
architected
how society is ~ (social justice)
architected by FDR
he has ended the American era that was ~ (politics)
architected for snap responses, speed, amplification
the social web is ~
creation & transformation: infrastructure
area (territory)
my area
biology isn’t ~
area: ground, terrain & land
arena (in / inside the arena)
in the mental health arena
this has become an issue ~
in the homeland security arena
anyone in the ~ will tell you that...
in the legal one
this will be debated in the political arena, not ~
in the legislative arena
they would lose this battle ~
inside the legislative arena
Republicans have the upper hand ~
in the political arena
these questions will be debated ~, not the legal one
in academic and professional arenas
develop their languages for use ~
lose (this battle) in the legislative arena
they would ~
♦ “’Bae’ may be in the extreme get-the-fk-out-of-here phrase arena.”
(“Where did ‘Bae’ Come From?” by Natasha Zarinsky, Esquire, July 25,
2014.)
conflict: history / infrastructure / sports & games
arise (verb)
arise
these are just some of the issues that can ~ (workplace)
we will deal with those cases as they ~ (sex assault)
arises from the ashes
adoption is a miracle that ~ of despair
crisis (of enormous gravity) has arisen
a ~
appearance & disappearance / growth & development /
occurrence: direction / verb
aristocracy (noun)
Cambridge intellectual aristocracy
the club was his entrée into the world of ~ (Apostles)
rock aristocracy
all of ~ was coming (to see Cat Sevens and Carly Simon)
L.A.’s lustrous hip-istocracy
Adler was a star within ~ (Girls Like Us / Sheila Weller)
superlative: royalty
aristocratic (aristocratic wine, etc.)
aristocratic wines
Page 85 of 1574
~ at democratic prices (commercial)
superlative: royalty
arithmetic
parliamentary arithmetic
Johnson faces exactly the same ~ (as Theresa May)
analysis, interpretation & explanation: number
strategy: number
arm (twist arms, etc.)
twisted arms to limit
behind the scenes, the US government ~…
twist some arms
the President needs to ~
twisted his arm
threats might have ~ (to reinstate Benzema)
♦ “Techniques to encourage loyalty down the years haven’t always been
entirely compliant with the outlook of a modern human-resources
department. The former labour cabinet minister Jack Straw recalled in
his memoirs being grabbed by the ‘the goolies’ by his whip, a method
that led to teary-eyed agreement within moments. More enlightened
recent times mean such tales of robust or physical twisting of arms, or
indeed anything else, are less frequent...” (Political correspondent Chris
Mason, BBC Sounds, Six O’Clock News, “Senior Conservative alleges
MPs ‘intimidated’ by Government whips,” 20/01/2022.)
♦ “Cuomo strong-armed rather than cajoled; he used intimidation rather
than seduction to get his way.” (“New York After Cuomo” by Michael
Greenberg, The New York Review, October 7, 2021.)
♦ “Get them by their balls and their hearts and minds will follow.” (A
saying popular among combat soldiers during the Vietnam War who
were cynical about US government campaigns to “win the hearts and
minds” of the Vietnamese people.)
coercion & motivation: arm / verb
arm (get one’s arms around something)
get his arms around how
he couldn’t ~ to control COVID (ineffectual leader)
get their arms around the notion
nobody can ~ he would not only kill but decapitate her
get our arms around the pandemic
we need to ~ and save lives (Gretchen Whitmer)
get our arms around this
we’re going to pull out all the stops to ~ (vaccine roll-out)
wrap your arms around all this
it’s hard to ~
get our arms around it
it’s important to try and ~ and figure out... (a report)
try and get its arms around
this is a crisis the department will continue to ~
try to get their hands around this
they try to ~ by taking a fresh look at the data (NPR)
need to get our hands around
there has been a demonization that we ~ (anti-racism)
♦ “We’ve got to get our arms around this crisis [COVID] so we can get
our arms around our economy and make sure that people are safe. So...”
(Governor Gretchen Whitmer on ABC.)
♦ Michele Martin of NPR has given us “get one’s hands around
something,” seemingly on the analogy of a part of the body, or perhaps
to “freshen up” the cliche! What’s next?
♦ It is hard to know what the physical basis is for this cliché, but it is now
deeply embedded in contempo-speak.
comprehension & incomprehension: arm / verb
control & lack of control: arm / verb
arm (arm of an organization)
arm of the Kremlin
as an ~, Gazprom usually gets its way
distribution arm
Disney's ~, Buena Vista (movies)
commercial arm
the Indian Space Research Organization has a ~
political arm
the group's ~
evolved into an arm
Teach for America has ~ of the charter-school movement
division: arm
arm (configuration)
arm of the Mediterranean Sea
the Ligurian Sea is an ~
twin arms
in between those ~ of the Solomon Islands archipelago
configuration / resemblance: arm
arm (right arm)
Arafat's right arm
Abu Jihad was ~ (Kalil al-Wazir)
General Lee's right arm
"Stonewall" Jackson was ~
strong right arm
the Home Fleet was the ~ of Britain's naval power
importance & significance: arm
arm (at arm’s length)
kept his daughter at arm's length
he ~ (because she was a manipulative drug addict)
held at arm's length
he was ~ by the US for years (an authoritarian leader)
avoidance & separation: arm / distance
division & connection: arm / distance
arm (open arms)
open arms, hostility, and indifference
US troops were greeted with ~
greeted us with open arms
Page 86 of 1574
they ~
welcomed Disney with open arms
Orlando and Florida ~ (Magic Kingdom)
welcomed the Confucius Institute with open arms
many universities have ~
welcome them (back) with open arms
we will ~ (rebellious soldiers)
♦ "This country has a history of opening its arms. Today, its arms were
closed…" (Senator Barbara Boxer, on the failure of the Dream Act that
would have given a path to citizenship to young migrants.)
acceptance & rejection / welcome: arm
avoidance & separation: arm / distance
division & connection: arm / distance
arm (long arm)
long arm of Iran
Hezbollah is the ~
long arm of the law
no matter how long it takes, the ~ will catch up with you
long-arm statute
they are subject to jurisdiction pursuant to Virginia’s ~
♦ When workers stayed in boarding houses and ate communally in a
dining room, they had to develop a “boardinghouse reach” or risk going
hungry!
coercion & motivation / extent & scope: arm
arm (up in arms)
up in arms
the locals are ~ (recipients of trash from Rome)
up in arms over rising crime
the community is ~
got critics up in arms
her response only ~
conflict: weapon
armada (noun)
armada of vehicles
an ~ arrived and stormed the block (mass shooter’s house)
amount / group, set & collection: boat / military / sea
Armageddon
political “Armageddon”
she would face ~ if his case makes it to a tribunal
turned a Sunday afternoon into Armageddon
the crane collapse ~
♦ “I call it poolmageddon. It’s a chlorine crisis” (Rudy Stankowitz,
columnist for PoolPro Magazine, about a shortage of chlorine. From “A
Chlorine Shortage Could Spoil Pool Season This Summer,” NPR
Weekend Edition Sunday, May 9, 2021.)
♦ An online BBC article about a shortage of semiconductors entitle “How
will ‘chipageddon’ affect you” prompted Timbob to snark, ‘Surely
“Chipocolypse” would have been better than ‘Chipageddon.’”
destruction: allusion / Bible
armchair (armchair traveller, etc.)
armchair analysis
psychiatrists may not engage in ~ (ethics and politics)
Armchair Britain
Today’s destination is Cornwall (~)
armchair critic
the ~s, who have never achieved anything... (sports)
armchair detective
Kar is the typical ~ (a murder investigation)
armchair enthusiast
I’m no F1 guru, but am an avid ~ and could see... (crash)
armchair epidemiologists
beware ~ who have a solution to everything (pandemic)
Armchair Expert
during an appearance on the ~ podcast... (Dax and Monica)
armchair fans
they are out of town glory supporting ~(soccer snark)
~ had criticized Southgate’s team selection (3 Lions win)
armchair explorers
a tightknit community of ~ (Forest Fenn website)
armchair investigator
he had begun working with another ~ (lab-leak hypothesis)
Armchair Mountaineer
the ~ by David Reuther (Editor)
armchair quarterback
it’s easy to be an ~, what do you do when... (troubled kid)
all the ~s who couldn’t make it as a police officer...
armchair traveller
an ~ shouldn’t be giving advice about safety (trekking)
Armchair Voyage
see all episodes from ~ (BBC)
armchair warriors
I have zero tolerance for ~ (a veteran)
some shameful ~ on here (BBC HYS boxing)
armchair travel and adventure
books for ~
real and armchair
he was popular with ~ sailors alike (Tristan Jones)
safety of his armchair
said from the ~ (a response to criticism of police)
♦ “Nearly all advice sent to the King by armchair politicians is
impracticable nonsense.” (Don Quixote by Cervantes. Translated by
John Rutherford.)
♦ “Some brave keyboard warriors on here tonight.” (Sarcastic comment
on BBC HYS boxing.) / “So easy for you to say from behind a keyboard.”
(“Join the Discussion” snark.)
♦ “Does bring out the armchair critics, who have never achieved
anything, and think they know football.” (Jake 1234 in response to
Grover’s criticism about coach Gareth Southgate. On a BBC HYS,
football.)
Page 87 of 1574
♦ “Another keyboard coroner with his expert autopsy analysis from
thousands of miles away.” (Sarcastic comment on message board about
a police shooting.)
♦ “She called out some of the keyboard cowards with reasoned replies.”
(Social media trolls / cyberbullies.)
experience: house
armed
armed with the information
~, officials tracked down the criminals
armed with a microscope
~, he measured… (a scientist)
armed with her new mobility
the child begins exploring the world ~
armed with vast computing power
~, scientists will try to model a nuclear blast
armed (only) with her five senses
she makes diagnoses ~ (doctor)
armed with (fresh) search warrants
police arrived ~
armed with cash, good will, and local knowledge
they practice "public diplomacy" ~
help & assistance: military / weapon
armor (protection)
armour of obstinacy and willful ignorance
the Germans are deaf and blind, enclosed in an ~
opponent's armor
she uncovered a critical chink in her ~
chink in his armor
see chink (chink in one’s armor)
♦ “Life would be easier if vaccines offered invincible armor.” (Covid
pandemic.)
protection & lack of protection: Middle Ages / military /
weapon
armory (noun)
armoury of obstinacy and (willful) ignorance
the Germans are deaf and blind, enclosed in an ~
in her armory
slyness and guile are simply not ~
help & assistance: military / weapon
group, set & collection: military / weapon
arm-twisting
a lot of arm-twisting
his job requires a ~
coercion & motivation: arm / violence
army (Arnie’s Army, etc.)
Arnie’s Army
the ~ story (fans of Arnold Palmer)
Barmy Army
the ~ must have been disappointed (English cricket)
Britney Army
the ~ (#FreeBritney)
orange army
Verstappen’s ~ guaranteed a unique atmosphere (F1)
Tartan Army
members of the ~ (Scotland’s national football team)
the ~ belts out “Yes Sir, I Can Boogie” in London
♦.“’Boogie my... ‘ growled a disappointed Sean Connery, at McLeods
Publick House on W Main Street, after Scotland lost to Croatia. ‘What
have the descendants of Culloden, of Seringapatam, St. Valery and
Tumbledown Mountain come to? It almost makes me wish I could return
to Kafiristan!’” (“Elderly Scottish Visitor Disappears After Soccer Result,”
The Dothan Eagle, Dothan, Alabama.)
♦ Fans of the “Who Weekly” podcast call themselves Wholigans, they
have their own language and inside jokes, and they support the hosts by
subscribing on Patreon.
♦ “Hi, are you a Saweetie?” (The rapper greeting people to a private club
in West Hollywood.)
♦ “It’s part of a boyishness that Musk-eteers really love about him.” (Jill
Lepore using a term for followers of Elon Musk.)
enthusiasm / group, set & collection: military
army (a large group)
army of emojis
the smiley morphed into a whole ~
army of fans
an ~ broke out in celebration (#FreeBritney)
army of followers
he'll have an ~ (Apolo Ohno at Olympics)
army of (private) investors
an ~ spotted a chance (GameStop)
army of pastors
evangelicals are spreading rapidly through an ~
army of people
it takes an ~ to get you ready (Sandra Oh / Oscars)
army of statistics
he bolsters his analysis with an ~
army of volunteers
he recruited an ~ (Chef Jose “We Fed an Island” Andres)
army of (volunteer) workers
an ~ pounded nails (community playground)
army of zombies
they band these computers together into an ~ (botnets)
army of Ph.D.s
the vast ~ now roaming the universities
army of (poorly paid) migrant workers
an ~ works in Saudi Arabia
grassroots army
Page 88 of 1574
his war chest and ~ make him an unstoppable juggernaut
♦ “I think what people are worried about in this ad is that he says ‘army of
supporters’... We believe the language ‘army of supporters’ is not really
calling for an army but is calling on people who are normal campaign
volunteers.” (Sheryl Sandberg, the Chief Operating Officer of Facebook,
about a 2020 political ad.)
amount: military
arouse (verb)
aroused suspicions
what they said ~
consciousness & awareness: sleep / verb
arrive (a time can arrive)
1972 arrived
~, and the world didn’t end (a doomsday cult)
future / time: direction / movement / verb
coming, arriving, staying, leaving & returning: direction /
movement / verb
arrive (the equator is arriving, etc.)
arriving again
the equator is ~ (a moving ship)
♦ When you are traveling, on a ship, say, things can arrive and pass you.
coming, arriving, staying, leaving & returning: direction /
movement / verb
arrive (attainment)
arrived
she is, after just one engagement, a new artist who has ~
♦ See comer (up-and-comer, etc.)
primacy, currency, decline & obsolescence: direction /
movement
arrive at (an answer, etc.)
arrive at your answer
how did you ~
♦ “I hope you support where I come out (on my decision).”
attainment: journeys & trips / movement / verb
analysis, interpretation & explanation: journeys & trips /
movement / verb
arsenal (amount)
arsenal of medicines
the ~ against biological weapons is limited
arsenal of (top-of-the-line) technology
the team set out last month with an ~ (search team)
arsenal of tools
their ~ for evaluating applicants (colleges)
arsenal of (fire-fighting) tools
a growing ~
beauty arsenal
the ~ you can count on (cosmetics)
growing arsenal
there is a ~ of fire-fighting tools on the market
brought history into the arsenal
Erasmus and his followers ~ of the Reformation
♦ On Sunday, January 27, 2002, an arms depot blew up on a military
base in the densely packed Ikeja area of Lagos. A series of blasts shook
the city, and chaos reigned as thousands fled, not knowing what was
happening. At a canal several miles away, in the darkness, more than a
thousand people drowned in a great crowd stampede. As is common in
such stampedes, many of the victims were women and children.
amount / group, set & collection: weapon / military
help & assistance: weapon / military
art (work of art)
edible works of art
her awe-inspiring pie decorations are ~
work of art, a masterpiece
the winning of the South Pole had been a ~ (Amundsen)
genius, an absolute work of art
it was ~ (a goal scored by Arsenal captain Aubameyang)
turn the ocean into works of art
phytoplankton blooms ~ (BBC’s Colourful Planet)
♦ “This is the 70th birthday of one of the most important works of art in
American history. (Sound of opening music to the TV show I love Lucy.)
Yeah, think of it as a work of art...” (Steve Inskeep, NPR, Morning
Edition, Feb 5 2021.)
achievement, recognition & praise: picture
creation & transformation / superlative: picture
artery (route)
artery
the ~ poured across the US fueled development (a highway)
artery on the (old) Silk road
the street was an ~ (Jibek Joly in southern Kazakhstan)
artery of commerce
the Mississippi River is an ~
arteries of (global) trade
it is in all our interests that the ~ are kept free (shipping)
artery of water
the canal is a life-giving ~ (agriculture)
clogged artery
Boston's ~ (the Central Artery)
underwater arteries
these ~ could be vulnerable to attack (undersea cables)
bustling artery
the seventh floor overlooks a ~ (an avenue)
north-south artery
Route One, a ~ (Jerusalem)
Central Artery
the ~ is clogged with traffic day and night (Boston)
vital artery
the Grand Canal was a ~ (China)
Page 89 of 1574
commercial and military artery
the Gulek Pass has been a major ~ for millennia (Turkey)
route: blood
branching system: blood
Arthurian (adjective)
Arthurian figure
he became an ~ in Greek popular culture (Constantine XI)
fantasy & reality: allusion / history / person
allusion: books & reading
comparison & contrast: affix
artisanal (adjective)
artisanal items
using salvaged foods as ingredients in ~
artisanal mezcal
importing ~ for distribution in the U.S. market
artisanal food shop
~ helps Kosovo war-rape survivors earn income and heal
artisanal mining
~ supports poor families in the region (the Congo)
♦ “Come 2012, there’s a new food vocabulary: authentic, craft, small
batch, artisan, rustic and, of course, local. It’s the opposite of processed,
mass produced and factory farmed...” (“Artisanal And Authentic, The
Flavors Of The New Year” by Bonny Wolf, NPR, Weekend Edition
Sunday, January 1, 2012.)
creation & transformation: hand / manufacturing
artwash (verb)
artwash the regime
the government brings western influencers to ~
concealment & lack of concealment: hygiene / verb
appearance & reality: hygiene / verb
ascent (on the ascent)
on the ascent
India is ~ (militarily and economically)
China is ~, and the US seems on the descent
his career is ~ (an athlete)
seems to be on the ascent
plagiarism ~
growth & development: direction
primacy, currency, decline & obsolescence: direction
ascent (with the ascent)
with the ascent of the Nazis
her worst political fears came true ~
with the ascent of Chomsky
linguistics changed drastically ~
growth & development: direction
primacy, currency, decline & obsolescence: direction
ascent (other)
ascent to celebrity
Julia examines the famous chef’s ~ (HBO Max)
ascent (of his party) to power
the ~ in 1968 led to…
rapid ascent
the company has seen a ~
slow the ascent
action to ~ of their currencies
ascent, apogee and decline
sport compresses life’s natural trajectory of ~
growth & development: direction
primacy, currency, decline & obsolescence: direction
ashes (from the ashes)
from the ashes of the Ottoman Empire
Turkey rose ~
from the ashes of the Korean War
but ~ we rose (South Korean President)
from the ashes of apartheid
~, Soweto is emerging as a vibrant place…
from the ashes of despair
adoption is a miracle that arises ~
emerged from the ashes
the League ~ of World War I
rose from the ashes
the Universal Declaration of Human Rights ~ of WW II
amelioration & renewal / destruction / origin: fire
creation & transformation: fire
ask (big ask, etc.)
ask is that
really, our ~ we test the alternatives...
ask was
our biggest ~we wanted the conference to...
ask for a positive tweet
I’m not aware of any ~ (Jen Psaki, WH press secretary)
big ask of Trump
the Polish President went to Washington with a ~
brutal ask for the (young) boxer
this is a ~ (a match in Russia)
hard ask for (an antiwar) Belgium
it was a ~ (troop surge in Afghanistan)
big ask
what you want is a ~
asking for a change is a ~
he is demanding government documents, a ~
most important ask
Page 90 of 1574
the ~ I have for Afghanistan is that... (Ashraf Ghani)
tall ask
it may be a ~ to replicated his stats from... (NFL)
formal or explicit ask
no ~ was ever made (for celebrity to leave Oscars)
quite the ask
the idea of doing all that is ~ (privacy etiquette / guests)
comes with an ask
it ~, we need help...
♦ “Just lay out what your specific ask is.” “Our biggest ask was we
wanted...” (Heard on NPR.)
wants, needs, hopes & goals: part of speech
asleep (adjective)
asleep
all the governments are ~ (Middle East)
♦ “I hope this film shakes people from their slumber.” (The great
filmmaker and New York Knicks fan Spike Lee.)
consciousness & awareness: sleep
asleep (at the switch, etc.)
asleep at the switch
the regulators were ~ (oil spill)
asleep at the wheel
several Republican incumbents have been ~ (election)
many states have been ~ (girls marrying too young in US)
the World Health Organization was ~ (response to epidemic)
consciousness & awareness: sleep
control & lack of control: sleep
failure, accident & impairment: sleep
ASMR
ASMR angel
Charlotte, who is called the ~ (gift wrapping)
Asmr community
John Butler, a beloved member of the ~ (former farmer)
ASMR Dental Examination and Teeth Cleaning
~ (Lizi ASMR / roleplay / 606,106 views)
Asmr moaning
Asmr joi, Asmr roleplay, ~ (porn categories)
food ASMR
~ videos have garnered over 2.4 billion views (TikTok)
Lesbian ASMR
~ kissing, licking and mouth fetish
lewd ASMR
~ (a porn category)
♦ Relaxing; soothing; feeling of personal intimacy; surrendering yourself
to somebody else; softly spoken; lush whispers; hushed tones; Russian
and Eastern European accents; sounds; visceral; tingling sensation;
scalp; back of neck... (Features of ASMR.)
♦ “The Internet has brought a whole community of brain tinglers together,
who can upload and share videos and talk about their experiences, to
their heart’s content.” (BBC Radio 4, Seriously, “Brain Tingles.”)
♦ According to a BBC writer, John Butler, the “former farmer” and
“YouTube sensation,” provided tingly or shivery solace to millions during
the COVID pandemic. (BBC, “Asmr: Former farmer, 84, is accidental
YouTube star,” 14 June 2021.)
♦ Merriam-Webster added ASMR in January 2021.
♦ “People who don’t have ASMR don’t really get it... You got to have a lot
of subscribers.” (An ASMR video-maker.)
feeling, emotion & effect: bodily reaction
aspirational (adjective)
aspirational
does it apply to the here and now, or is it ~ (diplomacy)
wants, needs, hopes & goals: breathing
assassination (character assassination)
character assassination
to call him an anti-Semite is ~
calling him a racist is ~
character assassination through silence
inaction can be ~
right-wing character assassination
the film is ~ masquerading as "history"
cleverly orchestrated character assassination
the FBI conducted ~ (US)
anonymous character assassination
early uses of the printing press included ~
political character assassination
it was ~ (a script about John F. Kennedy)
posthumous character assassination
the Jackson estate calls the HBO documentary a ~
cesspool of character assassination
the Web site is a ~ (gossip site in rural towns)
victim of character assassination
he was the ~
accused her of character assassination
he ~
conduct character assassination
I'm not trying to ~
smells of character assassination
the criminal case against him ~
used character assassination
they ~ against him
accusation & criticism: speech / violence
speech: violence
assembly line (noun)
well-oiled assembly line
Hollywood was a slick, ~ (in the 1930s)
Page 91 of 1574
creation & transformation: manufacturing
asterisk (attention)
asterisk next to his name
there should always be an ~ (drugs / a boxer)
asterisk beside this victory
there will forever be a metaphorical ~ (split decision)
with an asterisk
this is justice ~ (exoneration came much too late)
giant asterisk
all 3 shootings, there’s a ~ next to them (a policeman)
attention, scrutiny & promotion: letters & characters
astir (adjective)
astir in the world
great things were ~ (the Renaissance)
set the baseball world astir
the news ~
activity: movement / sleep
astray (direction)
gone astray
science has ~, gone off the rails, many times
♦ “Follow the prophet, don’t go astray / Follow the prophet, he knows the
way.” (A Mormon children’s song.)
behavior / failure, accident & impairment: animal /
direction
astride (position)
astride the Red Sea and the Sahel
Sudan, ~... (geopolitics)
♦ This preposition means to have one leg on either side.
configuration: horse / leg / standing, sitting & lying
fictive position: horse / leg / standing, sitting & lying
astronomical (adjective)
astronomical
the odds are ~
astronomical prices
the ~ of the so-called glamour health spas
astronomical (suicide) rate
a nation plagued by an ~ (Japan)
astronomical sum
this is an ~ (salary)
 size: astronomy
comparison & contrast: astronomical
astroturf (noun)
perpetuate astroturf
corporations and special interest exploit media to ~
grassroots or astroturfs [sic]
we don’t know whether this is real ~ (protests)
♦ “Sometimes it’s very hard to verify. Sometimes it’s very hard to know
the motivations of the person... Astro turf, things that appear real but are
fake, right, we’re in this moment where there’s so much fakery...”
(Damien Cave, The New York Times.)
appearance & reality / concealment & lack of concealment
/ subterfuge: infrastructure
astroturfer (noun)
astroturfers
~ present themselves as grassroots organizations
astroturfers aim
~ to make you think you’re an outlier when you’re not
astroturfers claim
~ to debunk myths that aren’t myths at all
appearance & reality / concealment & lack of concealment
/ subterfuge: infrastructure
astroturfing
astroturfing
~ masks the sponsor, who is not grassroots
“~” creates the appearance of a grass-roots campaign
appearance & reality / concealment & lack of concealment
/ subterfuge: infrastructure
asylum (insane asylum, etc.)
insane asylum
NYC trains are ~s, so is this thread... (crime)
environment: mental health
Athens (Athens of Asia, etc.)
Athens of Asia
Samarkand briefly was the ~ (Tamerlane)
“Athens of Cuba”
locals christened it the ~ for its cultural life (Matanzas)
knowledge & intelligence: epithet
atmosphere (in / within an
atmosphere)
in an atmosphere of suspicion
they live ~
in an atmosphere of tension and gloom
people resumed their lives ~ (after rioting)
in a post-Sept.11 atmosphere
security concerns ~
in a carnival atmosphere
discussion should not have to be conducted ~
in a welcoming atmosphere
have people come together ~ (party)
within the cloistered atmosphere
she felt secure ~ (psychiatric ward)
Page 92 of 1574
in this highly charged atmosphere
~ the bombings started (Saudi Arabia)
in a calm atmosphere
~ we tend to win the debate
in an (intensely) partisan atmosphere
~, reform is very difficult (US Congress)
in a safe, discreet atmosphere
exploring her girl/girl fantasies ~ (brothel)
environment: air / atmosphere / weather & climate
feeling, emotion & effect: air / atmosphere / weather &
climate
atmosphere (atmosphere of trust, etc.)
atmosphere
the ~ inside the MGM Grand arena was festive
at the opening of the trial, the ~ was electric
atmosphere of acceptance
promote an ~ for new staff members
atmosphere of (open) access
an ~ at administrative buildings (pre-9/11)
atmosphere of (such sacred) ceremonies
the spiritual ~ (Wicca)
atmosphere of distrust
adding to the ~ was… (Middle East)
atmosphere of (funereal) gloom
an ~
atmosphere of stereotypes
an ~ among the restaurant workers (about who tips)
atmosphere of tolerance
the ~ he had seen on US television (towards gays)
atmosphere of trust
they established an ~ (US company in China)
atmosphere of denial and repression
an ~ (pedophilia and the priesthood)
atmosphere of hopelessness and poverty
Gaza's ~
atmosphere of hostility and distrust
the ~ (Middle East)
atmosphere of a (medieval) market-pilgrim town
the old quarter had the ~ (Lhasa)
atmosphere at Central Command
the ~ was one of confidence
atmosphere on the plane
the ~ remained calm (hijacking)
carnival atmosphere
there was a ~ (peaceful anti-war protest)
family atmosphere
companies used to have a ~
it's a ~ (Wild West Weekend at historic village)
party atmosphere
a ~ had taken over
the ~, the trinket booths (Gay Pride parades)
team atmosphere
create a ~ (sports)
work atmosphere
a ~ notorious for backbiting
classroom atmosphere
he created a ~ in which we could say anything
hometown atmosphere
creating a ~ for Atlanta’s transplants (sports bars)
pressure-cooker atmosphere
the accusations underscore the ~ in the region
anti-immigration atmosphere
Sept. 11 has not yet led to a massive ~
accepting atmosphere
Amigos in the Dominican Republic has an ~ (gays)
inviting atmosphere
US's ~ makes terrorist activities inevitable
freewheeling atmosphere
Krasnoyarsk's ~
electric atmosphere
the ~ in the city when a pride event is in town
friendly atmosphere
the ~ that originally drew foreigners to Wisconsin
liberal atmosphere
Khujand had a surprising ~ (Tajikistan)
peaceful atmosphere
preserving the ~ (synagogue after 9/11)
poisonous atmosphere
a "~" has descended on the Times (firings)
supportive atmosphere
this ~ (at a psychiatric hospital)
a ~ for scholarly development (university)
toxic atmosphere
political leaders have contributed to a ~ (politics)
volatile atmosphere
it's a ~ (national outrage over child abuse by clergy)
carnival-like atmosphere
a ~ outside the soccer stadium
cauldron-like atmosphere
the energy of the crowd in the ~ (World Cup)
quiet, safe and orderly atmosphere
promote a ~ (public library)
cost, taste and atmosphere
~ are important in a restaurant
Page 93 of 1574
environment or atmosphere
does this create a new ~ (Supreme Court rules on NCAA)
food, atmosphere, music
~ (New Orleans)
size, location and atmosphere
think about company ~ (looking for a job)
atmosphere prevails
an accepting ~ throughout the Dutch Caribbean (gays)
enjoy that atmosphere
some people don’t ~ (Virgin Galactic vs. SpaceX)
poison the atmosphere
fear and distrust can quickly ~ (epidemic)
♦ “For me to be here and to sample the atmosphere, I don’t think I’ll see
or hear an atmosphere like this again. The atmosphere was just
something that took my breath away... I have never seen anything like
this before. I’ve played at Anfield when there is a superb atmosphere but
this is something else, something special.” (Alan Shearer on Liverpool’s
amazing victory against Barcelona in a Champion’s League second leg
semifinal.)
♦ “The atmosphere was amazing, off the scale, absolutely lunatic.”
(Steve Bunce about Fury-Whyte in front of 94,000 fight fans at Wembley
Stadium.)
environment: air / atmosphere / weather & climate
feeling, emotion & effect: air / atmosphere / weather &
climate
atomic bomb
atomic bomb for poor people
terrorism was the ~ (Pablo Escobar)
cruise missiles and atomic bombs
you bodies are our new ~ (suicide bombers)
♦ “In 1945, news reached the camps that the US now possessed the
atomic bomb. According to Solzhenitsyn, this unexpected development
gave hope to many prisoners, who began to pray for atomic war.” (“On
The Prison Highway, The gulag’s silent remains,” by Ian Frazier, The
New Yorker, August 30, 2010.)
♦ The original target for the second atomic bomb was Kokura. But
because Kokura was clouded in, the bomb was dropped on Nagasaki.
♦ “I felt no remorse or guilt that I had bombed the city.” (Charles W.
Sweeney, pilot of the plane that dropped an atomic bomb on Nagasaki in
World War II.)
♦ “I don’t feel any guilt or blame about it. I think my view really is if we
hadn’t done it someone else would have. And it would be with us in any
case.” (Lilli S. Hornig, who worked on the Manhattan Project. From “The
Bomb,” PBS, 2015.)
♦ According to General Eisenhower, the four “tools of victory” that won
World War II were the bazooka, the jeep, the C-47 Skytrain, and the
atomic bomb.
destruction: explosion / nuclear energy
atomization (noun)
atomization of literary journalism
the ~ and getting paid for it (online reviewers)
atomization of the rap market
the ~
division & connection: physics
atrophy (verb)
atrophied
its military capacity has ~ (NATO)
attenuation / condition & status / functioning: health &
medicine / skin, muscle, nerves & bone
attached (attributed)
attached to depression
there is a severe social stigma ~
attached to it
cross burning has a history of racial intimidation ~
attached to that
no undue significance should be ~
attachment: materials & substances
attachment (noun)
attachment to him
younger black folk have less of an ~ (an older celebrity)
attachment: materials & substances
attack (verb)
attacked the government’s plans
conservative rebels have ~ (UK / COVID lockdown)
conflict: military
attack (under attack, etc.)
under attack
the feeling in Egypt was that all Arabs were ~
South Korean culture is ~ (insults about food)
under attack worldwide
he read of how Muslims were ~
come under attack
such practices have ~ as cruel to animals (cages)
his methodology has ~
♦ James Mossman: “You say that you don’t care what the critics write
about you, your work, yet you got very angry with Edmund Wilson once
for commenting on you work, and you let off some very heavy field guns
at him, not to say multiple rockets, so you must have cared...” / Vladimir
Nabokov: “I never retaliate when my works of art are concerned. Here
the arrows of adverse criticism cannot scratch let alone pierce the shield
of what disappointed archers call my self-assurance. But I do reach for
my heaviest dictionary when my scholarship is questioned...” (Vladimir
Nabokov, BBC Author Archive Collection, “James Mossman talks to
Russian writer Vladimir Nabokov in this 1970 interview.”)
accusation & criticism: military / weapon
conflict: military / weapon
attack (noun)
attacks on athletes
personal ~ at games (fan abuse)
attacks on their self-esteem and dignity
dealing with ~ (stereotypes, etc.)
attacks against Saudi Arabia
Page 94 of 1574
he condemned Western media ~ (Abdullah)
attack ads
we are seeing ~ of every kind (election)
attack mode
she is in a real ~
media attack
he condemned Western ~s against Saudi Arabia
mob attacks
protecting individuals from social-media ~
direct attack
under ~ you could use the quivering-lip approach
latest attack
this ~ stung local parole officials (calls to end system)
personal attacks
~ on athletes at games (fan abuse);
ladling criticism or indulging in ~
fend off some (major) attacks
he has had to ~ (a politician)
accusation & criticism: weapon
attacked
attacked from above and below
the ice is being ~ (floating ice shelf / global warming)
destruction: military / weapon
attend (verb)
attended these protests
violence has ~
attachment: journeys & trips / movement / verb
relationship: journeys & trips / movement / verb
audience (play to the audience, etc.)
see play (play to the audience, etc.)
auger (verb)
augers well
this ~ for future attempts to find the wreck (conditions)
fate, fortune & chance: bird / religion / verb
evidence: bird / religion / verb
aura (noun)
aura of assertiveness
she projects an ~ and self-confidence
aura of prosperity
Turkish businessmen sported an irresistible ~
aura of an (18th-century English) landscape
the pond possesses the ~
aura of a shrine
the images in the hall add the ~ (SuAnne Big Crow)
aura of unreality
an ~ descended over the mountain (disaster)
aura of doom and gloom
an ~
archive's aura
the exhibit has an ~ of dense, ordered information
romantic aura
the pond possesses the ~ of s landscape portrait
projects an aura
she ~ of assertiveness and self-confidence
punctured Slater's aura
he ~ of invincibility (surfing)
appearance: air / atmosphere
feeling, emotion & effect: air / atmosphere
auspicious (adjective)
auspicious
the timing of the move is ~ as the country is...
auspicious debut
the album is an ~ for the group (good reviews)
auspicious start
it was an ~ to an audacious career (in music)
auspicious time
the news came at an ~ in the U.K.
auspicious politically
everything is ~, Grant will surely be elected...
less than auspicious
her arrival in England was ~ (a refugee)
he was appointed under ~ circumstances
not an auspicious beginning
this was ~ (a bad date, but they ended up married anyway)
not an auspicious debut
alas, it was ~ (bad reviews)
♦ This comes from the Latin for bird and see and means, “The omens are
good.” At certain times and in certain places, the direction of flight of a
bird might determine whether or not a camel caravan set out that day.
Romans would cut open a bird and study the entrails. The early Puritans
in the US avidly studied nature for signs.
♦ “Punxsutawney Phil is predicting six more weeks of winter, but Staten
Island Chuck...”
♦ “Every sign points to her having a huge year in 2022...”
♦ “That’s a bad sign!”
♦ “Omens of ill-luck will follow those who pay attention to them.” (A
saying.)
♦ “The Spouter Inn. Peter Coffin. Coffin? Spouter? Rather ominous in
that particular connection, though I...” (Moby-Dick.)
fate, fortune & chance: bird / religion
evidence: bird / religion
author (person)
author of his own misfortune
he fully accepts he was the ~ (arrested)
Page 95 of 1574
author of her misfortune
the court argued she had been the ~
authors of our own life stories
we are not the ~ (addiction versus free will)
creation & transformation: books & reading / person
person: books & reading
auto da fe
auto-da-fe of Vietnam
the New Left died in the ~ (Louis Menand)
judgment / oppression / violence: history
automata (noun)
became automata
even captains ~, acquiring life only through orders
consciousness & awareness / feeling, emotion & effect:
mechanism
autopilot (on autopilot)
on autopilot
he's ~, his fingers go to the same place (gamer)
he was ~, frantically trying to save him (combat medic)
made on autopilot
a lot of our economic decisions are actually ~
♦ “Diving became this darkness which permeated the rest of my life. I
really hated it, but I knew it was my one chance to be special, so I kept
going, effectively on autopilot.” (Olympic gold-medal-winning diver
Matthew Mitcham.)
behavior / consciousness & awareness / feeling, emotion
& effect: plane
autopsy (analysis)
autopsy of the Cuban vote
so what’s your ~ in Florida (radio show)
♦ “So what’s your autopsy of the Cuban vote in Florida?” (Asked by Lulu
Garcia Navarro to her guest on NPR, Weekend Edition Sunday, “The
Cuban Vote in Florida,” November 11, 2018.)
analysis, interpretation & explanation: death & life / health
& medicine
autumn (in the autumn)
in the autumn of his life
he was ~
in the autumn of the year
but now the days are short, I’m ~ (Sinatra)
growth & development / decline: season
primacy, currency, decline & obsolescence: season
avalanche (noun)
avalanche of (racial) abuse
they faced an ~ (soccer players after Euro 2020)
avalanche of applications
it failed to prepare for an ~ (passports)
avalanche of (prejudicial) comment
the murder trial was nearly derailed by an ~ on social media
avalanche of data
an ~ given the Russians
avalanche of e-mail
his most recent column drew an ~ to Salon editors
avalanche of publicity
the disappearance triggered an ~ (Chandra Levy)
avalanche of (unfavorable) publicity
the ~ that resulted from... (politician)
avalanche of confusing forms and rules
he spoke about the ~ (Brexit)
avalanche picked up speed
as the ~... (calls for politician’s resignation)
amount & effect: snow & ice
avatar (noun)
default avatar
Twitter did away with the egg as its ~
avatars and superheroes
athletes are seen as ~
create your own avatar
some online video games allow you to ~
flatten characters into avatars
revenge thrillers tend to ~ and little else (films)
representation: religion
avenue (portal)
avenue of advancement
India's dalits need a new ~
new avenue
India's dalits need a ~ of advancement
dark sonic avenues
her songs lure listeners down ~ (Billie Eilish)
portal: infrastructure
avenue (route)
avenue of attack
his wrongdoing gave lawyers an ~
fruitful avenue
this might be a ~ for further research
legal avenue
pursue all reasonable ~s
reasonable (legal) avenue
pursue all ~s
all avenues
Canada will pursue ~ to assist the jailed men
pursue (all legal) avenues
Page 96 of 1574
we will ~
route: infrastructure
awake (adjective)
awake to what happened
everyone seems to be wide ~ (elections)
awake American
he signs his posts, "an ~"
awake electorate
the answer is reform and an ~
♦ “We are now awake and paying attention.” (An Asian parent who
helped lead a campaign that led to the recall of three San Francisco
school-board members.)
♦ Sam Sanders (“Opinion: It’s Time to Put ‘Woke’ To Sleep,” NPR,
Weekend Edition Sunday, December 30, 2018) argues that the term
woke has had its day and should be retired.
♦ see also woke (groups)
consciousness & awareness: sleep
awaken (awareness)
awakened to the horrors
on that day, the world ~ of apartheid (South Africa)
awakening in Algeria, Sudan, Morocco, and Jordan
Arab peoples are also ~ (after Tunisia, Egypt and Libya)
awaken people
we're trying to do what we can to ~
people are awakening
slowly the ~
consciousness & awareness: sleep / verb
awaken (nature, etc.)
awakening from (its winter) sleep
nature is ~
taiga awoke
the ~ (at dawn)
♦ “The sky turned from black to deep blue, and then grey and cloudy.
The shades of night began to shrink into the bushes and ravines. In a
few minutes our bivouac was astir again; men started talking; the horses
stirred at their ropes; a pica piped on one side, and lower down the gorge
another answered it; the yaffle of the woodpecker rang through the forest
and the melodious whistle of the oriole. The taiga awoke...” (Dersu Uzala
by V.K. Arseniev.)
activity / resemblance: sleep
awakened (adjective)
awakened and empowered
Nato seems ~ in this moment (NPR political pundit)
consciousness & awareness: sleep
awakening
9/11 awakening
part of it was a ~ (desire to "do more" for others)
religious awakening
the ~ is partly an outgrowth of the war (Bosnia )
spiritual awakening
she had a ~
consciousness & awareness: sleep
awash
awash with small arms
Yemen is ~ that have been smuggled in
awash with (at least 10,000) floral bouquets
the church is ~ (for murdered girls)
awash with (overt) irony
social media is ~ often tipping into sarcasm
awash with weapons
the Horn of Africa is ~
Libya is ~
awash with corruption, venality and graft
the government is ~
awash in allegations
India is ~ of corruption
awash in cash
the company is ~ and looking to buy
awash in flowers, firecrackers and fine foods
Chinatown is ~ (Chinese New Year)
amount & effect: water
away (a week away, etc.)
just a mouse click away
it was ~ (evidence of public shaming)
“One Heartbeat Away
~: Presidential Disability and Succession” (Birch Bayh)
about five minutes away
a dystopian future is ~
just a plane away
we are ~ from having cases here (COVID-19)
just a shot away
war, children, it’s ~ (“Gimme Shelter” / Rolling Stones)
just two weeks away
we are ~ from the first vote
just a week away
and now, with the decision ~, the clock is ticking
♦ “Cyberpunk is a dystopian future that’s about five minutes from our
current existence.” (Mike Pondsmith.)
future / proximity / time: distance / prep, adv, adj, particle
AWOL
went AWOL
the Federal government ~ (in defending a health act)
allegiance, support & betrayal: military
condition & status: military
Page 97 of 1574
ax (ax to fall, etc.)
waiting for the axe to fall
sitting around ~ (deadlines)
fate, fortune & chance: ax / blade
ax (noun)
budget ax
many state programs will succumb to the ~ (shortfall)
the camp may fall to the ~ (for teens)
faces the ax
the show still ~ (TV)
fall to the (budget) ax
the camp may ~ (for teens)
succumb to the ax
many state programs will ~ (budget shortfall)
taking an ax
he is ~ to spending
♦ Climax, Demon, Endurance, Cock of the Woods, Red Warrior,
Hiawatha, Hottentot, Black Prince, Black Chief, Battle Axe, Invincible,
XXX Chopper, Woodslasher, Razor Blade, Stiletto, Forest King, Young
American, Gorilla... (Late-19th-century model names of axes used to cut
down the North American forests.)
dismissal, removal & resignation: ax / blade / tools &
technology
ax (ax to grind)
ax to grind
he just has an ~ (criticism)
sometimes a source has an ~ (journalism)
this is another letter from somebody with an ~
axe to grind
he is motivated not by truth but an ~
ax to grind with the CIA
he has an ~
ax to grind with midwives
many in traditional medicine have an ~
ax to grind about something
there are always going to be people with an ~
ideological ax to grind
he has no ~ (a writer writing about capitalism)
personal ax to grind
he has a ~ (a critic)
political axes to grind
unions and companies often have ~
grinds a (political) ax
it ~ (Southern Poverty Law Center)
punishment & recrimination: ax / blade
revenge: ax / blade
axed (curtailed)
axed
the event was ~ (because of pandemic)
curtailment: ax / blade
B
baby (relationship)
Elam’s baby
the idea may be ~, but he has looked at it critically
his baby
the Gulf of Mexico is ~
Cooper refers to his camera, made in 1898, as ~
my baby
this is ~ and I want to keep growing it (a business)
it's ~ (Ferrari 458 Italia)
our baby
this is ~ (fire spotter speaking of his tower)
♦ “I don’t have kids but I feel that it’s like letting your baby go and grow
up. So she’s on her next step before she goes up to the moon. And you
have to do it.” (Dafna Jackson, an advisor at SpaceIL, after the
Beresheet spacecraft was shipped to Cape Canaveral, to be launched
into space by a Space X Falcon 9 rocket. Sadly, there was a glitch at the
last moment, and the spacecraft crash-landed on the moon.)
♦ “I am a childless man, after all, ladies and gentlemen, and my books
are my children, I have invested the blood of my soul in them, and after
my death it is they and they alone that will carry my spirit and my dreams
to future generations.” (Uncle Joseph Klausner from A Tale of Love and
Darkness by Amos Oz.)
♦ “This is my baby, this is what does the work.” (Albert Milton, the deputy
boss of a diamond mine in Botswana, speaking about a 720-ton electric
excavator crane that can grab 60 tons of broken rock in a single bite.)
♦ “So I get used to the book’s final stage, to its having been weaned from
my brain. I now regard it with a kind of bemused tenderness, as a man
regards, not his son, but, uh, rather the young wife of this son.” (Vladimir
Nabokov, BBC Author Archive Collection, “James Mossman talks to
Russian writer Vladimir Nabokov in this 1970 interview.” Nabokov had
been talking previously about the drudgery, work and failures of bringing
a book to birth.)
♦ “Every monkey is a gazelle to its mother.” (Arabic.)
enthusiasm / relationship: baby
feeling, emotion & effect: baby
baby (development)
baby of the publishing world
compared to physical book sales, audio is the ~
baby science
he rescued the of microbe hunting from a fantastic myth
growth & development: baby / death & life
baby (novice)
baby boxers
two novices, two ~ fighting one another (Steve Bunce)
♦ “A baby, just a baby.” (Ernest Borgnine in the film All Quiet On the
Western Front, about an injured new recruit. Borgnine gets ready to
shoot him, to put him out of his misery, before two stretcher-bearers
appear, put the casualty on a stretcher, and bear him to the rear.)
Page 98 of 1574
experience: baby
baby (size)
baby AK-47
the Draco is a ~ frequently namechecked in rap
size: baby
baby (younger)
baby of the family
I lost my brother, the ~ (his age was sixty-five)
growth & development: baby
baby (baby face, etc.)
baby face
he grew a full beard to hide his ~
appearance: baby / face
baby (vocative)
baby
so tell me, ~, do you want me to…
honey, baby, sweetie
he addresses me as ~ and other inappropriate names
vocative: speech
babysit (verb)
babysit them
at a certain point you can’t ~ (troubled people)
dependency: baby / family / verb
babysitter (role)
babysitter for the world
I'm tired of America being a ~ (illegal immigration)
electronic babysitter
they were the perfect “~” (Disney animated films)
$40,000-a-year baby-sitter
I'm a ~ (an unhappy corrections officer)
become a babysitter
he does not want to ~ (take a manager’s job / soccer)
♦ “A manager is just babysitting somebody’s toy.” (An ex-player not
interested in managing a Premier League soccer team.)
dependency: baby / family / person
person: baby
back (support / verb)
back Obama
will Hispanics ~
allegiance, support & betrayal: back / direction / position /
verb
back (return)
season is back
and now the ~ (after a hiatus / a TV series)
coming, arriving, staying, leaving & returning: prep, adv, adj,
particle
back (in time)
go back
see go back (verb / time)
look back
see look back (verb)
takes me back
see take (take us back / time)
transported audiences back
see transport (in time)
past & present / fictive transportation / time: direction /
movement / prep, adv, adj, particle / verb
back (back then)
back then
~ in Russia, it was a cutthroat business (oil)
I’ll admit it, I was fond of the gin myself ~ (Falesa)
past & present / time: direction / prep, adv, adj, particle
back (behind somebody's back)
behind her friend's back
she went after him ~ (dated friend's boyfriend)
went behind my back
he ~
whispered behind her back
people ~
whispered "queer" behind his back
people ~ (student)
badmouth your spouse behind his or her back
don't ~
ridicule (negative) leaders behind their backs
people typically ~
talk about bosses behind their backs
if you want a promotion, don't ~ (gossip)
♦ "Out here, people had a smile on their face and a dagger behind their
back." (Bigotry and discrimination.)
allegiance, support & betrayal / subterfuge: back
back (no way back, etc.)
no way back
there is ~, the people won’t forgive this (protests)
there is ~ (North Macedonia finally negotiates its name)
no way back from this
I think that there’s ~ (Cuba cracks down on protestors)
no way back for Egypt and the region
there is ~ (2011)
Page 99 of 1574
reversal: direction
fate, fortune & chance: journeys & trips
back (scratch somebody's back)
scratch my back
you ~, I'll scratch your back (mutual aid and assistance)
social interaction: back / verb
back (back and forth)
back and forth on that
there has been a lot of ~ (political issue)
position, policy & negotiation: movement
social interaction: movement
back (pat on the back / verb)
pat yourselves on the back
you did well, ~ (praise)
achievement, recognition & praise: back / gesture
back (pat on the back / noun)
pat on the back
give yourselves a ~ (praise from teacher)
achievement, recognition & praise: back / gesture
back (get off my back, etc.)
on the back of these workers
they make a lot of money ~ (Uber in Great Britain)
getting rich on the backs
publishers are ~ of libraries and academics
get off my back
~ and leave me alone
get them off my back
try and ~ (superiors)
affliction / conflict / oppression: animal / back
back (carry something on one’s back)
carrying England on his back
Joe Root is used to ~ (Ashes Test / cricket)
carried the team on his back
he ~ (football player)
♦ See the Wikipedia entry, “He Ain’t Heavy, He’s My Brother.”
difficulty, easiness & effort: back / burden / weight
help & assistance: back / burden / weight
back (turn one's back)
turned her back on Hollywood
Jamie Lee Curtis ~ (chose to live elsewhere)
turned its back on the victims
the West ~ (Rwanda genocide)
turned his back to anyone
he never ~ who needed help (a priest)
acceptance & rejection: back / verb
back (break the back)
break your back
she'll ~ if you're not paying attention to her (basketball)
broke the back of the campaign
those defeats ~ (primary elections)
break the back of the Covid epidemic
the vaccine could ~ (live virus BCG)
break the backs of defenders
the plan is designed to ~ (Baghdad)
break the back of the (German) war machine
he was destined to ~ (Stalingrad)
destruction: back / verb
back (back to the wall)
backs are to the wall
our ~
backs are (really) against the wall
our ~ (sports tournament)
have our backs against the wall
when we ~, we come out fighting (Welsh rugby)
survival, persistence & endurance: back
resistance, opposition & defeat: back
back (watch your back, etc.)
guard your back
you've got to ~
watch your back
~ (a warning)
sorry I wasn’t there to ~ (his brother drowned)
watch his back
he failed to ~ (leader deposed in coup)
watching my back
it's good to know that you are ~ (protecting, supporting)
♦ “Sorry I wasn’t there to watch your back like a big brother’s supposed
to.” (Chris Eubank Jnr’s tweet on the tragic death of Sebastian, the thirdeldest child of the great boxer Chris Eubank.)
danger / protection & lack of protection: back / direction /
position / verb
back (have somebody’s back)
got your back
I've ~
got your literary back
we’ve ~ (NPR promotes “The Books we Love”)
had my back
you’ve always ~, and I’ll have yours (Biden and Blacks)
danger / protection & lack of protection: back / direction /
position / verb
Page 100 of 1574
back (stab in the back)
stab in the back
what they see as a ~ by their Gulf neighbors (Qatar)
it’s really a ~, trust betrayed (French about Australia)
danger / protection & lack of protection: back / direction /
knife / position
back (get one’s back up, etc.)
got his back up
a good bowler ~ and we couldn’t stop him (Ashes cricket)
got my back up
his tone just ~
got my back up about the request
he ~
resistance, opposition & defeat: animal / back / dog / verb
conflict: animal / back / dog / verb
back (courage)
stiffens his back
economic pressure just ~ (Daniel Ortega)
stiffened his spine
he showed signs of going wobbly, but Pelosi ~ (politics)
courage & lack of courage: back
strength & weakness: back
back away (verb)
back away from the issue
Democrats are starting to ~ (impeachment)
avoidance & separation: verb / walking, running & jumping
backbiter (person)
annoying backbiters
the ~ who had plagued him as an army officer
person: animal / back
affliction: animal / back / person / predation
backbiting
backbiting, exclusion, rumors
girls use ~ (girls bullying girls)
“There were tracks, clearly enough. It was evident that the little hunter (a
sable) had quietly lay hidden behind a branch, and then suddenly flung
itself upon the deer... Specks of blood showed that the sable had bitten
it, but further tracks showed that the little deer had succeeded in
throwing its assailant off. It had galloped on, and the sable, after starting
to pursue it, had stopped and climbed up a tree.” (Dersu examining
tracks in the snow. From Dersu Uzala by V.K. Arseniev.)
behavior: animal / back / predation
conflict: animal / back / predation
backbone (basis)
backbone of Al Qaeda
Uzbeks and other Central Asians are the ~ in the area
backbone of the (rebel) army
the Dinka tribe, which formed the ~ (southern Sudan)
backbone of the company
these people are the ~
backbone of the (Louisiana) economy
shrimping is the ~ (oil spill)
backbone of the (Chilean) economy
Atacama’s copper mining industry forms the ~
backbone of (the Navy’s) leadership
surface warfare officers are the ~
backbone of his (political) party
they are the ~
backbone of rigor
in science, sharp criticism is the ~
Backbone of the World
Indians called these jagged peaks the “~” (Glacier NP)
backbone and nervous system
the Nile provides Egypt with a natural ~
financial backbone
the oil pipeline serves as the ~ of the country
infrastructure backbone
Amazon provides the ~ for major firms (servers)
technology backbone
Shopify provides the ~ for businesses to set up a store online
transportation backbone
Greyhound is the ~ for people who can't afford…
bases: back / skin, muscle, nerves & bone
backbone (branching system)
backbone of England
the Pennines are commonly described as the “~”
backbone of all Hind
the Great Road is the ~ (Kim)
backbone of the Kamchatka Peninsula
the Sredinny Range, the ~
Guinean backbone
Mount Nimba is part of the so-called ~ (Guinea)
branching system: back
backbone (courage)
takes backbone
for Republicans, it ~ to stand up to Trump
courage & lack of courage: back
strength & weakness: back
backbreaking (adjective)
backbreaking labor
a coal miner's capacity for ~
backbreaking shift
Page 101 of 1574
after a ~ (at a nursing home)
backbreaking work
~ for 50 cents a day
backbreaking and dangerous
it was ~ labor (diamond mining)
difficulty, easiness & effort: back
back burner (on the back burner)
on the back burner
that all seems to be ~ now
on the budget back burner
the environment is ~
put the issue on the back burner
he ~ (a politician)
put on the back burner
a lot of the department's works has been ~ (priorities)
remained on the back burner
the tax issue ~ (politics)
sits on the back burner
the climate-change issue ~ in Washington
♦ “I think there has been a vacuum of course recently, I think Iraq has
dropped off the radar screen, it’s very much at the back burner...” (Laith
Kubba about US engagement in Iraq.)
♦ “We shouldn’t allow the issue of global warming to be put on the back
burner... Or indeed any sort of burner come to that.” (“Loose Ends” with
Clive Anderson, BBC.)
importance & significance / priority / superiority &
inferiority: center & periphery / direction / position
back burner (to the back burner)
relegated to the back burner
major problems have been ~ (Saudi Arabia)
pushed (climate) issues to the back burner
the economic crisis has ~
put to the back burner
our issue are always ~ (Black Voters Matter)
importance & significance / priority / superiority &
inferiority: center & periphery / direction / position
back down (verb)
back down
the compromise allows both politicians to ~
she’s an artist who won’t ~ or bow to convention
backed down
faced with a coup, the government ~
the government ~ and commuted the death sentences
backing down
she is holding her ground and not ~
back down from a confrontation
analysts believe he will ~
back down or give her space
officials didn’t ~, they threatened her (Naomi Osaka)
refused to back down
the protestors have ~
forced him to back down
a political firestorm ~ (King)
backing down
she is holding her ground and not ~
conflict / dominance & submission / resistance, opposition
& defeat: animal / back / standing, sitting & lying / verb
backdrop (against a backdrop)
against that backdrop
~, it's not a huge surprise (attack on consulate)
against the backdrop of the Cold War
it was ~ that… (Eisenhower speech)
against a backdrop of (ongoing) violence
negotiations go on ~ (Middle East)
context: picture / theater
analysis, interpretation & explanation: picture
backed
backed by Iran
the rebels are ~
backed by the US
he has been ~ and other countries (Guaido vs. Maduro)
allegiance, support & betrayal: back / position
backfire (verb)
backfire
the campaign may succeed but it could also ~ (military)
"circle-the-wagons mentality" backfired
the ~
reversal: verb / weapon
background (fade into the background)
fade into the background
many prefer to ~ (teen-model sites on Internet)
faded into the background
the doctor-patient relationship has ~ (vs. money)
appearance & disappearance / attention, scrutiny &
promotion / importance & significance / perception,
perspective & point of view: center & periphery / picture /
position / verb
center & periphery: direction / position / picture
backhand (verb)
verbally backhanded
he ~ the journalist (Dan Crenshaw / politics)
accusation & criticism / speech: force / verb / violence
Page 102 of 1574
backing (support)
backing from the university
she received some ~
allegiance, support & betrayal: back / position
backlash (noun)
backlash against (bilingual) education
today in the climate of ~...
anti-American backlash
the government has struggled to prevent an ~ (Yemen)
climate of backlash
today in the ~ against bilingual education
backlash has started
the ~
sparked a backlash
his crusade has ~ (to make school lunches more healthful)
♦ A backlash against Facebook and technology has been referred to as a
techlash.
resistance, opposition & defeat: direction / violence / whip
reversal: direction / violence / whip
backlog (amount)
backlog
prolonging the process and swelling the ~ (visa requests)
backlog of cases
the FBI has a huge ~ (security clearances)
backlog of planes
because the weather will create a ~ waiting to land…
backlog of work
the NTSB needs to move on to the ~ that…
paperwork backlog
reducing the overall INS ~
processing backlog
foster kids remain orphans due to a ~ (adoptions)
♦ The backlog is the large log at the back of a hearth
amount: pile
backpedal (verb)
backpedaling on key demands
China has been ~ (trade dispute)
backpedal on the whole idea
they began to ~ of national standards (education)
backpedals on (tax) pledge
top Republican ~
back-pedal from his comments
he continued to ~ (a politician / BBC)
backpedaled after fierce criticism
the coach ~ from Chinese fans, sponsors, and partners
reversal: direction / mechanism / movement / verb
back seat (take a back seat)
take a backseat to my job
my job and family began to ~
take a backseat to reality
protocol had to ~ (CID investigation)
take a back seat to unseating
issue must ~ the current president
taking a second seat to schedule and cost
safety and quality were ~
importance & significance / priority / superiority &
inferiority: direction / position
backstabber (person)
backstabber
he's a ~, watch out
he's the worst kind of ~, he poses as a friend
backstabber or turncoat
being a ~ is offensive to most people
two-faced backstabber
he's a ~
traitor, a backstabber and a fraud
former fans have been waiting to call him a ~ (basketball)
person: back / knife
allegiance, support & betrayal / behavior / character &
personality: back / knife / person
backstabbing (noun)
backstabbing
~ is an art (politics)
back-stabbing and bad-mouthing
~ on the "Survivor" TV show
backstabbing and betrayal
~ remain a function of all our lives
allegiance, support & betrayal: back / knife
behavior: back / knife
backstage (adjective)
backstage advisor
he remains a ~ to Putin
backstage contacts
there have been ~ between them (diplomacy)
backstage diplomacy
~ has turned to more open confrontation
backstage look
the documents and testimony provide a ~ at why…
backstage negotiations
approval of the nominations came after ~
Page 103 of 1574
backstage politics
the organization is rife with ~ (sports)
backstage role
the administration playing a ~ in trying to resolve…
he played a pivotal ~ in persuading…
backstage self
we have a private, ~, versus our public self
backstage political struggle
he settled the ~ by choosing… (UN)
backstage lobbying
there has been ~ by Washington (diplomacy)
backstage maneuvering
there has been a lot of ~ (diplomacy)
backstage wrangling
after weeks of ~, the Party has decided…
backstage policy making
he was a master of ~ (Labor Party)
operates backstage
he ~ (an athletic booster)
concealment & lack of concealment: theater
attention, scrutiny & promotion: theater
backstop (noun)
backstop against the president’s worst instincts
he was a ~ (government)
♦ “A backstop; a guardrail; trying to keep the President from going
outside the bounds; minimize the damage...” (“John Bolton’s Place in
Ukraine Policy” by Mara Liasson, NPR, Morning Edition, October 25,
2019.)
behavior / constraint & lack of constraint: boundary
backtrack (go back in time)
backtrack
I think we have to ~ a bit (a history discussion)
past & present / time: journeys & trips / movement / verb
backtrack (reversal)
backtrack
the union has had to ~ on its demands
reversal: direction / journeys & trips / movement / verb
back up (verb)
back up
let’s ~ and get big picture for a second (NPR radio show)
perception, perspective & point of view: picture / position /
verb
backward (adjective)
backward Turkey
Ataturk took a ~ and made it modern
backward tack
I am embarrassed by the ~ of this administration
backward traditions
the Prophet (PBUH) did his utmost to eradicate ~
culturally backward
stoning takes place in remote and ~ areas
progress & lack of progress: direction
backwards (progress)
step backwards
to me this seems like a huge ~
go backwards
we should not ~ down the road toward nuclear power
sliding backwards
we are ~ to a less enlightened time
move us backwards
the election will ~ economically
progress & lack of progress: direction / movement
backwards (past)
go backwards
they want to ~ to a romanticized past that never existed
look backward
New Year's day is a time to ~ and forward
some ~ to a (reputedly) glorious past for answers
marching backwards
it feels like this country is ~ to the Middle Ages (religion)
past & present / time: direction / movement / prep, adv,
adj, particle
backwater (noun)
backwater
in 1831, Southampton County was a ~
backwater of the Office of International Affairs
he was transferred into the relative ~
backwater in a (vast Islamic) empire
the region around Kabul was merely a ~
long-ignored (rural) backwater
in ~s
provincial backwater
the town remained a ~
remote backwater
Darien remained a ~
rural backwater
Beijing has brought wealth and modernity to a ~
he wants to bring development to the ~ (a politician)
this is not some ~ (site of a noxious landfill)
sleepy backwater
oil transformed Khartoum from a ~ to a modern city
Page 104 of 1574
in a (rural) backwater
she found herself banished to a small hospital ~ (a doctor)
stereotype of Turkey as an (agricultural) backwater
the ~ persists
became a backwater
there were a lot of other reasons that Spain ~ for so long
changed from a provincial backwater to a place
Tikrit ~ of large mosques and wide modern roads (Iraq)
remained a (provincial) backwater
the town ~
center & periphery / isolation & remoteness / progress &
lack of progress: river
backyard (in somebody's backyard)
in China's (own) backyard
~, Southeast Asia…
in Russia's backyard
Kyrgyzstan is ~ (politics, etc.)
proximity: house
backyard (other)
backyard
the Sunset Beach wave was my ~ (Hakman)
historical and rightful backyard
China sees northeast Asia as its ~
not-in-my-backyard
this is one of those ~ issues (Nimby)
proximity: house
bad (my bad, etc.)
bad
I just wanted the ~ to go away (trauma)
bad wrong
something’s ~ here (racism / Frye Galliard on NPR)
my bad
sorry, ~
♦ I feel badly for...” (A sports commentator.)
flaws & lack of flaws: part of speech
badass (power)
means you’re a badass
‘playing like a girl’ ~ (women’s soccer)
total mountain badass
he’s the nicest guy in the world and a ~ (Tommy Caldwell)
leached badass of its badassery
overuse has ~
♦ Many agree that this word comes from the Black community. In that
regard, it has been classed with words like lame-ass, dumbass, etc.,
including the one made famous by Cardi B and Megan Thee Stallion.)
♦ Bad, badass, blow up, catch fire, chill, coup, crazy, crush, dope,
dynamite, kill, killa, mean, nasty, sick, wicked... (Words that sound bad
but can have positive connotations. English is crazy!)
♦ “This team taught all of America’s children that ‘playing like a girl’
means you’re a badass.” (President Obama welcoming the 2015 World
Cup-winning women’s team to the White House.)
♦ See “‘Badass’: The One Word That Has Become A lightning Rod For
Many Female Chefs” by Nina Martyris, NPR, The Salt, November 11,
2019. A link leads to another great article, “We’ve Hit Peak Badass. It’s
Gotta Stop” by Jesse Sheidlower, Daily Beast, Apr. 14, 2017.)
person: force
character & personality: person
badge (badge of honor)
badge of honor
playing from memory is a ~ (pianists)
criticism from him is a ~ (politics)
receiving death threats is a ~ (Black Lives Matter)
became a badge of honor
the "one-percenter" label ~ (bikers)
wore its (cutting-edge) approach as a badge of honor
the bank ~ (ended up being hacked)
wore her conviction as a badge of honor
she ~ (the suffragette Susan B. Anthony)
wore his scorn as a badge of honor
she ~
wore the scorn (of liberals) as a badge of honor
he always ~ (Rush Limbaugh)
wear that as a badge of honor
they ~, as a sign they are right (de-platformed)
♦ “The idea you could hold your liquor and type a new lead on a breaking
story was a badge of honor.” (The great journalist Pete Hamill, about
journalism back in the day.)
♦ “I’d like to personally welcome him to the club, because we receive
death threats every day. So, he’s officially part of this movement. It’s a
badge of honor.” (Hawk Newsome, co-founder of Black Lives Matter New
York, about Norwegian Parliament member Petter Eide. From
“Norwegian politician receives threats over Black Lives Matter Nobel
Prize nomination” by Bill Hutchinson, 31 January 2021.)
♦ Duty, Honor, Country. (The motto of West Point.)
achievement, recognition & praise: sign, signal, symbol /
military
badge (representation)
capitalist rebel badge
he wears the ~ on his sleeve (Domm Holland, technology)
wore that badge
I was damaged goods, I ~ very early on in my life
representation: sign, signal, symbol
badger (The Badger, etc.)
known as “The Badger”
the man ~ for his aggressive approach (Bernard Hinault)
epithet: animal
commitment & determination: epithet
Page 105 of 1574
badger (verb)
badgered him
the lawyer ~ (trial)
♦ “He claims he locked himself in the plane bathroom and fell asleep to
avoid her badgering.” (A Hollywood celebrity at trial.)
affliction / behavior / commitment & determination /
speech: animal / verb
badlands (environment)
badlands of real life
students leave the sanctuary of academe for the boorish ~
behavior / control & lack of control / environment: ground,
terrain & land / history
bag (in the bag)
in the bag
it’s not ~ yet (Liverpool wins EPL)
certainty & uncertainty: container
bag (collection)
bag of narratives
it is out of such a ~ that his book has been fashioned
bag of tricks
he knew any treatment in the whole psychiatric ~ was futile
amount / group, set & collection: container
bag (pack one’s bags)
pack the bags and get out
it’s just time to ~ (NATO in Afghanistan)
coming, arriving, staying, leaving & returning: journeys &
trips / verb
baggage (noun)
baggage of marriage
the ~ (gender, religion, culture, etc.)
baggage of the South
the racial ~ (US)
baggage from his (ancestral) past
each comes into the world with ~ (race, religion, class)
baggage and attitude
he dealt with all the ~ we had (poor kids)
complicated baggage
soldiers take home some more ~ (from overseas)
generational baggage
Boomers, Xers go to work carrying lots of ~
historical baggage
the word crusade has largely shed its ~ in the West
political baggage
the ~ of its anti-establishment origins (black studies)
pseudoscientific baggage
gay had a long linguistic history and no ~ (vs. homosexual)
psychological baggage
students can arrive with ~ (suicides at MIT)
racial baggage
the ~ of the South (US)
a lot of baggage
Biden has been around a long time and has a ~ (politics)
cultural and historical baggage
the ~ that rugby lugs (in South Africa)
historical, cultural and religious baggage
the ~ (of marriage)
social and economic baggage
students with ~ (alternative school)
carrying (lots of generational) baggage
Boomers, Xers go to work ~
freighted with (historical and cultural) baggage
the N-word is ~ (racial epithets)
let go of the baggage
we must ~ in our minds (the Avalanches)
rid himself of this baggage
Ray ~ (classification and mythical creatures)
♦ “I got him with all his baggage, and he got me with all of mine.” (A
marriage.)
history: burden / journeys & trips / weight
oppression: burden / history / journeys & trips / weight
bailout (noun)
bailout
~s are unpopular (of banks, national economies)
survival, persistence & endurance: boat
amelioration & renewal: boat
bail out (save)
bail out Mexico
the IMF helped ~ in the 1990s
bailing out (big) banks
the taxpayers are ~
bailed out the company
the government ~ (with loans)
survival, persistence & endurance: boat / verb
amelioration & renewal: boat / verb
bail out (leave)
bailed out
high-profile guests have ~ (attending a party)
bailed out of school
he ~ in 2008 (an athlete)
bail out of this treaty
Page 106 of 1574
the US may ~ (open-skies treaty)
coming, arriving, staying, leaving & returning: plane / verb
dismissal, removal & resignation: plane / verb
bailed out
bailed out by the EU and the I.M. F.
Ireland was ~ in 2010
survival, persistence & endurance: boat
amelioration & renewal: boat
bait (verb)
baited children
the company ~, using nursery rhymes (advertising)
attraction & repulsion: fish / hunting / verb
pursuit, capture & escape: fish / hunting / verb
bait (noun)
bait
the Iraqis didn't take the ~ (fire and expose themselves)
clickbait
see clickbait (noun)
jailbait
she alleged he often referred to her as “~” (a 17-year-old)
trade bait
he’s an intriguing prospect and might be ~ (an athlete)
take the bait
you can ~ or learn to pick your battles (relationships)
when it comes to trolls, don’t ~ (internet)
rise to the bait
he refused to ~ (speech)
rises to the bait
trolls ask stupid questions to see who ~ (Internet)
took the bait
I made a nice feint and he ~ (chess)
the news media ~ (picked up story that was not true)
attraction & repulsion: fish / hunting
pursuit, capture & escape: fish / hunting
baked in (and baked into)
baked in the cake
it was ~ (a man’s vice)
baked into the very architecture
racism is ~ of the internet
baked into it
the code has instructions ~ that... (ransomware)
baked into the system
there’s a lot of waste ~ (pandemic and public health)
baked into the (medical) system
racism is ~ (Tuskegee Syphilis Study)
baked into that term
some evangelicals don’t like the assumptions that are ~
baked into our social systems and psychology
racism is ~ (Critical race Theory)
baked into the hardware and software
insecurity is ~ of the internet (computer hacking)
attachment / relationship: cooking
configuration / identity & nature: cooking
bake in (and bake into)
baked delays into their schedules
airlines have ~ instead of improving operations
attachment / relationship: cooking
configuration / identity & nature: cooking
balance (verb)
balance the demands
trying to ~ of work and family
balance a home and a career
for women trying to ~
balance militancy versus moderation
his speech had to ~ (MLK)
balance (energy) needs and the land
an example for how to ~
balance the risk and the benefit
you have to ~ (vaccinations)
balance security and synchronization
~ (special operations / military)
balance civil liberties and national security
how to ~ in a war on terror
balance tradition with changes
Inuit leaders try to ~
balance the need (for openness) with national security
policies to ~
balance the benefits against the difficulties
you need to ~
balance the human cost against the cost to the animal
we must ~
balance the need against the risks
we must ~ (combat rescues)
balance their assignments against their safety
photojournalists have to ~
how to balance
an example for ~ energy needs and the land
struggling to balance
young women ~ work and family priorities
trying to balance
~ the demands of work and family
equilibrium & stability: scale / verb
Page 107 of 1574
balance (in the balance)
in the balance
lives are ~, this is serious (COVID-19 pandemic)
hanging in the balance
lives are ~ (tornado forecasting)
his life is ~ after a drug overdose (a rapper)
hangs in the balance
Britain's future ~ (elections)
hung in the balance
his life ~ (penalty phase of trial)
fate, fortune & chance: equilibrium & stability / scale / verb
balance (off balance)
kept the actors off-balance
he ~ by interrupting their line readings (film)
keep the enemy off balance
try to ~
throw the Soviets off balance
an assault to ~ and regain the initiative
throws the show off balance
his realistic portrayal ~ (a play)
throw the system off balance
it will ~ (the body)
disruption / flaws & lack of flaws / readiness &
preparedness: equilibrium & stability / scale
equilibrium & stability: scale
balance (out of balance)
out of balance
in a person with depression, these chemicals are ~
my priorities and life are ~
wildly out of balance
the sauce was ~, overloaded with… (food)
woefully out of balance
the system is ~ (politics)
priorities are out of balance
our societal ~
values (as a nation) are (sadly) out of balance
our ~
swung (way) out of balance
the financial sector has ~
equilibrium & stability: scale
flaws & lack of flaws: equilibrium & stability / scale
disruption: equilibrium & stability / scale
balance (work and job, etc.)
balance in my life
the ocean represents ~ (Ken Bradshaw / surfer)
balance between modesty and sexiness
aim to strike a ~
work / life balance
the generations disagree on authority, teamwork, ~
workers who value a ~
know your limits to maintain a happy ~ and avoid burnout
wholeness, balance, wellbeing, health
pay attention to your ~ (Hozho)
keeps his balance
he ~ by leaving his work behind when he returns home
maintains her balance
she ~ by staying firmly rooted at home in Utah (an actor)
strike a balance
aim to ~ between self-denial and overindulgence
equilibrium & stability: scale
balance (noun)
balance of chemicals
restoring the normal ~ in the brain (antidepressants)
balance of the region
the dams would disrupt the ecological ~
balance of freshwater and saltwater
a dike collapse could destroy the delicate ~ (estuary)
balance of stability and flexibility
the ankle joint is designed for a ~
balance between existence and annihilation
the ~ was precarious (Homer)
balance between stability and mobility
the elbow joint displays an elegant ~
balance between racing and safety
you have to find a ~ (5 Oceans race)
balance between usability and security
the ~ is a tricky one (computers)
fluid balance
her ~ needs to be restored (medicine)
trade balance
control the ~
basic balance
the ~ of sweet, salty, sour, and bitter (Cambodian cuisine)
delicate balance
a dike collapse could destroy the ~ of fresh / saltwater
ecological balance
the dams would disrupt the ~ of the region
fragile balance
the ~ between production and conservation (natural gas)
sense of balance
we must restore a ~ to the debate (energy / conservation)
checks and balances
Page 108 of 1574
she didn't go through the regular process of ~ (corruption)
balance (of the Supreme Court) has shifted
now that the ~
attain a balance
~ between mission accomplishment and environmental
protection (war)
destroy the (delicate) balance
a dike collapse could ~ of fresh and saltwater (estuary)
find a balance
you have to ~ between racing and safety (Velux 5)
restore balance
a decrease in OPEC's output would be needed to ~
strike a balance
~ between what is possible and what is probable (combat)
equilibrium & stability: scale
balanced
balanced approach
a ~ for the listing of adult items on eBay
a ~ might involve asking… (race, genes and disease)
balanced budget
the ~ amendment
balanced diet
a ~ might not be on the menu
balanced perspective
it is important to have a ~ (safety and study abroad)
balanced and responsible
a ~ approach to development (Arctic)
racially balanced
the show has a ~ cast (theater)
fair and balanced
~ news
equilibrium & stability: scale
flaws & lack of flaws: equilibrium & stability / scale
balance of power
balance of power
naked aggression to change the ~ (political)
balance of power between professor and student
the ~ is so slanted (dating)
balance of power in Kashmir
it would have no impact on the ~
shift in the balance of power
there's a ~ (relationships)
impact on the balance of power
it would have no ~ in Kashmir
equilibrium & stability: scale
balk (verb)
balked at publishing
the network ~ his report
balking at (high sticker) prices
consumers are ~ (auto buying)
eagerness & reluctance / resistance, opposition & defeat /
starting, going, continuing & ending: horse / verb
balkanization (noun)
balkanization of the (professional) structure
the ~ continued... (history of engineering)
instance of balkanization
the term LGBTQIAA+ is a clear ~ (Jonathan Rauch)
division & connection: ground, terrain & land / history
Balkanized
Balkanized between universities, drug companies
medical research in the US is ~, and funders
division & connection: ground, terrain & land / history
ball (play ball)
play ball
it is often good politics to ~
he is being punished for refusing to ~
he has directed officials not to ~ (impeachment enquiry)
if they didn’t ~, it was game over for them (starlets)
played ball
he would never have ~, he was a man of integrity
playing ball
helping to oust some third-world leader who isn’t ~ (NSA)
play ball with the Kremlin
you either ~, or… (business)
play ball with (party) leaders
many candidates refuse to ~ in Washington
play ball with me
if you ~, I'll play ball with you
play ball with newspapers
WikiLeaks may be willing to ~ for now, but…
willing to play ball
she may be ~
need to play ball
the unions ~ (local hiring)
refused to play ball
he has ~ with the EPA (politics)
get Republicans to play ball
Democrats are struggling to ~
social interaction: sports & games / verb
unanimity & consensus: sports & games / verb
Page 109 of 1574
ball (the ball is in somebody's court)
ball will be firmly in the court of the governors
the ~ to decide how to move forward (pandemic)
ball is in Russia’s court
Blinken says the ~ (U.S. “diplomacy”)
ball is in your court
the ~
action, inaction & delay / confronting, dealing with &
ignoring things / position, policy & negotiation /
responsibility / social interaction: ball / sports & games
ball (take one's eye off the ball)
took his eye off the ball
some people think Obama ~ (rising unemployment)
attention, scrutiny & promotion / consciousness &
awareness / failure, accident & impairment: ball / sports &
games / verb
ball (drop the ball)
dropped the ball on this case
a lot of agencies ~ (serial killer)
dropped the ball in the case
investigators ~
♦ “The university dropped the ball and she paid the price with her life.”
(Lauren McCluskey, the University of Utah.)
failure, accident & impairment: ball / hand / sports &
games / verb
ball (get the ball rolling, etc.)
get the ball rolling
we need to ~
this is a good investment to ~
sometimes it takes a gentle nudge to ~
he made attempts to ~ on this very thing
got the ball moving
she ~ on the impeachment enquiry (politics)
keep the ball rolling
to ~, we must…
started the ball rolling
he ~, and other businesses followed suit
CO2 may have ~, but… (global warming)
starting, going, continuing & ending: ball / movement /
verb
balloon (verb)
balloon
as our entitlement commitments ~
ballooned
the number of women (in prisons and jails) has ~
usage of Zoom has ~ overnight (video-conferencing app)
ballooning
the debt is ~
long-term unemployment is ~
ballooned into Wall Street's biggest crisis
the credit squeeze ~ since…
ballooned to $14.4 billion
the price tag has ~ (military project)
ballooned to over 300 pounds
his weight reportedly ~ (a basketball player)
increase & decrease: air / atmosphere / balloon / size /
verb
balloon (puncture a balloon, etc.)
punctured the (helium) balloon
he ~ of the stock’s soaring price
destruction: air / atmosphere / balloon / hole
failure, accident & impairment: air / atmosphere / balloon
/ hole
ballooning (adjective)
ballooning (pension) costs
he blames the problem on ~
ballooning (national) debt
voters are alarmed by the ~
ballooning deficit
the state is faced with a ~
ballooning demand
~ for oil is bound to be disruptive
ballooning (Medicaid) expenses
government officials look to curb ~
ballooning problem
this spotlights the ~
ballooning trade surplus
China has a ~ with the US
ballooning (cost) overruns
the State Department agency tried to hide ~
increase & decrease: air / atmosphere / balloon
ballgame (different ballgame)
different ballgame
piracy is a ~
it's a ~ when you don't…
therefore, you have a ~, as they say in America...
whole different ballgame
this year has been a ~ (Delta variant / COVID)
taxonomy & classification: sports & games
ballgame (new ballgame)
whole new ballgame
we're in a ~
Page 110 of 1574
online journalism is a ~
situation: sports & games
ballistic (go ballistic)
go ballistic
people will ~ when they read that…
went ballistic
she ~ (upset and angry)
she confronted her husband with the pictures and ~
feeling, emotion & effect: direction / flying & falling / rocket
balm (noun)
balm for the afflictions
his wisdom is a ~ of our age (a poet)
balm for the trauma
her films are a ~ that adolescents feel
amelioration & renewal: health & medicine
banana (noun)
banana peel
Iran put a ~ in front of the US and Trump put his foot on it
banana skin
he’s a potential ~ (boxer speaking of tough next opponent)
Joshua has got past a potential ~ (boxer wins)
♦ “I slip on a banana peel, that’s tragedy. You slip on a banana peel,
that’s comedy.” (Attributed to Charlie Chaplin.)
♦ “Iran put a banana peel in front of the United States and President
Trump put his foot right on it.” (Cali Nasir’s analysis after an Iranian proxy
militia in Iraq killed an American. The resultant US airstrike against the
militia resulted in an outburst of Iraqi anti-Americanism, including an
attack on the US Embassy in Baghdad.)
♦ “It’s a potential banana skin because he’s relatively unknown...that’s
quite dangerous...So I’m taking him very seriously...” (Josh “the Tartan
Tornado” Taylor about his upcoming boxing match with Apinun
Khongsong. Taylor ended up defeating his opponent with a paralyzing
body shot in the first round.)
failure, accident & impairment: fruits & vegetables
banana republic
banana republic
France is a ~ ruled by uneducated people (Koons’ Tulips)
♦ This phrase appeared in 1955. At the time, United Fruit controlled 42%
of the agricultural land in Guatemala and was very concerned by the new
socialist government which had promised land reform. That government
was overthrown by a CIA-supported coup.
dependency: allusion / history
Band-Aid (noun)
Band-Aid
if it’s real and it isn’t just a ~... (a proposed program)
the emergency operation is a ~, a short-term fix (famine)
band-aid solution
this a just a ~ for a much deeper problem
put a Band-Aid on a bullet wound
we’ll always ~ (social justice)
amelioration & renewal: health & medicine
substance & lack of substance: health & medicine
bandwagon (noun)
moaner bandwagon
post an opinion, don’t just jump on the ~ (sports)
Nuwaubian bandwagon
locals who had climbed aboard the ~ began to jump off
on the (Doncic) bandwagon
I’ve been ~ for a long time (great Slovenian basketball star)
climbed aboard the (Nuwaubian) bandwagon
locals who had ~ began to jump off (Putnam County, GA)
jumped on the bandwagon
I ~, repeating the things being said around me (regret)
leaped onto the bandwagon
the TV industry also ~ (3-D)
♦ “The BBC is always one of the first on any given bandwagon.” (Bob, a
sour golfing fan, on a BBC HYS about a story featuring Bryson
DeChambeau.)
unanimity & consensus: music
attention, scrutiny & promotion: music
bandwidth (noun)
have the bandwidth
we do not ~ to address all the calls (Portland police)
taking up (a lot of) bandwidth
the pandemic is ~ (other problems set aside)
ability & lack of ability / strength & weakness: tools &
technology
bane (noun)
bane of my life
the spinal brace quickly became the ~ (injured back)
greatest bane
corruption is the single ~ of our society
♦ Black henbane is a poisonous plant. Poison plants have had a long
relationship with public health, animal husbandry, traditional medicine,
witchcraft, and murder.
affliction: plant
bang (with a bang)
ended with a bang
the tournament ~, not a whimper
finish (out his career) with a bang
Tapia has a chance to ~ by... (boxer)
go out with a bang
the players wanted their coach to ~ (by winning)
apparently he wanted to ~ (mass shooter)
hit home with a bang
reality ~
kicking the year off with a bang
Page 111 of 1574
deal makers are ~ (mergers)
opens with a bang
the play ~, as…
opened with a bang
the film ~ (good revenues)
returned with a bang
he ~ (athlete has great day)
start (out) with a bang
I wanted to ~, so I…
attention, scrutiny & promotion: sound
feeling, emotion & effect: sound
bang (bang for the buck, etc.)
bang for the buck from Special Operations
the coalition gets plenty of ~ (war)
little bang for the buck
the report concluded subsides offered ~
more bang for the buck
employers will get ~ from this program
most bang for the buck
the president will focus on getting the ~ from…
nutritional bang for the buck
greens offer ~
get more bang for the buck
at Wall-Mart, you ~
♦ “You get much more of a bang out of the shot, as it were.” (Anthony
Fauci, about booster shots.)
cost & benefit: sound
feeling, emotion & effect: sound
banish (verb)
banishes fear
Captagon fuels conflict, for fighters it ~
dismissal, removal & resignation: society / verb
acceptance & rejection: society / verb
banished
banished to the bullpen
he has been ~ (a pitcher)
banished from the dictionary
American English should be ~ (the Brits)
dismissal, removal & resignation: society
acceptance & rejection: society
banishment (noun)
banishment of Brandon from the team
the ~ is complete hypocrisy (a religious honor code)
banishment from the hall
plagiarism can result in the ~ of academe
banishment from the league
it is time to end his ~ (a disgraced athlete)
result in banishment
plagiarism can ~ from the halls of academe
dismissal, removal & resignation: society
acceptance & rejection: society
bank (tissue bank, etc.)
food bank
drop off extra food at a ~
germ bank
~s around the world keep anthrax
job bank
an online ~
memory bank
the bomb can erase the ~s of electronic equipment
milk bank
~s collect, pasteurize and store donated breast milk
I’d like to thank every woman who’s ever donated to a ~
Organ Bank
the New England ~, one of several dozen regional centers
plant bank
a global network of ~s to store seeds and sprouts
a system of ~s is crucial in responding to climate crises
Seed Bank
the Millennium ~ Partnership (Kew Gardens)
seed bank
~s in Afghanistan and Iraq were destroyed during conflicts
Skin Bank
the New York Firefighters ~ (Hearst Burn Center)
sperm bank
he got the 50 bucks, but the ~ couldn’t protect his identity
group, set & collection: money
bankrupt (adjective)
bankrupt defense
it's a ~ (blaming victim for hate crime)
intellectually bankrupt
our way of managing parole supervision is ~
morally bankrupt
placating terrorists is ~
worth & lack of worth: money
banner (carry a banner, etc.)
carry the banner of the National Front
she intends to ~ into the 21st century
carrying a banner for female athletes
she is ~ (Annika Sorenstam)
carrying a banner for black directors
he said he was not ~ (playwright)
Page 112 of 1574
wave the banner of free speech
when criticized they ~ (Web hosts)
representation: flags & banners / verb
banner (under the banner)
under the banner of the ruling party
both men will contest the election ~
under the banner of the IMU
armed men ~ invaded Tajikistan
allegiance, support & betrayal: flags & banners
banner (behind the banner)
behind the banner of reparations
they hoped to unite the community ~ (protest)
allegiance, support & betrayal: flags & banners
banner (banner of Islam, etc.)
banner of Islam
the youth must hold aloft the ~ (King Abdullah)
banner for artists
over time Dirty South, not Third Coast, became a ~
hold aloft the banner
the youth must ~ of Islam (King Abdullah)
hide behind the banner
scoundrels ~ of patriotism
wave the banner
they ~ of religion
♦ NO WAR; TAKE YOUR WAR AND GO TO HELL; BUSH, BLAIR and
BERLUSCONI—ASSASSINS; NOT IN MY NAME… (Banners at a march
in Florence, during which 300,000 marched to protest the Iraq War.)
allegiance, support & betrayal: flags & banners
banner (size)
banner ad
for 10,000 visitors, I made $330 per ~ (Internet)
banner headline
the newspaper ran a ~ declaring…
~s trumpeted the news
banner weekend
it was a ~ for HBO this weekend (many viewers)
banner year
2000 was a ~ for genomics
size: flags & banners
baptism
baptism by fire
it was my ~ (new teacher)
baptism of fire
Salk referred to his time with Francis as a "~"
experience: religion / water
baptized
baptized in fire and blood
you have been ~ and come out steel (combat)
get baptized
you ~ pretty quickly in this business (death-penalty law)
experience: religion / water
bar (bar is set high, etc.)
bar
the ~ is set so high for him (performance)
the ~ is down to “don’t do dumb stuff”
difficulty, easiness & effort: sports & games
barb (trade barbs, etc.)
trading barbs
US and Chinese officials have been ~ (conflict)
conflict: verb / weapon
barbed (speech)
barbed letters
the president and the speaker had traded ~ (politics)
barbed question
a reporter interrupted with a ~
barbed satire
it’s a ~ about race, class and culture (a film)
speech: blade / knife
barbaric (behavior)
barbaric power
the people are under the boot of ~
reckless and barbaric
the ~ attack (use of Novichok in England)
behavior: history
Barbie (and Barbie Doll)
Barbie Girl type
well I ain’t never been the ~ (Gretchen Wilson)
appearance: object
character & personality: sign, signal, symbol
bare (lay bare)
lays bare the (latent) anti-Semitism
the vandalism ~ that still exists in society
laid bare the challenge
the incident has ~ of the alliance (US / Pakistan)
laid bare the whirlpool
his murder ~ of religious violence and extremism
concealment & lack of concealment: cloth / clothing &
accessories / verb
Page 113 of 1574
bare (laid bare)
laid bare
the open secret about Ozy Media has been ~ (fraud)
laid bare in the (feisty TV) debate
the candidates’ divisions were ~ (politics)
concealment & lack of concealment: cloth / clothing &
accessories
bare (verb)
bared the excesses
the rally ~ of his movement
bare the secrets
the press can ~ of government and inform people
concealment & lack of concealment: cloth / clothing &
accessories / verb
bare-bones (adjective)
bare-bones budget
we want to have a ~ (saving money)
bare-bones care
under the plan, seniors will get ~ (health)
bare-bones and limited
right now it’s ~ (opening park during pandemic)
sufficiency, insufficiency & excess: skeleton / skin, muscle,
nerves & bone
bare-knuckled (adjective)
bare-knuckled approach
he took a ~ to the rarified world of art criticism
bare-knuckled politics
even by the lowly standards of Washington, this was ~
bare-knuckled work
she counted votes and did the ~ that was needed (politics)
conflict: boxing / fist
bark (more bark than bite, etc.)
more bark than bite
the US is ~
substance & lack of substance: animal / dog / sound /
teeth
bark (bark up the wrong tree, etc.)
barking up the wrong tree
if you’re looking for accuracy, you’re ~
they can’t go for collusion because they’re ~ (a report)
pursuit, capture & escape: animal / dog / hunting / sound
bark (verb)
barked
"Look up," he ~
barked at them to stop
the policeman ~
barked at Rodriguez for running
he ~ over his mound (baseball)
bark commands at the TV
people ~ (voice commands)
sound / speech: animal / dog / verb
barnacle (resemblance)
barnacles of dried gum
~ encrust the undersides of tables and chairs (schools)
urban barnacle
the padlocks cover old bridges in a kind of ~ (Paris, etc.)
♦ [H]e describes today’s tax code as ‘full of barnacles and crevices and
windows and holes. It needs a major reform and restructuring.’” (“Beyond
The Tax Deal: Targeting The Code Itself,” NPR, All Things Considered,
December 18, 2010. The description is enough to cause trypophobia!)
♦ see also encrustation
resemblance: animal / boat / burden / sea
barnacle (affliction)
skin barnacles
how to get rid of ~
♦ see also encrustation
affliction: animal / boat / burden / sea
barnacle (scrape the barnacles, etc.)
chip away at the barnacles
Pena Nieto will try to ~ slowing the economy (Mexico)
scrapes the barnacles off Homer’s hull
Emily Wilson’s ‘Odyssey’ ~
scrub the barnacles
the third-party companies are out of control, so we will ~
♦ “The number of sort of third-party contracting companies that we’re
using has really gotten out of control, so we’re going to scrub the
barnacles on that front. It’s pretty crazy. We’ve got barnacles on
barnacles. So there’s going to be a lot of barnacle removal.” (“Elon Musk
To Analysts: Stop With The ‘boring, Bonehead Questions’ on Tesla” by
Avie Schneider, NPR, The Two-Way, May 3, 2018.)
♦ “Wilson’s project is basically a progressive one: to scrape away all the
centuries of verbal and ideological buildup—the Christianizing (Homer
predates Christianity), the nostalgia, the added sexism (the epics are
sexist enough as they are), and the Victorian euphemisms—to reveal
something fresh and clean. Why call them ‘handmaidens’ when they
were slaves? Why insist, as so many translators do, on 19th-century
diction when that time had no more in common with Homer’s than ours?”
(“Emily Wilson’s ‘Odyssey’ Scrapes The Barnacles Off Homer’s Hull” by
Annalisa Quinn, NPR, Book Reviews, December 2, 2017.)
amelioration & renewal: animal / boat / burden / sea /
weight
barnacled
barnacled with myths
the stories of their rise are ~ (US presidents)
child-barnacled
his ~ present (four sons and a daughter from two women)
Page 114 of 1574
attachment: animal / boat / burden / sea
barnstorm (verb)
barnstorming the state
they have been ~ (politicians)
barnstorming for months
after ~… (a politician)
attention, scrutiny & promotion / message: plane / verb
Barnum
P.T. Barnum of American race relations
she is the ~ (Robin DiAngelo)
modern-day P. T. Barnum
he is sort of a ~ (an arena builder and promoter)
attention, scrutiny & promotion: allusion / circus / epithet
barometer (noun)
barometer of their abundance
but the catch rate provides a ~ (sharks)
barometers of change
public tours serve as ~ (limited after 9/11)
barometer of (poor) nutrition
childhood anemia, a ~, is higher in India than China
barometer for his team
he has been a ~ (when he is good, team is good)
career barometer
actors used the show as a ~ (Law and Order)
closely watched barometer
the index is a ~ of home prices
measurement: tools & technology
baron (power)
drug baron
the notorious ~ Joaquin “El Chapo” Guzman
meat baron
he is nicknamed “the ~” (Clemens Tonnies)
person: government
power: history / Middle Ages / person
baroque (adjective)
got baroque
the war plan ~, insane, to the point where... (nukes)
complexity: history
barrage (noun)
barrage
no software can eliminate the ~ (popup ads / computers)
barrage of combinations
he reshaped his opponent’s nose with a ~ (boxing)
barrage of lawsuits
the campaign has filed a ~ in various states (election)
barrage of (graphic) pictures
Saudis get a ~ of Palestinians suffering…
barrage of questions
I was subjected to a ~
his ~ barely left time for answers
withering barrage
their report came under a ~ of criticism (education)
♦ The rolling barrage was developed in World War I to provide what is
described nowadays as "shock and awe" for attacking infantry soldiers.
amount & effect: military / weapon
barrel (at the bottom of the barrel)
at the bottom of the barrel
I did my time ~ (worst job assignment)
finish at the bottom of the barrel
we ~ every year (a sports team)
stuck at the bottom of the barrel
I'm ~ (pay scale)
hierarchy: position
barrel (verb)
barreled up the Eastern Seaboard
the hurricane ~
movement: force / verb
force: movement / verb
barricade (storm the barricades)
stormed the barricades
he ~, time and again (to hold the church accountable)
storm the barricades of racism
many left their studies to ~ (Martin Luther King)
storm the barricades of (male) resistance
women have to ~
storm the barricades for him
many are ready to ~ (support for an embattled politician)
certain to storm the barricades
shareholders will be ~ (losing money)
ready to storm the barricades
she casts herself as an outsider, ~ (a politician)
resistance, opposition & defeat: history / infrastructure /
verb
barrier (noun)
barriers to access
~ in that market are extremely costly (trade)
barriers to (foreign) ownership
lower ~ of local industries
Page 115 of 1574
barriers to participation
a meet with the theme of overcoming ~ (climbing)
barriers to (import) penetration
~ in Japan
barrier between animals and humans
influenza could hop the ~
barriers and stereotypes
coming out and tearing down ~ in "macho" professions
age barrier
no ~, no height bar, no gender gap
class barrier
~s are deepening cultural and racial ones
color barrier
broke rugby's ~ in 1976
gender barrier
she broke a ~ (first Division I female football player)
pain barrier
practicing through the ~ (musicians)
we’d gone through the ~, the sun gave us power (K2)
research barrier
by easily being able to grow the cells, he overcame a ~
trade barriers
the lowering of ~ (globalization)
cultural barrier
despite language and ~s, people came together (protest)
people struggle to communicate across ~s
legal barrier
~s to correcting injustices (death-penalty cases)
racial barrier
it helped to bring down some ~s (basketball)
socioeconomic barrier
debate over the ~ facing black boys (education)
linguistic, cultural and psychological barriers
immigrants face many ~
lowering of (trade) barriers
the ~ (globalization)
glass ceilings and other barriers
~ barring women
stereotypes and other barriers
trying to break down ~ (foreigners)
broke (a lot of) barriers
she ~ (a famous woman)
lower these barriers
20 states have passed laws to ~ (expunging criminal records)
overcame a (research) barrier
by easily being able to grow the cells, he ~
put up (new) barriers
as many European countries ~ (against immigrants)
bring down some (racial) barriers
it helped to ~ (basketball)
break down (racial) barriers
how to ~ in France
get past the sex barrier
how do I ~ with guys (she waits, he loses interest)
communicate across (cultural) barriers
people struggle to ~
obstacles & impedance: ground, terrain & land / wall
division & connection: ground, terrain & land / wall
Baryshnikov (Baryshnikov of football,
etc.)
Baryshnikov of football
he was canonized as “the ~” for his acrobatic receptions
(Lynn Swann after Super Bowl X)
Big Baryshnikov
the ~ (Shaquille O’Neal, NBA)
♦ Shaquille O’Neal, one of the greatest NBA players of all time, has been
referred to as the Big Baryshnikov.
achievement, recognition & praise / superlative: epithet
baseline (noun)
baseline levels
it drops to ~ (a hormone)
baseline measurement
exposures may be difficult to interpret without ~
baseline poverty
will Haiti return to ~ (after earthquake)
baseline study
tedious ~s
baseline of how
we do need a ~ things have been in the past (polar ice)
♦ A baseline relates to land surveying.
analysis, interpretation & explanation / measurement:
surveying
basement (basement price, etc.)
basement price
he thinks he can buy the company at a ~
in the basement
the ratings have been ~ (baseball)
decline: direction
basement (hierarchy)
in the basement for (high-school) graduates
we're now ~ (US education and the OECD)
hierarchy: direction
Page 116 of 1574
basement (concealment)
internet’s dirty basement
if you peer into the ~ (conspiracy theories, fake news)
concealment & lack of concealment: direction / house
bash (verb)
bashing the democrats
the president has been ~ on immigration
bash opponents
“white privilege” is used as a political weapon to ~
accusation & criticism / speech: fist / verb / violence
bashing (noun)
Arab bashing
the rising tide of ~ in America (post 9/11)
Guat-bashing
the crimes have a chilling street name, "~" (Guatemalans)
Islam bashing
the rising tide of ~ in America
detractors describe her comments as "~" (Ayaan Ali)
business-bashing
this will dispel the ~ image of Obama (politics)
class-bashing
he defended her against ~ critics from The Village Voice
gay-bashing
issues include AIDS and ~
he thought he'd be safe from ~ (high-school student)
gay-bashing
the ~ televangelist was arrested in a public toilet
man bashing
some women are uneasy with ~
accusation & criticism / speech: fist / verb / violence
bask (verb)
basking in the afterglow
while he was ~ of a caretaker’s honeymoon period
basks in (New York) fame
resilient Emma Raducanu ~ (US Open winner)
basked in the glow
she ~ of being a global business celebrity
bask in the prestige
major cities ~ of the Olympics
bask in that smile
she knows what it feels like to ~ (of a handsome man)
basking in (an Olympic) triumph
the U.K. is ~
bask in my victory
I am going to ~ (Tyson “the Gypsy King” Fury)
basking in his victory
on a hot day, Boris Johnson is ~ (new Prime Minister)
feeling, emotion & effect: animal / atmosphere /
temperature / verb
behavior: animal / atmosphere / temperature / verb
basket (category)
put him in the same basket
do you ~ as Snowden (Julian Assange)
taxonomy & classification: container
basket case
basket case
Haiti has not always been a ~
from the standpoint of manufacturing, America is a ~
the economy is not a ~
he considered the company a ~ (an executive)
basket-cases of Central Asia
the two ~, Tajikistan and Kyrgyzstan
Europe's basket case
Ireland used to be ~
economic basket case
Spain is an ~
North Korea is now an ~, propped up by China
emotional basket case
the whole experience left me an ~
international basket case
Kissinger described Bangladesh as an ~
♦ A basket case is a person who has had all limbs amputated. Its date of
inclusion in dictionaries—1919—means it probably references soldiers
severely wounded in World War I.
condition & status / functioning: health & medicine
bastion (noun)
bastion of elitism
he views golf courses as a ~ (Chavez)
bastion of (racial) exclusivity
the sorority is a ~
bastion of progressive government
many see New Zealand as a ~
bastion of (southern male) privilege
the private club was once a ~
bastion of religion
Poland is a ~
bastions of free speech
universities are no longer ~
bastion of tradition and authority
the university is a ~
bastion for the militia
the neighborhood is a ~
Page 117 of 1574
Democratic bastion
Chicago is a ~
last bastion
Las Vegas casinos are the ~ for smokers
public-employee unions are the ~ of labor strength
main bastion
the ~ of protection against downstream floods...
♦ A bastion can be reduced, or surrounded and starved into submission,
or betrayed from within, or simply bypassed...
protection & lack of protection: fortification / military
bat (go to bat for somebody, etc.)
coming to bat for NBC
he is ~ against allegations...
go to bat for him
nobody will ~ (a dictator under siege)
allegiance, support & betrayal: baseball / sports & games /
verb
bat (batting zero)
batting zero
the fact that he’s ~ doesn’t seem to bother him
failure, accident & impairment / success & failure: baseball
/ sports & games / verb
bathing (forest bathing, etc.)
dust bathing
a herd of elephants washing and ~ at a water hole
forest bathing
~ is a national pastime in Japan (shinrin-yoku)
sunbathing
naked ~ and teenage brains (Jeremy Vine on BBC Radio 2)
topless ~ in a public place
♦“ Where the sun is the doctor ain’t.” (An Italian mountaineer proverb that
relates to heliotherapy and a traditional treatment for tuberculosis.)
♦ “If water is scarce, take an ‘air’ bath. Remove as much of your clothing
as practical and expose your body to the sun and air for at least 1 hour.
Be careful not to sunburn.” / “In some situations, you may be able to take
a snow bath. Take a handful of snow and wash your body where sweat
and moisture accumulate, such as under the arms and between the legs,
and then wipe yourself dry.” (FM 3-05.70, “Survival,” US Army, May
2002.)
♦ “Some people have mistaken ‘forest bathing’ as a nudist activity.” (In
North Carolina.)
absorption & immersion: water
baton (pass on the baton)
hand over the baton to my son
today’s the day I ~ (boxer retires with injury)
pass on the baton to someone else
it is time to ~ (an elected official)
passed on the baton to them
Tony Pike ~ (running a hotel on Ibiza)
starting, going, continuing & ending: sports & games
transmission: sports & games
baton (drop the baton)
dropped the baton
the company ~ on this
failure, accident & impairment: sports & games
battalion (a large group)
battalions of consultants
Freedman hired ~ who specialized in health care
amount: military
batten (batten down)
battened down
people have ~ (for a hurricane)
battens down for monster storm
Texas ~ (Hurricane Harvey)
batten down the hatches
~ and prepare for another pounding (Hurricane Maria)
battens down the hatches
Europe ~ as Italy deaths rise (coronavirus closures, etc.)
♦ “When suppertime came, the old cook came on deck sayin’ / Fellas, it’s
too rough to feed ya / At seven p.m., a main hatchway caved in, he said /
Fellas, it’s been good to know ya.” (“The Wreck of the Edmund
Fitzgerald” by Gordon Lightfoot.)
protection & lack of protection / readiness & preparedness
/ survival, persistence & endurance: boat / sea / storm /
verb
batter (the hurricane battered the city)
battered the city
the hurricane ~ (New Orleans)
force: storm
battering ram
became the Reagan Republicans’ battering ram
Carter’s support for gay rights and the ERA ~ (1980)
conflict: fortification / military
battery (recharge one's batteries)
charge my battery
I came here to ~ (leadership school / China)
recharge my batteries
I make sure I take time to ~
I asked for a leave of absence to ~
recharge his batteries
he resigned unexpectedly, saying he wanted to ~
he travels to South America to ~
recharge his batteries in the US
he will ~ (soccer star)
amelioration & renewal: electricity / verb
Page 118 of 1574
battery (amount)
battery of tests
he took a ~
amount: military / weapon
battle (verb)
battled (in vain) to contain
as fire-fighters ~ it (museum fire)
battling the swarms with insecticide
authorities are ~ sprayed from airplanes (locusts)
battled for her life
she ~ on Sunday after a man shot her
battle for supremacy
cartels ~ in South Africa's taxi wars
battle against a (false) sense of complacency
we must ~
battled addiction
she has ~ all her life (an actor)
battled alcoholism
he ~ as a teen
battles (severe) asthma
he ~, which gets worse in stressful situations
battling the coronavirus
he is still ~ (sick with the virus)
battled the fire
for three hours we ~ (grass fire)
battled (ice-glazed) roads
commuters ~ (freezing rain)
battled the spread
critics have ~ of agricultural biotechnology
battling the (locust) swarms
authorities are ~ with insecticide sprayed from airplanes
battled windchills
they ~ of 20 below (North Dakota)
battle trafficking
Irmi Basu and her center ~ (sex / Calcutta)
battled in vain
as fire-fighters ~ to contain it… (museum fire)
cartels battle
~ for supremacy in South Africa's taxi wars
conflict: military / verb
battle (noun)
battle
for Japan, the ~ is one of national pride (whaling)
learn to pick your ~s (disciplining a toddler)
battle to curb
government's ~ the influence of graft (Serbia)
battle in the (culture) war
these bills are the latest ~ waged over the rights of...
battles of identity
in ~, language often becomes the front line (Berbers)
battle of wills
expect another ~ all the way to the final wall (swimming)
battle of (former) champions
it was a ~ (boxing)
battle of the sexes
the theme of “I Love Lucy” was the basic ~
battles of the next generation
the civil rights ~ (animal rights)
battle against AIDS
celebrate the small victories in the ~
battle against assimilation
the age-old ~
battle against (entertainment) violence
a turning point in the ~
battles with (drug and alcohol) abuse
Ramone discussed his ~
battle with alcoholism
he had fought a long ~ (a suicide)
battle with AIDS
she told in a quiet voice of her ~
battle with cancer
a near-fatal ~
the general died after a brave ~
battle with Congress
a new front in the President’s ~ is opening
battles with unions and regulators
waging fierce ~
battle over the land
a lengthy court ~
battle over (reproductive) rights
the ~ (abortion)
battle over the terms
a legal ~ of the agreement
battle over the best method
the so-called reading wars—the ~ of teaching reading
battle between his (warring) parents
trapped in the ~
battle between defenders and detractors
the ~ of the traditional canon (literature)
battle between the school system, county
the ongoing budget ~
Page 119 of 1574
battle (going on) between commerce and creativity
there’s a constant ~ (country music)
battle for answers
the one last battle, the ~ (Agent Orange)
battle for the championship
their ~ (basketball)
battles for (championship) crowns
their epic ~
battle for minds
this is a ~ (post 9/11)
battle for public opinion
losing the ~
battle for the thermostat
the ~ is waged in offices and homes across the nation
battle scars
showing off ~ (football players)
government's battle
the ~ to curb the influence of graft (Serbia)
budget battle
an ongoing ~ between the school system, county
court battle
a long-running ~
he was granted joint custody of his kids after a lengthy ~
custody battle
he was the object of a fierce ~
development battle
on the losing side of ~s
divorce battle
a bizarre last chapter in a ~ (townhouse explodes)
edit battles
~ have contested Wikipedia articles about political events
election battle
he is facing a difficult ~ (Germany)
epic battle
their ~s for championship crowns (sports)
he had an ~ with a mako (fishing)
their ~ Saturday night (Ward vs. Gatti / boxing)
kite battle
it's time for the rokkaku ~ (kite festival)
turf battles
~ likely to ensue (federal agencies)
visitation battle
~s involving grandparents
textbook battles
~ are legendary in Texas
public relations battle
but is losing the ~
VHS-Beta battle
the ~ at the beginning of the video era
coming battle
he doesn't have any illusions about the ~ (legislative act)
ongoing (budget) battle
an ~ between the school system, county
long-running battle
the ~ over the rights of …
pitched battle
his entering the race could lead to a ~ for the progressive
vote
hard-fought battle
he died after a ~ with a lung issue
annual (funding) battles
~ on Capitol Hill
bitter battle
she resigned last June after four years of ~s (university)
a ~ involving teachers, school officials and the mayor
brave battle
the general died after a ~ with cancer
daily battles
there are ways to diffuse ~ and teach your toddler
endless battle
toilet training doesn't have to be an ~
ferocious battle
a ~ is being waged in California (same-sex marriage)
fierce battle
waging ~s with unions and regulators
judicial battle
this is the latest development in an ongoing ~
legal battle
a ~ over the terms of the agreement;
animal-rights groups have had ~s with the federal
government
lengthy (court) battle
a ~ over the land
nightly battle
how can I get my toddler to brush her teeth without a ~
significant battle
it has lost a ~ in the PR war (Facebook versus Australia)
long, hard battle
it's been a really ~ for me (cancer survivor)
age-old battle
the ~ against assimilation
near-fatal battle
a ~ with cancer
day in, day out battle
Page 120 of 1574
a ~ with beavers
David-and-Goliath battle
waging a ~ against Time Warner
heat of the battle
look, in the ~... (Nick Kyrgios about a tennis match)
heat-of-the-battle (m)
in the ~ racing (NASCAR)
object of a (fierce custody) battle
he was the ~
them-vs.-us battle
it's a ~
aspect of the battle
redirected their attention to another ~ (anti-whaling)
epicenter of that battle
Birmingham became the ~ (for civil rights)
object of a (fierce custody) battle
he was the ~
years of (bitter) battles
she resigned last year after four ~ (university)
in the (President’s) battle
a new front ~ with Congress is opening
turning point in the battle
a ~ against entertainment violence
tantrums and battles
~ (toddlers)
war or battle
we’re not in a ~ with Facebook (government official)
facing a (difficult election) battle
he is ~ (Germany)
lose this battle
they would ~ in the legislative arena
pick your battles
learn to ~ (disciplining a toddler)
♦ “We all got our daily battles, right?”
♦ “We fight hard, we play for keeps, we take no prisoners. We’ll get in the
trenches and fight dirty.” (Greg Pruett, president of the Idaho Second
Amendment Alliance, a gun-rights group.)
♦ “Marines don’t fight wars, they fight battles.” (A Marine captain, Marjah,
Afghanistan, 2010.)
♦ “With human corpses, human excrement, and rotting rations scattered
across Peleliu’s ridges, the blow flies or bluebottle flies underwent a
population explosion. Those nasty insects were so large, so glutted, and
so lazy that some could scarcely fly... It was revolting, to say the least, to
watch big fat blowflies leave a corpse and swarm into our C rations...
Each morning, just before sunrise, when things were fairly quiet, I could
hear a steady humming sound like bees in a hive as the flies became
active with the onset of daylight. They rose off the corpses, refuse,
rocks, brush, and wherever else they had settled for the night like a
swarm of bees. There numbers were incredible.” (With the Old Breed by
E.B. Sledge.)
conflict: military
battle (uphill battle, etc.)
long battle
he had fought a ~ with alcoholism (a suicide)
uphill battle
it will be an ~ (political reform)
small businesses have faced an ~ (online vending)
facing an uphill battle
they are ~ (politics)
fought a (long) battle
he had ~ with alcoholism (a suicide)
difficulty, easiness & effort: military
battle cry
battle cry
the vendors chant their ~, “Quando luchamas, ganamos”
repeal has been the ~ for years (Obamacare)
battle cries of our modern crowds
slogans are the ~
battle cry of public health officials
it has become the ~ (wear a mask to slow the spread)
battle cry against machismo
their new single is a ~ (Y La Bamba’s “Mujeres”)
less of a battle cry
“lock ‘em up” has become ~ for politicians
became a battle cry
that word Perseverance ~ for us (Nasa Mars mission)
inspired Obama’s own campaign battle cry
the United Farm Workers of America ~ (Si se Puede)
conflict: military
battleground (Battle Ground, Indiana,
etc.)
Battle Ground
the town of ~ is near the site of the Battle of Tippecanoe
geography / military: proper name
battleground (conflict)
battlegrounds of discontent
hospitals have become ~ (poor service)
battlegrounds in the (drug) business
hepatitis C is one of the fiercest ~ (drug development)
battleground for the future
the Gulf of Mexico is the ~ of offshore oil drilling
battlegrounds for (freedom of speech) issues
college campuses are ~
battleground for (culture-war) issues
the schools have become a ~
battleground state
Page 121 of 1574
Ohio is a crucial ~ (elections)
in the ~ of Pennsylvania, which Trump won in 2016
latest battleground
green spaces are the ~ in the disputer (development)
public battlefield
he enjoys the ~ (Jill Lepore about Elon Musk)
become a battleground
the state has ~ over the issue (abortion)
♦ “Byron visited; so did the Wordsworths—twice—and the architect and
collector John Soane and thousands of others. They carried away
skulls—Sir Walter Scott had one—and fingers and teeth and bullets and
cannon balls... A century later such battlefield tourism would flourish
even if its more gruesome collecting tastes were suppressed.” (The site
of the Battle of Waterloo, in Belgium. From The Work of the Dead: A
Cultural History of Mortal Remains by Thomas W. Laqueur.)
♦ Years ago they had marched thousands of miles to legendary
battlefields... they had once gone to the ends of the earth and seen
beyond the farthest horizon... We looked at these men in blue, existing in
pensioned security, honored and respected by all... and we were in awe
of them. Those terrible names out of the history books—Gettysburg,
Shiloh, Stone’s River, Cold Harbor—came alive through these men.
They had been there... and to watch them was to be deeply moved.”
(Waiting for the Morning Train: An American Boyhood by Bruce Catton.)
conflict / place: military
bay (at bay)
hold the Taliban at bay
the Afghan government will struggle to ~
kept my depression at bay
the device has ~ (an electrical implant)
keep oil drilling at bay
we need to ~
keep his furies at bay
he works hard to ~ (troubled ex-boxer)
keep hate at bay
our job is to ~, out of the mainstream (SPLC)
keep monotony at bay
the breaks in the narrative ~
keep Usyk at bay
Joshua struggled to ~ (boxing)
kept at bay
the modern world can't be ~ forever
remains at bay
inflation ~ (economy)
♦ This refers to the barking of dogs as they prevent a stranger from
approaching a cabin, or force a bear to climb a tree.
avoidance & separation: dog / sound
bay (bay for blood, etc.)
baying for blood
the fans are always ~ (boxing)
baying for the blood
they are ~ of Nancy Pelosi (politics)
baying for her blood
flag-waving patriots are ~ (India)
baying my name
the nine-year-olds were jeering at me and ~ (a small boy)
baying for vengeance
he compared the attacks on him to a mob ~
eagerness & reluctance: animal / dog / hunting / sound /
verb
beachhead (noun)
beachheads for any foreign government
US universities should not be ~
get a beachhead
you ~, like Social Security passes (progressivism)
presence & absence: military
survival, persistence & endurance: military
starting, going, continuing & ending: military
beacon (noun)
beacon of hope
the center will be a ~ (Muhammad Ali Center)
the school is a ~ (in deprived Detroit neighborhood)
beacon of justice
the center’s reputation as a ~ had taken some hits (Southern
Poverty Law Center)
beacons of faith and optimism
the old prairie churches were ~ (US)
beacon of liberty
the US is a ~, freedom and opportunity
beacon for (high-achieving) students
the school is a ~ (high school)
beacon for human rights
she was once seen as a ~ (a political figure)
♦ In a project that brought ancient Roman history to life, 500 flaming
beacons were lit along the 84-mile-lenth of Hadrian's wall, from Tyneside
to the Cumbrian coast.
direction: fire / light & dark / journeys & trips
bead (draw a bead / have a bead)
had a bead on the corruption
he ~, similar to today (Hal Holbrook about Mark Twain)
target: weapon
beak (Parrot's Beak, etc.)
Le Bec d'Aigle
~ is a giant rock overlooking the calanque (Eagle's Beak)
Parrot's Beak
the ~ juts into Vietnam from southeast Cambodia
the Mano River flows through the ~ area of Guinea
proper name: bird / shape
geography: bird / proper name / shape
Page 122 of 1574
beak (area)
Eagles Beak
the ~ is a natural arch in Arizona
area: shape
shape: bird
bear (a bear of an epidemic, etc.)
bear of an epidemic
he has a ~ on his hands (mayor and coronavirus rates)
behavior / force: animal
bear (a weight, etc.)
bear
the death of a child is almost too much to ~
affliction: burden / verb / weight
oppression: burden / verb / weight
bear (bear fruit, etc.)
bore fruit
their protests ~ only after…
borne fruit
British attempts to deter Iran have not ~
bearing fruit
the development program appears to be ~
Bears Fruit
War on Piracy ~
product: fruits & vegetables / verb
bearbaiting
form of (human) bearbaiting
a judge summed up the show as a ~ (Jeremy Kyle Show)
conflict: animal / violence
bearing (direction)
find his bearings
he spent two months trying to ~ and a job (new city)
lose your bearings
when you're homeless, you kind of ~
losing its bearings
the city is ~, it's heritage (development)
lost her bearings
she ~ in the pursuit of fame
get his bearings
it took him a while to ~ (a new job)
get his bearings back
it took him a while to ~ (stunned boxer)
regain my bearings
after the birth of my first child, it took me time to ~
♦ “We strayed from the path several times, but quickly corrected our
mistakes. When we came across a tuft or a hillock, I tried to get a look
round, to get my bearings. Dersu took a bunch of reeds and mugwort
and bent it down as a patteran. I looked ahead and all round.
Everywhere, on every side, extended the endless, waving ocean of
grass.” (Dersu Uzala by V. K. Arseniev. A patteran is a sign relating to a
course. Nowadays a person might use blaze orange flagging tape.)
direction: journeys & trips / tools & technology
beast (‘The Beast’ Mugabi, etc.)
‘The Beast’ Mugabi
John ~ vs. “Marvelous” Marvin Hagler (boxing)
earned the nickname “the Beast”
he has ~ (the boxer Artur Beterbiev)
epithet: animal
force: epithet
beast (insult)
beast
this person, not even a person, this ~... (a murderer)
wild beasts
those ~ shot you in the back (said at a funeral)
turn into (wild) beasts
when we see their faces, we ~, thugs and murderers (WWI)
♦ “He had finally tracked the beast to its lair.” (Churchill visits Hitler’s
bunker in 1945. From Churchill: Walking With Destiny by Andrew
Roberts.)
insult: animal
beast (power)
beast
the weather is a ~ today across much of the country
he’s a ~ (said by NFL player admiringly about another)
Day two on the Eiger was a ~ (climbing conditions)
Gronkowski is a ~ (RazB / Super Bowl 55)
the whole thing is a ~ (a road train of the Outback)
beast of a wave
another bruising encounter with a ~ (Nazare surfing)
beast on the drums
she is an absolute ~ (10-year-old Nandi Bushell)
beasts at major finals
there are teams who are ~ (Euro 2020 in 2021 / soccer)
Beast inside
Beauty outside, ~ (Apple computer advertisement)
beast mode
that marine going ~ with the rammer (Wolfie)
f****** beast
how does he do it, he’s a ~ (Marine howitzer rammer)
giant beasts
social media is a landscape with some ~ in it (Facebook)
much scarier beast
he’s a ~ now because... (Conor McGregor / MMA)
stubborn beast
Baranchyk, a ~, didn’t fall (exciting boxing match)
Page 123 of 1574
such a beast
oh, he’s got it, he’s such a beast (Alex Honnold)
beast, a monster
this storm is a ~ (satellite image of a hurricane)
♦ “She is an absolute beast on the drums.” (Ten-year-old Nandi Bushell.)
♦ “I don’t even know how this man does it, he’s a f****** beast, every gun
has two people ramming, it’s just this guy alone, he is tearing it up...”
(Praise for Wolf, AKA Wolfie, a Marine Corp rammer on a 15- round
mission. youtube.com/watch?v=CdO_0twP_CU
character & personality / force / power / size: animal
beast (different beast, etc.)
complex beasts
modern airliners are ~ (engineering, computers, etc.)
different beast from what
distilled alcohol is a ~ came before it (wine, beer)
different beast
he insists his film is a ~ (sequel, not a reboot)
rare beast
flavorists are ~s (inventing smells for the food industry)
♦ “Neither fish nor fowl...”
♦ see also animal (different animal, etc.)
taxonomy & classification: animal
beat (defeat)
beat you
it was the weather that ~ (Mt. Everest)
conflict / success & failure: sports & games / verb
beat (beat oneself up)
beat myself up
I’d ~, sometimes I would cry (a drinking problem)
beat yourself up
if you slip up or hit a plateau, don't ~ (weight loss)
beat yourself up over that
don't ~ (a performance mistake)
beat herself up for not being
she should not ~ around more to help her ailing mother
punishment & recrimination: fist / verb
beat back (verb)
beat back arthritis
he squeezes a golf ball at night to ~
beat back the epidemic
in an attempt to ~, the government is... (Luanda)
beat back (mounting) skepticism
she is trying to ~ of her qualifications
beat back dirt and disease
their lives, a daily struggle to ~ (Kabul slums)
fighting to beat back
Yahoo and AOL are ~ spammers
attempt to beat back
in an ~ the epidemic, the government is... (Luanda)
resistance, opposition & defeat: fist / verb
beat (beat down / the sun, etc.)
beat down on the (black) rocks
the sun ~ (Kilauea)
beat down relentlessly
the desert sun ~
force: fist / verb / violence
beaten (beaten up)
get beaten up
he knows he'll get attacked and ~ (politics)
accusation & criticism: fist / violence
beatification (noun)
beatification
his ~ has taken a long time (writer / literary canon)
sanctioning, authority & non-conformity: religion
beatify (verb)
beatify all Northerners
she did not demonize all Southerners, or ~ (Stowe)
sanctioning, authority & non-conformity: religion / verb
beating (take a beating, etc.)
public relations beatings
the embassy’s career officers were used to taking ~
4-0 beating
as Wales contemplated the ~ (Euro 2020 vs. Denmark)
taken a beating
she said her confidence had ~ (athlete)
the industry has ~ recently
the dollar has ~ abroad
its stock has ~ (a company)
took a beating
its reputation ~ in the financial crisis (rating service)
took a (serious) beating
the Democrats ~ in the midterm elections
taken a beating over its (contract) process
the Air Force has ~
taken a beating from the storms
the coastline has ~
taken a beating in the media
he has ~ (an athlete)
feeling, emotion & effect: fist / verb
Page 124 of 1574
beat up (storm)
beating up Texas
the rain and flooding is just ~ (ABC News)
force: storm
beaver (verb)
beavered at neural nets
AI scientists ~ for decades before...
beavering away
a small army of Canadian zealots was ~ at the case
our readers have been ~ (a prediction challenge)
difficulty, easiness & effort: animal / verb
work & duty: animal / verb
behavior: animal / verb
beckon (verb)
deep pockets beckon
the Gulf’s ~ (arms sales)
devices beckon
the line is long and other ~ (tech convention)
attraction & repulsion: gesture / hand / verb
fictive communication: gesture / hand / verb
bed (put something to bed)
put to bed
a successful launch will help ~ memories of the problems
put this (silly) incident to bed
we need to ~ (sports controversy)
put questions (about his age) to bed
his performance didn’t ~, but... (elderly politician at debate)
put the tie to bed
they pushed forward to ~ but... (soccer second-leg game)
starting, going, continuing & ending: sleep / verb
reconciliation, resolution & conclusion: sleep / verb
bed (put to bed)
put to bed yet
this matter has not been ~ (COVID 19 origin)
starting, going, continuing & ending: sleep
reconciliation, resolution & conclusion: sleep
bed (jump into bed with someone)
jump into bed with the Syrian government
the Kurds don’t immediately want to ~
allegiance, support & betrayal: love, courtship & marriage /
verb
bed (lie in one’s bed)
lie in it
he has made this bed and he’s got to ~ (politics)
judgment / responsibility: house / verb
bedazzled (decorated)
bedazzled case
a white iPhone with a ~
bedazzled masks
little girls with ~ (pandemic)
he sells ~ on Etsy (pandemic)
bedazzled suit
he’s got the pompadour and ~ (an Elvis impersonator)
appearance: light & dark
bedevil (verb)
bedeviled the governor
the scandal ~
bedeviled his (own party’s) leadership
he ~ by blocking compromise
bedeviled the (Democratic) nominee
the story ~ right up until election day
bedevils the people
corruption ~
affliction: creature / religion / verb
bedeviled
bedeviled by the (sluggish) economy
he found himself ~ (president)
bedeviled by (technical) problems
the company has been ~ (autos)
bedeviled by a lack
the response effort was ~ of organization
affliction: creature / religion
bedfellow (companion)
bedfellows
how Africa’s football and politics are ~ (BBC)
unpromising bedfellow
history suggests the state and steel are ~ (subsidies)
ideological bedfellows
he and Mr DeSantis are seen as ~ (politics)
natural bedfellows
Somaliland and Taiwan are ~ (diplomatic recognition)
strange bedfellows
the bill has made for some ~ (from both parties)
unlikely bedfellows
a new album combines ~ (romantic / avant-garde)
examine your bedfellows
you need to ~ and ask yourself... (manosphere & far right)
make (strange) bedfellows
politics can ~
Page 125 of 1574
♦ “Better to sleep with a sober cannibal than a drunken Christian.”
(Ismael about sharing a bed with Queequeg, from Moby-Dick by Herman
Melville.)
relationship: sleep / journeys & trips
bedlam (noun)
bedlam
it was ~, the whole city was on the run (Berlin 1 May)
bedlam of the city
the ~ recedes (in a courtyard garden)
bedlam in the streets
there was ~ (World Cup victory)
construction bedlam
he surveyed the ~ (restaurant being built)
management bedlam
it’s ~ (at Fox News)
political bedlam
the system breeds ~ (government)
bedlam ensued
the announcement was made, and ~
bedlam engulfed the fans
~ (a victory)
♦ According to Wikipedia, this word comes from Bethlem Royal Hospital
in England. It was one of the first institutions to house the insane.
behavior / environment: mental health
bedrock (noun)
bedrock of who we are
quality is the ~ (Boeing)
bedrock of our storytelling tradition
these 100 stories are a ~ (the Decameron by Boccaccio)
bedrock belief
it's a ~ of mine (people have souls, animals don't)
bedrock policy
keeping employee costs down is a ~ (a retail giant)
bedrock principle
a ~ is civilian control of the military (US governance)
innocent until proven guilty is one of our country’s ~s
bedrock value
he brought some ~s to the job (a cop about right / wrong)
the ~s that make America unique (freedom of religion)
bedrock of safety
the ~
bases: ground, terrain & land
bedroom (sex)
bedroom issues
the church doesn’t know what it’s talking about on ~
♦ “Well, he has one girl per book, approximately, and that’s one a year.
He’s a bachelor, and he moves around the world pretty rapidly. And umm
I don’t see any great harm in that myself.” (Ian Fleming speaking about
his fictional creation James Bond to Roy Plomley on BBC’s Desert Island
Discs in 1963.)
♦ “Why should we be afraid of latex, when we see that it can save
lives...? I just don’t mention [making condoms available] in my report to
the bishop.” (A Catholic nun in Cameroon, dealing with the AIDS
epidemic.)
♦ “Below the navel there is neither religion nor truth.”
sex: euphemism
bee (busy as a bee)
as busy as a bee
he was ~
activity / behavior: animal / insect
bee (queen bee)
queen bee of wellness
Belle Gibson was the ~ (the
hierarchy: animal / insect / royalty
beef (conflict)
my particular beef
~ is with the newspapers (the beloved John Cleese)
issues and beefs
tells us about some of the ~ (2021 Oscars)
has a beef with someone
if he ~, it should be with the medical staff (an athlete)
conflict: cows & cattle
beefed up
security has been ~
~ at the Capitol
amelioration & renewal / strength & weakness: cows &
cattle / food & drink / meat / verb
beef up (verb)
beefed up (border) controls
the US has ~ (against smuggling)
amelioration & renewal / strength & weakness: cows &
cattle / food & drink / meat / verb
beehive (activity)
beehive
the military hospital was a ~ (heavily guarded)
beehive of activity
inside, these buildings were a ~ (hospital)
the place was a ~ (a city newspaper before the internet)
activity / environment: insect
beehive (Beehive cluster, etc.)
Beehive cluster
M44, the ~
proper name: insect / shape
Page 126 of 1574
been through (endure, etc.)
been through anything like that
we’ve never ~ in our family (murder)
been through hell
I’ve ~
been through this before
this is not our first rodeo, we’ve ~ (hurricanes)
♦ see also get through (endure, etc.), go through (endure, etc.)
survival, persistence & endurance: journeys & trips /
movement / prep, adv, adj, particle
experience: journeys & trips / movement
before (at an earlier time)
before tractors and combines
then I did plowing and scything, that was ~, you know...
best-before
the ~ dates are usually 3 or 4 months after delivery (beer)
sequence / time: direction / position / prep, adv, adj,
particle
before (we have hard work before us)
before us
we have hard work ~
future / time: direction / position / prep, adv, adj, particle
beg (verb)
begging the Department of Defense to address
the group has been ~ this issue
she begged her daughter to come home
she ~
begged the coach to give
Mom ~ me a chance, and he did (Allen Iverson)
beg you to move
melodies, groove and beats ~ (Electric Warrior)
begged for his life
he ~
pushed and begged
he ~ for an evacuation plan (Fall of Saigon / 1975)
♦ “Jolene, Jolene, Jolene, Jolene / I’m begging of you please don’t take
my man.” (Dolly Parton. Miley Cyrus. Nuff said.)
wants, needs, hopes & goals: speech / verb
speech: verb
beget (verb)
begat the Freedom Caucus begat Donald Trump
the Tea Party ~ (NPR’s Mara Liasson / 2016)
begat Michael Jordan who begat Tier Woods
he created this paradigm that ~ (O.J. Simpson)
beget work
few living directors ~ that... (the filmmaker Roy Andersson)
begot ingenuity
scarcity ~ (poor kids devise ways to have fun)
creation & transformation / relationship: birth / verb
beginning (just the beginning, etc.)
beginning
it’s just the ~ (first picture of black hole in space)
♦ “Beginning is easy, continuing is hard.” (A Japanese saying.)
progress & lack of progress / starting, going, continuing &
ending: journeys & trips / movement
behavior (fire, etc.)
fire behavior
they are seeing ~ that they’ve never even been trained for
character & personality: materials & substances
behemoth (noun)
behemoth among (federal) agencies
the Department of Defense is a ~
behemoth pickup trucks
~ roar down Main Street (oil-boom town in Texas)
civil rights behemoth
it has built itself into a ~ (Southern Poverty Law Center)
online (classifieds) behemoth
the ~, Craigslist…
economic behemoth
China has emerged as an ~
political behemoth
other candidates understand that he is a ~ (Joe Biden)
tabular behemoths
these ~ catch in the shallows (icebergs / S. Georgia Island)
cutthroat behemoth
antitrust regulators depict it as a ~ (a tech company)
pop-culture behemoth
the ~ Game of Thrones
lactating behemoths
Holsteins are ~ (versus Ankole cattle)
2,300-page behemoth
it is a ~ (a government act)
four-billion-dollar (accessories) behemoth
Coach is a ~ (fashion)
built the company into a behemoth
he ~ (security)
spells the end for a behemoth
the decision to pull the show ~ that dominated schedules
♦ The Behemoth was a huge land monster mentioned in the Book of Job.
Its aquatic counterpart was the Leviathan. Both creatures were controlled
by God, and symbolized God's power.
Page 127 of 1574
size: allusion / Bible / creature / religion
behind (behind schedule, etc.)
behind on payments
we were ~
behind schedule
they were now almost 2 months ~
falls behind
Faisal ~ (worker at Dairy Queen)
fell behind on a (key) module
later, as Russia ~ (space station)
fell behind in his mortgage
he ~ (money woes)
time / timeliness & lack of timeliness: direction / position /
prep, adv, adj, particle
behind (competition)
behind in the race
Uber is ~ to develop autonomous vehicles
left behind
Nokia has been ~ by competitors in the smartphone market
competition: direction / movement / position / prep, adv,
adj, particle / sports & games / walking, running & jumping
behind (progress)
behind in school
he is way ~
behind the (learning) curve
we were well ~ (for a military operation)
way behind
he is ~ in school
well behind
we were ~ the learning curve (for a military operation)
fall behind
we want to keep up and not ~ (government official)
the US could ~ China (digital currency)
fallen behind at Fremont
he had ~ at Fremont, not just in history but... (school)
fell behind by 3 years
our program ~ (space)
lag behind
women ~ men in the most visible arenas of science
lagging (far) behind
US students are ~ (education)
left behind
the poor are ~ (services go to wealthy)
progress & lack of progress: direction / movement / prep,
adv, adj. particle / walking, running & jumping
behind (in the past)
behind
the team's best days are ~ (sports)
behind her
now it's all ~ (wild lifestyle)
behind him
in college, with his high school playing days ~...
behind it
the 100th mission is ~ (space shuttles)
behind us
now that this is ~, we can move forward (divorce)
it is tempting to believe the danger is ~ (terrorism)
the first phase of the pandemic is ~
our darkness days are ahead of us, not ~ (pandemic)
long behind
his best writing days were ~ by then
get the case behind him
he just wanted to ~ (object of criminal investigation)
left his old life behind
he ~
leave our colonial past behind
the time has come to fully ~ (Barbados)
put his old life behind him
he tried to ~
put their differences behind them
they sought to ~ (diplomacy)
put their (money) problems behind them
her new job ~
♦ "Now that that is in the rear-view mirror…" (Behind us.)
♦ "That's all water under the bridge."
♦ “We’re so focused on what’s ahead, we’re not worried about what’s
behind us.” (The boxer Anthony Joshua, speaking about his rematch with
Andy Ruiz Jr. AJ had lost the first match, in a tremendous upset.)
past & present / time: direction / journeys & trips /
movement / position / prep, adv, adj, particle
behind (responsibility)
behind the bombing
no one knows who is ~
behind the machinery
he is the brains ~ that makes the wave (Kelly Slater’s wave)
behind the (new) policy
he is a driving force ~ (a doctor)
behind the project
he was the brains ~
responsibility: direction / position / prep, adv, adj, particle
behind (basis)
behind this decision
Page 128 of 1574
what could be ~
behind these new levels
what are the causes ~ of stress (colleges)
idea behind the program
the ~ was to…
logic behind (military) training
the hidden ~
motivation behind the attack
the ~ seems to be to…
personalities behind the inventions
the exhibition is an attempt to bring to life the ~
reasoning behind this
the ~ is that…
story behind the plaque
do you know the ~
theory behind this practice
the ~ is that…
driving force behind development
economics is usually the ~ (zoning)
driving force behind globalization
the ~
driving force behind hostess bars
ultimately money is the ~ (Roppongi)
lies behind
inequality in incomes ~ the divisiveness of our politics
what ~ human behavior
bases: direction / position / prep, adv, adj, particle
relationship: direction / position / prep, adv, adj, particle
behind (support)
behind it
the government has to get ~ and the Prime Minister is
against it (a proposal)
behind you
I'm ~ (I support you)
get behind the development
it's time we ~ of renewable energy
allegiance, support & betrayal: prep, adv, adj, particle
behind (put something behind)
behind me
they tell me I have to put Nick’s death ~ (grieving widow)
put her trauma behind her
she has tried to ~ (rape)
put this behind us
we’ve got to ~ and move on with our lives (after disaster)
reconciliation, resolution & conclusion / resiliency: direction
/ prep, adv, adj, particle / verb
behind-the-scenes
behind-the-scenes
a ~ of world hegemony
behind-the-scenes controversy
fraught with ~
behind-the-scenes documentary
a ~ (making of a film)
behind-the-scenes negotiations
~ failed
behind-the-scenes role
his ~
behind-the-scenes strategist
behind-the-scenes workers
a cadre of ~ (state fair)
behind-the-scenes lobbying
months of ~
concealment & lack of concealment: theater
belch (verb)
belched up
a great cloud of steam ~ through the hatch (burst pipe)
belched forth smoke, ash and lava
the volcano ~
belched from the smokestacks
black smoke ~
belched (diesel) exhaust
trucks ~
belched smoke
the engine ~ (coal-fired)
resemblance: bodily reaction / verb
Belichick (the racing Bill Belichick, etc.)
racing Bill Belichick
he’s a little bit the ~ (Bob Bufford and Justified)
subterfuge: epithet
believer (true believer)
true believer in the cause
she was a ~ (Irish Republican Army)
dogged true believers
the Wikipedia system can put it at the mercy of the ~
progressive true believers
the ~ who flocked to Mr Sanders in 2016 (politics)
allegiance, support & betrayal: allusion
identity & nature: allusion
commitment & determination: allusion
Page 129 of 1574
bell (warning)
alarm bell
civil rights activists sounded the ~s
“fight or flight” bells
that type of rhetoric tends to ring the ~ (Jewish Americans)
warning bell
spiraling suicide rates sound a ~
ring (any) bells
one case doesn't usually ~ (epidemics)
ringing the alarm bell
the mayor is ~ as loudly as he can (coronavirus cases)
set off alarm bells
for Western intelligence, it ~ (Mig-25 “Foxbat”)
sounded the alarm bells
environmentalist have ~ (pollution in Lake Baikal)
civil rights activists ~
sound a warning bell
spiraling suicide rates ~
warning: bell / sound
bell (bells and whistles)
bell and whistle
$3,200 for a top of the line model with every ~ (a toilet)
bells and whistles
it has more ~ than a fire engine (a sports watch)
attention, scrutiny & promotion: sound / train
bell (ring a bell)
ring a bell
did that name mean anything to you, did it ~ (murder)
consciousness & awareness: bell / sound / verb
bell (unring a bell)
unring a bell
you can't ~ that has already been rung
reversal: bell / sound / verb
bell curve (shape)
distribution of a bell curve
the scores have the ~
shape: bell / direction
bellwether (noun)
bellwether election
Democrats are fretting about losing a ~
bellwether of (global) conservation efforts
island initiatives are a ~
bellwether of (economic) health
the housing market is seen as a ~ by many (US)
bellwether of (African) progress
Ghana again became a ~ (peace, democracy)
bellwether for the condition
small businesses have become a ~ of the US economy
bellwether for the industry
the labor talks could serve as a ~ (airline unions)
watched (by other defendants) as a (potential)
bellwether
the case has been widely ~
♦ A wether is a ram leading a flock of sheep. The shepherd attaches a
bell around the ram's neck, to indicate the location of the flock.
direction: sheep
belly (orientation)
belly of the rover
an umbilical runs to a computer inside the ~ (on Mars)
belly of a tank
the slug punches a hole in the ~
belly landing
he questioned whether a ~ would work (space shuttle)
Perseverance’s belly
at present, the aircraft is slung beneath ~ (Mars)
orientation: direction / stomach
belly flop (noun)
prime-time belly flop
her speech was a ~
failure, accident & impairment: sports & games / water
bellyful (amount)
bellyful of war
I’ve had a ~
bellyful of promises and politicking
the people of Britain have had a ~
bellyful of deceit, waste and incompetence
there has been a ~ (New Labour)
amount / consumption: food & drink / stomach
sufficiency, insufficiency & excess: food & drink / stomach
feeling, emotion & effect: food & drink / stomach
belly-up (adjective)
belly-up
we had plenty of excuses to go ~
went belly-up
the company ~ (failed)
♦ This refers to a dead fish or other animal dead in water.
failure, accident & impairment: animal / death & life / fish
condition & status: animal / death & life / fish
Page 130 of 1574
belong (verb)
belongs to the fifth century
of the great philosophers, only Socrates properly ~
belongs to the past
what happened ~ (a historical injustice)
fictive possession: verb
below (behavior)
below you
that’s ~
behavior: direction / prep, adv, adj, particle
admiration & contempt: direction / prep, adv, adj, particle
belt (area)
belt of ice
in winter a 600-mile-wide ~ seals off Antarctica
belt of (coniferous) forests
the taiga—the huge circumpolar ~
Bible Belt
Atlanta versus the surrounding ~ (strip clubs)
Black Belt
the ~, an impoverished region of the rural South (US)
banana belt
the lush ~ of southern Ecuador
farm belt
Louisiana's ~
mineral belt
a large ~ west of Albuquerque
radiation belt
the ~s of earth
snow belt
few move from the sun belt to the ~ (US)
ecologically diverse (transition) belt
this remote, fragile, and ~ between forest and steppe
circumpolar belt
the taiga—the huge ~ of coniferous forests
semiarid belt
the Sahel, a ~ that spans Africa just below the Sahara
25-mile belt
oil fields clustered along a ~ between Basra, Kuwait
♦ A belt often has a buckle. See buckle (attachment)
area / configuration: clothing & accessories / shape
belt (below the belt)
belt
he's known for hitting ~ (politics)
behavior: boundary / boxing
restraint & lack of restraint: boundary / boxing
belt (under one's belt)
one expedition (to Gasherbrum II) under his belt
he had ~
7 deployments under his belt
he has ~ (first sergeant)
6,000 jumps under his belt
a skydiver with ~
25 years (of Forest Service work) under his belt
he has ~
experience: clothing & accessories
belt (notch in a belt)
conviction notch in their belts
prosecutors just want another ~ (convict exonerated)
♦ “Carly had belt-notched all those coveted hotties—Cat Stevens, Kris
Kristofferson, Warren Beatty, Jack Nicholson, Mick Jagger, James
Taylor...” (Girls Like Us by Sheila Weller.)
achievement, recognition & praise: history / mark /
violence
belt (tighten one’s belt)
tightening our belts this summer
we will be ~ (pandemic ruins tourist season)
sacrifice: food & drink
sufficiency, insufficiency & excess: food & drink
belt-tightening
belt-tightening at the Pentagon
he will announce a new round of ~
belt-tightening measures
the school will also take ~ like…
corporate belt-tightening
recent years of ~
fiscal belt-tightening
in an age of ~
sacrifice: food & drink
sufficiency, insufficiency & excess: food & drink
bemoan (verb)
bemoan the paywall
advocates of open access ~ (academic articles)
resistance, opposition & defeat: sound / verb
bench (verb)
bench him
the channel decided to ~
dismissal, removal & resignation: sports & games / verb
benchmark (at a benchmark)
at or near that benchmark
these year's figures already are ~ (female graduates)
Page 131 of 1574
measurement: mark
benchmark (other)
benchmark
it is a ~ that we must keep in mind
benchmark of skill
I consider the Green Narrows as a ~ (kayaking)
benchmark for toughness
support for capital punishment is a ~ for politicians
benchmark indicator
use objective criteria to establish ~s (environment)
benchmark run
the Green Narrows is a ~ in the Southeast (kayaking)
benchmarks, the milestones
the ~ you speak of in this book, like marriage...
standards and benchmarks
we are working on meeting ~ for curricula (education)
barriers and benchmarks
when it comes to ~, snowboarding has the 1440° spin
established (climbing's new) benchmark
the man who ~ (Tomaz Humar / south face of Dhaulagiri)
performance benchmarks
it ranks first on three of the industry's leading ~
reached (all) the benchmarks
he ~ on or close to schedule (child development)
set the benchmark
she ~ in 1996 (time spent in space)
♦ The round metal USGS plaques on mountaintops are benchmarks that
indicate height above sea level.
♦ “The benchmarks I don’t worry about that much...” (Teresa Thayer
Snyder, former superintendent of Voorheesville school district in upstate
New York. She doesn’t want schools to get too focused on so-called “lost
time” to the COVID-19 pandemic, because the kids learned plenty during
the pandemic.)
measurement: mark
bend (bend over backwards)
bends over backwards to be cooperative
the staff ~
bends over backwards being polite
he ~
bending over backwards to comply
we are ~ with the rules
difficulty, easiness & effort: standing, sitting & lying / verb
bend (verb)
bend to demands
Shiites refuse to ~ by Sunnis that...
bend (in any way) to economic pressure
he won’t ~ (Daniel Ortega)
bend the government to their will
local leaders who wish to ~
refuse to bend
Shiites ~ to demands by Sunnis that...
caused him to bend
the threat ~ but not break
♦ A reed bends but does not break.
resistance, opposition & defeat: materials & substances /
verb
beneath (behavior)
beneath me
that’s ~
beneath the dignity
is anything ~ of the Obama White House (politics)
beneath you
that's way ~ (her reaction to his rude proposal)
behavior: direction / prep, adv, adj, particle
admiration & contempt: direction / prep, adv, adj, particle
Bermuda Triangle
Bermuda Triangle of airspeed
transonic is the unknown, it is the ~ (flying)
legal Bermuda Triangle
this is a ~, trying to figure out who’s at fault
certainty & uncertainty fantasy & reality: allusion / history
berserk
went berserk
the elephant ~ and killed its trainer
the 200-pound chimpanzee ~ and was shot dead by police
he hit a home run, and the crowd ~ (sports)
she ~ and stormed out (angry and upset)
behavior / control & lack of control: mental health
berth (a wide berth)
give her a wide berth
I always ~ (a boss)
avoidance & separation: boat
beside (support)
beside me
life is so cruel without you ~
allegiance, support & betrayal: position / prep, adv, adj,
particle
besiege (verb)
besieged (northern) Mexico
violence has ~
besieged NBC with calls
they ~ (to kill a story)
Page 132 of 1574
amount & effect: fortification / military / verb
besieged
besieged by email
she has been ~
besieged by lobbyists
Congress is ~
besieged by the media
he was ~
besieged by questions
doctors have been ~ from patients
besieged by reporters
he has been ~
besieged by (corruption) scandals
his government has been ~
besieged borough
more food relief is needed across the ~ (Bronx / pandemic)
besieged politicians
the ~ have started a counterattack (politics)
amount & effect: fortification / military
besity (infobesity, etc.)
“infobesity”
~ is affecting our brains and lives (information overload)
increase & decrease / size: affix
bestial (adjective)
bestial wretchedness
he sees out his days in a state of ~ (retirement)
comparison & contrast: affix / animal
bestiary (noun)
nautical bestiary
silhouettes of sailing junks, different sizes and designs, a ~
taxonomy & classification: animal
bet (all bets are off)
all bets are off
~ (election)
certainty & uncertainty / fate, fortune & chance: cards /
gambling / sports & games
bete noire (black beast)
his (obstreperous) bete noire
~, Major Ross
affliction: animal / color
betray (verb)
betrayed no emotion
he ~ while the charges against him were read
betrayed an erosion
the recrimination ~ of confidence (Israeli raid)
betraying him
after so many years, his body was ~ (an athlete)
betrayed a hint
neither man ~ of anxiety
betray a (profound) ignorance
animal rightists ~ about nature (opinion)
evidence / fictive communication: verb
concealment & lack of concealment: verb
betray (fail)
betrayed him
he got clipped and his legs ~ (a boxer)
failure, accident & impairment: verb
betrayed
betrayed by (bad) leadership
he had been ~
allegiance, support & betrayal: speech
between (come between, etc.)
come between them and their mom
the only thing that would ~ was death (mom murdered)
division & connection: prep, adv, adj, particle
bewail (verb)
bewailed what they called
defense contractor ~ declining weapons spending
resistance, opposition & defeat: sound / verb
conflict / speech: sound / verb
bewitch (verb)
bewitched all
she ~ with a mesmerizing performance
feeling, emotion & effect: magic / verb
bewitching (adjective)
bewitching city
Kim is a perfect companion to a ~ (Lahore)
feeling, emotion & effect: magic
Bhopal (Australia’s Bhopal, etc.)
Australia’s Bhopal
Wittenoom is ~ (asbestos contamination)
failure, accident & impairment: epithet
bible (enthusiasm)
Bible of Boxing
The Ring magazine, the ~…
bibles of (backpacking) seekers
Page 133 of 1574
those ~ everywhere (A Time of Gifts, etc.)
The Sound Effects Bible
Rick Viers, author of ~
♦ “That was Luigi. We met at his house at two, with our good boots on
our feet, but no backpacks, no rope (about whose use none of us had
any real notion anyway; but we knew—having studied the Alpine Club
guidebook—the theory of the double rope, the respective merits of hemp
and manila, the technique for rescuing someone from a crevasse, and
other fine points), a hundred grams of chocolate in our pockets, and
(may God forgive us!) wearing shorts.” (“Bear Meat” by Primo Levy.
Translated from the Italian by Alessandra Bastagli.)
enthusiasm: Bible / religion
Bible (authority)
Bible of sports
the ~ on the Internet (Internet site)
Bible of (psychiatric) diagnosis
according to the ~, the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual
Bible of the (social-media) movement
the ~ is Clay Shirky's "Here Comes Everybody"
bible of psychiatry
the DSM—the ~ (Diagnostic and Statistical Manual)
bible for educators
the text became a ~ (The Uses of the University)
fashion bible
Vogue’s rise to dominance as the world’s ~
so-called bible
the DSM, the ~ of psychiatry…
psychiatric bible
the DSM is the ~ for mental disorders
♦ The DSM is the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders.
sanctioning, authority, & non-conformity: Bible / religion
bible (hand on the bible, etc.)
hand on a Bible
~, but you must come clean with me...
sincerity, lack of sincerity & honesty: Bible / religion
big (as noun)
do big
we don’t just think big, we ~ (an Amazon advertisement)
size: part of speech
big (big fan, etc.)
big crossword guy
my stat teacher was like a ~
extent & scope: size
big (significance)
big fight
we want a ~, a marquee fight (Eddie “Who else” Hearns)
big questions
even when the plan is published, there will be ~...
so big
I knew this was huge, this was ~ (photojournalist)
big name
see big (big name, etc.)
importance & significance: size
big (big name, etc.)
so big
I knew this was huge, this was ~ (photojournalist)
big names
some ~ have not made official announcements yet
a who’s who of ~ were present (at Aretha’s funeral)
importance & significance: size
Big (comprehension, scope)
Big data
~ is a field that treats way to analyze... (Wikipedia)
Big History
~ has long been out of favor in academic circles
the glib tendentiousness of ~
Big Physics
“~ and New Ideas” by Melvyn J. Shochet (Science, 1993)
Big science
~ (see the Wikipedia entry)
deep ecology
books about ~
♦ Big History; “all-encompassing explanatory histories”; “high-wrought”
theory; grand narratives; popular history (Jared Diamond, etc.); the
standard textbook version... (“Free For All: Is it time to rethink everything
we’ve been taught about the origins of ‘civilization’?” by Gideon LewisKraus, The New Yorker, November 8, 2021.)
extent & scope / importance & significance: size
big bang (“Big Bang” of country music,
etc.)
big bang
the ~ had been the surprise hit, “Tom Dooley” (folk)
big bang of the beginning
the ~ of country music is supposed to be in 1927
legislative “big bang”
it is a ~ on par with the creation of the euro (“Fit For 55”)
“Big Bang” of country music
the sessions at Bristol became known as the ~
♦ The “Big Bang” of country music was 1927. That’s the year of the
Bristol sessions when both the Carter family and Jimmie Rodgers
recorded in Bristol, Tennessee. The rest is history.
♦ The Big Bang had been the Kingston Trio’s 1958 surprise #1 hit, “Tom
Dooley...” (The 1960s mainstream ascendance of folk music. From the
wonderful Girls Like Us by Sheila Weller.)
epithet: astronomy
origin: astronomy / epithet
Page 134 of 1574
big bang (in a big bang)
go out in a big bang
he wanted ~ (suicide)
attention, scrutiny & promotion: astronomy / sound
big brother (relationship)
Instagram’s big brother
he came from ~, Facebook (Mosseri)
role of the big brother
he was playing the ~ (making things better for athletes)
calls Taiwan its “big brother”
Somaliland ~ (mutual diplomatic recognition)
thought of him as a big brother
his players ~, he took an interest in their off-field lives
♦ “Sorry I wasn’t there to watch your back like a big brother’s supposed
to.” (Chris Eubank Jnr’s tweet on the tragic death of Sebastian, the thirdeldest child of the great boxer Chris Eubank.)
relationship: family
Big Brother (oppression)
Big Brother intrusion
why cave in to such a ~ on your privacy
oppression: allusion
allusion: books & reading
big gun (and heavy gun)
big gun
they didn’t have their ~s tonight (injured players)
he has brought in another ~ to help in his Senate bid
heavy guns
he is bringing out his ~ (wife and family / scandal)
spiked their guns
Spallanzani had ~ with a simple fact (science dispute)
♦ “When you wheel out your biggest gun to take down the incumbent
president, it frees Biden to be a lot more positive tonight.” (Political
strategist Paul Begala, speaking about Obama’s direct criticism of Trump
at the Democratic Convention.)
♦ "Big guns" refer to artillery, the King of Battle. Artillerymen have been
traditionally referred to as Redlegs. They tend to be hard of hearing.
♦ "The Turks have 12-inch guns at Aqaba, Sir. Can you imagine what
that means?" (Lawrence of Arabia, the film.)
♦ “This is the battle for Tumbledown Mountain, with the Scots Guards
and the Gurkhas going in on Monday morning in the early hours. The big
guns have been talking to each other, and now it’s the troops on the
ground who are moving in.” (A BBC reporter covering the 1982 Falklands
War.)
strength & weakness: military / weapon
importance & significance: military / size / weapon
bighearted (and big-hearted)
big-hearted personality
he was known for his ~
bighearted, (supremely) patient man
he was a ~ (speech therapist)
character & personality / size: heart
heart: size
big league (and big leagues)
big-league hotel
it's a ~ with a celebrity chef
big-league philanthropy
~ has its critics (Gates, Buffet, Zuckerberg, etc.)
big-league politician
he's a ~
drafted into the big leagues
many internet celebrities may never be ~ (stardom)
attainment / importance & significance / success & failure:
baseball / size / sports & games
big shot (person)
big-shot (Hollywood) director
he's a ~
children of big shots
~ and university admissions
protozoological big shots
before he was thirty Schaudinn was one of the ~
person: force / weapon
importance & significance / power: person / size / weapon
big up (as verb)
big his career up
he’s just trying to ~
big himself up
he’s just trying to ~ by using someone else’s grief
big yourself up
do you really need to ~ by...
increase & decrease: part of speech / size / verb
bigwig (person)
psychiatric bigwigs
the ~ of Europe...
person: society
importance & significance / power: person / size
bilge (noun)
bilge
he has lost credibility for writing that ~
worth & lack of worth: boat
bill (butcher’s bill, etc.)
“butcher’s bill”
the Duke of Wellington used to call it the ~ (casualties)
butcher’s bill to be paid
there’s a ~, and it accrues to bin Laden (embassy bombings)
Page 135 of 1574
♦ “At the beginning of the Battle of the Somme, on July 1, 1916, the
British Army suffered 60,000 dead and wounded—in one day. It was
arguably the worst butcher's bill in military history.” ("Why World War I
Resonates," by William Boyd, The New York Times, Jan. 21, 2012.)
♦ “The Gulf War was 30 years ago and we’re still there messing around. I
don’t know what the answer is but the people who profit sure aren’t
paying the bills.” (Kbbpll, March 3, 2021, about the rocket attack on alAsad airbase, March 3, 2021.)
military: consumption / meat / money
billboard (noun)
billboard for what
Walmart is a ~ employment practices should be
attention, scrutiny & promotion / representation: picture /
sign, signal, symbol
bill of health (clean bill of health)
clean bill of health
the bank was given a ~ (by auditors)
gives them a clean bill of health
the E.P.A. still ~ (chemicals in tap water)
give investments a clean bill of health
analysts felt pressured to ~ or lose business
received a clean bill of health
the reservoir ~ from inspectors (prior to collapse)
♦ This phrase probably relates to ships in foreign ports. Such ships would
be in quarantine until port officials determined that the crew was not
carrying an infectious disease.
condition & status: health & medicine
billy club
psychological billy club
it’s a ~ to coerce a person (lie-detector test)
coercion & motivation: violence / weapon
oppression: violence / weapon
bind (in a bind)
leaving cities in a bind
a police shortage is ~
put it in a bind
Pakistan’s support for militants has ~
situation: container / rope
bind (constraint)
double bind
too sweet or two shrill, the ~ for women
constraint & lack of constraint: rope
bind (constrain)
bind her
she questions the traditions that ~
constraint & lack of constraint: rope / verb
bind (connect)
bind
the ties that ~
bind the characters
the ties that ~ gradually become clear
binds us to where
making wine ~ we are (California)
build and bind
book clubs can help ~ communities
attachment / division & connection: rope / verb
binding (adjective)
binding changes
there are these legally ~ from Brussels (Brexit)
non-binding referendum
Puerto Rico voted for US statehood in a ~
ironclad, waterproof, bulletproof, (legally) binding
we need ~ guarantees (Sergey Ryabkov / diplomacy)
constraint & lack of constraint: rope
binge (on a binge)
on a building binge
China has been ~ for decades (infrastructure)
gone on a (hiring) binge
the company has ~
behavior / restraint & lack of restraint: alcohol
binge (other)
binge
the ~ is over (spending by elected officials)
the ~ was epic and so is the hangover (housing market)
binge of (skate-park) construction
the city continued the ~ (NYC)
binge flying
London seeks to curb "~" (airport expansions)
gone on a (spending) binge
the Democrats have ~
behavior / restraint & lack of restraint: alcohol
biography (non-human)
“biography of the grain”
Amber Waves presents itself as a ~ (by Catherine Zabinski)
biography of a movie
his book is, essentially, the ~ (Shooting ‘Midnight Cowboy’)
♦ “The human relationship with wheat is the subject of Catherine
Zabinski’s short book Amber Waves, which presents itself as a
‘biography’ of the grain, although she reminds us on page three that
‘wheat isn’t a person’ in case we were liable to be confused.” (Flour
Fixated” by Bee Wilson, London Review of Books, 24 September 2020.)
♦ Nonhuman and nonliving things can have biographies,
autobiographies, obituaries and even be characters.
Page 136 of 1574
analysis, interpretation & explanation: books & reading
biopsy (analysis)
biopsy that
one way you could kind of ~ or look at it... (a subject)
analysis, interpretation & explanation: death & life / health
& medicine / verb
bird-dog (verb)
bird-dogged him
we ~ at press conferences (Chicago protestor / mayor)
affliction: animal / dog / hunting
pursuit, capture & escape: animal / dog / hunting
birds and the bees
talk about the birds and the bees
I finally had that ~ with my son
know about the birds and the bees
does she ~
sex: euphemism
bird's-eye (bird's-eye view)
bird's-eye view of the battlefield
drones give commanders a ~
bird's-eye view from a plane
you get a ~
♦ This has morphed to “helicopter view,” a “3,000-foot perspective,” “the
30,000-foot level,” “the 40,000-foot level,” and “maybe you have to look
at things from 20 billion miles up to get this kind of perspective.”
♦ “Ten years later he likened his own position as minister to riding
‘comfortably on an elephant, whose trunk could pick up a pin or uproot a
tree with equal ease, and from whose back a wide scene lay open.’”
(Winston Churchill, Minister of Munitions of War in 1917. From Churchill:
Walking With Destiny by Andrew Roberts.)
perception, perspective & point of view: animal / bird /
height / position
birth (creation)
birth of Pakistan
since the ~ in 1947
movement's birth
the city of their ~ (Kandahar / Taliban)
nation's birth
Sunnis have dominated politics since the ~ in 1920 (Iraq)
given birth
Atlanta has ~ to a new generation of rappers (US)
creation & transformation: birth
birthday (creation)
France’s birthday
July 14 is ~
175th birthday
the institution’s ~ (the Smithsonian Institution)
creation & transformation: birth
birthed (created)
birthed in the mid to early 2000’s
the movement was most likely ~ by two men (MGTOW)
creation & transformation: birth
birthplace (the birthplace of democracy,
etc.)
birthplace of democracy
Greece, the ~
birthplace of Islam
Saudi Arabia, the ~
birthplace of humanity
Africa is the ~
birthplace of country music
Bristol, Tennessee has been called the ~ (1927)
birthplace of Chinese maritime shipbuilding
the Pagoda Anchorage has been called the “~” (Mawei)
birthplace of the French tacos
it is among several contenders for the ~ (Vaulx-en-Velin)
epithet: birth
origin: birth / epithet
bit (champ at the bit)
champing at the bit to start
he was ~
eagerness & reluctance: horse / verb
starting, going, continuing & ending: horse
bit (bit between its teeth)
get the bit between his teeth
Whyte will ~ (Dillian Whyte / boxing)
got the bit between his teeth alright
he’s ~ (T.E. Lawrence and Damascus / the film)
commitment & determination / constraint & lack of
constraint / control & lack of control: horse / verb
bite (resemblance)
bit into him
the lash ~again and again (Call of the Wild)
bit into her neck
the cord ~
resemblance: animal / teeth / verb
biting (adjective)
biting cold
once the ~ arrives
biting (social) critic
he was a ~
Page 137 of 1574
biting sanctions
these are the most ~ every imposed
feeling, emotion & effect: animal / sensation / teeth
bitten (enthusiasm)
bitten by the bug
and so I really got ~ (acting, in high school)
bitten by the action bug
as a boy, he was ~
bitten by the cycling bug
as a youth he played soccer before he was ~
enthusiasm: insect / sensation
bitter (personality)
bitter
he isn't ~, just wiser
bitter, angry and hostile
he was ~ (sick man with undiagnosed illness)
angry, bitter (m)
I've talked to amputees that went through a real ~ stage
became bitter
he ~ to the point of suicidal (soldier back from Iraq)
♦ Don’t be bitter, be better!
feeling, emotion & effect: food & drink / taste
character & personality: food & drink / taste
bitter (bitter weather, etc.)
bitter cold
they escaped into the ~ (house fire in winter)
bitter winds
~ from Manchuria
bitter (Balkan) winter
the ~
feeling, emotion & effect: food & drink / taste
bitter (a bitter blow, etc.)
bitter battles
she resigned last June after four years of ~ (university)
bitter blow
the defeat was a ~ for Serbia and Montenegro (soccer)
bitter (political) climate
the increasingly ~ ahead of elections next summer
bitter (international) controversy
despite the ~ (oil project)
bitter disappointment
he proved to be a ~ (a judge)
but a ~ awaited us… (expedition)
bitter dispute
they are locked in a ~ over Kashmir
bitter end
she maintained her innocence to the ~
it’s a ~ to a pioneering, powerful career (prison)
bitter enemies
Ethiopia and Eritrea, ~... (fighting proxy war in Somalia)
bitter fact
car-jacking is a ~ of life
bitter feelings
Iranians have ~ towards Saddam Hussein
bitter irony
in a ~, female military personnel guard captured Taliban
bitter memories
helped erase ~ of the 1994 players strike (baseball)
bitter negotiations
flight attendants are engaged in ~ with the company
bitter (late-night) negotiations
after ~
bitter taste
the ~ of regret (bad decisions)
bitter (family) power struggle
he is kept on the throne because of a ~
bitter and long-running (m)
the bloody culmination of a ~ feud (cop / citizen)
long and bitter
a ~ family feud over the estate of Jimi Hendrix
consumption / feeling, emotion & effect: food & drink /
taste
bittersweet (adjective)
bittersweet
the recognition was ~ (combat soldier who survived)
the victory was ~
feeling, emotion & effect: food & drink / taste
black (Black Sea, etc.)
Black Sea
Turkey has coast on the ~
Black Volta
the ~ is a tributary of the Volta River
♦ The White Volta’s main tributaries are the Black Volta and the Red
Volta.
proper name: color
geography: color / proper name
black (warning)
black diamond
only expert skiers should try a double ~ trail
black flag
don’t swim or boat if you see a ~ at the beach
Page 138 of 1574
black (rainstorm) warning
it was the city’s first ~ this year (Hong Kong)
♦ “Hong Kong has three levels of rainstorm warning, with black being the
highest. The second highest is red. The third highest is amber.”
warning: color / sign, signal, symbol
black (feeling)
black depression
he fell into a ~
black dog
I am trying to hold on to my senses, to fend off the ~
black mood
still the ~ clung to Scott
feeling, emotion & effect: color
black (black day, etc.)
black day
it was a ~ for democracy (Zimbabwe)
his resignation was a ~ for British diplomacy
401 jobs slashed on ~ for Fife (the Courier)
Black Friday
~, 1929, when the New York stock market crashed...
black summer
Australia’s ~ (2019-2020 bushfire season)
Black Sunday
the ~ dust storm of April 14, 1935 (US)
feeling, emotion & effect: color
black (while black, female, brown,
Muslim, etc.)
being royal while black
~ (the Duchess of Sussex, Meghan / NPR)
being watched while black
the play is about ~ (Fairview)
Birding While Black
~ (Jason Ward / Christian Cooper / NPR)
‘Canvassing While Black’
the ~ incident (Janelle Bynum, Oregon representative)
coping while black
~ (race-based trauma)
“Driving While Black”
the new PBS documentary, ~ (history)
driving while Black
~ is still a crime in Louisiana (Eugene W. Collins)
existing while black
the challenges of ~ (NPR)
Farming While Black
she details her experiences in her new book, ~ (NPR)
Geocaching While Black
he writes about encountering racism on his blog, ~ (NPR)
living while black
what it’s like ~, in Japan (NPR)
getting a citation for ~ (King Anyi Howell / NPR)
PWI-ing While Black
~ was created for the NPR Student Podcast Challenge
Rowing While Black
“A Most Beautiful Thing: ~” (NPR)
running while black
he was 25 years old, and ~ (Ahmaud Arbery / NPR)
“running while black”
there has been a lot more conversation about ~ (Arbery)
sleeping while black
Breonna Taylor was ~
Traveling While Black
her new book, ~ (Nanjala Nyabola / NPR)
Living (and Dying) While Black
The Beast Side: ~in America (by D. Watkins)
play classical music while Black
what it can look like to ~ (NPR)
♦ “You can’t walk while black. With Ahmaud you can’t jog while black...
Driving while black. But Breonna Taylor was sleeping while black in the
sanctity of her own home.” (Civil rights and personal injury attorney Ben
Crump.)
♦ “Black women have been killed in many of the same circumstances as
their brothers, fathers and sons. They’ve been killed driving while Black,
being in their homes while Black, having mental crises while Black.”
(Kimberle Crenshaw.)
♦ DWB (driving while black); LWB (living while black)... (Text.)
♦ “Talking While Female.” (Narrated by NPR’s Selena Simmons-Duffin.)
♦ “Reporting While Brown in The Summer of Trump.” (Gene Denby.)
♦ “Running while brown. Skittish while Muslim.” (NPR. Code Switch.
Race. In Your Face.)
♦ “Like the murder of Sarah Everard in the UK last year, [the murder of
Ashling Murphy] has reignited the debate about safety of women as they
go about their everyday business [italics mine].” (“Ashling Murphy: Irish
police arrest man on suspicion of teacher’s murder” by Lisa O’Carroll,
The Guardian, 18 Jan 2022.)
♦ “Outside lay the body of a man killed for being in his home.” (An ABC
report on Ukraine-Russia War, the first war of the TikTok era.)
inclusion & exclusion: society
blackball (verb)
blackball him
he has accused teams of colluding to ~ (an athlete)
acceptance & rejection: color / mark / society / verb
oppression: color / mark / society / verb
blackballed
blackballed by league owners
the truth is he was ~ (NFL player Colin Kaepernick)
acceptance & rejection: color / mark / society
oppression: color / mark / society
Page 139 of 1574
black belt (person)
bureaucratic black belt
he was a skilled infighter, a ~ (State Department)
person: sports & games
ability & lack of ability / conflict: person / sports & games
black box (noun)
black box
the military is a ~, you never know what’s going on
~s whose inner workings are mysterious (brains)
it’s really a ~ (human embryo research vs. rats, mice)
the FCC is a ~, they don[‘t tell you what they are doing
big black box
it’s the ~ we’re going to try and look into (investigation)
access & lack of access / analysis, interpretation &
explanation / concealment & lack of concealment: color /
tools & technology
black eye
black eye for Rupert Murdoch
what a ~ (scandal)
black eye for the sport
when judges cheat, it's a ~ (Olympic figure skating)
brought a black eye to the sport
they have ~ (swim coaches photograph nude girls)
puts a black eye on the sport
it really ~ (cyclist admits to doping)
take a black eye for this
I don’t think Cleveland will ~ (fan riot)
gives us (all) a black eye
it ~ (hunter on hunter who shot a tame deer)
flaws & lack of flaws / reputation: color / eye / mark
black hole
legal black hole
he is being kept in a ~ (arrested)
black hole for communication
Afghanistan was a ~ (no infrastructure)
in a black hole
I was ~ (unable to easily communicate)
♦ In a black hole, the gravity is so strong that not even light can escape.
In other words, nothing gets out.
access & lack of access / concealment & lack of
concealment / consciousness & awareness / isolation &
remoteness: astronomy / color / light & dark
blacklist (verb)
blacklist the (Chinese) company
the decision to ~ was seen as a bargaining ploy (tariffs)
acceptance & rejection: color / mark / society / verb
oppression: color / mark / society /verb
blacklisted
blacklisted
his books have been ~ (disgraced French author)
acceptance & rejection: color / mark / society
oppression: color / mark / society
Black Mirror
Black Mirror
it’s all very ~, isn’t it (deep fakes and journalism, etc.)
Black Mirror stuff
this is some real-life ~ (facial recognition)
♦ Black Mirror is a TV science-fiction series created by Charlie Brooker
that updated the older Twilight Zone series (see Twilight Zone).
fantasy & reality: allusion
black operations (and black ops)
Black Ops Advertising
she is the author of ~
♦ “Just as the military has moved from face-to-face action to covert
operations, so-called black ops, so advertising has moved from being
obvious to more hidden, in particular, through social media.” (“The Kids
Who Decide What All The Other Kids Talk About,” BBC Sounds,
presented by journalist Paul Mason.)
concealment & lack of concealment / subterfuge: military
black out (verb)
blacked out
I ~ (alcohol)
consciousness & awareness: alcohol / color / verb
black sheep
black sheep of the band
Dennis was already the ~ (the Beach Boys)
black sheep of the family
he's the ~
I was the ~ and took the wrong direction (gang)
black-sheep brother
invite the ~ to the wedding
character & personality: animal / color / sheep
sanctioning, authority & non-conformity: animal / color /
sheep
black site (national security)
archipelago of black sites
he had been tortured in the CIA’s ~
access & lack of access / concealment & lack of
concealment / consciousness & awareness / isolation &
remoteness: color / light & dark
blank (fill in the blanks)
fill in the blanks
they want to ~, connect the dots, figure out... (probe)
Page 140 of 1574
analysis, interpretation & explanation: school & education
blanket (verb)
blanketed (much of) the Northwest in ash
the eruption ~ (volcano)
blanketed the city with (orange) dust
the huge sandstorm ~ (Beijing / 2010)
blanketed the Southeast
forests ~ before European settlers arrived
blanketed the area
federal, state and local police ~ (manhunt)
blanketed (several) cities
snow and ice ~
blanketed the island
ash and smoke have ~ of St. Vincent (eruption)
blanketed mountains
snow ~ in the UAE, a rare occurrence
configuration / cover: blanket / cloth / verb
blanket (under a blanket)
under the blanket of snow
polar plants and animals ~
configuration / cover: cloth / blanket
blanket (cover)
blanket of ash
a ~ covered the orange and lemon trees (eruption)
blanket of clouds
a ~ hid Pumori, Ama Dablam, and other lesser peaks
configuration / cover: blanket / cloth
blanket (blanket amnesty, etc.)
blanket amnesty
he has offered a ~ to the soldiers (New Guinea)
he does not favor a ~ for illegal immigrants
blanket guarantee
is that a ~ that…
blanket policy
airlines handle it on a case-by-case basis, without a ~
blanket statement
it is a ~ that is just not right
extent & scope: cloth / blanket
blanketed
blanketed by (lush) forests
Haiti was once ~ (now 90% deforested)
configuration / cover: cloth / blanket
blaring (headlines, etc.)
blaring headlines
~, fleshy photos and breathless coverage (a tabloid)
attention, scrutiny & promotion: sound
blasphemy
committing blasphemy
is he ~ by… (analysis of war strategy)
sanctioning, authority & non-conformity: religion
blast (criticize)
blasted him for taking
they ~ this position (politics)
blasted her
her critics ~ (politics)
blasted his predecessor
Obama finally ~ by name
speech: explosion / sound / verb / weapon
accusation & criticism: explosion / force / military / verb /
weapon
blast (blasted the Bahamas, etc.)
blasted the Bahamas with (maximum sustained) winds
Hurricane Dorian ~ of 185 m.p.h.
force: storm
blasted apart
canon has been blasted apart
but that ~ (doctors withhold prognosis)
destruction: explosion
blather (noun)
patriotic blather
~ like “Dulce et decorum est / Pro Patria mori”
worth & lack of worth: speech
blaze (blaze a trail, etc.)
blazed
thank you, Penny Marshall, for the trails you ~
importance & significance: history / journeys & trips / mark
searching & discovery: history / journeys & trips / mark
blaze (in a blaze of glory)
went out in a blaze of glory
he ~ (Custer)
attention, scrutiny & promotion: fire / light & dark
bleed (verb)
bled across borders
the crisis has ~ (terrorism)
Page 141 of 1574
bleeding into everything
politics is ~ (Dancing with Stars kerfuffle)
bleed over into other things
does that delusional disorder ~
bleeds into their personal lives
inevitably their work ~ (FBI hunters of serial killers)
bleeding us dry
this price war is ~ (destroying our profits)
bleeding cash
Airbus is ~, chief executive warns
bleeding jobs
US manufacturing have been ~
bleeding money
the school was ~ (troubled charter school)
leaking: blood / health & medicine / verb
bleed (noun)
talent bleed
the conventional explanation for ~ is… (military)
stanch the (talent) bleed
if the Army hopes to ~, it needs to…
leaking: blood / health & medicine
bleeding
financial bleeding
you need to stop your ~ now
staunched the bleeding
opening up ~ of its tourism sector (Dubai / pandemic)
leaking: blood / health & medicine
blemish (noun)
blemish on the game
his injury was the only ~ (sports)
blemishes against him
I’m a massive fan, but there are those two ~ (boxer / drugs)
ugly blemish
the Charlottesville tragedy was “an ~” on the US (2017)
flaws & lack of flaws: mark
blend (mixture)
blend of fear, anger, need, and love
their relationship was a toxic ~
mixture: materials & substances
blend in (verb)
blend in
Tom Wolfe did not ~ (clothes, writing)
easily blend in
drug traffickers ~ (Atlanta)
concealment & lack of concealment: mixture / verb
attention, scrutiny & promotion: mixture / verb
blessed
blessed
with sun and wind, California is ~ (renewable energy)
blessed with (over) 100 waterfalls
Sri Lanka is ~
blessed with good looks and money
she wasn't just ~, she was also smart
cost & benefit: religion
blessing (sanction)
blessing of the board
the bid is expected to get the ~
with the city's blessing
~, cars pair up for duels (legal drag racing)
his blessing
to acquire public credibility, ~ was essential
given the vote its blessing
the election board has ~
sanctioning, authority & non-conformity: religion
blessing (benefit)
blessing
the seasonal flooding of the Mekong is a ~, not a curse
blessing or a bane
oil can be a ~ for a country (corruption, etc.)
blessing and a burden
patients see choice as both a ~
blessing and a curse
these gems have been a ~ (Sierra Leone diamonds)
the annual rains are a ~ for the subcontinent (floods)
blessings as well as its scourges
celebrity’s ~
mixed blessing
progress has been a ~
cost & benefit: religion
blight (verb)
blighted (Aboriginal) communities
alcohol and poverty have ~ (Northern Territory)
blights the present
history ~ (Balkans)
corruption: plant / verb
blight (noun)
moral blight
“whiteness” is not a ~ (race)
Page 142 of 1574
urban blight
the group is devoted to fighting ~ (buildings)
corruption: plant
blighted
blighted economy
as Greece's ~ plunges further into the abyss
blighted neighborhoods
the city's ~
corruption: plant
blind (noticing, understanding,
judging)
blind to merit
the military personnel system is nearly ~
“blind” to genocide preparations
the report said France had been ~ (Rwanda)
blind to race, religion and ethnicity
the state is ~ (French ideal)
blind to (all) reason and decency
terrorists are ~
blind spot
rivals of the U.S. are aware of this ~ (NSA surveillance)
blind, deaf and dumb
terrorists are ~ to all reason and decency
colorblind
~ justice under the law is enshrined in our system (US)
the ~ application of the rule of law
confronting, dealing with & ignoring things: eye
consciousness & awareness: eye
blind (hard to see, hidden)
blind curve
~ (sign)
blind drop
please scout ~s (kayaker Edward Lee Green)
blind spot
deserts can produce ~s (radio signal strength)
face blind
some people are ~ (can't recognize familiar faces)
♦ "Edward Lee Green / 1953-Dec. 27, 1998 / Outstanding musician,
adventurer, loving father, beloved friend. His unique talents will be
forever missed by those who knew him. / Died as a result of pinning at
Crack-in-the-Rock Rapid Dec. 23, 1998 on the Raven Fork in Cherokee,
NC. / Please Scout Blind Drops. / Jesus said, "I am the way…" John
14:6. (Monument at Dillsboro put-in on the Tuckasegee River.)
sight: eye
blind (disregarding evidence, logic)
blind faith
he had this ~ in me (defensive coach)
blind hatred
terrorists are driven by ~
blind optimism
hope is not ~ (Barak Obama)
commitment & determination: eye
blind (not controlled by intelligence)
blind draw
one judge becomes a substitute in a ~
fate, fortune & chance: eye
blind (fly blind)
flying blind
the psychiatrist is ~ (treating soldiers with drugs)
the US economy is ~ (during government shutdown)
♦ “We are flying partly blind. It’s like having, maybe, thirty flashlights that
you’re just arbitrarily shining at different locales around the United
States, and the rest of the country is in the dark.” (Identifying mutations
of the COVID virus. Dr. David Relman of Stanford University.)
consciousness & awareness: plane
blind alley (noun)
ran into blind alleys
he ~ (a scientist)
lead him down blind alleys
his dribbling skills would ~ (young soccer phenom)
success & failure: infrastructure / journeys & trips
progress & lack of progress: infrastructure / journeys &
trips
blind date
blind date
I was on a ~ with this great guy
sight: eye
blinded
blinded by love
I was so ~ that I didn't see the problem in front of me
consciousness & awareness: eye
perception, perspective & point of view: eye
blinder (noun)
narrow blinders
it takes self-awareness to view the world without ~
blinders fell from her eyes
she recalled how the ~ (she thought he loved only her)
viewed through the blinders
every issue is ~ of a particular interest (government)
♦ Blinders are the same as blinkers.
perception, perspective & point of view: eye / horse
consciousness & awareness: eye / horse
Page 143 of 1574
blindfold (noun)
America’s blindfold
~ was finally coming off (COVID spreading in US)
consciousness & awareness: eye
blinding
blinding sandstorm
another day of ~s and battlefield confusion (Iraq)
a ~ in Baghdad forced the postponement of…
blinding whiteout
a snowstorm caused a ~ (50-vehicle pileup)
sight: eye
blindly
blindly committed
the IMF is ~ to the policy of…
commitment & determination: eye
blind side (from the blind side)
blind side
fire team approaches the bunker from its ~
sight: eye
blindsided
blindsided by his action
we were ~
blindsided by Johnson’s announcement
the Lakers were clearly ~ (“Magic” Earvin resigns)
blindside by (nude-photos) leak
Jennifer Lawrence ~
readiness & preparedness: eye
consciousness & awareness: eye
blind spot
blind spot
it’s a ~ so enormous we barely notice it (concern for future)
ethical blind spot
he has an ~ regarding the appearance of impropriety
confronting, dealing with & ignoring things: eye
consciousness & awareness: eye
perception, perspective & point of view: eye
blink (conflict)
blink
America will not ~ in the fight against terrorists
there’s a conflict here and somebody has to ~ (politics)
blink first
who will ~ in this third set (tennis / Wimbledon)
blinks first
so it becomes a case of who ~ (the West vs. Iran)
blinked and then backed down
Obama ~ (Syria crosses red line)
feeling, emotion & effect: eye
conflict / confronting, dealing with & ignoring things /
dominance & submission / resistance, opposition & defeat:
animal / eye / gesture / verb
blink (in the blink of an eye)
in the blink of an eye
and ~ it let go (cougar attack)
my family disappeared ~ (pandemic)
flowering plants conquered the world seemingly ~
speed: eye
blink (light)
blinked its lights
a Mercedes ~
resemblance: eye / verb
blinkered (adjective)
blinkered denial
his ~ of what is obvious tells us all we need to know
blinkered narrow-mindedness
if only the Western media could shed its ~
perception, perspective & point of view: horse / eye
consciousness & awareness: horse / eye
blinkers (noun)
pulls away the blinkers
she ~, widening the focus (The Gun, the Ship, and the Pen)
♦ Blinkers are the same as blinders.
perception, perspective & point of view: horse / eye
consciousness & awareness: horse / eye
blip (noun)
blip
the drop may simply be a “~” (deaths from virus)
blip of cases
we don’t want these ~ to become resurgences of cases
blip of coverage
after a mere ~, it fell off the front pages (club fire)
blip on the radar screen
Ecstasy is no longer a ~ (the club scene)
blip on the (campaign) radar
foreign policy was barely a ~ (2019 electioneering)
blip on the (historical) radar
the industry is such a small ~ right now
blip in the data
is it a trend or just a ~
blip in the history of the United States
in some ways, Prohibition seems like a ~
Page 144 of 1574
blip or a lasting feature
economists disagree over whether it is a short-term ~
blip or a trend
is his loss a ~ (electoral defeat)
blip or a lasting trend
is the record number of women candidates a ~
blip or a hint of the future
are falling oil prices a ~
short-term blip
it may be a ~ or a lasting feature (wage inflation)
temporary blip
the figures suggest a recovery, not just a ~ (economy)
his success was still dismissed as a ~ (young politician)
slight blips
police report only ~ in security plans
tiny little blip
the Wuhan virus will be “a ~ on the horizon” (prediction)
barely a blip
for the young, the nuclear test is ~ (not important)
just a blip
the decrease in the daily death toll may be ~ (pandemic)
movement or a blip
is it a ~ (voters elect socialist mayor in US)
ignored the movement as a blip
many ~ that would never break into the mainstream (gays)
♦ Oscillographs and radar screens have blips.
importance & significance: size / tools & technology
presence & absence: size / tools & technology
starting, going, continuing & ending: size / tools &
technology
blistering (adjective)
blistering attacks
many groups have issued ~ on her (a journalist)
blistering comment
a ~ came from….
blistering speech
Greta Thunberg gave a ~ at the climate summit
feeling, emotion & effect: sensation / skin, muscle, nerves
& bone
blitz (campaign)
blitz by the White House
the news precipitated a public-relations ~
blitz of (negative) advertising
there has been a ~ (politics)
blitz surrounding her (latest) album
the promotional ~
blitz chess
Carlsen beat Karpov in a game of ~
media blitz
a local ~ keeps her picture on the front pages (missing)
publicity blitz
a ~ arranged by advisers (for a politician)
public-relations blitz
the news precipitated a ~ by the White House
advertising blitz
a lavish ~ (for Microsoft software)
promotional blitz
the ~ surrounding her latest album (singer)
waging a (full-scale media) blitz
he has been ~ (ex-politician promotes his book)
amount & effect / attention, scrutiny & promotion /
campaign: military / weapon
blizzard (consciousness)
“blizzard of everything”
a life lived online in the ~ (Patricia Lockwood character)
feeling their way in a blizzard
financial analysts are ~, squinting through the snow
consciousness & awareness: snow & ice / weather &
climate
blizzard (noun)
blizzard
with the ~ in full fury, I sent out a tweet (a Twitter storm)
blizzard of (red, white and blue) confetti
a ~ (New Years in Time Square)
blizzard of fire
there was a ~ at the intersection (combat)
blizzard of intruders
we are constantly faced by a positive ~ (pathogens)
blizzard of punches
he has withstood a ~ (a boxer)
he would throw a ~ (prior to fight / Muhammad Ali)
blizzard of (new) regulations
businesspeople have been affected by a ~
blizzard of speculation
there has been a ~ (honeymoon murder)
blizzard of facts and figures
it is included in a ~ that obscures…
Scorsesian blizzard
there is a ~ of directors’ names (during an interview)
♦ "The blizzard was what we called a purga, during which the
temperature can drop well below zero, with the gale so violent that it will
lift roofs off houses and uproot trees. Walking during a purga is out of the
question. As a rule every blizzard is accompanied by loss of life. / Around
us the scene was unbelievable... / We shrank back in our tents and sat in
silent awe…" (Dersu Uzala by V. K. Arseniev.)
Page 145 of 1574
amount & effect: snow & ice / storm
bloated (size)
bloated budget
the US must resolve its ~
bloated bureaucracy
the ~ isn't keeping us safer (national security)
bloated inbox
a ~ is a familiar headache
bloated and inefficient
our intelligence agencies are ~
refugee-bloated (m)
a ~ population
size: fatness & thinness / health & medicine
block (around the block)
around the block
he has been ~ and fought for world titles (a boxer)
experience: infrastructure
block (obstacle)
writer’s block
but sometimes ~ hits and I can’t think of a way to start
♦ In the dictionary I use, there is no entry for “writer’s block” but there is
an entry for “writer’s cramp.”
♦ “The log jam broke.” (Writer’s block.)
obstacles & impedance: wall
block (out of the blocks)
quick out of the blocks
Liverpool were ~ in the second half (soccer)
starting, going, continuing & ending: sports & games
blockbuster (noun)
blockbuster
the modern age of ~s (films)
blockbuster antidepressant
Prozac, its ~ (drug company)
blockbuster (IMAX) film
the ~ Everest
blockbuster (fraud) suit
the agency brought a ~ against the company
blockbuster writer
such ~s as…
* Blockbusters were high-explosive bombs dropped on cities in World
War II.
amount & effect / attention, scrutiny & promotion / feeling,
emotion & effect / success & failure: explosion / weapon
blogosphere (in the blogosphere)
in the blogosphere
the videos appear to be firmly entrenched ~
computer: earth & world / place
blogosphere (other)
blogosphere
the ~ is alight with conspiracy theories
percolating (for years) around the blogosphere
the argument has been ~
computer: earth & world / place
blood (in one's blood)
in his blood
he has politics and showmanship ~ (Gov. Andrew Cuomo)
it was in his genes, ~ (Calvin Klein sketches as kid)
in my blood
it wasn't ~ (working in family business)
this place is ~ (High Street resident / Newark)
the city is ~ (Baghdad)
in our blood
cricket is ~ (A Pakistani fan)
the love of jade is ~ (a Han Chinese)
gets in your blood
it ~ (helping others at Arlington National Cemetery)
♦ "The city is in my blood, the ruins of its palaces, the mosques and the
river." (An Iraqi, speaking of Baghdad.)
♦ "He has aviation fuel running through his veins.” Said of an ex-RAF, exBA pilot who flies airshows.
identity & nature: blood
blood (identity)
family blood
our ~ says never give up, continue on (Nik Wallenda)
drop of Russian blood
there was not a ~ in her veins (Catherine the Great)
♦ “I may be from Tampa, but my blood is in Cuba... I have a lot of family
still left in Cuba.” (Kevin Morejon, protesting in Florida.)
identity & nature: blood
blood (in cold blood)
shoot her (3 times) in cold blood
how could he ~....
feeling, emotion & effect: blood / temperature
blood (blood on one's hands, etc.)
blood on his hands
he has ~ (terrorist financier)
blood on their hands
we say they have ~ (companies that used slaves)
has blood on his hands
he ~ (a politician)
drenched in blood
Page 146 of 1574
his hands were ~ (a terrorist)
drenched Russia in blood
he has ~ (Stalin)
guilt / involvement / responsibility: blood / hand
blood (smell blood)
scent blood
Mr Prayuth’s enemies ~ (Thailand)
smell blood
they ~ (victory in tournament)
smells blood
the opposition Labor Party ~ (vote of no confidence)
smell blood in the water
Republicans ~
conflict: animal / blood / predation / verb
blood (blood in one’s eyes, etc.)
with blood in their eyes
other soldiers, ~, came up and threatened to shoot him
♦ see also mist (red mist), red (see red)
feeling, emotion & effect / violence: blood / color / mental
health
blood (out for blood)
out for blood
she is ~ (vindictive)
conflict / punishment & recrimination: animal / blood /
predation
blood (draw blood)
drawn blood
nobody has ~ yet (chess match with 8 draws)
conflict: animal / blood / predation
blood (blood boils)
blood boils
my ~ when I see violations (traffic)
feeling, emotion & effect: blood / temperature
blood (blood runs cold)
made my blood run cold
and then he said something that ~ (violence)
feeling, emotion & effect: blood / temperature
blood (young blood, etc.)
fresh blood
the king might reshuffle his cabinet to inject ~
young blood
the US must add ~ to its veteran roster (women's soccer)
experience: blood
blood (bad blood)
bad blood
the ~ started early (politics)
bad blood between them
there is ~
conflict: blood
blood (effort)
blood and sacrifice
all the ~ we made up to his point is for nothing (war)
blood and treasure
we have wasted an enormous amount of ~ in Afghanistan
it’s a complete waste in terms of ~ (Afghanistan)
President Johnson reflected on the cost in ~ (Vietnam War)
we need to pull out and save American ~ (Afghanistan)
blood, sweat and tears
he gave the franchise 20 years of his ~ (Kobe Bryant)
blood, treasure and effort
after so many years, and so much ~ (US in Afghanistan)
sweat and blood
a lot of ~ went into it (making a film)
difficulty, easiness & effort: blood / sign, signal, symbol
sacrifice: blood / sign, signal, symbol
blood (blood represents life)
blood and tears
enough of ~, enough (Palestinian-Israeli conflict)
treasure and blood
how much more can we give in ~ (foreign wars)
death & life: blood / sign, signal, symbol
bloodbath (noun)
bloodbath
there's going to be a ~ (a football game)
‘Blood Bath’
political fighting could make redistricting a ~ (Texas)
bloodbath in tech stocks
there was a ~ (Dow)
partisan bloodbath
he turned the hearings into a ~ (politics)
conflict: blood / violence
blood brother (connection)
blood brothers
soldiering and drinking have always been ~
relationship: blood / family
division & connection: blood / family
Page 147 of 1574
bloodhound (noun)
bloodhound
he’s a born ~ who lives to track the scent of malfeasance
searching & discovery: animal / dog / hunting
pursuit, capture & escape: animal / dog / hunting
blood sport (noun)
blood sport
when law and politics were a noble pursuit, not a ~ (the past)
blood sport of politics
I would not be deterred by the ~ (Hillary R. Clinton)
blood sport of (party) politics
the ~ drives the US media
bloodsport of (Red vs. Blue party) politics
the ~ drives the US media
tabloid blood sport
she became the target of ~ (Britney Spears)
Washington blood sport
even by the lowly standards of ~, this was bare-knuckled
politics
♦ Blood sports include dog fighting, bullfighting, fox-hunting, cockfighting,
and bear-baiting.
conflict: animal / blood / predation / sports & games /
violence
bloodthirsty (adjectivity)
bloodthirsty zeal
the ~ of revisionist history
behavior: animal / blood / predation
character & personality: animal / blood / predation
bloody (guilt)
hands are bloody
his ~ (a politician)
guilt / responsibility: blood
bloody (conflict)
bloody (intraparty) quarrel
it’s not what Republicans wanted, a ~ (politics)
conflict: blood
bloom (verb)
bloomed
their relationship ~
membership (in professional social networks) has ~
his career has ~
romance ~
his paranoia ~
bloomed in the role
she truly ~ (an actor)
bloomed into an international incident
the case has ~
bloomed into a showroom
his small home shop has ~
bloomed during the last decade
interest has ~ (new literature theory)
bloomed as a teenager
she ~ (physically)
bloomed intellectually
that year our daughter ~ (in a gifted class)
bloomed late
their careers both ~ (successful athletes)
romance bloomed
in this emotional wasteland, ~ (divorce)
growth & development: plant / verb
bloom (bloom has faded, etc.)
bloom is off the rose
at 30, the ~ of both grownup life and their careers
bloom had faded
as soon as the first ~ of my work... (a writer)
decline: plant
bloomer (late bloomer)
late bloomer
as someone who has always considered himself a ~...
timeliness & lack of timeliness: fruits & vegetables / plant
growth & development: death & life / fruits & vegetables /
plant
blossom (verb)
blossomed
he has ~ after a slow start (a Chelsea soccer player)
blossomed into (real) depression
my uncertainty had ~ (the future)
blossomed into (full-blown) panic
the thought ~
blossomed into warfare
simmering resentments ~ (two politicians)
blossoming in the Middle East
a revolutionary spirit is ~
blossom out of control
the consequences can ~ (problems on 767 jetliner)
blossomed all over the country
now citizens' groups have ~
groups have blossomed
now citizens' ~ all over the country (Siberia)
love (for yo-yos) blossomed
his ~ again
Page 148 of 1574
growth & development: plant / verb
blot (noun)
blot on his record
his racial ideas appear to modern eyes as a ~ (Churchill)
blot on our reputation
renditions and torture will long remain a ~ (US in Iraq)
flaws & lack of flaws: mark
reputation: mark
blow (body blow, etc.)
body blow to the home team
the goal was a ~ (soccer)
body blow for Biden
it’s been a ~ (politics)
body blow to Manchester United
make no mistake, this is a ~ (loss to Middlesbrough)
Body Blow for Assad's regime
“A ~” (title of article)
knock-out blow
he was unable to land a ~ on Amy Klobuchar (politics)
knockout blow
the air campaign failed to deliver a ~ (Iraqi Freedom)
the ~ was delivered when… (investigation / indictments)
feeling, emotion & effect: boxing / fist / sensation
blow (bitter blow, etc.)
blow
this is not a ~ but a boost
blow to the city
the decision is an embarrassing ~
blows to this community
a string of crushing ~
blow to our defense
losing him, it's a huge ~ (football)
blow to the environment
loss of the reefs will be a major ~
blow to the regime
loss of the airport was a huge psychological ~ (war)
blow to the city's reputation
the violence is a ~ (Rio / carnival)
blow to the (farmworkers) union
the Supreme Court’s decision was a mortal ~
dagger blow
we must deal sharp ~s to the terrorists
knockout blow
the air campaign failed to deliver a ~ (Iraqi Freedom)
the ~ was delivered when… (indictments)
crippling blow
his death dealt a ~ to his network (a terrorist)
crushing blow
a string of ~s to this community
devastating blow
loss of the coral reefs would be a ~
embarrassing blow
the decision is an ~ to the city
stinging blow
the death of a donor dealt the hospital's reputation a ~
bitter blow
the defeat was a ~ for Serbia and Montenegro (soccer)
final blow
they saw the confrontation as the ~ (firing)
huge blow
losing him, it's a ~ to our defense (football)
major blow
loss of the reefs will be a ~ to the environment
mortal blow
the law would strike a ~ to a system that... (athletics)
the Supreme Court’s decision was a ~ to the union
psychological blow
the takeover was a huge ~ to the regime (airport)
sharp (dagger) blow
we must deal ~s to the terrorists
string of (crushing) blows
a ~ to this community
soften the blow
he tried to ~ (economic news)
Boeing will try to ~ for them (supply chain)
deal a blow against the enemy
we will ~
dealt a (heavy) blow to Hamas
the offensive has ~ (Israel attacks Gaza)
feeling, emotion & effect: fist / sensation
blowback (noun)
blowback risk
the ~ to Sanders is real (a political endorsement)
explosive blowback
the group faced ~ when it... (Southern Poverty Law Center)
legal blowback
the ~ forced the company into bankruptcy (opioids)
political blowback
you can't attack Wall Street without ~
getting blowback
she is already ~ on how and when schools should reopen
Page 149 of 1574
♦ “Brady just happened to be the blowback. He got caught up in the
blowback, Skip, the collateral damage, that’s what Brady is. And so, it
was a blast radius. He dropped the bomb, ‘I got BA [Bruce Arians], I got
the Tampa medical staff, I got...’ and Tom Brady and Guerrero, they got
caught up in that, Skip, the blast radius. (Shannon Sharpe talking with
Skip Bayless on their great sports show “Undisputed” about the Antonio
Brown controversy of January 2022.)
reversal: explosion / weapon
resistance, opposition & defeat: explosion / weapon
blow-by-blow (a blow-by-blow account,
etc.)
blow-by-blow account
he gave me a ~ of what had happened
sequence / speech: boxing
blow-in (noun)
blow-in
he is not quite a native but he’s not a ~, an outsider
migration: bird / wind
coming, arriving, staying, leaving & returning: bird / wind
blown away
blown away
I was ~
prepare to be blown away
~ (a TV ad for a new movie)
feeling, emotion & effect: explosion / weapon
blow off (verb)
blew him off
at first, she said, she ~ (dismissed him)
dismissal, removal & resignation: breathing / verb
blowout (noun)
blowout
the fight was a ~ (easy victory)
difficulty, easiness & effort: explosion
blow over (verb)
things blow over
we'll be gone until ~
reconciliation, resolution & conclusion: storm / verb / wind
starting, going, continuing & ending: storm / verb / wind
blow up (destroy / disrupt)
blow up the norms
he did more to ~ than any five majority leaders (McConnell)
blow up the system
we want to ~ (anti-Nancy Pelosi young democrats)
blow up Wall Street
the guy who helped ~ (Michael Osinski)
blew up the Senate
this is the guy who ~ in the Obama years (McConnell)
destruction / disruption: explosion / verb
blow up (blow up on TikTok, etc.)
blew up
the case ~ (attention paid to child abduction)
it had a signature dance that ~ with it (song “Hot Boy”)
blew up on TikTok
his song ~
blowing up on our help line
this is such a popular scam, it is ~ (rental cars)
blowing up on TikTok
I want to talk about an artist who is ~ (Blanco Brown)
blew up with congratulations
coaches’ phones ~
blowing up with texts
my phone starts ~ from Cari (I hate you, etc.)
blew up from other schools
my phone ~, “Are we in danger...” (superintendent shot)
blown up the internet
the nursing community has ~ rallying to her cause (nurse)
increase & decrease / initiation: explosion / verb
attention, scrutiny & promotion: explosion / verb
amount & effect: explosion / verb
blowup (attention / noun)
song’s massive blowup
the ~ is partially thanks to TikTok
increase & decrease / initiation: explosion
attention, scrutiny & promotion: explosion
blow up (blow up in one's face)
blow up in his face
it could ~ (if he ignored the infraction)
blown up in our face
this has ~ (supporting Somali warlords)
reversal: explosion / verb / weapon
blow up (emotion)
blew up
I couldn’t take it anymore and I just ~
blew up over the issue
a recent city council meeting ~ (immigration)
♦ One hundred forty people were killed when a boiler blew up on a
steamship in 1838. (See the Wikipedia entry “Steamship Pulaski
disaster.”)
feeling, emotion & effect / initiation: explosion / pressure /
verb / weapon
blowup (conflict)
blowup
Page 150 of 1574
there's going to be a ~ (controversy)
initiation: explosion / pressure / weapon
conflict: explosion / pressure / weapon
blue (out of the blue, etc.)
out of the blue
I was thinking of calling her when ~ she called me
pulmonary edema can, ~, strike down the best climber
absolutely out of the blue
her disappearance was ~
totally out of the blue
then something ~ happened... (a murder investigation)
bolt-from-the-blue
any US military action will look like a ~ act of aggression
appear out of the blue
a thunderstorm can ~
appears out of the blue
an electrical problem ~ (HomeWire)
came out of the blue
nobody could do anything about the pandemic, it ~ (boxing)
came (quite) out of the blue
the "genius award” ~ (John D. MacArthur Foundation)
comes out of the blue
it ~ and you don’t know when it will hit you (pandemics)
♦ “In southern Indiana lightning struck a ball field, injuring four members
of the Seymour girl’s high school softball team. One of the girls was in
critical condition, while the other three sustained non-critical injuries...
The skies were reportedly clear at the time of the strike.”
fate, fortune & chance: color / electricity / lightning / sky /
storm
appearance & disappearance / occurrence / origin: air /
atmosphere / color / lightning / sky
blue (politics)
blue state
is Iowa at this point a red state or a ~
♦ "Is Iowa at this point a red state or a blue state?" "Iowa is still a purple
state." (US politics, as talked about on NPR.)
♦ “Red, R, Reagan, that’s why we chose red.” (A network broadcaster
during the 1984 presidential election, explaining why states that had
gone for Reagan were colored red on a national map. Democratic states
were colored blue.)
identity & nature: color
blue (feeling)
broken and blue
and so if I seem ~, walk on by (Dionne Warwick)
feeling blue
I'm ~
♦ “But when I’m down, and feeling blue, I close my eyes so I can be with
you.” (Irene Cara.)
feeling, emotion & effect: color
blue blood
fellow blue-bloods
North Carolina and ~ Kentucky and Duke (basketball teams)
hierarchy / superiority & inferiority: blood / color / royalty
blueprint
blueprint
they had to figure it out for themselves, there was no ~
FDR didn’t have a ~, he was an experimenter (New Deal)
blueprint about what
there is no ~ to do next
blueprint for change
the plan is a ~, for action
blueprint for a better future
clean energy is a ~
blueprint for reforming
his ~ education has some good points
administration's blueprint
the ~ calls on states to adopt new standards
education blueprint
the president will send his ~ to Congress
draw up a blueprint
leaders met to ~ for economic cooperation
script: infrastructure
blues (the blues)
coronavirus blues
five glimmers of hope to beat the ~ (BBC)
feeling, emotion & effect: color / music
blue whale
blue whale
it’s what a journalist might call a ~ (a story)
♦ “So it’s this vital, forgotten buried event that’s what journalists might call
a blue whale, it’s this event that sounded and sank in the past, dwelled
unspoken for years and decades, and then it resurfaced in our present
time, specifically in the wake of the Pulse Nightclub Shooting... And it
sings this really strange song of a very different past...” (Robert W.
Fieseler, speaking about his book Tinderbox: The Untold Story of the Up
Stairs Lounge Fire and the Rise of Gay Liberation.)
♦ see also black swan.
appearance & disappearance / fate, fortune & chance /
occurrence: animal / color / sea
bluff (verb)
bluffing
is the party ~, will they really do it (politics)
she thinks I’m ~ but I’m not
bluffing on Brexit
the EU is not ~
bluffing over the terms
Page 151 of 1574
we are not ~ (diplomacy)
bluff his way out of it
he managed to ~ (a sticky situation)
position, policy & negotiation / sincerity, lack of sincerity &
honesty / strategy / strength & weakness / subterfuge:
cards / gambling / verb
bluff (noun)
call your bluff
you're lucky she didn't ~ (negotiations)
position, policy & negotiation / sincerity, lack of sincerity &
honesty / strategy / strength & weakness / subterfuge:
cards / gambling
blunt (speech)
blunt
he is ~ (speech)
sincerity, lack of sincerity & honesty: speech
speech: blade / knife / force
blush (embarrassment)
saved Welsh blushes
his header ~ (soccer)
feeling, emotion & effect: blood / gesture / skin, muscle,
nerves & bone
board (on board)
on board with (Mursi's) changes
if the military is ~…
on board with the plan
she is not really ~
bring people on board
they've gone out of their way to ~ (developer)
climbing on board
many voters are ~ (politics)
get the managers on board
we need to ~ (workplace flexibility)
hopped on board
other companies have ~ (normcore fashion, music, etc.)
jumped on board
Harvard ~ last month (sex / romance policy)
keep them on board
it was hard to ~
unanimity & consensus: boat / train
allegiance, support & betrayal: boat / train
board (off the board / euphemism)
off the board
the two other members of the ISIS cell are already ~
death & life: euphemism
boast (verb)
boast of its (statistically high) success rate
every summit allows a company to ~ (Mt. Everest)
fictive communication: speech / verb
boat (boat of science, etc.)
boat of science
he rocked the ~ (Pasteur)
♦ “[He] splashed up a great wave of excitement about microbes that
rocked the boat of science for thirty years.” (Pasteur. From Microbe
Hunters by Paul De Kruif.)
bases: boat
boat (in the same boat)
in the same boat
all the teams are ~ (concerns about fuel)
empathy & lack of empathy / situation: boat
unanimity & consensus: boat
boat (rock the boat)
rock the boat
they can be expected to ~
rock (Mr. Erdogan’s) boat
the EU does not want to ~ (immigrants)
rocked the boat
he ~ of science (Pasteur)
rocks the boat
if anyone ~, it’s not going to be me
♦ He wasn’t there to rock the boat, he intended to sink it.
disruption / equilibrium & stability: boat
unanimity & consensus / society: boat
sanctioning, authority & non-conformity: boat
boat (slow boat to China)
proverbial slow boat to China
what must have seemed the ~
speed / timeliness & lack of timeliness: boat
boat (burn one’s boats)
burned the boats
we ~, the only way home was through them (sports)
♦ See the Wikipedia entry, “Point of no return.” Cortes supposedly began
his conquest of Mexico by burning his boats; the Bounty mutineers
certainly burned the Bounty after reaching Pitcairn Island.
commitment & determination / fate, fortune & chance:
allusion / history / journeys & trips / river
body (body of the plane, etc.)
body of the device
the needle retracts into the ~ after use (safety syringe)
bases: body
Page 152 of 1574
body (body economic, etc.)
body economic
his description of the ~ had appeal (Adam Smith)
body politic
see body politic
bases: body
body (body of literacy, etc.)
body of world literacy
the magazine is an open running sore on the ~
sore on the body
the magazine is an open running ~ of world literacy
bases: body
body count (actual)
coronavirus body count
with a ~ exceeding... (politics)
death & life: military
body count (figurative)
professional body count
there has been quite a ~ (firings, replacements)
♦ see also casualty (noun)
dismissal, removal & resignation: death & life / military
body politic
body politic
Republicans kowtow to the ~
body politic versus the body natural
the ~ and how it related to sovereignty and Kings
China’s body politic
the damage that the British did to ~ was echoed in...
diseases of our body politic
more fundamental causes of the current ~
scar upon the body politic
homelessness is a ~
sore in the body politic
Bloody Sunday became a running ~ (Ireland)
injecting poison into the body politic
they are ~ (Fox News, etc.)
plaguing the body politic
he presents a litany of ills that are ~
poisoning our body politic
the media is ~, and hurting our entire country
bases: body
bogeyman (and boogeyman)
bogeyman of many
Venezuela has become the ~ on the right (politics)
Islamist bogeyman
the US is obsessed with the ~ (foreign policy)
creates a boogeyman
the myth ~ to stir up fear and repression (white anarchists)
affliction: creature
bogged down
bogged down in (federal) bureaucracy
the plan got ~ (to restore the Everglades)
bogged down in (scientific) squabbles
the test has been ~ and bureaucratic foot-dragging
bogged down in the (UN) system
the US is ~
bogged down by red tape
rescue efforts got ~ (Kobe earthquake)
overloaded, bogged down
hospitals are ~ (epidemic)
get bogged down
if they ~ at some bottleneck like the Hillary Step (Everest)
got bogged down
the plan ~ in federal bureaucracy (environment)
rescue efforts ~ by red tape (Kobe earthquake)
♦ “Making our way through the submerged forest was no easy job. The
mules sank up to their knees in the mud, fell into deep holes, and
exhausted themselves. / It was not till dusk that we managed to reach
the hills on the right side of the valley. The mules were dead beat, but
the men were still more tired.” (Dersu Uzala by V. K. Arseniev.)
obstacles & impedance: ground, terrain & land / journeys &
trips
boil (affliction)
perpetual boil
this ~ needs to be lanced (diplomacy)
two boils
~ were lanced today (fired from The New York Times)
affliction: health & medicine / skin, muscle, nerves & bone
boil (initiation)
emotions are boiling
~ (Tea Party advocates in US)
tension are boiling
~ (police shooting and verdict)
makes my blood boil
it ~ (removal of fairy doors from forest)
initiation: heating water / temperature / verb / water
feeling, emotion & effect: temperature / verb / water
activity: heating water / temperature / water
boil (boil down to something)
boil down to
but what does all this jargon ~
Page 153 of 1574
boils down to
eventually it all ~ do I want a car or....
boils down to this
it all ~...
boil down to the following
your options ~...
boils down to cost
the matter ~...
boiled down to the fact
today it ~ we didn't get the bounces (loss / soccer)
boils down to one (major) issue
the debate usually ~...
boil down to a (chronic) lack
others say Metro's problems ~ of rail cars
boiled down to choice and safety
the issue ~ (midwifery)
boiled down to two (simple) things
his allure ~: money and power (drugs)
analysis, interpretation & explanation: heating water /
temperature / water / verb
bases: heating water / temperature / water / verb
boilerplate (noun)
boilerplate
some of the charges seemed routine, almost ~ (crime)
boilerplate about "common sense and compromise"
there was nothing new, just ~
boilerplate element
it contained the ~s of any rejection letter
boilerplate ideologies
they just repeat the ~ of their respective sides (a talk show)
boilerplate motion
it's a ~ filed by many defendants
boiler-plate points
he made all the ~ (a politician)
boilerplate sentimentality
the production is steeped in ~ (a play)
boilerplate statement
the auditor's report was little more than a ~
boilerplate stuff
the ~ you’d expect in any trial (jury-selection questions)
legal boilerplate
the warning was mere ~ (company’s filing)
upbeat management boilerplate
it was written in the idiom of ~
♦ “Along with host Augusta Dell’Omo, Natalie takes us on a deep dive
into... “ (Right Rising / RR on Stitcher. In other episodes Michael takes us
on a deep dive into...; Sophie takes us on a deep dive into...; Simon
takes us on a deep dive into...; Ashton takes us on a deep dive into...;
Ashley takes us on a deep dive into...; and Julia takes us on a deep dive
into... That’s a lot of divers and diving! The repetition shows how a
figurative expression can go from novel to cliché to the kind of boilerplate
language you might find in a disclaimer or label that is too boring to read.
Guests break down, unpack, unpick, discuss, walk us through, give us
an overview of, and help us with their respective topics.)
♦ see also buzzword (noun), ese (legalese, etc.), funny language,
language (of sports, cars, etc.), lip service (pay lip service, etc.), speak
(NASA-speak, etc.), supersizing (linguistic supersizing), talk (mediator
talk, etc.)
script: manufacturing / tools & technology
language: speech
boiling point
reached a boiling point
the crisis has ~
sent (racial) tensions to a boiling point
his death ~ (Amadou Diallo, shot by police)
feeling, emotion & effect / initiation: heating water /
temperature / water
boil over (verb)
boiling over
as the #MeToo movement was ~, he was cooked (a chef)
anger boiled over
his ~ Monday when he… (student shoots professors)
crisis was boiling over
the energy ~
party boiled over
a ~ (violence)
resentment boiled over
her ~ and we had a big fight (husband / wife)
streets are boiling over
the ~ (Egyptian protests)
about to boil over
the situation is ~
feeling, emotion & effect / initiation: heating water /
temperature / verb / water
Bolshevik
bolshevik against the science
Jules Bordet was a little ~ of his master, Metchnikoff
little bolshevik
he was a ~ against the phagocyte science (Bordet)
“saboteur” and “Bolshevik”
he was called a ~ (lexicographer Philip Babcock Grove)
♦ Stalin visited his old mother and regaled her with stories about how
nice the Kremlin was, how deep the carpets were, how nice the furniture.
His old mother listened, and her brows knit. “But Soso,” she said. “What
if the Bolsheviks come back?”
disruption: allusion / history / violence
bolster (verb)
bolster our forces against the enemy
Page 154 of 1574
we must ~
bolsters his analysis with an army
he ~ of statistics
bolster their arguments
to ~ the Egyptians… (NTSB investigation)
bolstered its capabilities
the Coast Guard has ~ for port security
bolster their case
to ~, FBI officials have prepared a… (terrorism)
bolster (babies') health
living with a dog or a cat may ~ (germs)
bolster morale
hot food and the Internet ~ (US military in Iraq)
bolster the myth
this has helped to ~ that children… (intersexed)
bolstered the notion
archaeological expeditions ~ of… (archaeology)
bolster patrols
the Highway Patrol has hired 150 new officers to ~
bolster his reputation
he was just shooting off his mouth to ~
bolster security
funds to ~ for nuclear weapons and waste (terrorism)
amelioration & renewal: infrastructure / verb
protection & lack of protection: infrastructure / verb
strength & weakness: infrastructure / verb
bolstered
bolstered by the courage
~ of their teammate, they won the game easily
bolstered by (a handful of) studies
his insights are ~
bolstered by the work
his conclusions were ~ of…
findings are bolstered
experts say the ~ by the fact that…
amelioration & renewal: infrastructure
protection & lack of protection: infrastructure
bolt-hole (and bolthole)
bolthole for the world’s shadow elite
it provides a ~ (the UAE)
♦ The woodchuck, feeling threatened, bolts to its hole.
protection & lack of protection: animal / hole
bomb (review-bomb)
review-bomb the game
audiences were so offended they proceeded to ~
computer: explosion / military / weapon
bomb (danger)
bomb cyclone
West Coast braces for ‘~’ (CNN Weather Center)
“lava bomb”
a ball of solidified molten rock, also known as a ~
weather bomb
Vancouver Island feeling the wrath of the coastal ~
ticking bomb
we must control it, it’s a ~ (online influence campaigns
he was a “~” planning to carry out attacks (a terrorist)
ticking bomb for any woman
he was a ~ involved with him, glad he’s in a cell
♦ “Any excuse to say Bomb cyclone and I am ON. BOARD.”
(#BombCylcone)
♦ ‘Lava bomb’ speeds down Cumbre Vieja volcano (© Harri Geiger @
Harrigeiger. Super!)
♦ see also time bomb
danger: explosion / military / weapon
bomb (roach bomb, etc.)
roach bombs
you can buy rat-resistant trash cans and ~ (at a store)
♦ “A New York City woman set off 21 bug bombs insider her apartment,
causing an explosion that collapsed her five-story building, injuring 14
people.”
resemblance: explosion
bomb (code bomb)
"code bomb"
after he was demoted, he inserted a ~ (hacker)
computer: explosion / weapon
bomb (drop a bomb)
dropped this bomb
Assange ~ without providing any evidence
dropped that little bomb in there
you just kind of ~ that you yourself got COVID (NPR)
amount & effect: explosion / weapon
attention, scrutiny & promotion: explosion / sound /
weapon
bomb (fail)
bombed
his previous movie had ~
bomb at a comedy club
so badly does he ~
success & failure: explosion / weapon
bombard (verb)
bombarded principals with messages
parents ~ (worried for kids)
Page 155 of 1574
bombard him with complaints
the young men he employed would ~
bombarded Friedel from all directions
Mexico ~ (soccer)
amount & effect: explosion / military / verb / weapon
bombarded
bombarded with notices about today’s deadline
her neighborhood has been ~ to file for compensation
bombarded with emails from opponents
lawmakers were ~
bombarded with faxes from around the world
the president's office was ~ from around the world
bombarded with complaints
the company was ~
bombarded by (job) offers from companies
he was ~
bombarded by hateful emails
she is being ~
bombarded by (visual and auditory) stimuli
we are constantly ~
bombarded by (so many unspecific) warnings
citizens have been ~ (terror)
bombarded by new ideas
in 1999, China was being ~ (due to Internet)
amount & effect: explosion / military / weapon
bombardment (noun)
bombardment of (food) advertising
the constant ~ (health)
amount & effect: explosion / military / weapon
bombproof
bombproof
your pro should be ~ (climbing)
bombproof roll
you need a ~ (kayaking)
flaws & lack of flaws: explosion
bombshell (noun)
bombshell
dropping a real-life ~ from his past
bombshell of a story
what a ~ (the horse Justified failed doping test)
bombshell claim
the ~ came on cross-examination (murder trial)
economic bombshell
the president dropped an ~ when he announced...
new bombshells
stayed tuned for ~ (entertainment TV)
bombshell landed
perhaps the most jaw-dropping ~ just 3 days ago (trial)
dropped his bombshell
he ~ (a lawyer)
fired (back) a bombshell
she ~ (divorce back-and-forth)
amount & effect / attention, scrutiny & promotion / feeling,
emotion & effect: explosion / military / sound / weapon
bonanza (noun)
bonanza of waves
the storm has created a ~ for surfers (hurricane)
bonanza for credit card companies
the move away from cash has been a ~
propaganda bonanza
the attack was a ~ for the insurgents
marketing bonanza
his success has been a ~ (Japanese ballplayer)
commercial bonanza
the drug has been a ~
financial bonanza
the ~ from Turkmenistan's gas fields
activity / amount & effect / cost & benefit / worth & lack of
worth: mining / money
bond (noun)
invisible bonds
the ~ that weave a country together into a single polity
attachment / division & connection: chemistry
bone (close to the bone, etc.)
close to the bone
his arrest hit ~
proximity: skin, muscle, nerves & bone
bone (cut something to the bone, etc.)
cut his rations to the bone
Shackleton had taken risks, he had ~
pared to the bone
the delegation has been ~ (government trip abroad)
♦ see also pared (pared to the bone)
dismissal, removal & resignation / sufficiency, insufficiency
& excess: knife / skin, muscle, nerves & bone
bone (racist bone, etc.)
bone in my body
I have not one evil ~
Page 156 of 1574
political bone
he doesn’t have a ~ in his body (a military man)
racist bone
there’s not a ~ in my body
I don’t have a ~ in my body
to the bone
Marcos Llorente, a Blanco ~ (Real Madrid player)
♦ “When it comes to matters of morals, I’m Catholic right down to my little
toes.” (The abortion issue.)
identity & nature: skin, muscle, nerves & bone
bone (throw a bone to someone)
throwing them a bone
she is just ~ hoping they’ll support her (politics)
coercion & motivation: animal / food & drink
bone (bone of contention)
big bone of contention
a ~ is Biden’s embrace of “Buy American” (with Canada)
conflict: animal
boo (verb)
boo
some of you may cheer and others will ~
judgment: sound / verb
achievement, recognition & praise: sound / verb
boo (noun)
cheers and boos
the judge’s decision drew ~
judgment: sound
achievement, recognition & praise: sound
booby trap
booby trap of missteps
their fraudulent marriage creates a ~ (plot of book)
booby traps for unwary workers
many 401(k) plans have options that are ~
party booby traps
holiday ~ (ethics laws and partying / government)
budgetary booby trap
legislators concocted a ~ and must now defuse it (cuts)
political, ideological and geopolitical booby traps
the Middle East is such a mess of ~
overcome a booby trap
cooks had to ~ (the stink of Brussels Sprouts)
♦ “He took responsibility for and poured resources into improved public
schools when most mayors thought schools were political booby traps.”
(Scott Simon’s wonderful tribute to Richard M. Daley. From “Chicago’s
Recommended Daley Allowance, NPR, Weekend Edition Saturday,
September 11, 2010.)
♦ “Someone could get nailed for two beers and a bacon wrap. Nobody
wants to be the example... I’m just going to avoid them this year.” (A
House GOP aide, about ethics “guidance” from House and Senate ethics
committees, that could turn simply attending a party into a “booby trap”
that could “blow up in one’s face.”)
♦ “They’re trying to grab the House, and we’ve got barricades, picket
fences and booby traps to defeat that.” (A Kentucky Democrat,
presumably speaking figuratively.)
♦ “Booby traps: Man in Maine killed by own device.”
♦ “New technologies in cars are potential booby traps for first
responders.”
♦ “I found a piece of red detonating cord between my legs. That’s when I
knew I was screwed.” (Gunnery Sgt. Michael Burghardt, aka “Iron Mike”
and “Gunny,” just before getting blown up by a trap while investigating an
IED in Ramadi. Incredibly, he was not too badly wounded. A photo of him
“flipping off” whoever detonated the trap became famous on the
Internet.)
♦ “Victim-operated improvised explosive devices, known as VOIEDs,
have various switches known as pressure plates. The idea is that the
bomb is detonated by an unsuspecting individual by completing the
circuit when pressure is applied or removed to the switch. / A power
source supplies electricity between the switch and the detonator and by
completing the circuit, the main charge explodes...” (“A U.S. Marine, A
Curious Boy And An Unfathomable Moment” by AP investigative reporter
James LaPorta, at NPR, September 9, 2021.)
danger: explosion / military / weapon
booby-trapped
booby-trapped email
most ransomware attacks begin with a ~
danger: explosion / military / weapon
book (rule book)
rip up the rule book
its willingness to ~ (Fast & Furious franchise)
script: books & reading / sports & games
constraint & lack of constraint: books & reading / sports &
games
book (close the book)
closed the book on a NFL future
he has ~ (athlete)
close the book on this
we need to ~ and move on
curtailment / development: books & reading / verb
reconciliation, resolution & conclusion / starting, going,
continuing & ending: books & reading / verb
book (books and covers)
judge a book by its cover
you can't ~
appearance / appearance & reality / judgment: books &
reading
book (open book)
open book
the rookie driver is a refreshingly ~ (interviews, etc.)
character & personality: books & reading
sincerity, lack of sincerity & honesty: books & reading
Page 157 of 1574
book (by the book)
by-the-book
he was strictly ~ (a soldier)
character & personality: books & reading
constraint & lack of constraint / script: books & reading
book (throw the book at somebody)
“throw the book” at anyone
he vowed to ~ responsible
threw the book at him
the judge ~
punishment & recrimination: books & reading / verb
book (development)
book of life
a man's ~ should be considered, not just one chapter (trial)
what is the ~ itself but man’s war with nature (wild beasts)
♦ “It is a book as old as time: a good young person makes a mistake,
chapter two is a good, young person is full of remorse. Chapter three is a
good young person learns from the mistake and becomes a better
person.” (Australia Olympic team boss Ian Chesterman, following the
bad behavior of some Australian athletes at the Tokyo Olympics.)
development: books & reading
bookworm
bookworm
I admit it, I'm a ~
enthusiasm: animal / books & reading / person
person: books & reading
boom (jade boom, etc.)
jade boom
the ~ has been fueled by the Chinese
boom and bust
Argentina is used to ~ (the economy)
activity / cost & benefit: explosion
boom (increase)
booming
business is ~
increase & decrease: explosion / sound / verb
activity: explosion / sound / verb
boomerang (verb)
boomeranged on him
it ~ (controversy)
boomerang (back) on us
it could ~
reversal: direction / verb / weapon
boomerang (noun)
boomerang kids
millennial ~ may consume resources, finances and time
coming, arriving, staying, leaving & returning: weapon
booming (adjective)
booming popularity
the ~ of audiobooks coincides with the rise of podcasts
increase & decrease: explosion / sound
boost (verb)
boost the economy
it will ~ (medical tourism)
boost his image
this will ~ in the public eye (a fallen celebrity)
boost (sagging) morale
they turned to sports to ~ (soldiers in war zone)
boost scores
schools are under relentless pressure to ~
boosted my spirits
it ~
increase & decrease: direction / force / verb
boost (noun)
boost of expertise
big business can offer a ~ (vaccination campaign)
boost from the private sector
public health can get a ~ (outsourcing)
give a boost
the deal would ~ to health programs (federal spending)
increase & decrease: direction / force
boot (area)
boot of Italy
the ~ ( Io Stivale)
Italy’s boot
Taras and Croton, on the heel and instep, respectively, of ~
instep of Italy’s boot
the road reached the Ionian Sea at the ~ (Taranto)
♦ “If you look at that boot of Louisiana, the regions that will get hit the
hardest are at the ball of the foot. Those sparsely populated parishes
facing the Gulf like Terrebonne, Lafourche, and Plaquemines.” (John
Burnett reporting on Hurricane Ida.)
♦ The state of Missouri has a bootheel region, based on its shape.
shape: clothing & accessories
area: shape
boot (oppression)
boot
as the ~ is removed from the neck of the people
boot of the Americans
Latin America felt the heavy ~ (Guatemala / 1950s)
Page 158 of 1574
under the boot
the people are ~ of barbaric power (Albania)
has its boot on the neck
the government ~ of the company
oppression: clothing & accessories
boot (shake in one’s boots)
shaking in their boots
a lot of HR folks are ~ (mass resignations / COVID)
feeling, emotion & effect: clothing & accessories
boot (get the boot)
got the boot
he ~ after making the final four (a dance contest)
dismissal, removal & resignation: clothing & accessories
boot (soldier)
boots on the ground
we needed ~ (soldiers abroad to fight terrorism)
we have increased our ~ (US-Mexico border)
military / person: sign, signal, symbol
bootleg (adjective)
bootleg copy
he bought a ~ of Microsoft Windows
concealment & lack of concealment / subterfuge: alcohol /
clothing & accessories
bootlegger
digital bootlegger
new tools to go after ~s (a bill)
concealment & lack of concealment: alcohol
boot out (verb)
boot out the IMF
Chavez helped Argentina ~
dismissal, removal & resignation: clothing & accessories /
verb
border (proximity)
border on the absurd
his arguments ~
bordered on miraculous
the last-minute goal ~ (sports)
bordered on obsession
his pursuit ~
bordered on panic
her response ~
border on racism
his comments ~
borders on rudeness
this ~
configuration / proximity: boundary
borderland (noun)
borderlands of science
a broad humanistic interest led him to pioneer on the ~
proximity: boundary
division & connection: boundary / line
area / environment: ground, terrain & land
born (born teacher, etc.)
born to do this
you were ~ (a porn site)
born athlete
the kid was a ~
born bloodhound
he’s a ~ who lives to track the scent of malfeasance
born teacher
he was, it seemed, a ~
born worrier
~s versus people who are carefree
natural-born
~ genius is often deliberate technique (teachers)
she is a ~ leader
there are no ~ salesmen
identity & nature: birth
born (creation)
born
how to let peace be ~ despite the difficult labor pains
the Red Guards were ~, and a period of madness began...
Macedonia was where Slavic Christianity was ~
born of war
like so many fundamentalist movements, the Taliban were ~
born in the 1970's
the shadowy Baluchistan Liberation Army, ~ (Pakistan)
born in the Swiss Alps
On was ~ (On is a company that makes running shoes)
born in ancient Greece
the Olympics, ~ and reborn in Athens in 1896
born in New Orleans, Louisiana
Satch(mo), both you and jazz were ~, right (Roy Plomley)
born in (great) jubilation
South Sudan, ~, is plunging into a vortex of violence
born on 23 May 1991
the Koori Mail was ~ (indigenous Australian newspaper)
born on platforms
it was ~ associated with far right extremism (QAnon)
Page 159 of 1574
born on the kitchen table
the Chicago Defender was ~ of its publisher in 1905
born on the (New York) subway
the Guardian Angels were ~ about 40 years ago (crime)
born from Wounded Knee
he thinks of everything that’s been ~
born out of frustration or ignorance
his comments were ~
born digitally
the material wasn't ~ and must be hand-scanned
conceived, born and raised
Nature was ~ to serve polemic purpose (the magazine)
phrase was born
the ~ in a Facebook post in 2013 (“Black Lives Matter”)
star was born
a ~ (Tom Daley at Beijing Olympics)
♦ “Six months after Hotcakes and Sally [Sarah] were born, James
released his fifth Album, Walking Man... (Carly Simon’s album, the baby,
and James Taylor. From Girls Like Us by the fine writer Sheila Weller.)
♦ “Icebergs are born to wither and melt away.” (BBC “How a colossal
block of ice became an obsession” by Jonathan Amos, 15 Jan 2022.)
creation & transformation: birth
born-again
born-again Christian
his conversion from hell-raiser to ~
born-again conservative
he is a ~
commitment & determination / creation & transformation /
identity & nature: religion
born-on (adjective)
born on date
best consumed within 110 days of the ~ (Budweiser)
creation & transformation: birth
bottled up (emotions)
bottled up inside
he must have a lot of fright and anxiety ~ (soldier)
bottled up rage
the ~ of black people (the rapper Bobby Sessions)
kept them bottled up
these things I internalized, I ~ (Andre Leon Talley)
feeling, emotion & effect: bottle / container
access & lack of access: bottle / container
bottleneck (the Bottleneck, etc.)
the Bottleneck
the climbers came to the infamous passage called the ~
~, an hourglass-shaped gully beneath a serac (on K2)
Bottleneck Peak
routes up ~ include Tippin The Bottle (Utah)
Bottleneck Wash
~ enters from the left (into Granite Creek, Arizona)
proper name: bottle / neck / shape
geography: bottle / neck / proper name
bottleneck (noun)
bottleneck
Native Americans hunted the pronghorn at this ~
the Panama Canal has become a ~ (too narrow, etc.)
opening this ~ is critical (shortage of nurses)
bottlenecks on highways
traffic ~
bottlenecks in the (nation's) power grid
~ can cause outages
transportation bottleneck
it’s really going to be a ~ (lack of trucks)
genetic bottleneck
blood samples reveal a ~ (too few Amur tigers left)
at some bottleneck
if they get bogged down ~ like the Hillary Step (Everest)
become a bottleneck
the Step has frequently ~ (Hillary Step / Everest)
remove (refining) bottlenecks
industry must ~ (oil)
♦ “We will have more eh neck bottles, traffic jams, and that is a
dangerous thing.” (The remarkable Ecuadorian mountain guide Carla
Perez on a relatively crowded K2 in 2019.)
obstacles & impedance: bottle / neck / shape
shape: bottle / neck
bottle up (emotions)
bottles things up
she ~
bottle it up and put it away
you kind of ~ (male on male abuse)
feeling, emotion & effect: bottle / container / verb
access & lack of access: bottle / container / verb
bottle up (impede)
bottled up the Russian Far Eastern Fleet
the Japanese ~ at Port Arthur (1904)
obstacles & impedance: bottle / container / verb
bottom (at the bottom)
at the bottom of the barrel
do their time ~ (worst job assignment)
at the bottom of the (economic) pyramid
new jobs are coming ~ (poorly paid jobs)
Page 160 of 1574
at the bottom of the pecking order
we were ~ (biker club)
hierarchy: direction / position
bottom (hit bottom)
hit bottom
we may have ~ (unemployment)
hit rock bottom
the moment you ~ and admit to yourself… (addiction)
he was a person who had ~
things had ~ (bad relationship)
before you can get better, you have to ~ (addiction)
hitting rock bottom
livestock prices are ~
primacy, currency, decline & obsolescence: direction
decline: direction
bottom (get to the bottom of something)
get to the bottom of where
he was never able to ~ the money had gone
get to the bottom of the error
state officials said they would ~
get to the bottom of this case
we want to ~
get to the bottom of this mystery
no one wants to ~ quicker than... (crash)
get to the bottom of that
we’re never ever ever going to ~ (a boxing issue)
get to the bottom of things
we need to ~ (a murder investigation)
get to the bottom of this
we will ~ (investigation into fatal stampede)
I want to ~ (US sits by during genocide in Rwanda)
we'd really like to ~ (mystery illness)
get to the bottom about what happened
we need to ~ (congressional investigation)
analysis, interpretation & explanation / bases /
reconciliation, resolution & conclusion / searching &
discovery: direction
bottom (no bottom)
no bottom to his willingness
there is ~ to abuse his power (politics)
extent & scope: depth / water
bottomless (adjective)
bottomless
the well of outrage is ~ (fundamentalists)
bottomless thirst
China has a ~ for oil and gas
extent & scope: depth / direction
amount: container / depth / direction
bottom line
bottom line
what it is going to mean for the ~ (sanctions)
cost & benefit: money
analysis, interpretation & explanation: money
bouillabaisse (mixture)
bouillabaisse of his forebears
Lil Nas X is a ~ (George Michael, Elton John, etc.)
mixture: food & drink
bounce (verb)
bounced from one idea to the next
I ~ (what to do this summer)
bounced around Southwest Asia
he ~ (a terrorist)
bouncing around
he was ~ a lot back then (rootless)
bounces in and out of bankruptcy
everybody ~ (airlines)
bounced between homes
his family ~ (rootless)
movement: ball / direction / verb
bounce back (verb)
bounce back
the love and support of someone who helps them ~
she was always able to ~ (Whitney Houston)
bounced back
I matured and ~ (a boxer)
bounce back from (natural) disasters
modern economies ~ (Kobe earthquake, etc.)
bouncing back from the pandemic
the economy is ~ (UK)
bounce back from setbacks
the UFC has been able to ~
bounce back quickly
resilient people ~ from failure
resiliency: ball / movement / verb
bounce back (noun)
tremendous bounce back
we’re going to see a ~ (lifting COVID restrictions)
resiliency: ball / movement
bound (destination)
college-bound
Page 161 of 1574
~ high-schoolers are making their final deliberations
direction: journeys & trips / movement
bound (constrained)
bound by a (strict) code
they are ~ of ethics (education consultants)
bound by the rules
he did not feel ~ that governed most men
bound by the (military's) code of silence
he didn't feel ~
desk-bound
the Chairman oversaw only the 1,600 ~ officers
duty-bound
nurses are ~ to report what they think is abuse
fogbound
the plane crashed in ~ mountains
fog-bound
a pileup on a ~ stretch of freeway killed eight (France)
hidebound
see hidebound
homebound
the ~ elderly
he takes meals to a ~ invalid
honor-bound
I am ~ to pay him back
house-bound
she is ~
ice-bound
Siberia's ~ expanse
the climate of ~ coastal regions
leather-bound
~ books
muscle-bound
a ~ frat boy
snowbound
we were ~
Nigata Prefecture is ~ for months (Japan)
spellbound
see spellbound
tradition-bound
the Marines are the most ~ of the services
tradition-bound
the Navy was run by ~ admirals
wheelchair-bound
the ~ author
feel bound
he didn't ~ by the military's code of silence
constraint & lack of constraint: rope
boundless (adjective)
boundless energy
he was known for his ~ and tireless volunteerism
boundless enthusiasm
he didn't share his ~
boundless optimism
a ~ in the power of technology (computing)
amount / extent & scope: boundary
boundary (division)
boundaries of the (doctor-patient) relationship
a psychiatrist may relax the normally strict ~
boundaries between plant species
the ~ are far more porous than among animals
boundary expressions
lexicographers must deal with these ~
racial boundary
Hispanic is an ethnicity crossing ~s
strict boundaries
a psychiatrist may relax the ~ (doctor-patient)
social, cultural and religious boundaries
his teachings transcend all ~
boundaries blur
when ~
relax the boundaries
a psychiatrist may ~ of the doctor-patient relationship
transcended (racial) boundaries
his work ~ (playwright August Wilson)
division & connection: boundary
boundary (behavior)
boundary
the usual ~s keep getting crossed (politicians)
boundaries of their (famed) tolerance
the Dutch are rethinking the ~ (drugs, sex, squatting)
pushes boundaries
he ~ (the comic Dave Chappelle)
behavior / constraint & lack of constraint: boundary
bounded
bounded on the east
the plateau is ~ by an escarpment of 100m
bounded (on the east) by an escarpment
the plateau is ~ of 100m
plateau is bounded
the ~ on the east by an escarpment of 100m
Page 162 of 1574
configuration: boundary
bounds (no bounds, etc.)
knows no bounds
the hypocrisy of the NCAA ~
overstepped his bounds
he’s a creep who ~ (gossip)
overstepping their bounds
Homeowner’s Associations are ~
behavior / constraint & lack of constraint / extent & scope:
boundary
bound up
bound up in the myths
Indians are ~ white Americans have created
constraint & lack of constraint: rope
involvement: movement / rope
bouquet (collection)
bouquet of memories
this record brings back a particular ~ (Melvyn Bragg)
bouquet of tests
Kerala is doing a ~, diagnostic, pooled... (pandemic)
group, set & collection: plant
boutique (noun)
boutique (mountain guide) service
Madison Mountaineering is a ~
superiority & inferiority: money
bow (and bow down)
bows before legend
rational explanation often ~ (folklore)
bowing to cancel culture
they are ~
bow to the inevitable
we will have to ~
bowed to the inevitable
he has ~ (minister under attack resigns)
bowed to pressure
he has ~ from industrialists (a politician)
bow (down) to (government) pressure
he thought the Washington Post would ~
bowed to (public) pressure
he finally ~ to do something
bow (down) to Russia
for cheap gas, we should ~ (a Moldovan taxi driver)
bowing to the U.S.
the Turks are not ~ (arms dispute)
back down or bow
she’s an artist who won’t ~ to convention
dominance & submission / resistance, opposition & defeat:
direction / religion / standing, sitting & lying / verb
bowels (noun)
bowels of the prison
a tiny, dark room in the ~ (solitary confinement)
bowels of Madison Square Gardens
we’re now walking through the ~ (radio show)
bowels of the Los Angeles Superior Court
I found in the ~ a lawsuit... (O.J. Simpson trial)
bowels of the ship
he gathered his men in the engine room in the ~
deep in the bowels
scientists walk around ~ of the CDC (Atlanta, Georgia)
place: infrastructure
bowl (Vietnam’s rice bowl, etc.)
grain bowl
Punjab is India’s “~”
rice bowl
the Mekong Delta, Vietnam's ~
farming & agriculture: epithet / sign, signal, symbol
bowl (America’s salad bowl, etc.)
“Salad Bowl of the World”
the city bills itself as the ~ (Salinas, California)
America’s salad bowl
the Salinas Valley is known as ~ (greens)
the Salinas Valley is nicknamed ~
Northern California’s Salinas Valley is often dubbed ~
farming & agriculture: epithet / sign, signal, symbol
bowl (salad bowl / mixture)
mixing bowl
the club was a ~ (young musicians learn from elders)
melting pot, a (beautiful) tapestry, or a salad bowl
is the United States a ~
reimagined as a salad bowl
the melting pot was being ~ (ethnic identity, etc.)
♦ “Macedonia [was] the inspiration for the French word for ‘mixed salad’
(macedoine).” (Balkan Ghosts: A Journey Through History by Robert D.
Kaplan.)
♦ Argentina was once describe by a Polish émigré as “batter that has not
yet become cake.” (“Another New World” by Larry Rohter, The New York
Review, June 10, 2021.)
♦ “This points to a unique understanding of plurality of Indian society—it
is more like a thali (an Indian meal comprising a selection of separate
dishes served on a platter), rather than a melting pot.” (Neha Sahgal, a
lead author of a Pew study that found Indians support religious tolerance
and religious segregation.)
identity & nature / mixture: food & drink
Page 163 of 1574
bow out (verb)
bow out
he has refused pressure to ~ (a politician)
it would have been a good time for him to ~ (a boxer)
♦ “This is a pretty special way to bow out if this is indeed his swan song.”
(Commentary about the great and beloved boxer Amir Khan, who lost his
match to Kell Brook by TKO in the sixth round in a packed Manchester
arena.)
coming, arriving, staying, leaving & returning / dismissal,
removal & resignation / starting, going, continuing &
ending: theater / verb
box (box somebody into a corner)
boxed himself into a corner
he has ~ on tax increases (a politician)
movement: corner
constraint & lack of constraint / situation: boxing / corner /
movement / sports & games / verb
box (in / out / outside the box)
out-of-the-box
how ~ can I go (actor takes strange roles)
out-of-the-box idea
she came up with an ~
think out of the box
we have to think ~ (WHO and Ebola)
think outside the box
she learned how to ~
fit it (neatly) into a (single conceptual) box
“data” escapes attempts to ~ (cloud, stream, mine)
constraint & lack of constraint / idea: container
box (labeling)
Eurovision box
they didn’t try to fit into a ~ (an Italian group)
put them in a box
we don’t want to brand people, to ~ (legacy students)
forces autistic people into a box
the world often ~
characterization: container
box (tick a box, etc.)
boxes of (so-called) diversity
there are easy ways to tick the ~ and not critically engage
box-ticking exercise
this is just a ~ to silence criticism
tick-box exercises
~ that really have no clinical value (NHS bureaucracy)
tick both boxes
trying to ~ was always the goal (to make a film popular)
ticked all the boxes
he had ~ he needed to (to travel / COVID)
ticks all the boxes
Tyson Fury ~ (the boxer)
ticks every box
her game ~ (Emma Raducanu)
ticks off (just about) every box
she ~ that liberals might want in a nominee (Supreme Court)
ticking a box
it’s not just an exercise of ~ anymore, it’s taken seriously
♦ “Satisfies all requirements for success.”
judgement / cost & benefit: letters & characters
box (check the box, etc.)
box to be checked
the FAA was just another ~ (profits over safety)
check the boxes
it seemed like an exercise to ~ (bureaucratic formality)
checked a lot of boxes for my dream next thing
this ~ (Anthony Weiner about his company)
check-the-box exercise
it’s merely a one-week ~ (mental health / policing)
check-the-box holiday
a paid holiday vs. just a ~ (Juneteenth)
check off (multiple) boxes
it would ~ for ethnic and racial diversity
tick in a box
I don’t think it is a procedural ~ (cold case investigation)
♦ “Check, check, check, and it was a no-brainer...” (The popular NFL
player Cam Newton returns to the Carolina Panthers. Or as Newton
himself said, “You know where I’m here, and this ain’t for no ploy.”)
substance & lack of substance: letters & characters
boxed in (verb)
boxed in
she’s not about to be ~ (a singer and her style)
constraint & lack of constraint: container
boy (golden boy)
golden boy
he was a ~ from the get-go (Justice John Roberts)
golden boy of this (island) nation
he was once the ~ (Malta’s prime minister resigns)
golden boy quarterback
~ faces uncertain future (in NFL draft)
England’s golden boy
Rooney was ~ (2004 Euros)
PSG’s (attacking) golden boys
~ Mbappe and Neymar
Page 164 of 1574
Hollywood golden boy
at the time, he was riding high as a ~
Democratic golden boy
the ~’s career could be about to end (Gavin Newsom)
liberal golden boy
he became a ~ during his Senate bid (Beto O’Rourke)
brings down (Rhode Island) ‘golden boy’
college cheating scandal ~ (tennis coach took bribes)
♦ see also boy (blue-eyed boy), girl (golden girl), guy (character), man
(big man, little man, etc.), Mister (and Mr., Missus, Mrs.)
person: society
achievement, recognition & praise: person
attraction & repulsion / character & personality: person
boy (blue-eyed boy)
blue-eyed boy of publishing
audio is the ~ at the moment (audio books)
♦ see also guy (character), man (big man, little man, etc.), Mister (and
Mr., Missus, Mrs.)
achievement, recognition & praise / superlative / worth &
lack of worth: family / person
character & personality: person
person: family
boy (big boy, etc.)
really big boys
they haven’t played against the ~ yet (Italian soccer)
put on the big boy pants
he needs to ~ and act as commander in chief
put his big-boy pants on
the president needs to ~ and acknowledge that he lost
♦ see also guy (character), man (big man, little man, etc.), Mister (and
Mr., Missus, Mrs.)
person: baby
growth & development: death & life
character & personality: person
boy (bad boy)
‘bad boy’ of basketball
he was the ~ (the remarkable Dennis Rodman)
bad boy of Western philosophy
Nietzsche is the ~
called “Bad Boys”
the team was ~ (NBA Detroit Pistons / 1988)
♦ see also guy (character), man (big man, little man, etc.), Mister (and
Mr., Missus, Mrs.)
person: force
behavior / character & personality / sanctioning, authority
& non-conformity: person
brace (verb)
brace yourself
~ for bad news
brace for (yet another) election
Israelis ~
bracing for more fallout
Washington is ~ from the scandal
braced for a typhoon
the Philippines ~ that could trigger flooding
readiness & preparedness: equilibrium & stability /
infrastructure / verb
braced
braced for a long siege
the demonstrators are ~
braced for a (tropical) storm
Florida is ~
readiness & preparedness: equilibrium & stability /
infrastructure
Brahmin (person)
Brahmin Caste
the ~ of New England (Oliver Wendell Holmes, Sr.)
brahmin elite
they are an insular, intermarrying ~ (Bohemian Bourgeois)
Boston Brahmin
the ~ is a Wikipedia entry
♦ “They have coalesced into an insular, intermarrying brahmin elite.”
(“How The Bobos Broke America” by David Brooks, The Atlantic,
September 2021. A Bobo is short for Bohemian Bourgeois, or the young,
multicultural left.)
♦ “And this is good old Boston, / The home of the bean and the cod, /
Where the Lowells talk only to Cabots, / And the Cabots talk only to
God.” (“Boston Toast” by John Collins Bossidy.)
acceptance & rejection / hierarchy: society
society: person
person: society
brain (noun)
brains behind the machinery
he is the ~ that makes the wave (Kelly Slater’s wave)
brains behind the project
he was the ~
mathematical brain
he is the ~ behind the striking timepieces (sundials)
knowledge & intelligence: head
brain (on the brain)
sex on the brain
not that men need help getting ~
wants, needs, hopes & goals: addiction
brainchild (noun)
brainchild of a Ladakhi engineer
the ice stupa is the ~ (Sonam Wangchuk)
Page 165 of 1574
brainchild of Ted Turner
24-hour news was the ~ (CNN)
brainchild of a (16-year-old high school) student
the stunt was the ~ (viral news story)
Mat Damon’s brainchild
The Last Duel is ~ (the film)
idea: family / head
creation & transformation: family / head
brain-dead (adjective)
brain dead
Macron described NATO as “~”
‘Brain Dead Liberal’
“Why I Am No Longer a ~” (article by David Mamet)
“brain dead” and “morons”
he labeled complaining residents as ~
♦ “Porgy and Bess is a buncha good songs but has nothing to do with
race relations, which is the flag of convenience under which it sailed.”
(The great playwright David Mamet, from “Why I Am No Longer a ‘Brain
Dead Liberal,’” The Village Voice, March 11, 2008.”)
consciousness & awareness: health & medicine
condition & status: death & life / health & medicine
brain death (noun)
brain death of Nato
what we are currently experiencing is the ~ (Macron)
♦ “You have to look at the background and see exactly which bits of Nato
Macron was criticizing.” (Sophie Pedder, Paris Bureau Chief of the
Economist, talking on NPR about Macron’s description of NATO as
“brain dead.” Angela Merkle labeled Macron’s description “drastic
words.”)
condition & status: health & medicine
brain drain (and brain gain)
brain drain
the agency has suffered a severe ~
"brain gain"
out-of-state students lead to a ~ (at Chapel Hill, NC)
reverse brain drain
the US is seeing a ~ as foreign students go home
knowledge & intelligence / leaking: head
brainstorm (verb)
brainstorm ideas
~ for his current script
brainstorm solutions
meet key people and ~ to the challenges you face
brainstorm everything
if we tried to ~ that could possibly go wrong, we'd…
idea: head / storm / verb
brainstorm (noun)
latest brainstorm
his ~ is to open a chain of "As Seen on TV" stores
idea: head / storm
brain trust
medical brain trust
he compared notes with the NFL's ~ (concussions, etc.)
knowledge & intelligence: head
group, set & collection: money
brainwash (verb)
brainwashed him
the cult had ~
violence: head / hygiene
brainwashed
brainwashed to believe
they have been ~ that everything is about race (CRT)
brainwashed by the media
he says his co-worker has been ~ (politics)
coerced, brainwashed or (even) drugged
she may have been ~ (a terrorist)
♦ According to the Wikipedia entry, “The term ‘brainwashing’ was first
used in English by Edward Hunter in 1950” in reference to the Korean
war.”
♦ "He's a human being; we should treat him the same as we treat any
other G.I.... I don't think it's the boy's own fault. No doubt at the time—I
never seen him or never met him—No doubt he was young and he
wasn't trained properly." (Charles E. Kelly, World War Two veteran and
Medal of Honor recipient, when he was asked by Mike Wallace,
newsman, "How do you think that we should treat US Army turncoats?"
like Samuel David Hawkins, who had just returned back to the US from
China in 1957.)
violence: head / hygiene
brake (control)
emergency brake
they are pulling the ~ (COVID shutdown)
pump the brakes
some voters want them to ~ (impeachment)
moderates are saying, hey, let’s ~ (slow down of demands)
tap the brakes
something is causing shoppers to ~ on spending
tapping the brakes
the Fed is ~ a bit on the economy
put the brakes on (economic) growth
industrialists fears the unions would ~
put the brakes on your feelings
you ~ to avoid confrontation (Japanese “Gaman”)
tap the brakes on spring break
high gas prices may ~
Page 166 of 1574
control & lack of control / increase & decrease / speed:
mechanism / movement
branch (taxonomy)
branches of Buddhism
the various ~ (Zen, Tibetan, etc.)
branches of Christianity
the Armenian Church, one of the most ancient ~
branch of Islam
the Hazara are members of the Shiite ~ (Afghanistan)
discrimination against adherents of the Shi'a ~
the Salafiya ~ regards Shiites as non-Muslims
the Ismailis are a minority within the minority Shia ~
branches of Islam
the centuries of enmity between the Sunni and Shiite ~
branch of Shia Islam
Ismailism is a ~
branches of biology
ecology is one of the hardest ~ (it's so complex)
branches of the (Hawiye) clan
the many ~ (Mogadishu)
branch of government
judges constitute a third ~
branch of knowledge
theology was accepted as the supreme ~
branches of the military
special operations forces from various ~
branch of physics
quantum mechanics is a ~
branch of engineering
he felt the oil industry ~ suited his personality
branch of the Bani Hassan
Al-khalayleh is a ~ (Jordan)
branch bank
each of the four corners has a ~ (NYC)
branch library
or any other ~
ordnance branch
he is in the ~, which provides ammunition
service branch
veterans from all four ~s
Salafiya branch
the ~ of Islam regards Shiites as non-Muslims
Shi'a branch
discrimination against adherents of the ~ of Islam
Shia branch
the Ismailis are a minority within the minority ~
various branches
special operations forces from ~ of the military
adherents of the (Shi'a) branch
discrimination against ~ (in Saudi Arabia)
taxonomy & classification: tree
branching system: tree
branch out (verb)
branch out
I just thought I’d ~ (make new friends)
branched out into (food) wholesaling
he ~ (a businessman)
growth & development: tree / verb
branching system: tree / verb
brand (verb)
branded his accusers liars
he ~ (convicted sex abuser)
brand them apostates
Sunni Arab extremists ~ (Iraq's Christians)
branded the extradition "unlawful"
the Russians ~
branded all Chechen rebels baby killers
he ~ (post-Beslan)
characterization: fire / mark / verb
brave (verb)
braved the weather
several hundred people ~ for a screening
courage & lack of courage: verb
brave (girls and women, etc.)
brave book
Bari Weiss has written what must be judged a ~ (blurb)
bravest (red carpet) looks
Taylor Swift’s ~
brave plaintiffs
the two ~ who took on Florida’s anti-gay marriage ban
brave (widower) type
the press wanted him to be this very ~ (Joe Biden)
Brave, a Badass, a Heretic
I have been called ~ (a female blogger)
how brave
~ he is at being so outwardly gay (a pop star)
extraordinarily brave
she made the ~ decision to create a new show... (I May
Destroy You)
incredibly brave
it’s ~ that she has revealed her truth (depression)
bold or brave
Page 167 of 1574
I don’t think it’s ~ (Superman’s son is bisexual)
need to be brave
girls coming through ~ (soccer lesbians / Lisa De Vanna)
called the professor extraordinarily brave
she ~ for leading the charge against the cancel mob
♦ “When one person speaks truth, it gives license for all of us to do the
same.” (Meghan Markel about her miscarriage. When her daughter was
born, her photographer Misan Harriman tweeted, “Lilibet has arrived.
Congratulations to my brave friend and her lovely family!”)
♦ “I have been called Brave, a Badass, a Heretic...” (A female blogger
who has written for the Huffington Post, ScaryMommy, the Houston
Moms Blog, etc.)
♦ “Choosing yourself, and acknowledging that you are worthy simply
because you are breathing—that is a brave thing.” (“A Letter to College
Sports” by Cailin Bracken.)
♦ “What makes Lil Nas X so extraordinary is how brave he is at being so
outwardly gay within the urban music world.” (Elton John.)
♦ bibleexpert: He died after a “brave” battle with cancer. Dropping bombs
on Iraq, on the other hand, didn’t require quite as much bravery. / James
to bibleexpert: The Air Force and Navy drop bombs the Army fights on
the ground and that takes brave men and women. / Lake Life to
bibleexpert: Speaking of bravery, a coward behind a key board criticizing
a much greater man than he could ever be is pathetic. / bibleexpert to
Lake Life: How did you assess that I’m a “coward”? (ABC’s “Join the
Discussion,” about the death of an Army general who died of cancer.)
♦ “Why is this brave? What’s brave about not being brave?” (Talk radio
host Clay Travis about the gymnast who quit her Olympic team because,
as she explained, “I was like, I am not in the right headspace.” The
gymnast was widely praised as brave.)
♦ “They said it’s a bold new direction. I say [DC Comics is]
bandwagoning. I don’t think it’s bold or brave... If they had done this 20
years ago, perhaps that would be bold or brave.” (Dean Cain,
commenting on DC Comics decision to make Superman’s son bisexual.)
♦ “Good morning, everyone. It’s very brave of you to all be up this early.”
(Ramtin Arablouei and Rund Abdelfatah.)
inclusion & exclusion: society
brave new world
brave new workers
~, how workers adapt to the changing economy
brave new streaming world
we live in a ~ (a filmmaker)
brave new world of business
Wal-Mart and the ~
brave new world of ‘editing’ human genes
the ~ (CRISPR)
in the brave new world
it’s a detective story ~ that we live in (hacking)
♦ Aldous Huxley wrote the book in 1931 and it was published in 1932.
The book creates a dystopian future world, the only goal of which is
stability based on the principles of science and social science. Huxley
wrote it as a parody of H.G. Wells’ books on utopias.
oppression: allusion / books & reading
allusion: books & reading
bravery (groups)
bravery
his fear, and his ~ is not in doubt (John A. Symonds)
bravery and courage
that takes ~ (Simone Biles prioritizes her wellbeing)
showed enormous bravery
he ~ (Muhammad Ali refuses induction)
♦ “It takes huge bravery to say what she’s saying.” (Simon Biles
withdraws from Tokyo Olympics event to prioritize her wellbeing.)
♦ “It’s bravery for the left, it’s not bravery for the world.” (Fox anchor Todd
Piro, about DC Comics making Superman’s son bisexual.)
inclusion & exclusion: society
brawl (noun)
political brawl
the government's ~s with the Muslim Brotherhood
this is turning into a ~ (funding)
public brawl
he knew he would lose in a ~ with a Naval officer
scientific brawl
his appetite for ~s is increasing with age (scientist)
conflict: fist / violence
brazen (adjective)
brazen
the company was ~ (bribes)
brazen play
they orchestrated a ~ (political corruption)
♦ The origin of this word relates to brass.
restraint & lack of restraint: materials & substances
behavior: materials & substances
breach (verb)
breached (parts of) the agreement
Iran has already ~ since the Trump administration...
breached a (2012) agreement
the question of whether Facebook ~ over user privacy
breached article 16
Hong Kong supporters ~ of the FIFA Disciplinary Code
breached a (a key, bust seldom tested “morality”) clause
PBS argued that he ~
breached confidentiality
the Board members who contacted the press ~
breached its contract
reports that the startup ~ (Philly Fighting COVID)
Parler claimed the tech giant breached ~ by...
breached their (fiduciary) duties
the Board members willfully ~ to the union
breached EU Law
Dutch rules ~ on protecting nature from...
breached his obligations
the court ruled Snowden ~ to the intelligence agencies
breached the terms
Iran has since ~, enriching uranium past the limit
Page 168 of 1574
breached a certain threshold
schools would have to shut down if infections ~
protection & lack of protection: fortification / military / verb
breach (noun)
breach of etiquette
the ~ was startling
she was chastised for a ~ (teen golfer at tournament)
breach of the peace
acts causing a ~ are prohibited (city park)
breach of (academic) politics
the ~ destroyed his university career
breach of (investigative) protocol
it is the worst ~ (leak about case)
breaches of respect
~ are sometimes met with vicious reprisal (surfing)
breaches of the rules
police were guilty of ~ on questioning suspects
breach of the (truce) treaty
we urge the North to apologize for the ~
breach of trust
Gordimer accused Roberts of ~ (over biography of her)
charges include bribery, fraud and ~ (a Prime Minister)
charges include misappropriation of Nissan funds and a ~
breaches of Islamic law
they police the streets on the lookout for ~
breach in the public health system
the closure creates a serious ~
breach with President Yeltsin
how do you avoid a major ~ (diplomacy)
data breach
the latest ~ (from the Dept. of Veterans Affair)
safety breach
China closed the lab after a ~ (SARS)
security breach
a series of ~s on the Internet
the CIA's handling of the ~
a ~ of customer information (40 million credit-card holders)
reports on ~s in airports
computer-security breaches
many companies have detected ~
substantial and significant breaches
police were guilty of ~ of the rules on questioning suspects
guilty of breaches
the police were ~ of the rules on questioning suspects
detected (computer-security) breaches
many companies have ~
jump into the breach
the company enlisted him to ~
step into the breach
the Germans and French have offered to ~ (intel)
stepping into the breach
zoom fatigue set in months ago, but audio is ~
stepped into the breach
ordinary citizens have ~ (disaster relief)
♦ “We showed we were willing to stand in the gap.” (Sherrilyn Ifill of the
NAACP Legal Defense Fund, about the “challenge of 2020.”)
♦ “Those who stormed this Capitol, and those who instigated and incited,
and those who called on them to do so, held a dagger at the throat of
America, and American democracy... I will stand in this breach, I will
defend this nation, I’ll allow no one to place a dagger at the throat of
democracy.” (President Joe Biden, in a speech on January 6th, 2022.)
♦ “The trenches having been opened and the works carried on in the
usual manner, the artillery at length began to make a breach, and after a
three days’ cannonade having made such an opening in the massive
wall that it was reported practicable by Colonel Wellesley, orders were
issued for storming the place... / Crossing the rocky bed of the Cavery,
under a terrible fire of cannon, jingalls, and musketry, the glacis and ditch
were soon crossed.../ Lieutenant-Colonel Dunlop was here wounded
when half way up by a sirdar of Mysore, who met him scimitar in hand.
Parrying a cut with his sabre, the colonel slashed open his antagonist’s
breast, and mortally wounded him. The sirdar made another cut that
nearly hewed off the head of the colonel, and falling back into the breach
was instantly bayoneted. Dunlop reached the summit, and then fell from
loss of blood... / Within seven minutes from the time the assault began,
the British standard was waving on the outer bastion of the fortress...”
(“Seringapatam, 1799, from British Battles on Land and Sea by James
Grant.)
protection & lack of protection: fortification / military
breached
breached during the pandemic
IEPs have been ~ (education / a lawsuit)
breached by a (crippling) cyberattack
the elections office was ~ (Florida in 2016)
breached lease
he does not want to continue in a ~ (a landlord)
database was breached
the FBI is investigating how the ~
information is breached
when consumer’s personal ~
privacy has been breached
those whose digital ~ have little resort
♦ “Cynthia responded to that and said, ‘You wanted to make her squirm a
little.’ / The fortifications had been breached, to continue the military
metaphor, and Cynthia charged right through. She said, ‘In fact, General,
you knew your daughter was not the victim of some rapist...’” (The
General’s Daughter by Nelson DeMille. The author is noteworthy in the
way he explicitly notices language and dialect.)
subterfuge: allusion / verb
bread and butter (livelihood)
bread and butter
positive stories are our ~ (Koori Mail newspaper)
bread and butter of prime-time TV
medical dramas are the ~ (2020)
bread and butter to reporting
Page 169 of 1574
making sources is ~
earn its bread and butter
science has to ~ (practical applications)
bases / importance & significance: food & drink
bread-and-butter (adjective)
bread-and-butter model
the company's ~
bases / importance & significance: food & drink
breadbasket (Pakistan’s breadbasket,
etc.)
breadbasket of India
the Punjab is the ~ (Sikhs)
breadbasket to the Revolution
the Mohawk Valley acted as the ~
Afghanistan's breadbasket
the broad Shomali Plain that was once ~
Brazil's (southern) breadbasket
~ flourishes (vs. Amazon)
Pakistan's breadbasket
Punjab is known as ~ for its agriculture
country’s breadbasket
Northern India, the ~ (larger farms, grain)
♦ This is the same as granary.
farming & agriculture / wheat: epithet / sign, signal, symbol
breadcrumb (evidence)
breadcrumbs for the police
he would leave few ~ (serial murderer changes identity, etc.)
bread crumbs to the crime scene
her clothes were ~ (Central Park jogger)
breadcrumb trail
an electronic ~ lets users backtrack (GPS)
clickstreams are the digital ~ which Amazon follows
digital breadcrumbs
police followed the ~ left behind by the victim and suspect
“Q drops” or “breadcrumbs”
these messages became known as ~ QAnon conspiracy)
♦ A breadcrumb trail is an allusion to the fairy tale of Hansel and Gretel.
The children’s horrid mother wished to get rid of them in a time of famine.
She led them deep into the forest but the kids were able to return home
by following a trail of small white stones they had dropped along the way.
The second time, they had no time to collect stones, so they dropped
crumbs of bread. But the birds ate the crumbs, and the kids were lost.
They eventually come to a gingerbread house where a cannibal witch
imprisoned them...
direction / evidence: allusion
breadcrumb (verb)
breadcrumbing you
he’s just ~ by hinting at a new position for you
subterfuge: allusion / verb
breadcrumbed
breadcrumbed
how to know you’re being ~
subterfuge: allusion
breadcrumbing (leading someone on)
breadcrumbing
~ is a modern term for intermittent reinforcement
~ is leading someone on (at work or in a relationship)
♦ A boss might breadcrumb you by hinting at a reward that he never
intends to give you. Or a person you’re interested in might breadcrumb
you by texting you just enough to make you think she is interested in
you. Sound familiar?
subterfuge: allusion
break (destroy / disrupt)
break capitalism
a super intelligent machine could ~ (AI)
broke the internet
what ~ (Facebook issues, etc.)
broke the Democratic Party
how Ted Kennedy ~
broke the Senate
many critics think that McConnell ~ (US politics)
Broke the World
Lords of Finance: The Bankers Who ~ (Liaquat Ahamed)
destruction: mechanism / verb
disruption: mechanism / verb
breakdown (nervous breakdown, etc.)
on the edge of a (nervous) breakdown
I'm ~
feeling, emotion & effect: mechanism / mental health
break down (explain)
break it (all) down for us
they will ~us (TV news analysis)
analysis, interpretation & explanation: mechanism / verb
break down (functioning)
authority broke down
political ~
discipline can break down
in a crisis, ~ (first responders)
fire ~ upon contact (military)
negotiations broke down
~ and resumed and broke down again
communications system broke down
the state-of-the-art ~
social order is breaking down
Page 170 of 1574
the ~ (in the wake of a great natural disaster)
law and order has broken down
functioning: mechanism / prep, adv, adj, particle / verb
failure, accident & impairment: mechanism / prep, adv, adj,
particle / verb
break down (destroy)
break down (trade) barriers
the European Union seeks to ~
break down the resistance
the operation seeks to ~ in Balad (military)
break down stereotypes
we must ~ about Muslims
break down the stigma
we must ~ of adoption
breaks down blood clots
the enzyme ~ (medicine)
help break down
study abroad can ~ stereotypes and prejudice
destruction: mechanism / verb
break down (feeling)
break down
he would ~ and start sobbing about his dad
broke down
when police arrested her, she ~
broke down in tears
she ~ as she told her sad story
broke down into tears
Walter Cronkite ~ on national television (Kennedy)
broke down in his tent
he ~ and wept for 45 minutes (climber)
feeling, emotion & effect: mechanism / mental health /
verb
break down (divide)
breaks down into (many small-unit) battles
combat in urban areas ~ (military)
breaks down into two (different) categories
the issue ~
breaks down features into elements
faction-recognition devices ~
broke down its data by age
the company ~ as well as income
break down ounces into gram
midsize dealers ~ (illegal drugs)
taxonomy & classification: mechanism
breaker (deal-breaker, etc.)
deal-breaker
it was a ~ in that respect (surprise rough sex)
rule breaker
she is a classically trained ~ (a musician)
he made a name for himself as a self-styled ~ (musician)
silence breakers
Time announced the ~ as their person of the year (2017)
destruction / disruption: affix / mechanism
breaking point (at the breaking point)
at the breaking point
they are ~ (financially)
at a breaking point
the system is ~ (immigration)
failure, accident & impairment: materials & substances
feeling, emotion & effect: materials & substances
condition & status: materials & substances
breaking point (to the breaking point)
stretched to the breaking point
we are ~ (police chief facing layoffs)
the Army and Marines are ~ (US in Iraq)
fire crews are ~ (California wildfires)
failure, accident & impairment: materials & substances
feeling, emotion & effect: materials & substances
condition & status: materials & substances
breaking point (other)
breaking point
every man has his ~ (the film Shawshank Redemption)
failure, accident & impairment: materials & substances
feeling, emotion & effect: materials & substances
condition & status: materials & substances
breakneck (adjective)
breakneck rate
Boeing has been churning out the popular model at a ~
speed: animal / horse
break off (verb)
broke off the attack
the mountain lion finally ~ (on 70-year-old man / CA)
broke off his engagement
he ~ to the former Playboy model
broke off (diplomatic) relations
Venezuela then ~ in response
broke off (business) ties
it ~ with... (two companies)
broke off (diplomatic) ties
Ecuador ~ with Colombia
Page 171 of 1574
break it off
until I got the nerve to ~ with my then-girlfriend
starting, going, continuing & ending: hand / verb
curtailment: hand / verb
break out (verb)
broke out in celebration
an army of fans ~ (#FreeBritney)
fight broke out
the ~ on Alexanderplatz square
typhus broke out
~ in the ships anchored on the Motherbank
initiation / occurrence: pursuit, capture & escape / verb
breakout (breakout sessions, etc.)
breakout rooms
Zoom ~ (online video conferencing)
breakout session
a ~ has been scheduled... (TESL convention)
♦ My dictionary gives two definitions. One relates to escape from enemy
encirclement or from a prison. The other is a skin eruption. Teacher
education and educational conferences are well known for their
“breakout” sessions followed by the blessed break for lunch.
division & connection: school & education
break through (verb)
break through
it’s difficult to predict which words will ~ (into dictionary)
importance & significance / obstacles & impedance /
progress & lack of progress: direction / military /
movement
breakthrough (noun)
breakthrough
research failures are finally being outnumbered by the ~s
breakthrough in the (murder) case
we are hoping for a ~
breakthroughs in medicine
the new research might lead to ~
breakthrough in (stalled) talks
a ~ on a bill that… (lawmakers)
breakthroughs in (armor) technology
revolutionary ~ (military)
breakthrough cases
experts are monitoring ~ among the vaccinated (COVID)
breakthrough infection
a ~ doesn’t necessarily mean the vaccine is failing
breakthrough lead
even a $2.5 million reward has not produced a ~
breakthrough moment
it was a ~ for a young man (Federer beats Sampras in 2001)
breakthrough pain
a "rescue dose" for sudden, severe ~ (morphine)
breakthrough year
he is having a ~ (baseball player)
research breakthrough
~s have reduced the cost
~s have led to new treatments for stroke
diplomatic breakthrough
the U.N.-sponsored gathering is a ~
revolutionary breakthroughs
~ in armor technology (military)
scientific breakthrough
it's a ~
technological breakthrough
the first ATMs were a ~ (1970s)
chance of a breakthrough
climate policy is gridlocked, with no ~
♦ In dictionaries, this word dates to 1918—World War I—when soldiers
struggled and died to break through enemy defenses.
importance & significance / obstacles & impedance /
progress & lack of progress: direction / military /
movement
breath (take one's breath away)
took my breath away
it ~ (a huge inflated medical bill)
she ~ (“It must be love”)
took your breath away
it ~ (an exciting boxing match)
takes your breath away
the canyon always ~ (Grand Canyon in winter)
fairly took my breath away
the book review was so spiteful it ~
feeling, emotion & effect: bodily reaction / breathing / verb
breath (hold one's breath)
held their breath
everyone ~, to see what she was gonna do (raped)
holding their breaths
people are ~ (waiting for a remedy)
holding its breath
the world is collectively ~ (Japan nuclear disaster)
holding my breath
I was ~ walking to the mailbox... (worried about a bill)
holding their breath
people are ~, waiting to see what happens next
fate, fortune & chance: bodily reaction / breathing / verb
Page 172 of 1574
breath (take a breath, etc.)
take a deep breath
this is a moment to ~ and think through things (crisis)
take a deep breath and take the long view
it’s a good time to ~ (hope during pandemic)
♦ Keep calm and carry on. (Great Britain, World War II.)
feeling, emotion & effect: bodily reaction / breathing / verb
breathe (caves breathe, etc.)
breathe
all caves ~
resemblance: bodily reaction / breathing
breathing space (and breathing room)
breathing room
provide ~ to consider the options
a little breathing room
the Turks are giving the Saudis ~ (to reply)
we have ~ to establish alternative energy sources
breathing space
travel bans can give you ~ (to prepare for virus)
gives the Postal Service “breathing room”
the rate increase ~
amelioration & renewal: breathing
time: breathing / place
breathless (adjective)
breathless coverage
blaring headlines, fleshy photos and ~ (the media)
feeling, emotion & effect: bodily reaction / breathing
breathtaking (adjective)
breathtaking action
he defeated his longtime rival in 6 rounds of ~ (boxing)
breathtaking advance
this is a ~ (legislative act)
breathtaking performance
she gave a ~ (skater)
breathtaking power
American prosecutors have ~
breathtaking speed
the cars go at ~s (racing)
breathtaking view
a front porch with a ~ of the mountains
the skyway provides ~s of the southern Appalachians
feeling, emotion & effect: bodily reaction / breathing
breed (create)
breeds (political) bedlam
the system ~ (government)
breeds corruption
the ruling ~ (campaign finance)
breeds the desire
success ~ for more success (school)
bred jealousy
success has ~ elsewhere (sports)
breeds peace
strength ~, right (US still in S. Korea, etc.)
Breeds Peril
Yellowstone Bison Thrive, but Success ~ (article)
bred (more) success
success ~ (diplomacy)
breed further success
that success would ~ (MGM gym)
creation & transformation: animal / verb
relationship: animal / verb
breed (type)
breed of enthusiast
roller coasters inspire a peculiar ~
breed apart
the war made them a ~ (W.W. II veterans)
they are a ~ and make no sense (white settlers)
breed of athlete
a pole vaulter is a very special ~ (danger)
different breed
they are a ~ to those who... (big riders / surfing)
new breed
the ~ of explorers (Blacks / National Geographic)
peculiar breed
roller coasters inspire a ~ of enthusiast
rare breed
he’s one of a ~ of technical divers
special breed
it's a dangerous job that takes a ~
a pole vaulter is a very ~ of athlete (danger)
♦ “Some professors are jerks, and students should learn the identifying
marks of the latter breed early on.” (Taking sexual advantage of
students.)
♦ “There’s a new breed of explorer... We down here ya’ all.” (Will Smith in
the official trailer for “Welcome To Earth” by National Geographic, on
Disney Plus.)
♦ “Chingachgook warned me about people like you... He said, ‘Do not try
to understand them. And don’t try to make them understand you. That is
because they are a breed apart and make no sense.” (Last of the
Mohicans, the 1992 film.)
taxonomy & classification: animal
identity & nature: animal
Page 173 of 1574
breed (dying breed, etc.)
dying breed
he is the last of a ~ (race car driver)
moderates are a ~ (politics)
Old Breed
With the ~ (World War II soldiers)
decline / past & present: animal
primacy, currency, decline & obsolescence: animal
breeder reactor (noun)
breeder reactor for extremism
the Punjab has been called a ~ (Pakistan)
creation & transformation: nuclear energy
breeding ground
breeding ground for (religious) extremism
mosques are a ~ (Pakistan)
breeding ground for (would-be) jihadists
Zarqa is a ~ (Jordan)
breeding ground for (serial) killers
the Pacific Northwest is a ~
breeding grounds for terrorism
the refugee camps are prime ~
the Sudan and Somalia, ~
breeding ground for viruses
the Internet is a ~
creation & transformation: animal
brew (mixture)
witches' brew
at one time, the US military was a ~ of racism
lethal brew
driving fatalities result from a ~ of… (India)
toxic brew
their illnesses resulted from a ~ of contaminants
we fight this ~ of stupidity and… (US exceptionalism)
mixture: food & drink
brew (activity)
brewing
this issue has been ~, and they knew it would bubble up
again
brewing in Nasiriya
another humanitarian crisis may be ~ (Iraq War)
controversy is brewing
a ~
crisis (in Haiti) has been brewing
~ since…
problem is brewing
a new ~ (too little space at Metro stations)
revolution is brewing
a ~ (against bilingual education)
storm was brewing
outside, the ~ (protests against the government)
tensions are brewing
~ between supporters and opponents
activity: heating water / temperature / verb / water
initiation: heating water / temperature / verb / water
bride (Bride of the Red Sea, etc.)
Bride of the Sea
Venice, the ~
Bride of the Red Sea
Jeddah, the ~ (Saudi Arabia)
configuration / relationship: epithet
bridge (noun)
bridge between the diaspora and the continent
explore your roots, build a ~ (Ghana)
mirror and a bridge
we are a ~ to culture at large (TikTok)
build bridges to the Taliban
he has sought to ~
burned some bridges
he's ~ in the tennis world (troubled athlete)
serves as a bridge
the Public Editor ~ between the newsroom and the public
division & connection: bridge / river
bridge (verb)
bridge the divide
they want to ~ and find common ground (gun control)
bridging the divide
ballet and baseball are ~ (Cuba and the US)
~ won’t be easy (NFL players’ protests)
bridge the gap
~ between the life you lead and the life you want to live
bridge the rupture
US diplomats are trying to ~ (Middle East)
division & connection: bridge / river / verb
amelioration & renewal: bridge / river / verb
bridge (air bridge, etc.)
bridge between the Middle East and Anatolia
Turkey is a ~ (eastern Turkey / Van)
air bridge
the ~ is important (food drops to starving refugees)
Egypt poured men and materiel into Yemen over an ~
she will fly out of Sanaa as part of this medical ~
Page 174 of 1574
Arctic Bridge
Arctic warming could revitalize the so-called ~
trans-Atlantic bridge
they have been trying to reestablish that ~ (Mafia / heroin)
transportation: bridge / river
division & connection: bridge / river
route: bridge / infrastructure / river
bridge (water under the bridge)
water under the bridge
it's ~ now
past & present: bridge / movement / river / water
time: bridge / movement / river / water
reconciliation, resolution & conclusion: bridge / movement
/ river / water
bridge (a bridge to sell)
sell that same bridge over and over again
they are happy to ~ (N. Korean promises)
sincerity, lack of sincerity & honesty: bridge
bridge (a bridge too far, etc.)
a bridge too far
the idea is ~ (a bad idea that goes too far)
I hope he wins, but my head says it will be ~ (Amir Khan)
he didn’t ask them to wear a mask, that was a ~ (staff)
bridge too far for some viewers
its use of racial slurs is an understandable ~ (Tarantino)
a game too far
it was, in some respects, ~ for England (World Cup)
a step too far
this could just be ~ (Khan vs. Crawford)
this approach is ~ (media coverage)
this may be ~ (substituting “bae” for “babe” / 2014)
♦ This echoes the title of the great 1977 Richard Attenborough film,
about Operation Market Garden during World War II. Its meaning is to
overreach. The actual operation was a noble and heroic attempt to end
the war early. It nearly succeeded. The unintended consequences were
horrible, however, in the parts of Holland that weren’t liberated: the Dutch
famine of 1944-1945. Market Garden started September 17, 1944. Anne
Frank was apprehended by the Gestapo on 4 August 1944, and she died
in Bergen-Belsen, perhaps in March, 1945. Allusions like these are a
double-edged sword. On the one hand, they memorialize. But as time
goes on and people forget, they trivialize.
♦ see also far (too far)
allusion: film / military
restraint & lack of restraint: allusion / bridge / history /
military
bridge (we will cross that bridge when
we come to it)
bridge
that’s a ~ she can cross at a later date
cross that bridge
we will ~ when we come to it
we will ~ and that decision will be made
we’re going to ~ when we get to it on Friday
confronting, dealing with & ignoring things / future / time /
timeliness & lack of timeliness: bridge / journeys & trips /
movement / river / verb
bridge (burn one’s bridges)
burn bridges
you never want to ~
burned some bridges
he's ~ in the tennis world (troubled athlete)
burned that bridge
but he ~ when he accused... (a soccer player)
division & connection: bridge / river / water
fate, fortune & chance: bridge / river / water
coming, arriving, staying, leaving & returning: bridge / river
/ water
bridge-building (through bridgebuilding)
resolve issues through bridge-building
they sought to ~
division & connection: bridge / river
amelioration & renewal: bridge / river
bridge-building
bridge-building visit
the admission came ahead of Medvedev's ~ to Warsaw
division & connection: bridge / river
amelioration & renewal: bridge / river
bridgehead (noun)
bridgehead
Hong Kong is not a ~ to subvert the mainland (China)
establish a bridgehead
hackers are keen to ~ on internal networks
presence & absence: bridge / military / river
survival, persistence & endurance: bridge / military / river
bridle (verb)
bridled against it
Biden ~ (becoming a public symbol of grieving)
bridle against (received) norms
the film does not ~ (the pieties of the Cold War)
bridal at criticism
he has a tendency to ~ (a politician)
“bridle” the executive
impeachment is designed to ~ if he engages in excesses
photographers bridle
~ as NFL announces policy
restraint & lack of restraint: horse / verb
constraint & lack of constraint: horse / verb
Page 175 of 1574
control & lack of control: horse / verb
resistance, opposition & defeat: horse / verb
bridle (mechanical bridle, etc.)
mechanical bridles
3 ~ hold the rover under the descent stage (Perseverance)
configuration: horse
bright (adjective)
bright
her future is ~
brighter
the future for the company has never been ~
bright idea
it's not easy to turn a ~ into a genuine business
superlative: light & dark
bright (bright side)
look on the bright side
well, ~…. (consolation)
♦ “The most ironic thing is that it became really quite serious and in the
Falklands War the sailors sitting on the HMS Sheffield after they had
been hit by an Exocet sang it for 3 hours while they were waiting to be
rescued. And the RAF pilots would sing it in great jeopardy, when they
were changing for their long, low-level bombing in the Bush Wars, Desert
Storm. And so you know, it took on a kind of optimistic component to it...”
(“Always Look on the Brightside of Life,” Monty Python. BBC Radio 4-
Inheritance Tracks, Eric Idle. U.S. veterans at Camp Vinnell in Saudi
Arabia delighted in recalling and reenacting Monty Python sketches at
the Tiki Hut on weekends.)
♦ seangamut: This is what is known as Karma! / Ambleside: “Always look
on the bright side of life!” (Manchester United 0-Liverpool 4.)
♦ see also Panglossian (adjective)
flaws & lack of flaws: light & dark
resiliency: light & dark
brighten (verb)
brightened the mood
the glad tidings ~ of Lincoln (military victories
feeling, emotion & effect: light & dark / mental health /
verb
brilliance (superlative)
flashes of brilliance
this was a performance of heart, quality and ~ (soccer)
he produced occasional ~ when he returned (a soccer player)
superlative: light & dark
brilliant (technology)
"brilliant" bomb
~s are in the future (Low Cost Autonomous Attack Systems)
~s are the smart bombs of the future
~s strike some as the ultimate nightmare
from dumb to smart to brilliant (m)
~ bombs (military)
knowledge & intelligence: mechanism
ability & lack of ability: mechanism
brilliant (superlative)
brilliant (medical and military) career
after a ~
brilliant hacker
he is a ~ (computers)
brilliant idea
I had a ~
brilliant job
who did such a ~
brilliant (new) plan
a ~ to…
brilliant scientist
she's a ~ who…
brilliant and abrasive (m)
a ~ engineer named…
superlative: light & dark
character & personality: light & dark
brim (verb)
brimming with patriotism
he staged a revival meeting ~
brims with irony
his account ~ (a book)
amount: container / verb
sufficiency, insufficiency & excess: container / verb
bring (verb)
brought joy to the citizens
the musical ~ of an anxious nation at war (“Oklahoma!”)
bring perpetrators to justice
we need to ~ (sexual abuse)
brought the South Pole into the public consciousness
Shackleton ~ (in the UK)
brought the (bitter) rift to the surface
the incident ~ (between military and government)
brought gusts
the storm ~ of almost 100 mph
brings (political) pain
Trump knows economic meltdown ~ (coronavirus)
brought its own problems
the solution has ~
brought territory
trade had ~, territory war, war an Empire (Great Britain)
brought (150mph) winds
the storm ~ (a hurricane)
giving, receiving, bringing & returning: verb
Page 176 of 1574
fictive transportation: verb
relationship: movement / verb
bring (the future can bring something)
see future (the future can bring something)
bring (bring it)
bring it
if you’re gonna sing it, you gotta ~ (gospel music)
brought it
people were looking for a new realism, and he ~ (Brando)
bringing the brawl
Ryder though is ~ and has done all night (boxing)
brought it in Game 1
Cassidy Hubbarth talks about who ~ (NBA finals)
♦ “It’s all about that dog that he gonna bring to the fight.” (A boxer
speaking about what makes a winning boxer.)
♦ “We know what he’s going to bring, like he always comes forward, puts
on pressure, throws big bombs...” (Joseph Parker about an upcoming
match with Derek “Del Boy” Chisora.)
commitment & determination: giving, receiving, bringing &
returning / verb
bring around (verb)
bring Londoners around
what will ~ (to support the Olympics)
allegiance, support & betrayal: direction / verb
bring back (restore)
bring the beaver back
efforts are underway to ~
bring him back
nothing we can do can ~ (executed for murder)
amelioration & renewal / primacy, currency, decline &
obsolescence / survival, persistence & endurance: giving,
receiving, bringing & returning / verb
bring down (verb)
bring down some racial barriers
it helped to ~ (basketball)
brought down his own career
he ~ with drugs (a baseball player)
bring down the (whole) edifice
any crack in the system would ~ (dictatorship)
destruction: direction / ruins / verb
primacy, currency, decline & obsolescence: direction / verb
bring up (a subject, etc.)
brought up Honnold
Caldwell, sitting on the deck that night, ~... (climbers)
brought up the (new California sport) climb
when I ~ (in conversation with a climber)
speech: ground, terrain & land
brink (on the brink)
on the brink of collapse
the government is ~
on the brink of default
the country is teetering ~ (Greece / economy)
on the brink of disaster
the country is ~ (economy)
on the brink of a (polio) epidemic
West and Central Africa are ~
on the brink of failure
the meeting was ~ (UN)
on the brink of insolvency
the factory is teetering ~
on the brink of unconsciousness
he was ~ (trapped caver)
on the brink of stardom
he has been hovering ~ (a film actor)
on the brink of (another) summit bid
10 days later, ~ (climbing)
hovering on the brink
he has been ~ of stardom (a film actor)
teetering on the brink
the factory is ~ of insolvency
proximity: ground, terrain & land
fate, fortune & chance: ground, terrain & land
brink (to the brink)
push Iraq to the brink
he urged them not to ~ of confrontation
proximity: ground, terrain & land
fate, fortune & chance: ground, terrain & land
brink (back from the brink)
back from the brink
Wall Street is ~
step back from the brink
they must ~ (rioters battle soldiers)
bring them back from the brink
we must ~ of extinction (endangered animals)
pull his friend back from the brink
he tried to ~ (drug intervention)
proximity: ground, terrain & land
fate, fortune & chance: ground, terrain & land
survival, persistence & endurance: ground, terrain & land
brinksmanship (noun)
brinksmanship
there’s a lot of ~ involved (negotiations)
Page 177 of 1574
fate, fortune & chance: ground, terrain & land
position, policy & negotiation: ground, terrain & land
bristle (emotional arousal)
bristled at questions
the senator ~ about his patriotism
bristles at the suggestion
she ~ that she encouraged cheating (an educator)
♦ Piloerection is a sign of emotional arousal. In chimpanzees, it will
cause the hair on their shoulders to stick straight up. At the same time,
chimpanzees might hoot and throw pebbles.
feeling, emotion & effect: animal / dog / hair / verb
bristle (with security, etc.)
bristling with security
the courthouse is ~
protection & lack of protection: animal / fortification /
military / verb
British (British of South America, etc.)
British of South America
people used to say we are the ~ (Chileans)
character & personality / identity & nature / migration:
epithet
brittle (emotionally brittle, etc.)
angrier and more brittle
she seems ~ (emotions)
emerged (emotionally) brittle
he ~ (from a turbulent childhood)
feeling, emotion & effect: materials & substances
ability & lack of ability: materials & substances
broad (adjective)
too broad
for some the brush stroke was ~ (cancel culture includes
Abraham Lincoln)
extent & scope: breadth
broadside (noun)
broadside against China
Secretary of State Mike Pompeo launched another ~
broadside against the 2015 same-sex marriage decision
Thomas and Alito issued a ~ on Monday when...
broadside’ against fellow lawmaker
Tiller backs challenger in ‘extraordinary ~ (politics)
Twitter broadside
Senator’s Grassley’s ~ at Obama...
Trump’s broadsides
it’s unclear if ~ will have much sway...
ferocious broadside
he launched a ~ against Jeff Sessions (politics)
legal broadside
she leveled the fiercest ~ yet against the Sackler family
aimed another broadside
he ~ at Pelosi (President Trump)
level broadsides
Democrats ~ at Romney’s wealth (politics)
♦ “Hood, in the Zealous, took the station, and from the port-holes of his
seventy-four poured such a tempest of shot upon the Guerrier, that in
twelve minutes he riddled and totally disabled her... Passing gracefully
and swiftly to windward of the Zealous, [the Orion] fired her larboard
guns so long as they could be brought to bear upon the Guerrier, then
passing inside the Goliath, by a single broadside she shattered and sunk
a frigate, La Serieuse, which annoyed her, sending her to the bottom in
an instant with all hands on board, 250 men... / By this time the sun had
set. The Audacious, under Captain Gould, was pouring a crashing fire
into the Guerrier... The Theseus, Captain Miller, following next, swept
away the remaining masts of the Guerrier...” / The victory was ours; the
loss to the French was terrible... (The Battle of the Nile, 1798, also
known as the Battle of Aboukir Bay. Only four French ships escaped.
From British Battles on Land and Sea by James Grant. Crowds of Arabs
and Mamelukes on shore celebrated and cheered on the destruction of
their enemies.)
accusation & criticism: boat / military / weapon
conflict / speech: boat / military / weapon
Brobdingnagian (adjective)
Brobdingnagian Embassy
the US is downsizing its ~ in Iraq
♦The allusion is to the satire Gulliver’s Travels by Jonathan Swift. The
same book contributed Lilliputian to the language.
♦ Elena Tapia in “Primary Metaphor and the Fantastic” analyzes
Gulliver’s Travels and other fantastical works of literature, including Alice
and Wonderland, through the lens of conceptual metaphor in order to
explain what it is that makes them so fantastic. Even better, her paper is
available at ERIC, ED472663.
size: allusion / person
allusion: books & reading
broken (failure)
broken
our food-safety system in this country is ~ (salmonella)
there is no question in my mind that the system is ~
the economy is ~, and Obama can't fix it
what is ~ (teachers, parents, students / education)
the judiciary is ~, the law needs to change
broken home
he comes from a ~
broken life
put back the pieces of a ~ (schizophrenia)
condition & status / failure, accident & impairment / flaws
& lack of flaws / functioning: mechanism
broken (English, etc.)
broken Arabic
reporters asked him in ~ if…
broken English
the Peruvian liaison officer spoke ~
Page 178 of 1574
flaws & lack of flaws: speech / mechanism
speech: functioning
broken (feeling)
broken man
he left high-spirited, but he returned a ~ (war)
left (absolutely) broken
his family had been ~ by his death
♦ “You must not think of him as a man who had been broken... He had
been hurt, he was wounded, but he was still the same man in great
spirits. He thought the best spirit of resistance is joyfulness.” (An
acquaintance of Boris Pasternak in his last years.)
feeling, emotion & effect: functioning / mechanism
broken-hearted
broken-hearted (m)
a ~ man
feeling, emotion & effect: functioning / heart
heart: functioning / mechanism
bromide (noun)
bromide
this is sound advice as far as it goes, but it's a ~
feeling, emotion & effect: health & medicine
amelioration & renewal: health & medicine
speech: health & medicine
broom (broom of reform, etc.)
broom of reform
I will grab the ~ and sweep this state clean
♦ Michele Rhee was an educational crusader. As chancellor of the
Washington, D.C. school system, she was given a mandate to "clean
house." She appeared on the cover of Time Magazine with a broom. But
community members felt like they had been compared to dirt, and she
ended up having to resign her position.
amelioration & renewal: house / hygiene
disruption: house / hygiene
brother (Instagram’s brother, etc.)
brother of igneous volcanoes
mud volcanoes are the poor ~ (research, etc.)
big brother
he came from Instagram’s ~, Facebook (Mosseri)
poor brother
mud volcanoes are the ~ of igneous volcanoes (research)
relationship: family
brother (big brother, etc.)
big sister
I was like a mother hen to them, I was like ~
big sister to young rockers
Judy Collins was a kind of ~ (place to crash, etc.)
help & assistance: family
brother (brother in arms, etc.)
brothers
the Serbs and Russians are ~ (Kosovo)
brothers to us
the Syrians are ~ (Iraqi Christian refugee)
brother in arms
the soldier's reflexive instinct to protect his ~
brother from another mother
he was my ~ (David Grohl about Taylor Hawkins)
fraternity brothers
he died after chugging whiskey with ~ (initiation)
band of brothers
they are more than a fun-loving, bike-riding ~ (gang)
division & connection / person / relationship: family
brotherhood (noun)
brotherhood of the sea
we have seen what the ~ means (international rescue)
brotherhood of firefighters
the ~
brotherhood of submariners
the ~
brotherhood, loyalty, courage, and self-sacrifice
the virtues of ~
brotherhood, service, sacrifice
~ (Rangers)
Sufi brotherhoods
Chechnya's ~
have a (long) brotherhood
Columbia and Venezuela ~ (Cucuta Constitution, etc.)
♦ “The code, the brotherhood, the three hours we come together as
one...” (Sports talk, about a player who controversially quit on his team
during a game. Coaches often say, “There is no “I” in “team.” Players
retort, “There’s an “I” in “win.”)
♦ "We have seen in deeds, not words, what the brotherhood of the sea
means." (A Russian Navy official, on the successful rescue of sailors
aboard a sunken mini-sub. The British, Japanese, and Americans had all
rushed to help.)
♦ "My hope is that this site contributes to making more people visit our
museum and that the pilgrimage to the Island of Gorée provides an
impetus to an enhanced brotherhood able to exorcise the demons of the
past." (Abdoulaye Wade, President of the Republic of Senegal, 2005,
speaking about the island opposite Dakar which was one of many slavetrading centers on the African coast, ruled in succession by the
Portuguese, Dutch, English and French.)
group, set & collection: family
division & connection / relationship: family
brought up
brought up to feel
I was ~ proud of the Empire
brought up harsh, strict
I was ~, but just normal discipline (boxer Conor Benn)
Page 179 of 1574
growth & development: death & life
bruise (verb)
bruised feelings
but the decision has ~ here (by church, to…)
bruised some egos
he ruffled some feathers and ~ (a general)
feeling, emotion & effect: color / health & medicine / mark
/ sensation / skin, muscle, nerves & bone / verb
bruised
left the Administration bruised
the experience ~ (diplomacy)
feeling, emotion & effect: color / health & medicine / mark
/ sensation / skin, muscle, nerves & bone
bruising (adjective)
bruising (political) attacks
after days of ~ on his tax returns and his record...
bruising election
it was a ~
bruising encounter
another ~ with a beast of a wave (Nazare surfing)
bruising encounter
he was finding college a ~ (depression, etc.)
feeling, emotion & effect: color / health & medicine / mark
/ sensation / skin, muscle, nerves & bone
brush (characterization)
same brush
it is wrong to paint them all with the ~ (a few bad cops)
brush stroke was too broad
for some, the ~ (cancel culture includes Abe Lincoln)
characterization: picture
brush aside (verb)
brushed aside their hosts
the Titans ~ (NFL football)
dismissal, removal & resignation: hand / verb
brush off (verb)
brushed off concerns
he ~ about his security
brushed off their concerns
he angrily ~ (a manager)
brushed off his protest
they ~
dismissal, removal & resignation: hand / verb
brush-off
gave me the brush off
she ~
dismissal, removal & resignation: hand
brush up against
brushed up against this story
I was amazed I had never ~ (author / camels in US)
fictive meeting & seeing: verb
brutality (noun)
brutality of storms
the suddenness, the ~ now, it is different (NYC mayor)
force: violence
bubble (verb)
bubbling here
there has been a long-term democracy moment ~
bubbling (just) under the surface
conflict is ~
bubbled to the surface
all those feelings and emotions ~ again (abuse)
activity / initiation: bubble / heating water / temperature /
verb / water
bubble (activity)
investment bubble
their current popularity is an ~ (NFTs)
stock bubble
but now that the ~ has burst (1990s)
dot-com bubble
the ~
housing bubble
the ~ will eventually pop (housing market)
in an (influence) bubble
we are in ~ (the advertising industry)
boom and bust of (Iceland’s tourism) bubble
the ~
bubble has burst
but now that the stock ~… (1990s)
bubble burst
then the ~, and investors lost fortunes (stocks)
bubble has deflated
Iceland’s tourism ~
activity: bubble / water
substance & lack of substance: bubble / water
bubble (isolation)
bubble of this isolated leadership
Page 180 of 1574
Trump pierced the ~ (North Korea)
Canberra bubble
he and the whole ~ face a much more persistent issue
filter bubble
the term ~ was coined by Eli Pariser (Wikipedia)
tailored web searches put users in a ~
their own bubble
they can’t see outside of ~ (Facebook leaders)
media bubble
the ~ caused blind spots and groupthink (politics)
overprotective bubble
so many parents now raise their children in an ~
in a bubble
the people who live ~ (partisan, cultural identity)
live in a bubble
the people at Facebook ~
lives in a bubble
she ~, away from reality the rest of us face (a celebrity)
pierced the bubble
Trump ~ of this isolated leadership (North Korea)
get out of the (Washington) bubble
NPR needs to ~
♦ “Sixty-eight percent of tweets between journalists who work at The
Washington Post, NPR, [and the] New York Times... are to each other.”
(“How Journalists Congregating Into ‘Microbubbles’ Affects Quality Of
News Reporting,” NPR, All Things Considered, August 12, 2020.)
isolation & remoteness: bubble / container / water
avoidance & separation: bubble / container / water
bubble (quarantine)
“Bubble Boy”
the ~ was described in a documentary in the mid ‘70s
gene therapy to treat ~disease (SCID)
bubble experiment
for the NHL, the ~ paid off (sports goes on in pandemic)
quarantine bubble
some TV shows have continued to shoot in ~s
social bubbles
the pros and cons of ~ or pods... (COVID-19)
one-way ‘bubble’
~ opens between Australia and New Zealand (Covid-19)
COVID-Free Bubbles
sleep away camps offer ~ for remote learning
in a bubble
when you’re ~ for 100 days, it’s tough (COVID-19)
in the Bubble
David Vetter became “the Boy in ~” (1984)
in the (NBA) bubble
what it’s like to be one of the chefs cooking for athletes ~
created a bubble
the college has ~ to keep COVID-19 out
stay in their “bubble”
NBA playoffs are underway as players ~
♦ Beijing will be “bubble-ized,” there will be “bubble-ized” flights... (A
sports columnist about the Beijing Winter Olympics.)
isolation & remoteness: bubble / container / water
protection & lack of protection: bubble / container / water
avoidance & separation: bubble / container / water
bubble up (verb)
bubble up
the Troubles continue to ~ in unexpected places (Ireland)
this issue has been brewing, and they knew it would ~ again
activity / appearance & disappearance / initiation: bubble /
heating water / prep, adv, adj, particle / temperature / verb
/ water
bubbling (adjective)
bubbling, unsolved mystery
his case remained a ~ for years (Kim Philby)
activity / initiation: bubble / heating water / temperature /
water
bubbly (personality)
chatty, bubbly and (unfailingly) polite
~, she is comfortable in the spotlight (Emma Raducanu)
character & personality: bubble / water
buccaneer (person)
individualist, a buccaneer
Amundsen was an ~ (not a public servant)
buccaneers, outsiders, (political) pirates
they want to be seen as ~ (opposition researchers)
taking & removing: boat / crime / person / sea
person: boat / crime / sea
character & personality: boat / crime / person / sea
buck (verb)
bucked his party
he ~ (John McCain / politics)
resistance, opposition & defeat: horse / animal / verb
sanctioning, authority & non-conformity: horse / animal /
verb
bucket (category)
police bucket
maybe this shouldn’t be in the ~ of things
neat buckets
the motivators don’t fit into ~ (mass-casualty incidents)
essential and nonessential buckets
it’s hard to put things in ~
Page 181 of 1574
divide things into three buckets
Biden and Pope Francis can ~ (issues)
put them in the same bucket
but with Snowden & Assange, I do ~
taxonomy & classification: container
buckle (give way)
buckled
instead of doubling down on the policy, he ~
destruction / failure, accident & impairment / resistance,
opposition & defeat: infrastructure / ruins / verb
buckle (attachment)
buckle on the strap
Vicksburg was the ~ that held the Confederacy together
buckle of the Bible Belt
they landed at the ~ (Fujianese workers in Oklahoma City)
♦ A belt often has a buckle. See belt (area).
attachment / configuration: clothing & accessories
bud (nipped in the bud)
nipped in the bud
the plot had been ~ at the zero hour
sedition has been ~ (a plot)
curtailment / growth & development: plant
appearance & disappearance: plant
budding
budding adventurer
the ~ claimed she was not afraid (Abby Sunderland, 16)
budding career
her ~ came to a screeching halt (a Nike runner)
budding ("heritage language") movement
the ~ in education
budding relationship
they managed to keep their ~ a secret (guy / girl)
budding romance
the innocence of a ~ (teens)
growth & development: plant
appearance & disappearance: plant
budge (verb)
budge
the negotiators won’t ~, they are immovable
resistance, opposition & defeat: movement / verb
position, policy & negotiation: movement / verb
commitment & determination: movement / verb
budget (attention budget, etc.)
attention budget
ads take a toll on the user’s ~ (internet)
constraint & lack of constraint: money
buffet (noun)
buffet of injustices
that place was a virtual ~ (Southern Poverty Law Center)
alternatives & choices / amount: food & drink
group, set & collection: food & drink
buffeted
buffeted by the news
for readers ~... (pandemic)
force: fist / violence / wave / wind
bug (enthusiasm)
acting bug
he took some drama classes and developed an ~
skating bug
he caught the ~ at age 8 (ice-skater Rudy Galindo)
ballet bug
if she hadn’t been bitten by the ~...
travel bug
she said she got the ~ from her father...
bitten by the bug
and so I really got ~ (acting, in high school)
bitten by the (cycling) bug
as a youth he played soccer before he was ~
get the (acting) bug
when people ~, there’s really nothing you can do about it
enthusiasm: insect
build (create)
build an (international anti-terror) coalition
they seek to ~
build confidence
rehearsals ~ and improve performance (military)
build his confidence
he needs time to ~
build my confidence
rehearsals ~ and improve performance (military)
built a (drug-trafficking) empire
he ~ in the Caribbean
built a (nationwide freight-hauling) empire
Johnnie B. Hunt, who ~
build the future
the motto was Pro futuro aedificamus—we ~ (school)
build a (secure) future
~ for their children
build interest
Leslie's dunk will ~ in the WNBA
Page 182 of 1574
build a (16-point) lead
~ (basketball)
built a good life
we ~ together
build muscles
some bodybuilders use GHB thinking it will ~
build opposition
he participated in clandestine meetings to ~
build (a series of working) partnerships
~ (federal agencies)
built a (fragile) present
they ~ out of pieces of the past (Balkans diplomacy)
build rapport
a personable style of communication that aims to ~
builds (close) relationships
the chaplain ~ with prisoners (prison)
built her reputation
she ~ as an educator over two decades (fired)
build a reputation
you can't ~ on what you are going to do (Henry Ford);
Cotto continues to ~ (the boxer)
build (deductive) skills
~ early in doctors' training
build (company) solidarity
he pays for Caribbean cruises to ~
build a team
trying to ~ is a hard juggling act (basketball)
build (community) ties
people don't stay long enough to ~
building a better tomorrow
we are ~
build trust
you can ~ by… (dealing with kid's separation anxiety)
build a (peaceful) world community
they seek to ~
built her reputation over two decades
she ~ (an educator)
building a case one block at a time
they are ~ (for conspiracy)
build self-esteem
some argue that the best way to ~ is to…
anger is building
the ~ here (oil spill)
aims to build
a personable style of communication that ~ rapport
trying to build
~ a team is a hard juggling act (basketball)
failure to build
his government's ~ a healthy economy
time to build
he needs ~ his confidence
hard to build
the company's reputation, ~, easy to destroy
creation & transformation: infrastructure / verb
building block
building block of society
the tribe is the ~ (rural south Iraq)
use the experience as a building block
you can ~
bases: infrastructure
build up (verb)
building up
a lot of anger is ~
increase & decrease: infrastructure / verb
built
built around the church
his life was ~
configuration: infrastructure
built in
built in
is there an assessment tool that is ~
downtime built in
their jobs have extended ~ (firefighters)
built-in incentive
stock options provide a ~
attachment: infrastructure
identity & nature: infrastructure
configuration: infrastructure
bulge (shape)
youth bulge
population trends will dramatically increase the Yemeni ~
increase & decrease: shape
bull (bull in a china shop)
bull in a china shop
she's a ~
bull-in-a-china-shop reputation
he showed a tactical skill which belied his ~ (politician)
force: animal / cows & cattle
bulldoze (verb)
bulldozed him
Page 183 of 1574
Wilder then fell again as Fury ~ (boxing)
bulldoze me
he tried to ~, but I resisted...
bulldozing values
critics say he is ~ that Americans hold dear (politics)
destruction: tools & technology / verb
force: tools & technology / verb
bulldozed
bulldozed through the parliament
the bold reforms were ~ (India)
force: tools & technology
bulldozer (epithet)
nicknamed “the Bulldozer”
he was ~ for his toughness on corruption (John Magufuli)
epithet: force
character & personality: epithet / force / tools & technology
bulldozer (noun)
expect a bulldozer
if you took on Joe McCarthy, you could ~ coming your way
destruction / force: tools & technology
bullet (velocity)
bullets of sound
acoustic weapons can fire ~
bullet train
at the controls of a Japanese ~
speed: bullet / weapon
bullet (shape)
bullets, needles, prisms, columns
snowflakes come in shapes: ~, stars cups, and plates
shape: bullet / weapon
bullet (magic or silver bullet, etc.)
magic bullet
nothing yet has proved a ~ (against oak-killing spore)
silver bullet
the system was sold as a ~ but it never worked (E-Verify)
this problem will take time to fix and there is no ~
vaccine ‘silver bullets’
COVID-19 advisor says there are no ~
proved to be a silver bullet
hydroxychloroquine has not ~ (COVID)
amelioration & renewal: bullet / magic / weapon
bullet (dodge a bullet)
dodged a bullet
we ~ here (car bomb ignites but fails to explode)
dodged a (big) bullet
we ~ (hurricane misses refineries)
fate, fortune & chance: bullet / weapon / verb
bullet (take a bullet for somebody)
take a bullet for the president
he has said he would ~ (a lawyer)
♦ “I’ve never seen an athlete in my generation take the bullets in the way
he has taken the bullets. Metaphorically speaking, he is a martyr.” (The
broadcaster Craig Mitch about Raheem Sterling, and the latter’s efforts
to fight racism in football and the media.)
allegiance, support & betrayal: bullet / weapon / verb
commitment & determination: bullet / weapon / verb
bullet (bite the bullet)
bite the bullet
we’re going to have to ~ (pay the tariff)
survival, persistence & endurance: bullet / verb / weapon
commitment & determination: bullet / verb / weapon
bulletproof (adjective)
bulletproof
your logic is ~
our story was ~ (investigative reporter)
the case against him needed to be ~ (expensive lawyers)
ironclad, waterproof, bulletproof, (legally) binding
we need ~ guarantees (Sergey Ryabkov / diplomacy)
seemed bulletproof
he ~ just a few weeks ago (politician under fire)
flaws & lack of flaws: bullet / weapon
bullied
bullied by a liberal media
we won’t be ~ (politics)
bullied by the north
southerners complain of being ~ (Sudan)
getting bullied
Twitter is ~ by the government
coercion & motivation: school & education
oppression: school & education
bull's-eye (shape)
"bull's-eye" rash
the disease is characterized by a ~ (Lyme disease)
shape: target / weapon
bull's-eye (target)
bull's-eye on his back
he has a ~ (a wanted terrorist)
put a bull's-eye on the city
the hurricane has ~ (New Orleans 2012)
Page 184 of 1574
target: weapon
bully (verb)
bullied colleagues
there are charges that she ~ (administration)
bully the (national) judiciary
his comments are a shameless effort to ~
bully the president into backing down
the Republicans are trying to ~ on reform
let the US bully it
China will not ~
coercion & motivation: school & education / verb
oppression: school & education / verb
bully (person)
bully in their region
Israel was the classic ~ (Egyptians / 1973 war)
bullies on the block
the Patriots are no longer the ~ (NFL football)
bully tactic
the letter is a ~ (impeachment trial)
Hollywood bullies
other ~ are being sidelined, but not...
internet bullies
people who have been harassed by ~
regional bully
many see Saudi Arabia as a ~ (its neighbors)
technological bully
Google’s co-founders reviled Microsoft as a ~
stood up to the (schoolyard) bully
he ~ (student vs. record-industry lawyers)
♦ A boy shall learn to fight, or let him put skirts about his knees. This boy
has never been taught to fight, but he shall have his first lesson to-night.
We will see if the National Schools can beat a Morgan... Now, a good
straight left is the bully’s downfall. That is lesson one from the book.
Like this.” (How Green Was My Valley by Richard Llewellyn. Huw had
been beaten up by a bully after his first day in class at a new school.)
coercion & motivation: school & education / person
oppression: school & education / person
person: school & education
bulwark (resemblance)
sandstone bulwark
the Ennedi is a ~ in the middle of the Sahara (Chad)
resemblance: fortification
bulwark (protection)
bulwark against (Republican) excesses
he was a ~ (a politician)
bulwark against (religious) extremism
he had been a ~ (deposed leader)
bulwark against (government) tyranny
the Second Amendment is a ~ (right to bear arms)
bulwark against vice
playgrounds provide a ~ (urbanization)
bulwark of stability and democracy
India represents a ~ compared with Pakistan
protection & lack of protection: fortification / military
bump (speed bump)
speed bumps
there have been a few ~ (negotiations)
speed bump of the land
so as soon as it gets over the ~ (hurricane / Yucatan)
hit a speedbump
his investigation ~ when he met with...
obstacles & impedance: journeys & trips
flaws & lack of flaws: journeys & trips
bump (bump in the road, etc.)
bump in the road
this is just a ~ (personal setback)
it was just a ~ of their ideal lives
bumps in the road to toilet training
many families encounter ~
encounter bumps in the road
many families ~ to toilet training
obstacles & impedance: journeys & trips
flaws & lack of flaws: journeys & trips
bump (increase)
bump in business
the films saw a ~ following their Tony wins
bump in earnings
the company has seen a ~
increase & decrease: shape
bumper (bumper crop)
bumper crop
what a ~ (of works / Public Domain Day)
amount: farming & agriculture
bumpy (adjective)
bumpy ride
consumers are in for a ~ this year (customer service)
bumpy road
the economy is on the ~ to recovery
flaws & lack of flaws: ground, terrain & land
bunker (noun)
bunker mentality
Page 185 of 1574
England must discard its ~ after Chennai defeat (cricket)
♦ “When we dug bunkers we saw how the dead lay in layers one above
the other.” (The Storm of Steel by Lieutenant Ernst Junger, quoted in
The Beauty and the Sorrow by Peter Englund.)
protection & lack of protection: fortification / military
buoy (verb)
buoy the movement
Trump’s rhetoric continues to ~
feeling, emotion & effect: direction / verb / water
buoyant (feeling)
buoyant
the Russian mood is definitely ~
the German fans are ~ and singing (soccer game)
buoyant about ending
they were ~ their opponents' unbeaten streak (sports)
buoyant mood
the members of the expedition were in a ~
buoyant music
she loved the musical's ~
buoyant optimism
he expressed ~ that…
buoyant and hopeful
her depression had lifted , and she felt ~
buoyant, lively (m)
it was a ~ performance (music)
felt buoyant
people who have ~ in the economy (housing market)
feeling, emotion & effect: direction / water
buoyant (personality)
buoyant 70
he is a ~ (years of age)
buoyant confidence
she projects a ~
buoyant personality
she has a ~ given her circumstances (illegal immigrant)
buoyant temperament
she has a ~
character & personality: direction / water
buoyant (strong)
buoyant
voters supported him while the economy was ~
Asian economies remain resilient, even ~
buoyant demand
the offering has seen ~ from investors
buoyant (job) growth
we are seeing rapid, ~
keeps prices buoyant
the rarity of such collectibles ~
increase & decrease: direction / water
buoyed
buoyed with hope
he seemed ~
feeling, emotion & effect: direction / water
survival, persistence & endurance: direction / water
burden (verb)
burden his wife with (toilsome and difficult) work
a man should not ~, based on her abilities and custom
burden our grandchildren with this debt
it is wrong to ~
affliction / oppression: burden / weight / verb
burden (noun)
burden
some view stress as a challenge rather than a ~
burden of expectation
she suffers from the ~
burden of guilt
they share a ~
burden of history
the special ~ that contemporary Greece has to deal with
burdens of leadership
the ~ are heavy (politics)
burden of the past
future generations won't suffer the ~
burden of proof
the ~ is on the FDA to show…
burden (of paperwork) on researchers
the ~ can be great
debt burden
she couldn't get out from under her crushing ~
~ keeps poor countries from healing their sick
tax burden
the ~ still falls on the shoulders of regular Americans
the local ~ on the mall store
financial burden
we must reduce the ~s on patients (health care)
a wedding can be a huge ~ (Arab countries)
heavy burden
he carries a ~ of responsibility (ruler)
the ~ of this mammoth job (Man U manager)
the stigma of AIDS is still a ~
physical and emotional burdens
the ~ of child-rearing (on grandparents)
Page 186 of 1574
blessing and a burden
patients see choice as both a ~
burden falls
the ~ on the shoulders of those least able to bear it
the ~ primarily on women (health-care decisions)
carry the burden
some kids ~ of extra responsibility (autistic sibling)
ease the burden
how can we ~ of the poor
get out from under her crushing (debt) burden
she couldn't ~
shoulder the burden
locals must ~ after regime change (Rumsfeld)
affliction / oppression: burden / weight
burgeoning (adjective)
burgeoning influence
they wish to allay fears about its ~
burgeoning momentum
a 3-week break stopped Baylor’s ~ (basketball)
♦ This verb form relates to the new growth of buds and branches.
growth & development: plant
increase & decrease: plant
buried (dead and buried, etc.)
dead and buried
the peace process is ~
Spurs looked ~ when Ziyech scored against them, but...
Switzerland were ~ but kept fighting (Euro 2020)
they looked ~ at half-time, but never write off this team
condition & status / destruction: burial / death & life
buried (concealment)
buried
it’s the past, it’s ~, we don’t want to dig it up again
buried in the archives
the information was ~
buried in the past
it is ~…
buried in a (158-page) report
the information is ~
buried in the navigation bar
the link was ~ (poor Web site design)
buried facts
~ about the (plutonium) contamination
buried secrets
~ have teeth (Ad for Truth be Told TV series)
stay buried
the past did not ~ (The Troubles and Brexit)
♦ “Secrets, long buried, sometimes don’t stay that way.” (Dateline NBC.)
concealment & lack of concealment: ground, terrain & land
buried (buried in debt, etc.)
buried in debt
are you ~
buried in work
homicide detectives were ~ (leads)
buried under a (huge) mountain of debt
they were ~
buried away
she was ~ in the U.S. Department of Agriculture
involvement / oppression: burial / ground, terrain & land
burned (impressed)
burned into our (collective) consciousness
fairy tales or folktales ~
impression: fire / mark / sensation
burned (hurt)
burned by their (past) investments
they were ~ in failed projects (tech industry)
got burned
many investors ~ (fraud)
♦ Once burned, twice shy!
feeling, emotion & effect: fire / sensation
burned-out (and burnt-out)
burnt out from years
he felt ~ of working on...
feeling, emotion & effect: fire / sensation
burner (front burner)
put the environment on the front burner
they seek to ~ (election)
put having more fun on the front burner
maybe it's time to ~ (ad for a cruise ship)
importance & significance / priority / superiority &
inferiority: center & periphery / direction / position
burning (burning desire, etc.)
burning desire
the ~ to be the best (basketball)
he has a ~ to get the facts (human rights investigator)
burning question
she has one ~ (what did my son die for in Iraq war)
burning righteousness
she pays a price for her ~ (a play)
feeling, emotion & effect: fire / sensation
Page 187 of 1574
burning (slow-burning)
slow-burning rebellion
the nation is in the grip of a ~ against the regime
slow-burning war
the Troubles, the ~ in Northern Ireland
activity: fire
burnish (verb)
burnished his credentials
his work in Beijing ~ (a politician)
burnished his reputation
his sermons have ~
♦ If you burnish something, you rub it until it shines.
increase & decrease: light & dark / verb
burnished
burnished and tarnished
reputations were ~ (2021 Trump impeachment trial)
increase & decrease: light & dark
burn off (verb)
burn off her (abundant) energy
your toddler needs to ~
burn off stress
exercise is a great way to ~
amelioration & renewal: fire / verb
burn out (verb)
burn out
he warns that troops will "~" and leave the service
burned out
what happens to adjuncts once they've ~
burn out from the environment
people who ~ (technology and computers)
burn out or fade away
playboating didn't ~ (whitewater rodeos, etc.)
feeling, emotion & effect: fire / verb
decline: fire / verb
burnout (noun)
burnout
the new IN thing is “~” (a Times-Picayune columnist)
Women’s Burnout
~: How to Spot It, Reverse It, Prevent It (a book)
competitive burnout
he quit the tour, citing ~ (a surfer)
digital burnout
with the Web, people started talking about “~”
avoid burnout
maintain a happy work / life balance and ~
contribute to burnout
three key factors ~...
♦ The concept of “burnout,” originally coined to describe the way many
drug addicts felt in the late 1960s, has been expanded to Achilles in the
Bronze Age. (See “It’s Just Too Much” by Jill Lepore, The New Yorker,
May 24, 2021. An excellent article by an excellent writer.)
feeling, emotion & effect: fire / mental health
burn through (verb)
burning through cash
Boeing has been ~ at a significant rate
consumption: fire / verb
burrito (shape)
“burritos”
~, long, sand-filled tubes covered by heavy fabric
sand burritos
~ contribute to beach loss (Sunset Beach, Oahu)
shape: food & drink
burrow (burrow into)
burrowing into the coal industry
Communists are ~, newspapers and shipyards
burrowing their way into the computer networks
hackers were ~ of government agencies (SolarWinds)
concealment & lack of concealment: animal
subterfuge: animal
burst (activity)
burst of negotiating
the crisis signaled a fresh ~
burst of recognition
you’re getting a ~ (an old Blues singer)
activity: explosion
burst (burst into tears, etc.)
burst into applause
the staff ~ (teachers)
burst into laughter
she ~
burst into tears
I ~, assuming…
feeling, emotion & effect: explosion / verb
burst (burst into violence, etc.)
burst into violence
lingering tensions ~
initiation: explosion / verb
Page 188 of 1574
burst on / onto the scene, etc.
burst into our consciousness
she’s ~ (tennis player Emma Raducanu)
burst into the headlines
the conservatorship ~ this week (#FreeBritney)
burst on the scene
he ~ in 1991 (independent politician Ross Perot)
burst onto the stage
he was one of several poets who ~ in the 60s (Russia)
attention, scrutiny & promotion / coming, arriving, staying,
leaving & returning: explosion / verb
bury (conceal)
bury it
catch and kill is buying the rights to a story to ~
bury the truth
the government is trying to ~
bury (radio) listings
newspapers ~
buried the report
Harvard found the same thing but ~ (race issue)
concealment & lack of concealment: burial / light & dark /
ground, terrain & land / verb
bury (bury oneself in something, etc.)
buries herself in her phone
whenever they’re together, she ~ (teen and father)
absorption & immersion: burial / verb
bury (kill)
bury any chance
annexation moves would ~ of peace (Middle East)
destruction: burial / death & life / verb
curtailment: burial / death & life / verb
bus (throw somebody under the bus)
threw him under the bus
the police chief ~ (a policeman)
threw us under the bus
I felt like he ~ (a politician)
♦ Geoff Nunberg talked about this idiom in “Primaries Toss Some ‘Under
the Bus,’ on Fresh Air, April 22, 2008.
♦I n 2019, NPR’s All Things Considered gave the expression a “1-Minute
Listen” with examples, dates of usage, and its use in a rap song. In that
1-minute listen, Ammon Shea at Merriam-Webster points out that the
expression is not usually, if ever, used as a direct threat: “I will throw you
under the bus!” certainly does sound odd. (“The Origins Of ‘Throw Him
(Or Her) Under the Bus,’” NPR, All Things Considered, November 11,
2019.)
allegiance, support & betrayal: violence / verb
bus (allegiance)
on the bus
you’re either ~ or not on the bus, and I’m driving the bus
driving the bus
I am ~ to make sure we get this country back on track
♦ This is like the politician who said, “This is my truck, and in my truck we
go by my rules.”
allegiance, support & betrayal / control & lack of control /
unanimity & consensus: mechanism
busy (active)
busy with groups of hikers
unlike the previous day, the path was ~
busy hurricane season
it’s expected to be a ~
activity: movement
bust (oil bust, etc.)
oil bust
historic oil bust delivers a gut punch to Texas county
boom and bust
Argentina is used to ~ (the economy)
activity: explosion
cost & benefit: explosion
butcher (verb)
butchered his presentation
he ~
failure, accident & impairment: meat / verb
butcher (Butcher of Baghdad, etc.)
Butcher of Baghdad
ridding the world of the ~ (Saddam Hussein)
Butcher of Ethiopia
General Rodolfo Graziani, the ~ (Yekatit 12, 1937)
Butcher of Fezzan
the Arabs called him “the ~” (Graziani, 1930-34, Libya)
butcher of Mosul
the execution of Shukair Farid, "the ~" (Iraq)
Butcher of the Monks
the general became known as the ~ (Zhao Erfang)
quisling butcher
he was a ~ (Croatia / Jasenovac)
criminals and butchers
the terrorists are ~ (Prince Abdullah)
cast Grant as a “butcher”
Southern historians ~ (revisionism)
nicknamed the Butcher
the general, ~, seized power in a coup (Gwangju Uprising)
Page 189 of 1574
♦ “The Duce will have Ethiopia, with or without the Ethiopians.” (The
Italian General Rodolfo Graziani.)
♦ AVENUE DU BOUCHER BUGEAUD (A defaced street sign in Paris.
Thomas Robert Bugeaud was instrumental in the subjection of Algeria in
the 1830s and 40s.)
epithet: person
death & life / military / oppression: epithet
butterfly (shape)
butterfly ballot
the ~ confused many voters (2000 presidential election)
"butterfly" mines
PFM-1 ~ scattered from the air (Afghanistan);
children think ~ are toys
shape: animal / insect
butterfly (social butterfly)
social butterfly
she's a ~
person: insect / society
character & personality / society: insect / person
butterfly (butterflies in stomach)
had butterflies in my stomach
I ~ (a nervous performer before a performance)
feeling, emotion & effect: insect / stomach
button (push a button / action)
push the button
officials must decide when to ~ (COVID circuit-breaker)
♦ “We pressed the big button with rescue helicopters, rescue dogs, the
Red Cross, the civil defense, fire, health and police.” (A Norwegian,
speaking in Norwegian, about eight homes that were swept into the sea
by a mudslide. His speech was translated by the BBC, which showed the
video of the astonishing event. Amazingly, nobody was injured in the
disaster.)
♦ “We never had any time for that, we just pushed the easy button.” (US
in Afghanistan.)
action, inaction & delay / initiation: mechanism / verb
button (push a button / emotion)
buttons
he knows what ~ to push (to provoke reaction)
he knows how to push ~ (Jake Paul / boxing)
pushes South Africa’s racial buttons
rugby ~
pushed my button
that's what ~ too far (a suspension)
push people's buttons
I like to ~ (George Carlin / comedian / taboos)
he likes to ~ (get them upset)
feeling, emotion & effect / initiation: mechanism / verb
button (pause button)
hit the pause button
we need to ~ (gene editing)
it never really ended, we just ~ (Korean War)
action, inaction & delay: mechanism
starting, going, continuing & ending: mechanism
button (panic button)
panic button
I was scared, I hit the ~
hit the panic button
it’s not time to ~ yet
feeling, emotion & effect: mechanism
button (hot button)
hot buttons
he addresses love, expectation, and other ~ (writer)
he addresses jealousy, grief, and other ~ (writer)
he addresses disappointment, fidelity and other ~
hot-button issue
another ~ at the WTO was dumping
let's talk about some of the ~s (politics)
hot-button subject
it's a ~ (racism and bias)
feeling, emotion & effect: mechanism / temperature
buttress (verb)
buttress Ethiopia against threats
a better approach is to ~ to its survival by…
buttress its argument
Eritrea produced Italian colonial-era maps to ~
buttressed his case
he has ~ with science's latest discoveries about…
buttress European influence
the pipeline will ~ all the way to Azerbaijan
amelioration & renewal: infrastructure / mining / verb
strength & weakness: infrastructure / verb
buttress (resemblance)
buttresses of (dark, gabbro) rock
these peaks and ~ are called the Black Cuillin
resemblance: infrastructure
buttress (Castle Buttress, etc.)
Buttress Point
~ is a point in New Zealand
Castle Buttress
~ is a peak in KwaZulu-Natal
Porcupine Buttress
the ~ is a series of promontories (Western Cape)
proper name: infrastructure
geography: proper name
Page 190 of 1574
buy (time)
bought us time
the lockdown ~ (pandemic)
time: money
buy (buy into something)
buy in to the company
workers who ~ (enthusiasm vs. apathy)
bought into the bravado
he initially ~ (claims of a corporation)
bought into the (e-wallet) concept
parents that have ~
buy into the stereotype
does this guy ~ that Asian women are generally weak
acceptance & rejection: money
allegiance, support & betrayal: money
buy (accept)
buy their argument
do you ~ that…
buy the “bad apples” argument
I don’t ~ (combat, war, and atrocities)
buying his excuses
his colleagues are not ~ (ethics violations)
acceptance & rejection: money / verb
buy-in (noun)
buy-in
~ is acceptance, support, participation (employment)
employee buy-in
companies that demand ~
~ is a major part of some corporate cultures
buy-in from parents
we didn't have enough of a deep ~ (school)
loss of buy-in
several factors can lead to a ~ (enthusiasm turns to apathy)
♦ A BBC Worklife article about buy-in included the following expressions:
get on board; drinking the Kool-Aid; go all in...
acceptance & rejection: money
allegiance, support & betrayal: money
commitment & determination: money
bypass (verb)
bypass Congress
the President will try to ~ to get what he wants
bypass the gatekeepers
the internet allowed people to ~ who controlled music
avoidance & separation: movement / verb / walking,
running & jumping
buzz (sound)
buzz with the sound
forests ~ of chain saws
sound: insect
buzz (activity)
buzzing with anticipation
the students were ~ (school assembly)
buzzing with excitement
the city is ~ ahead of next month's World Cup
buzzing with questions
my mind was ~
buzzed with possibilities
my mind ~
buzzed with rumors
the school ~
buzzing with shoppers
Rockefeller Center is ~
activity: insect / sound
buzz (attention)
buzz
the ~ this years is that…
buzz about the (new) hotel
there was a lot of ~ (a Japanese robot hotel)
buzz and excitement and a coming together
there’s a ~ for the city (Super Bowl LVI (56) / Cincinnati)
buzz about the Nationals
there has been a lot of ~ (sports team)
audience buzz
the TV show is getting critical acclaim and ~
water-cooler buzz
the ~ is underway (a controversy)
most buzz
which story is getting the ~
negative buzz
the group survived the initial ~
generated quite some buzz
this has ~ in the last 24 hours or so (politics)
♦ Buzzword has morphed to fuzzword (social-justice language, feminism,
etc.)
attention, scrutiny & promotion: insect / sound
buzz (sensation)
beer buzz
I like a good ~ in the morning
euphoria or buzz or high
inhaling to get a sensation of ~ (toluene abuse)
Page 191 of 1574
feeling, emotion & effect: sensation / sound
buzzed (buzzed about, etc.)
buzzed about
this is a company that is ~ and for good reason
attention, scrutiny & promotion: insect / sound
buzz saw (noun)
hit the buzz saw
we were one of them that ~ (industry loses funding)
ran into a buzz saw
Minnesota went to Iowa and ~ (football loss)
♦ “Up to about the time of the Civil War, trees were cut down by axes,
which was slow, laborious work. The arrival of the crosscut saw speeded
this process immeasurably, and the cant hook and peavey, perfected in
the pineries of Maine at about the same time, made it much easier to
handle the logs... In the same way the equipment at the sawmills was
vastly improved... and the mill’s capacity for processing logs was almost
unimaginably increased... So over most of the state of Michigan the
forest was destroyed.” (Waiting for the Morning Train: An American
Boyhood by Bruce Catton.)
♦ According to Merriam-Webster, a buzz saw is the same as a circular
saw, and its first known use was in 1847.
destruction / force: tools & technology
buzzword (noun)
buzzword-laden
Kendall’s ~ corporate-speak (TV series Succession)
just a buzzword
is Web3 the future of the Internet or ~
become a buzzword
mindfulness has ~ in current mainstream culture
♦ Buzzword has morphed to fuzzword (social-justice language, feminism,
etc.)
♦ “Politics, Pundits And The Problem With The Word ‘Pivot’” is a very
nice opinion piece by Scott Simon. (NPR, Weekend Edition Saturday,
June 11, 2016.) Simon rightly characterizes the word as a buzzword.
♦ “To keep class discussion buoyant, lecturers are told to ‘encourage
students to practise the verbalisation aspect of knowledge’. Multiple
‘learning outcomes’, sacred buzzwords before the pandemic, have been
supplemented with ‘learner journeys’, promising against the odds a
positive experience as well as a realistic hope of achieving something.”
(“Diary: On Quitting Academia” by Malcolm Gaskill, London Review of
Books, 24 September 2020. “In May, I gave up my academic career after
27 years...”)
♦ “Kyle was not an active shooter, that is a buzzword the state wants to
latch onto because it excuses the actions of that mob.” (Defense attorney
Mark Richards, an attorney defending Kyle Rittenhouse. The jury found
Kyle not guilty on all counts.)
♦ see also boilerplate (noun), ese (legalese, etc.), funny language,
language (of sports, cars, etc.), lip service (pay lip service, etc.), speak
(NASA-speak, etc.), supersizing (linguistic supersizing), talk (mediator
talk, etc.)
speech / substance & lack of substance: sound
language: speech
buzzy (adjective)
buzzy (electric vehicle) market
skeptics take aim at ~
buzzy (new) role
Anne Hathaway talks ~
attention, scrutiny & promotion: sound
bygone (adjective)
bygone days
reliving ~ of going to drive-in movie theaters (pandemic)
bygone era
hallmarks of a ~
he dressed and sounded like he had stepped out of a ~
in modern-day America, there is no such thing as a ~
♦ Ago also means “gone by.”
primacy, currency, decline & obsolescence: movement /
prep, adv, adj, particle
past & present / time: movement / prep, adv, adj, particle
byproduct (noun)
byproduct of (Mexico's) culture
domestic violence is an ugly ~ of machismo
byproducts of the war
renditions and torture are ~ (US in Iraq)
ugly byproduct
domestic violence is an ~ of Mexico's culture of machismo
product / relationship: manufacturing
creation & transformation: manufacturing
Byron (epithet)
Byron of the antipodes
the 33-year-old ~ (D’Arcy Wentworth)
character & personality: allusion / epithet
allusion: books & reading
byzantine
byzantine (Third World) bureaucracy
solutions have been impeded by a ~
byzantine formula
fees are calculated according to ~s
byzantine (asylum) process
he navigates a ~ to finally get a court hearing
byzantine regulations
~ are difficult for the outsider to navigate (Egypt)
the ~ are stifling
byzantine tax law
he relied on Smith's knowledge of ~
Byzantine twist of fate
in a ~...
often-byzantine
navigating America’s ~ health care systems
complexity: history
Page 192 of 1574
C
Caesar (Chinese Caesar, etc.)
Chinese Caesar
the “~,” the precocious King Cheng (c. 221 BC)
history / military: epithet
cage (a gilded cage)
in a (gilded) cage
the 4 Russian princesses lived ~ (isolated in a palace)
constraint & lack of constraint: animal
cage (jail, prison)
threw my boy in a cage
they ~ with those wild animals
oppression: animal / justice
cakewalk (dance)
cakewalk
this election is not going to be a ~ for...
England are still well placed, but it has not been a ~ (cricket)
no Indy 500 is a ~, it’s a massive challenge (motorsports)
military intelligence suggested the campaign would be a ~
♦ For the history of this word, see “The Extraordinary Story Of Why A
‘Cakewalk’ Wasn’t Always Easy” by Lakshmi Gandhi, NPR, Code Switch,
Race and Identity, Remixed, December 23, 2013. The title says it all!
attainment / difficulty, easiness & effort: food & drink
California (California of Europe, etc.)
California of Europe
Portugal, the ~ (beaches, wine, laid-back lifestyle, etc.)
geography: epithet
calculus
calculus of subsidizing
for China, the ~ green industries is quite different
complicated calculus
it is a ~ (universities try to reopen during pandemic)
cynical (political) calculus
the racist language they used was part of a ~ (politicians)
economic calculus
the recent rise of shale drilling has changed the ~
mental calculus
he committed an instant ~ (a sports player)
new calculus
for many Mexicans looking north, a ~ favors home
political calculus
the recent ~ hasn't resulted in a winning calculus
regional calculus
the ~ has swiftly and dramatically altered (diplomacy)
strategic calculus
we cannot change Pakistan's ~
part of our calculus
that was ~, if we... (war strategy in Afghanistan)
altering the calculus
changes in Cairo are ~ of the entire region
changed that calculus
her string of stumbles ~ (that she could win easily)
analysis, interpretation & explanation: number
strategy: number
calibrate (adjust)
calibrate its use
it must ~ of force (a country)
amelioration & renewal: tools & technology / verb
measurement: tools & technology / verb
calibrated (adjusted)
calibrated to the moment
his temperament was exquisitely ~ (soldier)
amelioration & renewal: tools & technology
measurement: tools & technology
Caligulan
Caligulan dissoluteness
Toghon Temur Khan, a man of ~ (last Mongol Emperor)
behavior / character & personality: history
comparison & contrast: affix
call (the mountains are calling, etc.)
mountains calling him
he longs to return to Patagonia, there are so many ~
appeal: sound / speech / verb
fictive communication: sound / speech / verb
call (call to arms)
call to arms for everyone
this is a ~ who may have a hospitalized relative
call to arms against the epidemic
the report was a ~ (Koop / AIDS)
troll call to arms
her followers saw it as a ~ (criticism)
wake-up call, cri de coeur, call to arms
his book is a ~ (about language)
appeal / message: military / sound
call (close call / judgment)
close call
this was not a ~, there was no case (a judge)
scientific close call
Page 193 of 1574
this was a ~, and it was my call to make (CDC director
overturns her advisory panel)
judgment: baseball / sports & games
call (the right call)
right call
he remains convinced that he made the ~ (a judge)
judgment: baseball / sports & games
call (call of duty, etc.)
call of duty
his extraordinary heroism, above and beyond the ~
call of fads
don't give in to the siren ~ (tattoos you can live with)
call of the wild
it heard the ~ and disappeared (a pet deer)
call to action
boredom should be a ~
call to duty
men and women who feel the ~
God's call
he has answered ~ to preach the Gospel (Billy Graham)
clarion call
his legacy is a ~ to pursue creative freedom (Dirk Bogarde)
siren call
don't give in to the ~ of fads (tattoos you can live with)
answered the call
she ~ of duty and lost her life (RCMP officer)
♦ “Chou has not abandoned the mountains entirely, though. He still feels
their call.” (The remarkable Chou Yeh-Cheng of Formosa. From “Can
Taiwan become Asia’s next great hiking destination?” by Joe Henley,
BBC, Travel, 14 December 2021.)
appeal / attraction & repulsion: speech / sound
call (appeal)
calls (for the FBI) to share
~ information
calls for the abolishment
Iraqi leaders have rebuffed ~ of the death penalty
calls for democracy
universal ~ and human rights
calls for his head
there have been ~ (a government official)
call for help
that night they got a ~ (climbing)
call for jihad
his out-and-out ~
call for a (mass) protest
a ~ against anti-Semitism and racism (France)
calls for (peaceful) protests
despite ~, trouble broke out
calls for resistance
~ emanate from mosque loudspeakers (Iraq)
calls for revenge
rival families would issue ~
call for equal rights
the ~ was heard all over the country (civil rights)
calls for democracy and human rights
universal ~
heed his call
I wish more gays would ~ (gays shouldn't assimilate)
rebuffed calls
Iraqi leaders have ~ for the abolishment of the death penalty
appeal: speech / sound
call (cattle call)
political cattle call
all the Democrats will try to stand out at the ~ (Iowa)
assembling: animal / theater
call for (appeal)
calls (out) for (decisive) action
the crisis ~ (terrorism)
called for a ban
he ~ of anti-personnel mines
call for (immediate) intervention
these situations may ~ (medicine)
calls for the removal
another option ~ of the population (Nauru)
called for a summit
Yeltsin ~ among the superpowers
appeal: speech / verb
call for (a recipe can call for something)
calls for flour
when a gravy, sauce, soup, or stew recipe ~
fictive communication: speech / verb
call (wake-up call)
wake-up call
this death is a ~
the oil spill has been a ~
wake-up call to world leaders
Greta’s message is a ~ everywhere (Greta Thunberg)
wake-up call to the Saudis
the bombings are a ~ (terrorists)
wake up call for the colonized world
it was a bit of a ~ (Russo-Japanese War for Egypt, Indians)
Page 194 of 1574
wake-up call, cri de coeur, call to arms
his book is a ~ (about language)
consciousness & awareness / warning: sleep
calling card
calling card
the way he positions his victims is his ~
the way the body was left amounted to a ~ (murder)
bravado, cunning and carelessness are his ~s
her openheartedness has always been her ~ (a singer)
calling card of many (neo-Nazi) groups
the swastika is still the contemporary ~
calling card of a monstrous storm
debris everywhere, tossed and scattered, the ~ (hurricane)
calling card for one's personality and lifestyle
weddings serve as a ~
grim calling card
mesothelioma has become the substance’s ~ (asbestos)
microscopic call cards
touch DNA, the ~ we leave behind (murder)
became his calling card
the film ~ in Hollywood (an actor)
♦ A calling card was a visiting card. Calling cards were once very
important in the days of "society." They would include a name, perhaps
an address, and a lady's "day at home." Cards were left at balls,
receptions and teas. Those arriving in a new city might inform members
of society there by sending calling cards.
evidence: object
call out (verb)
call his teammates out
he isn’t afraid to ~ publicly (NFL quarterback)
called them out
the students ~, we go on the ground and rallied (protest)
accusation & criticism: speech / verb
judgment: speech / verb
callout (criticism)
callout
not every ~ escalates into a full-scale dragging
callout question
well, that is a bit of a ~ (aggressive BBC interviewer)
callouts, draggings, and pile-ons
some Y.A. books are targeted in intense social-media ~
accusation & criticism / judgment: speech
calm (emotion)
calm in a sea
he is ~ of performative-anger posers (election candidate)
calm atmosphere
in a ~, we tend to win the debate
oasis of (relative) calm
it provides an ~ within Iraq (Kurdish region)
keep calm
~ and carry on
remained calm
the atmosphere on the plane ~ (hijacking)
stay calm
~, there is no reason for alarm
♦ Keep calm and carry on. (Great Britain, World War II.)
♦ Keep calm and chive on. (KCCO.)
♦ Keep calm and wear a mask. (The COVID-19 pandemic.)
♦ Keep Calm and Call Drew! (Drew Cochran, criminal defense, Maryland
State Bar.)
feeling, emotion & effect: water / wind
calm (activity)
calm
right now, things are ~
calm before the storm
this is likely to be the ~ (lull in computer hacking)
this is still the ~ (pandemic cases)
activity: water / wind
calm (verb)
calm traffic
the aim is to ~ (low traffic neighborhoods / LTNs)
a radar speed display, or “speed trailer,” can ~
♦ “Roundabouts are one example of the modern effort to make urban
roads safer by reducing speeds. Other tactics include traffic calming and
road diets, such as the narrowing of Charlotte Street from four lanes to
three.” (“Embrace the age of roundabouts” by Bill McGoun, Columnist,
Asheville Citizen Times, Sunday, August 1, 2021.)
amelioration & renewal / control & lack of control / feeling,
emotion & effect: animal / verb
calve (verb)
calved from the Ronne ice shelf into the Weddell Sea
a giant iceberg has ~ (A-76)
calved from the east of the continent
D28 ~ (Antarctica)
calve (immense serac) avalanches
hanging glaciers ~ (Everest base camp)
calve icebergs
tidewater glaciers ~
calve underwater
glaciers can ~, causing an iceberg to leap up
creation & transformation: animal / birth / cows & cattle /
glacier / snow & ice / verb
calving
calving of icebergs
the ~ by glaciers
Page 195 of 1574
calving of an iceberg
the ~ can create a huge wave
creation & transformation: animal / birth / cows & cattle /
glacier / snow & ice
camel (camel's nose in the tent, etc.)
camel's nose in the tent
he sees the decision as the ~ (a judicial case)
♦ “In August 1942 a single reinforced US Marine division splashed
ashore on Guadalcanal Island... [Ernest J.] King knew full well that it
would also be the camel’s nose under the tent. That once you put one
division ashore...it would have to be supported, and supplied, and
reinforced. It would draw more equipment and men and materiel like a
black hole into Guadalcanal and that is exactly what did happen.” (The
Guadalcanal Campaign violated the “Germany First” US policy and
almost failed for lack of materiel. From “World War II at Sea: A Global
History,” presented by Craig L. Symonds to the New-York Historical
Society, May 17th, 2018.)
access & lack of access: doors & thresholds / tent
starting, going, continuing & ending: doors & thresholds /
tent
cameo (noun)
celebrity cameos
the film featured a cavalcade of ~
necklace of (burnished) cameos
his book affords a ~ (Germany: Memories of a Nation)
characterization: clothing & accessories / picture
camouflage (verb)
camouflage my disability
growing up, I was always trying to ~ (polio victim)
concealment & lack of concealment: military / verb
subterfuge: military / verb
camouflage (concealment)
camouflage
“boring” is his ~ (criticism of a vice president)
‘social camouflage’
~ may lead to underdiagnosis of autism in girls
concealment & lack of concealment: military
subterfuge: military
camp (noun)
camps of advisers and loyalists
frictions between their ~ (politicians)
two camps
there will be ~, just as there are now (a debate)
the fault lines break people into ~ (computers)
split into (rival) camps
our fear that America is ~ (Red / Blue)
division: military
can (kick the can down the road)
kicked the can down the road
they just ~ (negligent doctor not dealt with)
kicked the can down the road for a year
they ~ (a troubled NFL team)
action, inaction & delay / confronting, dealing with &
ignoring things: movement / verb / walking, running &
jumping
canal (birth canal, etc.)
birth canal
push the baby through the ~
a woman can die if her baby becomes stuck in the ~
alimentary canal
the ~ extends from the mouth to the anus
anal canal
the sigmoidoscope is introduced into the ~
auditory canal
sound waves go through the external ear into the ~
♦ “On a turnpike four horses could draw in a day three thousand pounds
a distance of 18 miles; on the canal four horses could draw in a day a
boat loaded with two hundred thousand pounds of goods a distance of
twenty-four miles.” (The US in 1825. From A New American History by
W.E. Woodward.)
♦ “There is but one way to enter life, but the gates of death are without
number.”
route / shape / transportation: canal / infrastructure
route: water
canary (canary in the coal mine / cave)
canary in the coalmine
brook trout are the ~ (for water quality)
Jews are the ~ and they are raising the alarm (hate, etc.)
canaries in the coal mine
they are the ~, super-sensitive to warming (corals)
canary in the cave about rationing challenges
it's the ~ (changes to who gets a transplant kidney)
canary in the coal mine for disconnected societies
Japan’s lost generation could be the ~ (hikikomori)
evidence: animal / bird / mining
cancel (groups, etc.)
cancel
we don’t have to ~, to dismiss or silence... (books)
cancels or erases
I want to assure people this in no way ~ history
♦ “Good point. ‘Cancel’ alludes more power than they have. they’re just
boycotting.” (On a discussion board.)
♦ “Every step I’ve taken has gaslighted those whom I love... I am not a
culture vulture. I am a culture leech. You should absolutely cancel me,
and I absolutely cancel myself.” (An academic who claimed “identities of
color,” including Black Caribbean, North African Blackness, US rooted
Blackness, Caribbean rooted Bronx Blackness, Boricua...)
Page 196 of 1574
♦ See “The strange journey of ‘cancel,’ from a Black-culture punchline to
a White-grievance watchword,” by Clyde McGrady, The Washington
Post, April 2, 2021.
♦ “Cancelling is what comes out of Black discourse, it’s what comes out
of Black Queer discourse... If this had remained something that just stuck
within Black communities, within Latinx communities, then this wouldn’t
really be a story. But because it has crossed over...” (Meredith Clark,
who teaches media studies at the University of Virginia. From “Cancel
Culture Debate Has Early ‘90s Roots: Political Correctness,” NPR, All
Things Considered, July 9, 2021. Compare with McGrady’s article cited
directly above.)
inclusion & exclusion: society / verb
cancel culture (groups, etc.)
cancel culture
~ is leading us to an Orwellian dystopic society
cancel culture people
the ~, the woke people... (the beloved John Cleese)
“cancel culture” and “language orthodoxy”
she shares her thoughts on ~ (Chimamanda Ngozi Adichie)
left-wing cancel culture
the case has provoked allegations of ~ (France)
constitutional cancel culture
this is ~ (Trump’s second impeachment trial)
victims of cancel culture
the Free Speech Union supports people who are ~
♦ "It was ironic, it was arch, so it felt like, ‘Oh My God! they’re using this
against us!’” (Ruth Perry, who founded the Women’s Study Department
at MIT in 1984, about the term “political correctness.” From “How Cancel
Culture Became Politicized—Just Like Political Correctness,” NPR, All
Things Considered, July 26, 2021.)
♦ “Honestly, I think we should probably retire the phrase ‘cancel culture’
at this point. Because it’s losing its meaning...when people just use it to
mean, ‘I resent your drawing attention to my crazy ideas.’” (Mona
Charen, the Bulwark.)
♦ “I realize I’m in the crosshairs of the woke mob right now, so before the
final nail gets put in my cancel culture casket, I’d like to set the record
straight...” (The NFL’s Aaron Rodgers, employing nice alliteration.)
inclusion & exclusion: society
cancellation (groups, etc.)
cancellation
many Broadway pros aren’t too torn up about his ~
cancellation culture
this ~ is the SJW McCarthy moment (of Walt Whitman)
act of cancellation
the ~ is still mostly conceptual or socially performative
inclusion & exclusion: society
cancelled (groups, etc.)
cancelled no more
the program got cancelled, but she is ~
♦ “sorry, henry david Thoreau—ya (sic) cancelled” (Gerry Canavan of
Marquette University, Wisconsin. According to a ratemyprofessors
comment, “His Afrofuturism class is uber-interesting and a piece of
cake...”)
♦ “John James Audubon’s racism is the albatross rotting around the
necks of those who would hold him in reverence. It is past smelling foul
and beginning to reek.” (“What Do We Do About John James Audubon?”
by J. Drew Lanham.)
♦ “Some nights at the bar I would descend into discussions with
cosmologists and other[s]... and discover that Doctor Seuss meant more
to them than a menagerie of imagined animals and a vivid and
troublesome cat.” (“The Science of Dr Seuss,” BBC, Sounds, with Robin
Ince. Seven Doctor Seuss books were cancelled in 2021.)
♦ “The program got cancelled, but she is cancelled no more.” (The
presenter for Blue Origin’s New Shepard flight, referring to Mary Wallace
“Wally” Funk. Her real name seemed to have gotten cancelled in all of
the publicity. She was almost exclusively referred to as “Wally Funk” by
the media.)
inclusion & exclusion: society
cancer (noun)
cancer
this is a ~ that has been allowed to metastasize (issue)
government corruption is a ~ that destroys from within
cancer of our time
fake news is the ~
cancer on our society
Wall Street is a ~
cancer on the Internet
Facebook is a ~ (parent of teen)
cancer has metastasized
the ~ into a regional crisis (terrorism)
cut out this cancer
there is a need to ~ that we found (misconduct)
considers hacking a cancer
the Chinese government ~ to the whole society (Internet)
affliction: health & medicine
growth & development: health & medicine
cancerous (adjective)
cancerous growth
how can we stop the ~ of hate radio
affliction: health & medicine
growth & development: health & medicine
candle (candle of hope, etc.)
candle of hope
we need to light a ~ (victims of mass shootings)
♦ The lighthouse is an important symbol and icon to certain groups of
Christians.
♦ Florence Nightingale was known as “the Lady with the Lamp.” She was
not, in fact, a nurse. She was an administrator, logistician, statistician,
advocate, reformer, founder, writer, etc. And beloved by all those to
whom she administered “stump pillows.” There’s a collocation for you.
♦ “She became the center and the hope of the sick men’s lives. Their
letters home were filled with her, and through these letters her name
became a byword in thousands of English homes. ‘What a comfort it was
to see her pass even,’ wrote one of her men, in the most famous of all
letters about Florence Nightingale. ‘She would speak to one and nod
and smile to as many more; but she could not do it to all, you know. We
lay there by hundreds. But we could kiss her shadow as it fell, and lay
our heads on the pillow again, content.’ / This was the passage that
inspired the American poet Longfellow to write the poem on which the
popular image of Florence Nightingale is based: Lo! in that hour of
misery / A lady with a lamp I see / Pass through the glimmering gloom, /
And flit from room to room. / And slow, as in a dream of bliss, / This
Page 197 of 1574
speechless sufferer turns to kiss / Her shadow as it falls / Upon the
darkening walls.” (From Florence Nightingale by Ruth Fox Hume.)
♦ "We stopped killing whales for oil only when kerosene and finally
electric bulbs provided better and cheaper lighting."
♦ “We will make electricity so cheap that only the rich will burn candles.”
(Thomas Edison, December, 1879.)
wants, needs, hopes & goals: light & dark / sign, signal,
symbol
candy (noun)
eye candy
many go to auto shows looking for ~
eye candy for philistines
the work is ~ (Koons’ Bouquet of Tulips)
blond eye candy
there’s lots of ~ Down Under (Oz)
“goose candy”
replacing Kentucky blue grass, called ~
attraction & repulsion / consumption: food & drink / taste
cannibal (the Cannibal, etc.)
Cannibal
his nickname is “the ~” because he chews up his rivals
Cannibal
in snow weather, ‘The ~’ took off... (Eddy Merckx)
‘Corsa Cannibals’
~ can strip Vauxhall Corsas of their parts in just minutes
♦ The modernist Brazilian poet Oswald de Andrade, in his 1928
“Cannibalist Manifesto,” wrote about Brazil’s propensity for “cultural
cannibalism” (canibalismo cultural), or the mixing of various cultures to
create something new, which he considered a very good thing indeed.
♦ “In 1809 [the Maoris] captured the vessel Boyd, further up the coast,
and killed and ate its crew...” (The Boyd massacre in New Zealand. From
The Fatal Impact by Alan Moorehead. You would not wish to have been
anywhere near this event!)
♦ “I collected here a great many specimens of the beautiful Paradisea
Guilielmi, in my opinion one of the most exquisite of all the Paradisea;
also a great number of rare and new papilios. After spending a few days
here we returned to Simbang in time to catch the Ysabel, which took us
back to Stephansort.” (Through New Guinea and the Cannibal Countries
by Herbert Cayley-Webster, 1898.)
♦ In World War I, the western part of the Island of New Guinea was
controlled by the Dutch (neutral), the southeast was controlled by Britain,
and the northeast was controlled by Germany. Hermann Philipp Detzner
wrote a book about his adventures: "Four Years Among the Cannibals in
the Interior of German New Guinea under the Imperial Flag, from 1914
until the Armistice."
♦ “When an Edwardian anthropologist told her Nenets hosts the story of
Captain Oates’s heroic ‘I am just going outside; I may be some time,’
they refused to believe her. Scott, they objected would surely have eaten
him.” (The Shaman’s Coat by the great journalist Anna Reid.)
♦ "The victim responded to a posting placed by Mr. Meiwes on the
Internet seeking a person willing to be killed and eaten." (Armin Meiwes
killed the willing victim in 2001, ate parts of his body, and was sentenced
to a few years in prison. There was an uproar about his "light" sentence,
and he was re-sentenced to life in prison.)
epithet: person
destruction: epithet / person
cannibalize (verb)
cannibalizing other formats
that fear that e-books were ~ in the book world
cannibalizing the sale
library lending is ~ of e-books (borrowed for free)
destruction: food & drink / verb
cannibalized
cannibalized
the buildings had been ~
destruction: food & drink
cannon (loose cannon)
loose cannon
there are a lot of ~s out there (crazy people)
police are calling him a ~ (man on crime spree)
had he appointed a ~ who would wreck the system
person: military / weapon
behavior / character & personality / control & lack of
control / restraint & lack of restraint: military / person /
weapon
cannon fodder (military)
used as cannon fodder
the prospect of being ~ makes many conscripts defect
♦ Merriam-Webster dictionary gives 1847 for the first use.
♦ "There is a very real sense in which the modern world—our world—
was born between 1914 and 1918. Something changed in human
sensibility. Soldiers wouldn't be willing to engage in such slaughter.
Toward the end of the first World War, even, tolerance for past norms
had begun to end. In 1917, much of the French Army mutinied and
refused to attack. They would defend but not attack. The days of cannon
fodder were over forever as a result of that war…" ("Why World War I
Resonates," by William Boyd, NYT, Jan. 21, 2012. At the beginning of
the Battle of the Somme, on July 1, 1916, the British Army suffered
60,000 dead and wounded—in one day. It was arguably the worst
butcher's bill in military history.)
♦ The Butcher of Baghdad; Cannon fodder; Hamburger Hill; lambs to the
slaughter; fresh meat... (Warfare.)
military: animal / consumption / farming & agriculture /
plant
cannon fodder (other)
cannon fodder
West Ham has been ~ for years now (EPL)
written off as ~, they triumphed (World Series)
worth & lack of worth: military
canon (literature)
canon of (English) literature
certain authors occupy a central place in the ~
canon of "great books"
who decides what the ~ is (literature)
standard canon
defenders of the ~ often agree to its expansion (lit)
Page 198 of 1574
traditional canon
the battle between defenders and detractors of the ~
parallel, oppositional canons
establish ~ of work by women, gays…
concept of the canon
many would repudiate the ~ entirely (literature)
sanctioning, authority & non-conformity: religion
canon (other)
culinary canon
a native ~ embraces rice, persimmons, corn, bison (US)
vegetables are certainly part of his ~ (Niklas Ekstedt)
canon has been blasted apart
but that ~ (doctors withhold prognosis)
sanctioning, authority & non-conformity: religion
canonical (adjective)
canonical
his Cold War scholarship is ~ (John Lewis Gaddis)
canonical example
it was a ~ of what a computer couldn’t do
canonical greats
reissuing the work of ~ like Kurt Vonnegut (publishing)
canonical rules
it breaks many of the ~ of the series (a film)
canonical songs
they cover some of Waits’ ~
canonical (theatrical) works
~ such as those of Shakespeare
sanctioning, authority & non-conformity: religion
canonize (verb)
canonized him
since his suicide, his fans have ~ (an author)
sanctioning, authority & non-conformity: religion / verb
canter (noun)
canter
at a ~, take us through the voyage... (radio show)
at a canter
he should beat Jake Paul ~ (Tommy Fury)
speed: animal / horse / movement / walking, running &
jumping
movement: animal / horse / speed / walking, running &
jumping
canter (verb)
cantering to their first league title
Liverpool is ~ since 1990 (soccer)
♦ “Humphrey, the whole national health service is an advanced case of
galloping bureaucracy.” / “Certainly not. Not galloping. A gentle canter at
most.” (The TV series Yes Minister, “The Compassionate Society.”)
speed: animal / horse / movement / verb / walking,
running & jumping
movement: animal / horse / speed / verb / walking,
running & jumping
cap (tip one’s cap)
tip their cap to Duke Ellington
younger musicians like Sonny and Max Roach always ~
achievement, recognition & praise: gesture / hat / verb
capital (value)
capital in the bank
any study, any work you do on your voice is ~ (an actor)
human capital
we must invest in ~
political capital
he is willing to spend ~ on the issue
when you’re president you have a limited amount of ~
capital evaporated
in the last 2 weeks his political ~ (resigned)
♦ The French sociologist Pierre Bourdieu wrote “The forms of Capital” in
1986. He talked about economic, cultural, and social capital. Cultural
capital is knowledge, social capital is your network.
♦ “As a Black woman, I see things through color... race is a lens for me,
and it’s a lens that my children experience as well and I think for
someone to say, “Well, I don’t see skin color, I just see who you are,” I
think you’re leaving out a really big part of who I am, you’re leaving out
my cultural capital.” (Gina Parker Collins, founder of RIISE. From “The
Trials of Critical Race Theory,” CBSN Originals.)
♦ “Maybe I’ll lean into the pain narrative, write that and get a good
advance, ya’ll pay me for that, right.” (Fantasy author L.L. McKinney.)
cost & benefit / worth & lack of worth: money
capital (capital of the world, etc.)
“cherry capital of the world”
Traverse City bills itself ~ (Northwestern Michigan)
cowboy capital of the world
they call it the ~ (Stephenville, Texas)
“Gem Capital of the World”
Franklin, North Carolina, the ~
“Live Music Capital of the World”
Austin bills itself as the ~ (Sixth Street, etc.)
“ostrich capital of the world”
Oudtshoorn, the ~ (South Africa)
perfume capital of the world
Grasse is known as the ~ (France)
Shark Bite Capital of the world
Volusia County, Florida, has been dubbed the ~
stabbing capital of the world
Alice Springs now holds the unenviable title of ~ (2008)
Page 199 of 1574
waterfowl hunting capital of the world
Katy, Texas, ~
world’s turkey capital
Cuero, Texas, the ~ (disputed by Worthington, MN )
geography: epithet
capital (Black Bear capital, etc.)
capital of America
San Francisco was the car-break-in ~
capital of Canada
Thunder Bay is the murder ~
capital of crime
Detroit has a reputation as the ~
cardoon capital
Vaulx-en-Velin is known as the ~ of France
Back Bear Capital
Pine Mountain is claimed to be the ~ of Kentucky
coal capital
Blackwater, the ~ of Queensland (Australia)
gem capital
Ratnapura is known as the ~ of Sri Lanka
murder capital
Thunder Bay is the ~ of Canada
surf capital
Scheveningen is known as the ~ (Holland)
shark attack capital
New Smyrna Beach is known as the ~ (Florida)
Trout Capital
boosters say Jackson County is the North Carolina ~
Whale Capital
the town calls itself the ~ of Iceland (Husavik, Iceland)
next crypto currency capital
Texas is becoming the ~
financial capital
an earthquake rattled Italy’s ~ of Milan (no injuries)
geography: epithet
capital punishment
capital punishment
this was the political equivalent of ~ (calls for resignation)
career capital punishment
an apology should have sufficed, not ~
punishment & recrimination: justice
capstone (noun)
capstone of his career
the banking overhaul was the ~ (politician)
he wants health-care legislation to be the ~ (politician)
capstone of the peace treaty
the independence vote is the ~ (Sudan)
capstone to his agenda
the ratification of the treaty was the ~ (president)
capstone to his career
his present job is the ~ (service to his homeland)
capstone for the neighborhood
it will be the ~ (architectural project)
capstone (warfighting) doctrine
AirLand Operations is the Army's ~
legal capstone
the case puts a ~ on a historic election (court)
♦ Two pillars often support a capstone, which is the stone at the top.
importance & significance: infrastructure / height
captive (held captive, etc.)
captive to its own delusions
the Party was a ~
captive to its past
America, once forward looking, is now ~ (1619, etc.)
held captive
an anxious nation suddenly ~ by crisis (a pandemic)
possession / taking & removing: crime
constraint & lack of constraint / control & lack of control:
crime
captivity (noun)
live in captivity
child stars ~ (US female celebrities)
possession / taking & removing: crime
constraint & lack of constraint / control & lack of control:
crime
capture (verb)
captured him on a phone in the airport
security cameras ~ (terrorist)
captured it on video
no one had ~ until now (citizens videoing cops)
captured Oscars
it ~ for best picture, director and actor (film)
captured (the world's) attention
airstrikes in Baghdad ~
capture headlines
it goes on every day but doesn’t ~
captured my heart
the first time I saw him, he ~ (an orphan)
captured my imagination
that speaks to me, that ~ (a quotation)
the mountain ~ (Machhapuchhare)
Page 200 of 1574
captured the imagination
the job of fire watcher has long ~
he has ~ of fans (an athlete)
the young Mancini has ~ of boxing fans everywhere
climbing films have ~s of movie goers (Free Solo, etc.)
captured imaginations
theories about what happened have ~ for decades (Earhart)
captured the (public's) imagination
what has most ~ is…
he is riding on a new artistic wave which has ~ (Doug Hyde)
captured the (public) imagination
the film character ~ (Dirk Bogarde as Simon Sparrow)
captured the (nation’s) imagination
her rise and sudden downfall ~ (Elizabeth Holmes)
capture the loyalty
it has managed to ~ of working women (WNBA)
captures our minds
the story incapsulates how outrage ~ (viral online clip)
capture ("impulse") moviegoers
advertising to ~
captures the plight
Scott Adams's Dilbert ~ of the cubicle slave (cartoon)
capture market share
~ while the market is small
captures (satellite) signals
the GPS receiver ~
captures the uncertainty
she ~ that comes with big life changes (a songwriter)
capture the zeitgeist
the challenge is to make enough noise to ~ (adult superhero
films)
captured the hearts and minds
he has ~ of Americans (Olympic athlete)
failed to capture
they ~ audio of the landing , but... (Perseverance / Mars)
♦ "Now that we have captured your imagination, don't make us come
after the rest of you. (A clever TV advertisement from the Eastern Band
of the Cherokee Nation promoting tourism on their reservation in
Cherokee, North Carolina.)
♦ “California Highway Patrol Captures Runaway Emu After 30 minutes...
The Highway patrol said no one was hurt...” / “A [Chapel Hill] emu on the
run in North Carolina was most recently seen jumping on the hood of a
car. It’s been loose for weeks...” (NPR. So many emus on the run. Emu?)
pursuit, capture & escape: hunting / verb
fictive possession: hand / verb
capture (noun)
carbon capture
Wyoming has invested heavily in ~ (coal)
there are two types of ~ (point-source and direct air)
hard capture
~ is complete (SpaceX crew capsule docks with ISS)
regulatory capture
this is an example of ~ (Boeing and FAA)
♦ “We can confirm hard capture is complete.” (SpaceX’s Crew Dragon
capsule attaches itself to the International Space Station.)
pursuit, capture & escape: hunting
fictive possession: hand
captured
captured by an anti-intellectual, illiberal mob
Brearley has been~ (the school / obsession with race)
pursuit, capture & escape: hunting
fictive possession: hand
carapace (protection)
subjects’ protective carapaces
her job is to cut her ~ down to the bone (a journalist)
♦ A carapace is the exoskeleton of a creature like a turtle or crustacean
such as a lobster, crab, shrimp or prawn, or an arachnid (8-legged
creature vs. a 6-legged insect) like a spider or scorpion.
protection & lack of protection: animal
isolation & remoteness: animal
carcass (noun)
carcass of a tank
he stood by the burned-out ~
destruction / resemblance: animal
card (in the cards)
in the cards
that's not ~
if you’re a Congolese, you know a life of comfort is not ~
a permanent revival is just not ~ (the coal industry)
fate, fortune & chance: cards / gambling / sports & games
card (guilt card, etc.)
compassion card
Democrats are playing the ~ (unemployment benefits)
evidence card
they had the race card, we were playing the ~ (O.J. trial)
gender card
stop playing the ~, the fact you’re a woman... (politics)
guilt card
the ~ works—if they have any guilt (Internet suck sites)
race card
he played heavily on the ~ (Peru)
some accused the lawyer of playing the ~ to the jury
they had the ~, we had the evidence card (O.J. trial)
sympathy (get-out-of-jail) card
no ~ for this case, go straight to jail
get out of jail card
no sympathy ~ for this case, go straight to jail
political cards
Page 201 of 1574
but the New Left never had any ~ to play (students)
he played his ~ right and got a plum job
policy and philosophical cards
they will have to show their ~ (party in power)
strategy: cards / gambling / sports & games
card (play one's cards)
played his cards very carefully
he ~, negotiating a deal that... (Ahmed Zaki Yamani)
play my cards right
if I ~, I could be head cheerleader
played his (political) cards right
he ~ and got a plum job (Secretary of State)
strategy: cards / gambling / sports & games / verb
card (hold one's cards close)
holds his cards close to his vest
he ~ and knows just when to play them (an official)
character & personality / concealment & lack of
concealment: cards / gambling / sports & games / verb
card (dealt cards)
dealt some cards
they were ~ they can't play (under-privileged)
♦ "They were dealt some cards they can't play to this day. Fortunately, I
was dealt cards and somehow managed to play the right hand." (Olympic
champion speaking of his heroin-addict mother and step-father.)
♦ "It's not the cards you're dealt, it's how you play your hand."
fate, fortune & chance: cards / gambling / sports & games
card (strong card)
strong card
we don't have ~s but… (negotiations)
fear is a ~, if not a trump card (national security / politics)
his only ~ is that he…
it would be a ~ to play, but not perhaps a winning one
literature was never his ~
strong card in Afghanistan
he is the Pakistan Army's ~ (network leader)
Administration's (last) strong card
the ~ is to maintain economic sanctions against…
hold one strong card
we ~
strength & weakness: cards / gambling / sports & games
card (trump card)
trump card
this was her ~ (an endorsement for her)
fear is a strong card, if not a ~ (national security / politics)
strength & weakness: cards / gambling / sports & games
card (hold all the cards)
hold all the cards
when prosecutors ~, can any defendant get a fair trial
strength & weakness: cards / gambling / sports & games
card (cards on the table)
cards on the table
~, I can’t say... (I won’t lie to you)
concealment & lack of concealment / sincerity, lack of
sincerity & honesty: cards / gambling / sports & games
career (noun)
career of the metaphor
a case study of the ~ (weaponization)
growth & development: death & life
caretaker (role)
caretaker government
the ~ is fragile and weak
Israel’s ~ can only make limited decision (2019)
caretaker manager
a ~ will be appointed
he met with ~ Michael Carrick (the new interim manager)
caretaker PM
Hassan Diab is currently serving as ~ (Lebanon)
caretakers of the land
farmers are ~
help & assistance: infrastructure / person
Carnegie Hall (epithet)
Carnegie Hall of Broadway
onstage at the Shubert Theatre, the ~
superlative: epithet
carnival (noun)
carnival
boxing has always been a bit of a ~, a con (Jake Paul)
performance / resemblance: circus
attention, scrutiny & promotion: circus
carpet (verb)
carpets the (rolling) highlands in emerald and gold
cheatgrass ~
carpeted the meadow
flowers ~
cover / resemblance: carpets & rugs / verb
configuration: carpets & rugs / verb
carpet (a carpet of flowers, etc.)
carpet of ash
a ~ covered the city (eruption)
Page 202 of 1574
carpet of (low-rise) buildings
a ~ cover the seven hills (Istanbul)
carpet of color
wildflowers create a ~ (Arctic summer)
carpet of flowers
a ~ has been left (a memorial for dead fans)
carpet of frogs
there was a ~ (on a road in Greece)
lush carpet
the bird nests in the ~ of moss and vines (in a crater)
thick carpet
a crew laid down a ~ of insulation
carpet of wildflowers
the ~ in subalpine meadows (Mt. Rainier)
cover / resemblance: carpets & rugs
configuration: carpets & rugs
carpet (under the carpet, etc.)
brush it under the carpet
they will try to ~
brushing it under the carpet
it’s a whitewash, they’re ~ (education / PS752)
sweep it under the carpet
we can't any longer ~ (educational issue)
♦ “The problem with brushing things under the carpet is that they are still
there and one day someone is going to lift that carpet up and all you are
going to feel is shame and embarrassment.” (A celebrity who committed
suicide, who had been trolled mercilessly on social media.)
♦ see also rug (under the rug)
concealment & lack of concealment: carpets & rugs
carpet (Operation Magic Carpet, etc.)
Operation Magic Carpet
service members were repatriated by ~ (1945-1946)
Operation on Wings of Eagles, also known as ~ (1949)
the White Helmets were rescued in ~ (2018)
proper name: carpets & rugs / magic
military: proper name
carpet (magic carpet / other)
magic carpet
a ~ made of steel (a train)
magic carpet into a (serious intellectual) life
librarians were her ~
magic carpet away
Azerbaijan is a magical land, just a ~
♦ “Feel the wheels rumbling ‘neath the floors / And the sons of Pullman
Porters / And the sons of Engineers / Ride their fathers’ magic carpet
made of steel...” (The rousing song “Good Morning America How Are
You? / City of New Orleans.”)
transportation: carpets & rugs / magic
carpetbagger (person)
carpetbaggers
Canada’s Olympic team has the most ~ (born elsewhere)
carpetbagger politicians
~ adopt Florida as their native land
East Coast carpetbagger
he is an ~ (Montana politics)
gentrifying carpetbaggers
he accuses his neighbors of being ~
opportunistic carpetbagger
he accused her of being an ~ (politics)
social carpetbagger
he’s a ~, always code-switching to blend in
♦ “He calls himself an activist investor, and I would call him a carpet
bagger, and one who is trying to spread a climate of fear that pushes
studios to want to make only tent poles... He’s trying to manipulate the
market... Hedge fund guys do not create jobs, and we do.” (“George
Clooney To Hedge Fund Honcho Daniel Loeb: Stop Spreading Fear At
Sony” by Mike Fleming Jr, Deadline, August 2, 2013.)
♦ “But, of course, the new South had embraced all of this [commercial
strips, huge parking lots, motels, fast-food places, discount store, car
dealers, nightclubs, etc.], not quickly, as we had done up North, but
embraced it nonetheless. And in some strange way, the garish
commercial strip was now more associated with the South than with
anywhere else in the country. The carpetbaggers have finally taken
over.” (The General’s Daughter by Nelson DeMille.)
character & personality: history / person
identity & nature: history / person
carpeted
carpeted with flowers
the meadow was ~
carpeted with wild blueberry plants
the tiny island is ~
carpeted (at the base) with starfish and mussels
we drifted into an inlet alongside cliffs ~
carpeted eastern Washington
old-growth forests once ~
cover / resemblance: carpets & rugs
configuration: carpets & rugs
carried away
get carried away
it is no time to ~ (panic over virus)
control & lack of control: movement
feeling, emotion & effect: movement
fictive transportation: movement
carried off (died)
were carried off
one third of the population of Europe ~ (the Black death)
death & life: euphemism
Page 203 of 1574
carrot (reward)
carrot
offering ~s and wielding sticks to persuade people to…
amid the ~s, there will be some sharp sticks
carrot of membership
the EU is dangling the ~ in front of the two countries
coercion & motivation: fruits & vegetables / plant
carrot-and-stick
carrot-and-stick approach
it requires a ~ (a zoning alternative)
using a ~ to the millions moving into the fire zone
commanders say a ~ is necessary (military occupation)
♦ “The carrots do not work much. Now, we’re seeing more pressure
coming from the other side.” (Dr. Arthur Caplan, about requiring COVID
vaccinations in the US.)
coercion & motivation: fruits & vegetables / plant
carrousel (noun)
carrousel of helicopters
this constant ~ flying over the reactor (Chernobyl)
coming, arriving, staying, leaving & returning / movement:
sports & games
carry (carry me away, etc.)
carry me away
I let my emotions ~
carry the memory of my half-brother with me
I ~ every day (murdered)
carry the pain
families still ~ 19 years later (9/11 memorial)
feeling, emotion & effect: movement / verb
fictive transportation: movement / verb
carry (transport)
carry this loss
while I will ~ for a long time, it will motivate me
carries a (maximum) sentence
Count Fourteen ~ of 20 years imprisonment
carry viruses
smuggled pangolins have been found to ~
fictive transportation: verb
carry (assist)
carried this team
he ~ like we needed him to (Olympic basketball)
carried the team on his back
he ~ (football player)
♦ See the Wikipedia entry, “He Ain’t Heavy, He’s My Brother.”
help & assistance: burden / verb / weight
carry on (verb)
carry on
I got injured, but you still got to ~
resiliency / starting, going, continuing & ending / survival,
persistence & endurance: burden / journeys & trips / prep,
adv, adj, particle / verb
cart (cart off)
carted (31) Christians off to the station
police ~
carted him (off the field) on a stretcher
they ~ (injured player)
transportation: animal / verb
carved out
carved out of the Middle East
Jordan was ~
carved out of the Maasai land
the Masai Mara was ~
carved out by the British
Jordan was ~
carved out in the 1920's
Jordan was ~
creation & transformation: blade / knife
carve out (verb)
carve out an Islamic state
they want to ~ in Mindanao
carve a Muslim state out of the south
the group is fighting to ~ (Mindanao)
carve out a future
young Brazilians are trying to ~
carve out her own lane
she has managed to ~ (singing, fashion, etc.)
carve out (decent) lives
homesteaders tried to ~ (North Dakota)
carve out a living
wolves are forced to ~ on the steeper slopes
carved out (new) markets
some entrepreneurs have ~ by selling…
carve out a new role
Britain wants to ~ (post-Brexit)
♦ Carve out, fashion, shape...
creation & transformation: blade / knife / verb
Casanova (Serbian Casanova, etc.)
determined bovine Casanova
a feat impossible for even the most ~ (insemination)
Page 204 of 1574
Serbian Casanova
Dusko Popov, a ~… (a double agent for MI6)
allusion: books & reading
sex / character & personality: allusion / epithet / books &
reading
cascade (verb)
cascade through generations
negative attitudes ~
movement: direction / water
cascade (noun)
cascade of decisions
the computer models triggered a ~ (transportation)
cascade of disasters
we have seen a ~ lately
cascade of (damaging) events
head injury can initiate a ~
cascade of problems
the events combined to create a ~
cascades of white death
the 22 natural avalanche chutes are ~ (pass and highway)
set off a cascade
the decision has ~ of accusations and counter-accusations
trigger a cascade
these chemicals ~ of allergic symptoms (food allergies)
amount & effect: water
cascade (a cascade of hair, etc.)
cascade of strawberry-blond hair
she has pale skin and a ~
resemblance: water
cash in (verb)
cashing in
the economy is growing, but not all are ~
cash in on the experience
a failure is a man who blundered but is not able to ~
cash in on his fame
opportunists who want to ~ (sex-abuse accusers)
cash in on those investments
early success could position her to ~ (candidate’s hard work)
♦ “They are monetizing, they know what the game is.” (A lawyer for a
singer accused of sex abuse.)
cost & benefit: money / verb
Cassandra
Cassandra
for years he was a ~, his message ignored
“Go Ahead! regardless of the consequences and indifferent to the value
of human life.” (A diarist in the 1840s about science, technology, and the
use of steam for power.)
message: allusion / Iliad & Odyssey
cast (cast of candidates, etc.)
cast of candidates
a whole new ~ will be onstage at their debate (politics)
group, set & collection: theater
cast (cast doubt)
cast doubt on the (confession's) accuracy
the defense ~
cast doubts on such assumptions
the hearings ~ (politics of abortion)
cast doubts on plans
the difficulties could ~ to reopen New Orleans
cast (any) doubt on (Hamilton's) skills
she said she did not want to ~
casts (serious) doubt on another theory
the new finding ~ that had…
casts (some) doubt on a (popular) theory
the report also ~ that…
throwing, putting & planting: arm / verb
cast (light)
cast a beam
reflectors ~ (lighthouse)
cast a (dark) shadow
the tragic accident ~ over US-Korean relations
throwing, putting & planting: arm / verb
cast (other)
cast blame
officials can ~ only so much before the backlash starts
cast a curse
somebody must have ~ on his camel
cast discredit
the government alleges the paper ~ on the courts
cast a net
the authorities have ~ for the escapees
cast a pall
Chen's death ~ over the mountain (climbing)
cast a spell
at times he seemed to ~ on the ball (Ronaldo)
throwing, putting & planting: arm / verb
cast (characterize)
cast Grant as a "butcher"
Southern historians ~ (revisionism)
Page 205 of 1574
cast the debate as a class struggle
they have ~
cast the problem as a health issue
she has ~ (TV violence, etc.)
characterization: manufacturing / verb
cast (characterized)
cast as a hero
a guard ~ was recast as a villain (Richard Jewell)
characterization: manufacturing
cast aside (verb)
cast your fears aside
and you ~ (song)
cast security aside
at 48, he ~ to pursue his passion (left his profession)
dismissal, removal & resignation: arm / verb
castaway (person)
Hollywood castaways
mix with ranchers, fishermen and ~ (Livingston, Mont,)
homeless castaways
a dystopian future where children are ~ (a song video)
life’s castaways
she gives ~ the gift of merriment (film River of Grass)
society’s castaways
~—hookers, addicts, the homeless...
♦ A castaway usually becomes one by shipwreck. In cases of mutiny, a
person or persons might be cast adrift or left marooned on a deserted
shore. Alexander Selkirk is a famous example of a voluntary castaway.
He spent 4 years 4 months on one of the Juan Fernandez Islands in the
Pacific Ocean off the coast of Chile before being rescued. He probably
inspired Daniel Defoe’s Robinson Crusoe.
♦ Classic castaway stories include Robinson Crusoe and The Swiss
Family Robinson. The TV show Gilligan’s Island ran for 3 seasons. The
film Cast Away with Tom Hanks was very popular. People remember his
companion, Wilson, a soccer ball, and the scene where he removes a
rotten tooth with an ice skate.
♦ Tromelin Island in the Indian Ocean got its name from the captain who
rescued a group of castaways from that place. The whole story is quite
amazing!
person: island / society
isolation & remoteness / society: island / person / sea /
throwing, putting & planting
caste (noun)
caste society
America as a ~
caste system
lodgings follow a kind of unwritten ~ (officials)
the airlines use a ~ (paying more gets better treatment)
warrior caste
Marine pilots are an insular ~
professional military caste
the ~ will retain its grip (in time of war and conscription)
♦ "It's a caste system, and we are the untouchables of academia." (An
adjunct professor.)
♦ “Major Sleeman reveals the fact that the trade union and the boycott
are antiquities in India. India seems to have originated everything. The
‘sweeper’ belongs to the bottom caste; he is the lowest of the low—all
other castes despise him and scorn his office. But that does not trouble
him. His caste is a caste, and that is sufficient for him, and so he is proud
of it, not ashamed... A footnote by Major Sleeman’s editor, Mr. Vincent
Arthur Smith, says...’The sweepers cannot be readily coerced, because
no Hindoo or Mussulman would do their work to save his life, nor will he
pollute himself by beating the refractory scavenger.’ They certainly do
seem to have the whip-hand... Just like a milk-route; or like a London
crossing-sweepership.” (Following the Equator: A Journey Around the
World by Mark Twain.)
division & connection / hierarchy: society
society: person
castle (protection)
castle
a man's home is his ~
castle doctrine
Texas has a ~ which extends to your vehicles (deadly force)
~ is similar to “stand your ground” (deadly force)
♦ “Warning / Castle Doctrine / “No Duty to Retreat” (A sign / decal /
sticker.)
protection & lack of protection: fortification / military /
royalty
castle (Castle Peaks, etc.)
Castle
the Smithsonian is popularly known as the ~ (D.C.)
Castle Peaks
the ~ are peaks in Queensland, Australia
Castle Valley
~, Utah, is east of Arches National Park
Baboons Castle
the ~is a mountain in KwaZulu-Natal (South Africa)
New Castle
they were arrested in ~, Indiana (a town)
White Castle
~ is an oasis for late-night customers (hamburgers)
♦ This word often appears in geographical place names, as well as
cities. For example, Castle Creek / Islet / Mountain, Pass / Peak / Point /
Rock, etc.
proper name: fortification
casualty (noun)
casualty of the (real-estate) boom
the development was an early ~
casualties of Covid-19
this is one of the biggest ~ (great boxing match, no fans)
casualty of his own faith
he became a ~ (Columbus and geography)
casualty of the (slimmed-down) plan
Page 206 of 1574
the proposed sum is an apparent ~ (money for VA hospitals)
casualty of early stardom
he could have become Basquiat, a ~ (Jean Michel Basquiat)
too many casualties
there have been ~ (man accused of touching female athletes)
one of the first casualties
the low price of petrol has become ~ (pandemic recovery)
♦ “Two bass boats collided at night and there was a casualty.”
♦ Deaths from COVID have been described as a body count.
failure, accident & impairment: death & life / military
cat (cat and mouse)
see game (game of cat and mouse)
cat (cat out of the bag, etc.)
cat was (already) out of the bag
the ~, it already spread (virus)
concealment & lack of concealment / pursuit, capture &
escape: cat / container
catalogue (list)
catalogue of failures
the report describes a ~ (an air crash)
catalogue of problems
it’s one of a ~ caused by unplanned overdevelopment
amount: money
catalyst (noun)
catalyst
he was the ~, not the cause of the problem
this is a bill that will jump start, jolt, be a ~ (business)
the ~ for the government shutdown was…
Auschwitz was the ~ that made him into a great writer
catalyst of the team
he's been the ~
catalysts in this conflagration
Lincoln and his cronies were the ~ (US Civil War)
catalyst for change
disaster can be a ~
art can be a ~
catalyst for (economic) growth
the software industry could be a ~ (India)
catalyst for a (cultural) shift
snowboarding was a ~ in the world of skiing
catalyst for moving
the Morton case is going to be a ~ reforms forward (law)
economic catalyst
she said the museum would be an ~
served as a catalyst
the crash served as a ~ to mend relations (Poland-Russia)
initiation: chemistry
catalyze (verb)
catalyzed them to come forward
other accusers said that she ~ Me Too Movement)
initiation: chemistry / verb
catapult (verb)
catapulted Western Europe to (global) dominance
the industrial revolution ~
catapulted him to fame
his admission ~
catapulted Obama into the White House
the type of voter who ~
catapulted into the ranks
the company has ~ of top tech companies
catapulted over (more veteran) officials
she ~ (government promotion)
catapulted from an unknown to a superstar
he ~
throwing, putting & planting: mechanism / verb
catapulted
catapulted to the forefront
he has been ~ of the death-penalty debate
catapulted to stardom
she was plucked from obscurity and ~ (talent show)
catapulted out of obscurity
he was ~ (a politician who won an election)
catapulted into the limelight
after the broadcast, he was ~ (sports doping)
catapulted from obscurity to (prime-time) fame
he was ~ (an actor)
throwing, putting & planting: mechanism
catch (catch the imagination, etc.)
catch the (national) imagination
his account of the aerial voyage would ~
caught FitzRoy’s imagination
but it was the sea that had ~
caught the (national) imagination
his account would be published in the Times, where it ~
caught my interest
it really ~ so I started researching (a mine disaster)
the team ~ after I watched the game against Celtic
pursuit, capture & escape: hunting / verb
fictive possession: hand / verb
Page 207 of 1574
catch (marriage)
seemed the perfect catch
when she met him, he ~ (marriage / murdered by him)
pursuit, capture & escape: fish / hunting / love, courtship &
marriage
catch (catch and release)
catch and release
they basically had a ~, they should have been arrested
why the repeated ~, was he an informant
pattern of catch and release
it supports the ~ (interference to protect informant)
pursuit, capture & escape: fish / verb
Catch-22
in a Catch-22
he’s ~ (the rapper Bobby Shmurda and police protection)
allusion / alternatives & choices / situation: books &
reading
catchment (noun)
catchment area
about 1/3 of the state falls within our ~ (medical examiner)
extent & scope: river / water
catch up (his past caught up to him, etc.)
caught up to him
his past finally ~
the allegations have trailed him, and today the claims ~
by 2008, the truth had ~ (Bernie Madoff)
pursuit, capture & escape: hunting / verb
past & present / time: hunting / verb
catch up (catch up to something)
catching up to men
women are ~ in their number of partners
catching up to science fiction
reality is finally ~ (AI)
catching up in submarines
China is ~ (to the US)
competition / progress & lack of progress: journeys & trips
/ movement / sports & games / verb / walking, running &
jumping
catch up (catch up with something)
catch up with the technologies
standards have begun to ~ (biometrics)
catch up with the outside world
Fanning Island is anxious to ~ (Kiribati)
♦ "Let's keep moving, guys. Keep the line tight and keep it moving.
United 8114, I need you to catch up with the group." (An air-traffic
controller, directing traffic.)
progress & lack of progress: movement / walking, running
& jumping / verb
catchy (attention)
catchy headlines
these are ~
attention, scrutiny & promotion: hunting
catechism (noun)
Cold War catechism
the ~ dictated that...
script / unanimity & consensus: religion
cathedral (Cathedral Cave, etc.)
Cathedral Cave
large elliptical cupolas have been found in ~ (Australia)
Cathedral Mountain
we visited ~ (Tasmania)
Cathedral Room
~ is 204 feet high (Marvel Cave, Missouri)
proper name: religion
geography: proper name
cathedral (resemblance)
calcite cathedrals
these flooded caves are spectacular ~ of stalactites…
resemblance: religion
cathedral (Big Snowbird Creek, etc.)
cathedral
mountains are truly ~s ("Big" Jim Whittaker)
it's my church, it's my ~ (Yosemite on foot in winter)
cathedral of the Russian underground
the club was a religion, the ~ (the Leningrad Rock Club)
cathedral of stock-car racing
Daytona track, the ~…
cathedrals for fly fishermen
the waters here are ~ (Montana)
enthusiasm / reverence: place / religion
catnip (attraction)
catnip to (post World War I) audiences
adultery and divorce were ~
catnip to screenwriters
it has proved ~ (The Turn of the Screw)
catnip for (avid) travelers
lost and abandoned places are ~
box-office catnip
he was ~ (Dirk Bogarde)
attraction & repulsion: cat / plant
Page 208 of 1574
caught (other)
caught in the middle
civilians are ~ (war)
caught in the open
3 people ~ suffocated in the dust storm (Kansas / 1935)
caught in a (lightning) storm
they were ~ on a mountainside
caught in a (ferocious) storm
they were ~ near the summit of Les Droites
caught in a rip current
if you become ~, swim parallel to shore
caught in the drift ice
we'd be ~, but it was all right (fishing)
caught in a crossfire
three soldiers were ~
caught on film
unsuspecting women ~... (Internet porn)
caught on the back foot
police admit they have been ~ by the protests
become caught
if you ~ in a rip current, swim parallel to shore
the straps of his river sandals ~ on a rock
pursuit, capture & escape: hunting
fictive possession: hand
caught out
caught out by public reaction
he seemed to be ~ (a leader)
♦ Many associate this with the game of cricket.
failure, accident & impairment: ball / sports & games
caught up (in or by something)
caught up (again) in drugs
they go back out on the streets and get ~
caught up in the film
I was ~ and didn't hear the door open
caught up in a web
~ of drug addiction and crime
caught up in red tape
his expedition got ~
caught up in the drinking
I just got ~ and the drugs and fighting
don't get caught up in that
~ (weight loss / low self-esteem)
got caught up in red tape
his expedition ~
involvement: hunting
pursuit, capture & escape / situation: hunting
cauldron (noun)
cauldron
it’s going to be a ~ in there on Saturday (boxing match)
cauldrons of contagion
wet markets are ~ (coronaviruses, etc.)
cauldron of (internal) controversy
the Republican party is a ~
cauldron of grievances
a ~ bubbles beneath the surface
cauldron of socialization
the school bus used to be a ~
cauldron of (sectarian) violence
the country has become a ~
cauldron of war, violence and brutality
the US has hurled Afghanistan into the ~
witch's cauldron
the US is a ~ of unemployment and poor education
bubbling cauldron
the country has become a ~ since Ben Ali left (Tunisia)
simmering cauldron
you’ve got this ~ of hatred and revolution (Paris)
ethnic cauldron
the Balkans are a confused, often violent ~
red-hot cauldron
the Middle East is a ~ (protests, etc.)
revolutionary cauldron
many emerge from the ~ to become conservatives
send its children into that cauldron
a humane society would not ~ (war)
environment: container / fire / heating water / temperature
caustic (adjective)
caustic characterization
the leaked cables contained ~s of world leaders
caustic comment
she made a few ~s
caustic observation
she offered some ~s about their qualifications
caustic remark
they direct a lot of ~s and mockery
caustic welcome
he got a ~ (politics)
blunt and (sometimes) caustic
he defended his ~ style (governor)
feeling, emotion & effect / speech: chemistry / materials &
substances / sensation
Page 209 of 1574
caustically
caustically critical
she is now ~ (about school reform)
once a supporter, she is now ~ (an educator)
caustically funny
she is ~ (comic)
caustically intelligent
he is ~
caustically witty
his song is ~
caustically described
she ~ him as a figurehead
caustically dismiss
some scientists ~ his claims
said caustically
but he ~, "On a political level, …
speech: chemistry / materials & substances / sensation
cavalcade (noun)
cavalcade of (Nashville) artists
she is joined by a ~ (an album)
cavalcade of (celebrity) cameos
the film featured a ~
cavalcade of arm gestures
his every sentence is punctuated by a ~ (a politician)
cavalcade of people
there’s going to be a ~ saying you were wrong
♦ “We stood up now and then to get our circulation going, and it was
always the same: the wind was always blowing, there was always a
semblance of moon... and in front of the moon a fantastic cavalcade of
ragged clouds...” (“Bear Meat” by Primo Levy, translated by Alessandra
Bastagli.)
coming, arriving, staying, leaving & returning / group, set &
collection: horse / movement
cavalier (adjective)
cavalier attitude
he had a ~ towards going to war (a hawk)
cavalier and disrespectful
Pelosi said Barr was ~ (at a Senate hearing)
♦ The root is from caballus, Latin for horse, with the meaning of
supercilious. The rider has traditionally been dominant over the man who
walks.
character & personality: height / horse
hierarchy / superiority & inferiority: height / horse
cavalry (noun)
cavalry
the ~ has come, God bless you all (military aid in disaster)
the ~ is on the way (regulation of online abuse)
mechanized cavalry
today’s ~ means mobility and speed (military)
called in the cavalry
he ~, the FBI, ATF, State Police, US Marshalls (murder)
♦ “He claimed his newspaper had ridden heroically to the rescue of the
campaign.”
♦ “There’s no cavalry, no one will magically appear and save you.” (The
need to be self-reliant when mountain climbing.)
help & assistance / resistance, opposition & defeat: horse
/ military
cave (isolation)
cave
unless you are living in a ~, you know...
isolation & remoteness: mountains & hills
cave in (verb)
caved
instead of doubling down on his policy, he ~
caved in
I ~, just as Jean knew I would (and admitted truth)
cave in to his fears
he refuses to ~ (a stock-market investor)
cave in to (Serb) pressure
Europe will ~ (diplomacy)
caved in under the weight
the regime finally ~ of its impossible contradictions
cave to threats or fear
he did not ~ (from MS-13 members)
failure, accident & impairment: mining / verb
resistance, opposition & defeat: mining / verb
cavernous (adjective)
cavernous headquarters
as we left the ~, only we were in the lobby (pandemic)
resemblance / size: ground, terrain & land
comparison & contrast: affix
ceasefire (noun)
Ceasefire on Immigration
Clergy urge ~ (politics)
ceasefire in the war
there needs to be a ~ of words (dispute)
judicial ceasefire
the DA's office has offered to declare a ~ (drop charges)
conflict: military
reconciliation, resolution & conclusion: military
starting, going, continuing & ending: military
ceiling (glass ceiling)
glass ceiling
the ~ is alive and well on Wall Street
Page 210 of 1574
glass ceiling for women in politics
there is a perceived ~ (Massachusetts)
glass ceilings and other barriers
~ barring women
Japan's glass ceiling
she has helped to crack ~ (Toshiba team leader)
Oscars' glass ceiling
Kathryn Bigelow broke the ~ (Best Director)
age barrier, (no) gender gap, (no) glass ceiling
no ~
break the glass ceiling
success is the best way to ~
broke the (Oscars') glass ceiling
Kathryn Bigelow ~ (first woman Best Director)
raise the glass ceiling
quotas could ~ (employment)
shatter that glass ceiling
women can ~ once and for all
♦ Related is the glass cliff. That refers to putting a woman or minority in a
position of power in a bad organization, in which they are bound to fail.
♦ “There are studies that suggest that women are more likely to get jobs
at a point at which a company is in crisis. And I wonder if you think that
might be an issue as well.” / Jill Abramson: “It definitely was bad times, I
mean it was very soon after I became executive editor that we had one
of the biggest waves of staff reduction which, you know, creates pain and
misery throughout a newsroom.” (“Transcript: Former ‘New York Times’
Editor Jill Abramson Addresses Book Allegations,” NPR, All Things
Considered, February 7, 2019.)
obstacles & impedance: infrastructure
constraint & lack of constraint: infrastructure
concealment & lack of concealment: infrastructure
ceiling (debt ceiling, etc.)
debt ceiling
politicians battle over budget deficits and the ~
biological ceiling
120 years old is the ~ for human longevity
obstacles & impedance: infrastructure
constraint & lack of constraint: infrastructure
ceiling (high point)
ceiling and the floor
his numbers have been durable, the ~ (president’s
popularity)
increase & decrease: direction / height / house
celebrate (groups)
celebrate Black children
her books for very young readers ~
celebrate your differences
her goal is to help you acknowledge, accept and ~
celebrates Black excellence
in Newark, a drive-in movie theater ~
celebrate Juneteenth
Americans ~ after it becomes a national holiday
NPR employees ~
celebrate (Black History) Month
this week we ~ with an episode featuring...
celebrate National Hispanic Heritage Month
Alt. Latino and Tiny Desk ~ (NPR)
celebrates Asian/Pacific Islander Heritage Month
how NPR ~
celebrate their (childhood) neighborhood
2 cousins ~ in ‘Dream Street’ (a children’s book)
celebrates powerful women
on ‘Celia,’ Tiwa Savage ~
celebrates the cultural heritage, triumphs, adversities
Black History Month ~ that are part of our history
celebrate, educate, and empower
we ~ African American/Diverse people (arts & counseling)
preserve, celebrate
she uses social media to ~ Inuit throat singing
rouse, unite, celebrate and call to action
American Anthem, songs that ~ (NPR)
♦ “What I wanted to do in this book was to create those kind of poems of
celebration for places and people that were denigrated, right? So they’re
also poems of reparation for me.” (Joshua Bennett. From “‘Owed’:
Poems That Celebrate Denigrated Places And People,” NPR, All Things
Considered, September 23, 2020.)
♦ “Sandra Oh on celebrating Pixar, puberty and periods.”
♦ “Swiss Celebrate Tradition Of Blowing Up Snowman To Ring In
Spring.”
♦ “US zoo celebrates 50 years of giant pandas.” (BBC.)
inclusion & exclusion: society
celebrated (groups)
celebrated
Black lives are ~ in her extraordinary quilts
inclusion & exclusion: society
celebration (groups)
celebration of (Boston’s unique) accents
a ~
celebration of (Black) artists
the Black Opry is a ~
celebration of (Indian-American) cuisine
Bollywood Kitchen is a ~ (a cookbook)
celebration of cultures
it’s a ~ (a dress worn at a Met Gala)
celebration of diversity
Waiting for the Waters to Rise is a ~ (a book)
celebration of (gay-marriage) law
in New York, a ~
Page 211 of 1574
celebration of (Haitian) music
Rasanbleman (Red Moon) is a ~ (an album)
celebration of (indigenous) resilience
the forest will be renamed as a ~
celebration of women
In Defense of Witches is a ~ (a book)
celebration of (Southern) rap
the South got something to say: a ~
celebration of love, inclusion and strength
it’s a ~ (Jon Batiste’s “FREEDOM”)
celebration of uniqueness, individuality, representation
Pride is a ~ and so much more...
♦ “It’s world sleep day, a celebration of an activity we don’t do enough.”
(NPR.)
inclusion & exclusion: society
cement (verb)
cemented it in the public consciousness
the book really ~ (Helter Skelter scenario / Manson Family)
cemented his position
he has ~ as front-runner in the race (politics)
cemented his status
the show ~ as Britain’s best rapper (Glastonbury)
cement her surge
she is looking to ~ in opinion polls (politician)
attachment / strength & weakness / survival, persistence
& endurance: materials & substances / verb
cemented
cemented in the American consciousness
how did this narrative become ~ (Manson Family murders)
attachment / strength & weakness / survival, persistence
& endurance: materials & substances
cemetery (place)
graveyard for (Antarctica’s greatest) icebergs
South Georgia is something of a ~
bell cemeteries
collection points, known as Glockenfriedhofe, or ~
spacecraft cemetery
Point Nemo, also known as the ~ (remote Pacific Ocean)
♦ Between 1939 and 1945, 175,000 bells across Europe were taken by
Nazi Germany. They were transported to collection points, known as
Glockenfriedhofe, or bell cemeteries, the biggest of them in Hamburg.
(“The seizing of Europe’s bells” by Stephen J. Thorne, in Legion:
Canada’s Military History Magazine, November 21, 2018.)
place: burial / death & life
center (verb)
center her family
she has chosen to ~ (politics)
attention, scrutiny & promotion: center & periphery /
position / verb
center (society)
center
you drive people from the ~ towards the fringes (extremism)
society: center & periphery
center of gravity
center of gravity of Europe
Vienna had become the musical ~, drawing to it...
center of gravity for so many important developments
Asia and China are going to be the ~ in the 21st century
political center of gravity
Buffalo is not the ~ in New York State
bases: astronomy
attraction & repulsion: astronomy
centerpiece (noun)
centerpiece
its ~ is the Inc. record label (a studio)
a ~ of their argument is… (scientific evidence)
centerpiece of the Circumpolar North
the Arctic Ocean is the ~
centerpiece of his agenda
he has made it the ~ (crime bill)
centerpiece of our (domestic) agenda
health care is the ~
centerpiece of her campaign
her support of Medicare was the ~ (politician)
centerpiece of their culture
the camel is the ~ (Arab Bedouins)
centerpiece of their lives
for many people, work is the ~
centerpiece of their plan
city officials see the pier as the ~ to unify various sites
importance & significance: center & periphery / position
central (adjective)
central
the military is ~ (in Egyptian society)
importance & significance: center & periphery / position
central nervous system (basis)
central nervous system of modern life
the internet is the ~
bases: back / skin, muscle, nerves & bone
Page 212 of 1574
cesspit (noun)
cesspit of snarky poison
you know how social media and twitter in particular is a ~
cesspits of arguments, misinformation
the comment threads are absolute ~
environment: hygiene
corruption: smell
cesspool (noun)
cesspool
the neighborhood is a ~ that breeds crime
cesspool of corruption
college sports are a ~
cesspools of fraud
the federal mortgage agencies are ~
cesspool of hate
the website is a ~
cesspool of negativity
the Internet can be a ~ (consumer reviews, comments)
cesspool of character assassination
the Web site is a ~ (gossip site in rural towns)
reality-show cesspool
it's hard to stand out in the ~ (TV)
ethical cesspool
he is disgusted by the ~ of Albany (New York politics)
moral cesspool
this is indicative of the ~ that is America (nudity on TV)
political cesspool
finally somebody was doing something to clean up the ~
social cesspool
the tenements are ~s (1903)
clean the cesspool
they are trying to ~ (Web)
drain this (stinking) cesspool
he wants to ~ (New York politics)
environment: hygiene
corruption: smell
Ceuta and Melilla
linguistic Ceutas and Melillas
stranded like ~ (fuzzy semantics)
division & connection: history
chaff (separate the wheat from the chaff)
separate the wheat from the chaff
we need to ~ (real cases vs. imagined of a syndrome)
separating the wheat from the chaff
G-2 had great difficulty ~ (military intelligence)
searching & discovery: farming & agriculture / verb / wheat
worth & lack of worth: farming & agriculture / verb / wheat
dismissal, removal & resignation: farming & agriculture /
verb / wheat
chain (configuration)
chain of camps
the porters established a ~ up the mountain
chain of islands
the southern end of the ~ known as Lofoten (Norway)
chain of mountains
this great ~ (Caucasus Mountains)
human chain
policemen formed ~a (Hajj)
arriving police formed a ~ (rescue boys in river)
island chain
a nearby ~ was evacuated (typhoon)
an ~ that is part of the Antarctic peninsula
mountain chain
the Rwenzori ~ includes Africa's third highest peak
750-mile chain
a ~ of rugged mountains (the Caucasus)
divided into four chains
Tonga is composed of 140 islands ~
configuration: chain
chain (chain of events)
chain of events
the ~ that caused the airliner to crash
problems in this ~ (conception and infertility)
chains of events
describing hypothetical ~, he noted if…
chain of critical events
disasters are triggered by a ~ (engineering, crashes, etc.)
bizarre chain of events
in a ~, a passenger was killed... (NJ Transit Train)
surprise and sadness at the ~ (astronaut arrested)
fatal chain of events
the ~ began at 10:04 (car wreck)
falling debris started the ~ (loss of shuttle Columbia)
hypothetical chains of events
describing ~, he noted if…
sequence: chain
chain (oppression)
people's chains
we must break the shackles of an oppressed ~
invisible chains
she was exploited by “~” (sex trafficking)
constraint & lack of constraint / oppression: chain
Page 213 of 1574
chain (other)
chain of custody
drug screeners must follow the ~
chain of evidence
a ~ ties him to the crime
the ~ must be preserved (rape)
chain of (massive) explosions
Lagos struggled to recover from a ~ (ammo)
chain of trial and error
behind every discovery is a long ~ (astronomy)
cold chain
the ~—keeping the vaccine refrigerated (for measles)
supply chain
they have a very efficient ~ (Wal-Mart)
the army's ~ across the open desert is vulnerable to attack
there’s a whole ~ that feeds the production of the plane
link in the (global) chain
you're only as secure as the weakest ~ of information
predators in the chain
they were the top ~ (Iraqi terrorists)
break the chain
we need to ~ of transmission (COVID-19)
sequence: chain
chain of command (and chain)
chain of command
contact your immediate ~ if your believe…(military)
requests go through the normal ~ (military)
he forwards the report through the ~ (military)
the information went up the ~ to President Bush
program's chain of command
the ~
launch-control chain of command
those in the ~ (NASA)
top-down chain of command
older workers are used to a ~ (business)
military chain of command
federal military forces remain under the ~
level in the chain of command
the highest appropriate ~ must address…
chain of command (soon) broke down
the ~ (Suvla Bay / Gallipoli)
complained (for months) to the chain of command
he ~ about the poor gear
come down from the chain of command
a memo had ~ that said…
run it up the chain
Irving told him he’d have to ~ (a request for troops)
went outside of his chain of command
he was removed after he ~ (Navy captain)
♦ “You can jump the chain of command if you want and take the
consequences, you can disobey the chain of command and take the
consequences, but there is no, no situation where you go to the media...”
(Acting SECNAV Thomas Modley on his decision to reassign Captain
Brett Crozier from command of the nuclear powered aircraft carrier USS
Theodore Roosevelt.)
hierarchy: direction / chain / military
chain reaction
chain reaction
the ~ can go on for centuries (cyanide pollution)
chain reaction of car hitting car
a ~ (traffic pileup)
chain-reaction accident
a ~ that involved 125 vehicles (fog in Georgia);
low visibility caused a number of ~s (dust storm)
chain-reaction crash
the ~ happened in a snowstorm (highway)
chain reaction wreck
16 cars had a ~
chain reaction, a snowball effect
this will create a ~ (falling in a crowd crush)
sequence: chain
chainsaw (noun)
take a chainsaw to regulations
he wants to ~ (politics)
destruction / force: tools & technology
chalice (poisoned chalice)
poisoned chalice
the United job is a ~ (English soccer)
poisoned chalice of naval command
Baltaoglu vanished, and the ~ passed back to Hamza Bey
biggest prize and a poisoned chalice
the job is both the ~ (being the mayor of Rome)
fate, fortune & chance: allusion / food & drink
appearance & reality: allusion / food & drink
destruction / subterfuge: health & medicine
chameleon (change)
social chameleon
I was a ~, I went from group to group
style chameleons
celebrities tend to be ~, changing their looks
political chameleon
he was a ~ who charmed France (Jacques Chirac)
♦ “One of his nicknames was the Chameleon, his career was a stylistic
kaleidoscope.” (The musician Chick Corea.)
♦ “I’m so glad I was a Canadian in a way, because the Canadian can
take the best of the British, and the best of the American school, and uh
Page 214 of 1574
we’re rather good at that, we’re kind of like chameleons, in that respect,
that’s why there’s so many good Canadian comics.” (“Remembering
‘Sound of Music’ Star Christopher Plummer,” NPR, Fresh Air, Feb 12
2021, originally broadcast in 2007.)
♦ “[Chameleons] can camouflage themselves well... but they ultimately
did not outsmart the X-Ray machine.” (Smuggled chameleons from the
Usambara Mountains of Tanzania discovered in a suitcase at the Vienna
airport.)
appearance & reality / character & personality / creation &
transformation / identity & nature: animal
chameleonic (adjective)
chameleonic
her transformation was so ~ (Taylor Swift’s The Man video)
chameleonic and controversial
to the public, she’s been a ~ celebrity (Angelina Jolie)
surprisingly chameleonic
the series has proved ~ (Fast & Furious films)
appearance & reality / character & personality / creation &
transformation / identity & nature: animal
comparison & contrast: affix
champagne (money)
Champagne Johnny
his high living earned him the nickname ~ (John Osborne)
champagne socialists
~ are far removed from reality (politics)
champagne wishes
“~ and caviar dreams” (Lifestyles of the Rich and Famous)
♦ “Collaborating with these gentry was a mixed crowd of wide-minded,
wide-mouthed Liberals, who darkened council with pious but
disintegrating catch-words, and took care to live very well indeed.”
(Something of Myself by Rudyard Kipling.)
♦ “No, I can’t swig that sweet champagne, I’d rather drink beer all night,
in a tavern, or in a Honkey-tonk, or in a four-wheel-drive tailgate... Let me
get a big ‘hell yeah’ from the Redneck girls like me.” (Gretchen Wilson,
“Redneck Woman.” Hell yeah!)
money: sign, signal, symbol
champion (verb)
championing women’s voices
we have been ~ (a publisher)
allegiance, support & betrayal / attention, scrutiny &
promotion: Middle Ages / verb
champion (noun)
champion of social justice
he was a ~
champion of justice and equality
she was a giant in the law, a ~ (RBG)
its champions
each one has ~ (translations of Dante’s Divine Comedy)
allegiance, support & betrayal / attention, scrutiny &
promotion: Middle Ages
championed
championed by authors, consultants, and startup gurus
gamification is ~
allegiance, support & betrayal / attention, scrutiny &
promotion: Middle Ages
change (sea change)
sea change for Saudi Arabia
it’s a ~ (ending reliance on oil)
political sea change
there has been a ~ in Virginia (election)
amount & effect / creation & transformation / reversal: sea
channel (direct)
channeled (corporate) donation to Texas state races
he ~ (a convicted politician)
channeled his fears in music
he ~ (sickness therapy)
channel his (mental) illness to stay
he learned how to ~ functional
channels (more) money to (local) health centers
his plan ~ (reform)
channeled her unhappiness into writing
she ~
directing: verb / water
channel (through channels)
through administrative channels
submit requests ~ (military)
through diplomatic channel
India informed the US ~s that…
through operational channels
send NBC reports ~ (military)
through proper channels
a request has to go through ~
submit requests through administrative channels
informed the US through diplomatic channels
Spain ~ that…
go through proper channels
a report has to ~
route: water
channel (back channel)
back-channel operation
he was alarmed by a ~ in Ukraine (diplomacy)
supply chains, ~s, costs and cycle times
route: water
Page 215 of 1574
channel (distribution channel, etc.)
distribution channel
a new ~ has arisen (e-commerce)
supply chains, ~s, costs and cycle times
route: water
channeled
channeled to paramilitaries
US dollars have been ~
channeled through the I.S.I.
Pakistan wants talks with the Taliban to be ~
channeled to militants
it is not clear how much money is ~
channeled and exploited
people's anger is being ~ by corporate interests (politics)
directing: water
chaotic (adjective)
chaotic
Fury’s life has been ~
chaotic home
they were raised in a ~ with lots of siblings
flaws & lack of flaws: hygiene
chaperone (role)
worldly chaperone
he positioned himself as the grownup in the room, the ~
control & lack of control / experience: person
person: school & education
chapter (close a chapter, etc.)
close a chapter
the decision helps ~ on a painful period (Baylor University)
close a (tragic) chapter
the resolution will help ~ in Balkan history (apology)
close that chapter
we want to ~ in the department (remedy for racism)
it was time to ~ of my life (quit job)
close this chapter
it is time to ~ in our history (discrimination)
close this (dark) chapter
we would rather ~ of our history and move on
reconciliation, resolution & conclusion / starting, going,
continuing & ending: books & reading
chapter (other)
chapter
I'm definitely glad that ~ is over (in a career)
chapter of the (euthanasia) debate
ending that ~
chapter of history
we are spectators in a ~ (a significant labor dispute)
chapter of their lives
as they venture into this next ~ (retirement)
chapter of your life
it's kind of sad to end a ~ (breakup of band)
chapter of our (not-so-recent) past
that troubling ~
chapter in a career
fans witnessed another bizarre ~ that… (Mike Tyson)
chapter in his life
he started a new ~
chapter in the (still-unfolding) story
a ~
concluding chapter
the play was the ~ in a spellbinding story (series of plays)
troubling chapter
that ~ of our not-so-distant past
bizarre chapter
fans witnessed another ~ in his career (a boxer)
dark chapter
we would rather close this ~ of our history and move on
darkest chapter
his capture was one of the country's ~s of the war
final chapter
the war against terrorism is not near its ~
last chapter
a bizarre ~ in a divorce battle (townhouse explodes)
latest chapter
the ~ in the long, checkered history of…
this ~ has only tightened the family bonds (injury)
this is the ~ in the tragedy that is Haiti (epidemic)
new chapter
he is poised to write a triumphant ~ (Obama)
next chapter
as they venture into this ~ of their lives (retirement)
painful chapter
it was a ~ in Indian history (white boarding schools)
dark and forgotten chapter
it was a ~ in history (Kinkaseki POW camp / Taiwan)
succession of chapters
the lives of athletes are a ~ (playground, NBA, China)
begin the (next) chapter
he will ~ of his distinguished career
close a chapter
the decision helps ~ on a painful period (Baylor University)
close a (tragic) chapter
Page 216 of 1574
the resolution will help ~ in Balkan history (apology)
close that chapter
we want to ~ in the department (remedy for racism)
it was time to ~ of my life (quit job)
close this chapter
it is time to ~ in our history (discrimination)
marks a new chapter
his win ~ in American history (election)
write more chapters
it's been a storybook season, hopefully we can ~ (team)
write a (new) chapter
the protests could ~ in Arab politics
write his most glorious chapter
on Sunday he could ~ (Raheem Sterling, Euro 2020)
♦ “It closes the chapter but hasn’t ended the story, has it? I mean, clearly
there will be further trials connected to the violence of 2015... Even
during this trial there was more violence...” (BBC Newshour for 16 Dec
2020, “Fourteen people convicted in Charlie Hebdo trial.”)
♦ “It is a book as old as time: a good young person makes a mistake,
chapter two is a good, young person is full of remorse. Chapter three is a
good young person learns from the mistake and becomes a better
person.” (Australia Olympic team boss Ian Chesterman, following the
bad behavior of some Australian athletes at the Tokyo Olympics and on
their way home.)
development: books & reading
character (non-human)
character in her work
fashion is as much a ~ as everyone else (music videos)
becomes a character
the music is woven into the documentary and ~
♦ Nonhuman and nonliving things can have biographies,
autobiographies, obituaries and even be characters.
♦ “The year is 1925, and the place is Montana, which is played onscreen
by Campion’s native New Zealand. Whether it fulfills the role
convincingly...is a question that only Montanans will be qualified to
answer.” (“All In The Family: The Power of the Dog and King Richard” by
Anthony Lane, The New Yorker, November 29, 2021.)
person: books & reading
charade (noun)
Charade of Changing the World
Winners Take All: The Elite ~ (a book)
stop this charade
we need to ~ ("rubber rooms" for bad teachers)
performance / subterfuge: sports & games
substance & lack of substance: sports & games
charge (in, into, ahead, etc.)
charged ahead
the president ~ with his plans to...
charging forward
she is ~ with a civil case (a lawyer)
charging into (one of the country’s) leading debates
the leading philanthropy is ~ (Mellon / monuments)
commitment & determination / driving force / eagerness &
reluctance: horse / military / movement / verb
charge (lead the charge, etc.)
leading the charge
Republicans are ~ (for fiscal responsibility)
the young people are ~ (new media)
led the charge
he disappeared when he should have ~ (a politician)
led the (political and rhetorical) charge
the NRA ~ (guns and 2nd Amendment)
led the charge to go
Republicans ~ to war with Iraq
leading the charge to make
she is ~ mandatory (systemic racism / high schools)
led the charge to overturn
he ~ the ban
led the charge for restricting
the three organizations have ~ immigration
led the charge against the notion
he ~ of human-caused global warming
led the charge against charter schools
school boards have ~
led the charge for (educational) reform
he ~
led the charge for (greater) regulation
Democrats have ~
driving force: military / verb
charged (highly charged, etc.)
charged with desperation and despair
the words, recently so ~...
highly charged
these are ~ issues (protests)
there was a ~ atmosphere in Kenosha (rioting)
in this ~ atmosphere the bombings started (Saudi Arabia)
♦ “The words ‘I’m hungry,’ recently so charged with desperation and
despair, only slowly reverted to their old function of expressing an
ordinary desire for lunch.” (Leningrad by the great writer Anna Reid.)
feeling, emotion & effect: electricity
charisma (attraction)
a lot of charism
he has ~ (a politician)
attraction & repulsion: religion
charm (verb)
charmed New Yorkers with his humor
the mayor ~
Page 217 of 1574
charmed everyone with her culture, grace and beauty
she ~
charmed her with his good humor
he ~
charmed his way into homes and shops
he ~ (the photographer Peter Sekaer)
charm the pants off (just about) anyone
he could ~ (politician Ronald Reagan)
charmed the audience
he ~ (a dancer)
charmed fans
Baghdatis ~ at the 2006 Australian Open (tennis)
charms people
with his gentle manner, he ~ wherever he goes (a boxer)
charmed reporters
while he has ~, others find him abrasive
charmed and impressed
she ~ colleagues with her low-key style and commitment
feeling, emotion & effect: magic / verb
attraction & repulsion: magic / verb
charm (noun)
charm bracelet
her ~ spelled out "LOVE"
one of the year's hottest jewelry fads is the ~
charm campaign
Sudan's ~
charm school
beauty pageants and charm schools
charm and beauty
for centuries, visitors praised Basra's ~
charm, warmth and vivacity
stories of her ~ are innumerable
period charm
set in 1980, the show has a certain ~
attraction & repulsion: magic
charmed (charmed life, etc.)
charmed circle
teachers compete to enter the ~ of tenured academe
they spend their time in a ~ (acquaintances, etc.)
charmed existence
he enjoyed a ~, and then his family was poor
charmed life
she led a ~ (affluent)
charmed run
their ~ finally ended (sports team)
charmed years
for a few ~, he was on top (success)
fate, fortune & chance / protection & lack of protection:
magic
charmed (charmed by something, etc.)
charmed by the architecture
he was ~ (buying a house)
charmed by the (rugged) beauty
we were ~ of New Mexico
charmed by his speeches
voters were ~ and inspired by his vision (Obama)
charmed by the terrain
the young artist was ~ (the desert)
charmed by her good-heartedness
we were ~
attraction & repulsion / feeling, emotion & effect: magic
charming (people)
charming
he was cute, he was ~, he was very athletic… (psycho)
utterly charming
she could be ~ (a narcissist)
attraction & repulsion / character & personality: magic
chart (verb)
chart its own course
Iraq is free to ~
chart a (fresh) course
helping convicted felons ~
charted a (new) course
President Obama has ~ for the next two years
chart the future
Iraqis will ~ of Iraq
chart a new path
the leader is trying to ~
direction: boat / journeys & trips / map / verb
chase (verb)
chase after their dreams
artists and actors ~
chase (small) effects
studies ~ (unable to replicate)
chase headlines
scientists who manipulate data and ~
pursuit, capture & escape: walking, running & jumping /
verb
chase down (verb)
chase it (all) down
Page 218 of 1574
but what is the implicit comedy of that song, if you ~
analysis, interpretation & explanation: walking, running &
jumping / verb
chasm (noun)
chasm between Africans and African-Americans
the ~ (in Ghana)
widen into a chasm
the cracks could ~ (politics)
division & connection: ground, terrain & land
chatter (signals intelligence, etc.)
far-right chatter
experts tracking ~ online said...
speculation and chatter
there’s a lot of ~ on social media (an issue)
jump in (suspicious) chatter
there has been a ~
activity / analysis, interpretation & explanation /
surveillance: sound / speech
cheap (words are cheap, etc.)
cheap
words are ~, let’s see what they do
cheap on those streets
life is very ~ (parts of Essex County, New Jersey)
getting (very) cheap
life is ~ (gang violence)
worth & lack of worth: money / speech
cheap shot
cheap shot
he may have thought his ~ was funny, but it wasn't
his comment was a ~, totally unwarranted (insult)
his insinuation is unsubstantiated and a ~
~s get cheap laughs
cheap shot against him
that was a real ~ (a comment in newspaper)
cheap shot against the White House
she has taken a ~ (political commentary)
cheap-shot artist
he's a clever ~ (a political comedian)
cheap shot and dirty trick
he has bashed him with every ~ in the book (politics)
takes a cheap shot
she ~ at him when she says…
♦ In sports, a cheap shot refers to an unnecessary and vicious hit on a
defenseless player.
accusation & criticism / behavior / speech: sports & games
/ violence / weapon
check (in check)
in check
we have to keep North Korea ~
control & lack of control: chess / movement / sports &
games
checkmate (verb)
checkmate the West’s harshest sanctions
the Kremlin can ~
resistance, opposition & defeat: chess / sports & games /
verb
checkmate (noun)
checkmate
your American critics say you have run out of moves, ~
resistance, opposition & defeat: chess / sports & games
checkbook
open their checkbooks
a few companies may ~ (reparations for slavery)
money: purses & wallets / sign, signal, symbol
checkpoint (at a checkpoint)
at progress checkpoints
assign a grade or points ~ (projects / schools)
progress & lack of progress: journeys & trips / movement
cheer (verb)
cheer
some of you may ~ and others will boo
judgment: sound / verb
achievement, recognition & praise: sound / verb
cheer (noun)
cheers and boos
the judge’s decision drew ~
achievement, recognition & praise / judgment: sound
cheerlead (verb)
cheerlead for big projects
volunteers are less likely to ~ (Peace Corps)
enthusiasm: school & education / verb
attention, scrutiny & promotion: school & education / verb
cheerleader (person)
cheerleader
Roger Ver is its most visible ~ (Bitcoin Cash)
cheerleaders for the Pentagon
some say they served as ~ (reporters)
cheerleader for the city
he is a ~ (mayor of Las Vegas)
Page 219 of 1574
cheerleader for the industry
she was a ~, no matter what it was selling (Louella Parsons)
cheerleader for the superiority
she is a ~ of all things American
cheerleader for war
he was the exile ~ (an Iraqi)
cheerleaders for war
women have often been ~ (Spartan mothers)
cheerleader role
he is in the ~, he wants the economy back up (pandemic)
♦ “In Aristophanes’ comic play, Lysistrata, the women go on sex strike as
a way of ending the Peloponnese War. Do you think we would be as
warlike if women were in charge?” [Delighted laughter and clapping from
the audience.] / “It’s such a good question. My brief answer is no.
[Nervous laughter from audience.] You know, the Peloponnesian war, it
was the Spartan mothers who said, ‘Come back bearing your shield or
on it....’ I’m not sure that women are by nature kinder or gentler.”
(Margaret MacMillan, “War and Humanity,” the Reith Lectures, BBC.)
♦ "Wars are almost always begun with gaiety and lightness of spirit, with
cheers and songs. The day after the surrender of Fort Sumter the entire
land, both North and South, blazed with an ardent and confident
patriotism, although the patriotism of the South was precisely opposite to
that of the North. The streets of the cities were colorful with flags and
smart uniforms. Ladies waved handkerchiefs and threw kisses. The
barrooms did the largest day's business in the history of the nation, up to
that time… The churches were kept open all day for the saying of
bloodthirsty prayers. God, as usual, was on both side." (A New
American History by W.E. Woodward.)
person: school & education
attention, scrutiny & promotion / enthusiasm: person /
school & education
cheer on (verb)
cheered him on
everybody ~ (musician who abused underaged girls)
cheering her on for years
her mother and father have been ~ (a tennis phenom)
enthusiasm: sound / verb
Che Guevara
“Africa’s Che Guevara”
the murder of the man known as ~ (Thomas Sankara)
found an unlikely Che Guevara
in Pospisil, the P.T.P.A. ~ (tennis reform)
disruption: allusion / history
chemistry
chemistry of the team
he insists the ~ is fine (troubled NFL team)
chemistry between client and therapist
~ is crucial (psychotherapist)
chemistry between a boxer and a trainer
the ~ is crucial
Dream Team’s chemistry
the ~ turned out to be the hallmark to their success (1992)
screen chemistry
the two actors have so much ~ (movie)
on-screen chemistry
they had great ~ (Donna Reed and John Wayne)
team chemistry
his top priority is to improve ~ (sports)
good chemistry
teams, actors, orchestras require ~
are teams good because they have ~
do teams have ~ because they are good
~ sometimes trumps outright talent (sports team)
lack of chemistry
a ~ is blamed for failure
wealth of chemistry
a ~ is credited for success
chemistry can trump talent
good ~ (sports teams)
have chemistry
in sports, good teams ~
hurt the (team) chemistry
he ~ (an athlete)
♦ "Chemistry is when you hang around each other when you don't have
to. That's us." (Chris Weber, speaking of the Sacramento Kings, an NBA
team.)
functioning / mixture: chemistry
Chernobyl (rainforest Chernobyl, etc.)
rainforest Chernobyl
Texaco created a ~ (toxic waste in Ecuador)
destruction / failure, accident & impairment: epithet /
history / nuclear energy / place
cherubic (adjective)
cherubic preteen
a ~ with a gentle smile
appearance: creature / religion
comparison & contrast: affix
chess (noun)
playing chess
he was ~ (Larry Bird of the NBA)
♦ “He was playing chess and everybody else was playing checkers. He
was three moves ahead of everybody else.” (Tommy Heinsohn, Celtic
broadcaster, about the great Larry Bird from French Lick, Indiana.)
strategy: chess / sports & games
chess (chess game)
see game (chess game)
chessboard (noun)
North Korean Chessboard
“The ~: What Next for The Main Players” (Wapo)
Page 220 of 1574
complex geopolitical chessboard
trying to figure out Putin’s next move on a ~
strategic chessboard
Truman and the Soviets were arranging pieces on a ~
off the board
the two other members of the ISIS cell are already ~ (one
killed, one in prison)
moves on the chessboard
these were big ~ in Asia (US versus China)
pawns on a chessboard
they must stop being used as ~ (migrants)
square in (Europe’s Military) Chess Board
Sweden’s Gotland is a crucial ~
removed Mary from the chessboard
Elizabeth’s statecraft eventually ~ (history)
shift its pieces around the chessboard
the U.N. has had to ~ (troops in DRC)
♦ “The Democrats wrote the rules, then set up the chessboard. We are
now playing in the chessboard with the rules they set up.” (Voter dropboxes, which became controversial during the 2020 presidential
election.)
strategy: chess / sports & games
chess match (noun)
chess match
so far this match has been a ~ (Arguello vs. Ray Mancini)
strategy: chess / sports & games
chest (beat one’s chest, etc.)
chest-thumping
liberals dismiss conservatives as ~ cartoons
stand up and beat their chests
terrorists want to take credit, they want to ~
conflict: animal / gesture / standing, sitting & lying
performance: animal / gesture / standing, sitting & lying
attention, scrutiny & promotion: animal / gesture /
standing, sitting & lying
chew (and chew up)
chew barbed wire in Flanders
is there an alternative to having our armies ~
chews up his rivals
his nickname is “the Cannibal” because he ~ (cycling)
♦ “Are there not other alternatives than sending our armies to chew
barbed wire in Flanders?” (Winston Churchill, in a letter of advice to
Prime Minister Herbert Henry Asquith. The alternative turned out to be
Gallipoli.)
♦ “His nickname is “the Cannibal” because he chews up his rivals.” (The
great Eddy Merckx)
consumption / experience: food & drink / verb
chew over (verb)
chew it over with relish
the old women ~ (a bit of gossip)
consumption: food & drink / verb
Chicago (China’s Chicago, etc.)
Chicago of China
six hundred miles up the Yangtze lies Hankow, “the ~”
China’s Chicago
the city they call ~ (Wuhan)
modern-day Chicago
the leaders of Chongqing hope to turn it into a ~ (2007)
♦ “With all these fake Chinese Chicagos, how can anyone use the
phrase, “the Chicago of China” with any confidence or authority? Fact is,
nobody can.” (“The Chicago(s) of China” by Lauri Apple, the Chicago
Reader, August 17, 2010. Her delightful article mentions Chongqing
(Chungking, the “Chicago on the Yangtze); Hankow (now part of the
larger area of Wuhan, also on the Yangtze River); Zhengzhou
(Chengchow, on the Yellow River, referred to as the “Chicago of the
East); and Shanghai. She includes a link to “Chinese City’s ‘Chicago’
Hopes Face Obstacles,” the Wall Street Journal, July 27, 2007, which
lists good and interesting reasons why Chongqing deserves the epithet.)
♦ US newspaper readers knew Hankow as the Chicago of China in 1918
and also in the 1930s. The city was mostly forgotten until the 2019
COVID pandemic, associated with Wuhan.
comparison & contrast / geography: epithet
chicken (chicken and egg)
chicken and egg
this is the classic ~ that has plagued rural America (housing)
chicken and the egg
it's kind of the ~ (support for losing team)
chicken and egg problem
it's a ~
chicken-and-egg problem
it's a ~ (plants need oil, oil refineries need power)
relationship: bird
chicken (come home to roost)
chickens coming home to roost
this is a sort of ~ (political battle)
chickens would come home to roost so soon
Kennedy never foresaw that the ~ (Malcolm X)
they came home to roost
these chickens took a very long flight before ~ (scandal)
Justice of Roosting Chickens
On the ~ (notorious book blaming the West for 9/11)
♦ The legend of the “Brazen Bull” (Wikipedia) is instructive. Perillus of
Athens invented and built it for Phalaris, Tyrant of Sicily. Its first victim
was its inventor and its owner ended up within it.
♦ “This rude automaton is a tiger, killing and about to devour a European,
who lies prostrate under the savage beast. In the interior of the tiger
there is a rude kind of organ, played upon by turning a handle, like our
street hand-organs, and the notes produced are intended to represent
the growls of the tiger and the moans of the dying man.” (Charles
Macfarlane, in Our Indian Empire, quoted by James Grant in British
Battles on Land and Sea. Tipu Sultan, the Tiger of Mysore, met his end
at the Battle of Seringapatam, 1799.)
Page 221 of 1574
♦ “Yep, could be called a ‘shooting pandemic’... Unfortunately the planets
are lining up and the chickens are coming home to roost.” (Fredrika
Wade to Rick Chase on ABC’s “Join the Discussion” about the latest
mass shooting.)
♦ “We misuse our military power, and the chickens came home to roost.”
♦ Karma; what goes around comes around; live by the sword, die by the
sword; you made this bed, now lie in it...
fate, fortune & chance / judgment / responsibility /
reversal: animal / bird / justice / verb
chicken-hearted
chicken-hearted
he is ~ (afraid)
courage & lack of courage: animal / bird / heart
heart: bird
chicken (game of chicken)
see game (game of chicken)
chicken out (verb)
chickened out
he ~ and never gave her the letter
courage & lack of courage: animal / bird / verb
chieftain (noun)
corporate chieftain
~s who sell off shares of their companies (ethics)
banking industry chieftain
a former ~
power: person / military
child (spoiled child)
West's spoiled child
Israel is the ~
behavior: family / person
child (child of the Soviet Union, etc.)
child of the Victorian era
Churchill freely conceded that he was a ~
child of Soviet and post-Soviet Russia
he was a cynical ~
child of Bill Cosby
I was a ~, he was part of the wallpaper of Black America
children of the same (foul) spirit
they are ~ (domestic and international terrorists)
child of the underground
I, too, was a ~ (Zionist Palestine)
identity & nature: family / person
child (bastard child)
bastard child, the second class citizen
creative non-fiction is no longer the ~ (to literature)
♦ “He was now Fortune’s pet instead of her stepson.” (Change in fortune
to good fortune from awful fortune.)
person / relationship: family
worth & lack of worth: family / person
chill (feeling)
chill
I get ~s thinking about it (an exciting event)
feeling, emotion & effect: skin, muscle, nerves & bones /
temperature
chill (oppression)
sent a chill through the academic world
the sentences ~ (police arrests)
oppression: temperature
chilling (adjective)
chilling
the accusations against him are ~ (a terrorist)
chilling account
he has written a ~ of the murder (writer)
chilling development
it is the latest ~ in this chilling case (sniper murders)
chilling effect
this will have a ~ on the coal industry (project vetoed)
these bills will have a ~ (Internet regulation)
chilling incident
there have been two ~s (religious attacks)
chilling message
it was a ~
chilling street name
the crimes have a ~, "Guat-bashing" (Guatemalans)
feeling, emotion & effect: temperature
chilly (adjective)
chilly toward women's soccer
England has been ~
chilly reception
she received a ~ (a politician)
chilly response
he got a ~ from… (meeting / law-enforcement officers)
feeling, emotion & effect: temperature
chime in (verb)
chimed in that
he ~ he does the same thing (conversation)
chimed in on the controversy
readers ~
chimed in with his own statement
he has ~
Page 222 of 1574
chimed in from Haiti
he ~ (a reporter)
involvement: sound / verb
speech: sound / verb
chin (take something on the chin)
took the news on the chin
she ~ (Naomi Wolf)
feeling, emotion & effect / force: boxing
Chinatown (the film)
“forget it, Jake, it’s Chinatown”
a fatalistic ~ notion...
allusion: film
feeling, emotion & effect: allusion / film
fate, fortune & chance: allusion / film
chink (chink in one’s armor)
chink in her opponent's armor
she uncovered a critical chink in her ~
chink in his armor
she found a ~
the one ~ has been… (an athlete)
he has not been able to find a ~ (tennis)
protection & lack of protection: Middle Ages / military /
weapon
chink (flaw)
chink in conditioning
any ~ could mean defeat (Olympic swimming)
chink of vulnerability
he hasn’t shown a ~
flaws & lack of flaws: hole
chip (bargaining chip)
bargaining chip
the proposals are on the table as a ~
bargaining chip in (peace) negotiations
the fleet was a ~ (World War I)
used as a bargaining chip
he was kidnapped to be ~ with Washington
position, policy & negotiation / strategy: gambling
chip (chips fall, etc.)
let the chips fall where they may
let’s have the hearing and ~ (investigation)
chips may fall
the ~ in ways that are uncomfortable for all sides
fate, fortune & chance: tree
chip away (verb)
chip away at an employee's confidence
he uses insults to ~ (bad boss)
chip away at our information
these companies will never stop trying to ~ (Internet)
chip away at personal privacy
big tech companies continue to stifle speech and ~
chipping away (at the edifice) with hammer or chisel
lawyers are ~ (of personal responsibility)
taking & removing: blade / verb
chloroform (noun)
chloroform in print
Young Adult Literature is ~ (paraphrase of Mark Twain)
consciousness & awareness: health & medicine
chocolate (African Americans)
‘chocolate cities’
~ should be viewed as America’s heartland (Ernest Owens)
identity & nature: color
choir (preach to the choir)
preaching to the choir
they are ~ (sympathetic audience)
we are ~ (a drug program / parents)
message / unanimity & consensus: religion
choirboy (behavior)
choirboy
he was a ~ compared to some of Hernandez’s other friends
behavior: person / religion
person: religion
choke (verb)
choking on its own success
China is ~ (pollution)
choke on those words
Sanders would ~ (perfect is the enemy of good)
acceptance & rejection / affliction / consumption /
obstacles & impedance: bodily reaction / breathing / food
& drink / throat / verb
choke (fail)
chokes during pressure
she ~ (an athlete)
success & failure: breathing / verb
choke chain (noun)
choke chain around its neck
the Kim regime has an international ~, and we can tug it
Page 223 of 1574
♦ “Choke collar” is an entry in the dictionary I use, but not “choke chain.”
Dictionary entries of words and phrases can be maddening! “Dollar yoke”
also appears in the article that uses this phrase.
constraint & lack of constraint: animal / breathing / chain /
dog / pressure / violence
choked
choked with emotion
…, he said, his voice ~
choked with people
the prisons are ~ who stole to eat (Mexico)
choked with traffic
crowded intersections ~ (Brooklyn)
boulder-choked
the ~ Cheoah River in Graham County, North Carolina
briar-choked
as a boy, he explored the ~ woods behind his house
cholesterol-choked
he needs an operation for his ~ arteries
smoke-choked
the firefighters ascended the ~ stairwell
traffic-choked
it has been an average, ~ rush hour (Los Angeles)
weed-choked
behind the house was a ~ garden
the footbridge cross a ~ stream
obstacles & impedance: breathing
chokepoint (noun)
choke points, bridges, tunnels
identify ~ (military)
choke point or kill zone
as the enemy moves into the ~
chokepoints in the Northwest Passage
include one off Barrow, Alaska, and in Canada
choke points on interstates
~ and state highways
world's choke points
the ~—the Suez and Panama Canals, the Bab el Mandeb
the ~—the Straits of Gibraltar, and the Malacca Strait
oil choke point
Hormuz is the most important ~ in the world
important chokepoint
it is one of the world's strategically ~ (Strait of Hormuz)
migratory chokepoint
the Central Valley is an incredibly important ~ for birds
♦ This word seems to have arisen during World War II. Other words
derived from warfare include blockbuster, breakthrough, breakout, and
basket case.
obstacles & impedance: breathing
choose (chose me, found me, etc.)
domesticated humans
some say wheat ~
chose him
history, in its many meanings, ~ (John Hope Franklin)
chooses me
the part ~, I don’t choose it (actor Peter O’Toole)
chose me
golf ~, it’s the most fun thing I have (Aditi Ashok)
tennis ~ (Bernard Tomic)
found me
boxing ~, I didn’t have to look for it (Bilal Fawaz)
found him
Tommy has never sought notoriety, it just sort of ~
shape us
we shape our buildings and afterwards they ~
♦ “Tennis chose me. It’s something I never fell in love with.” (The
extraordinary Bernard Tomic.)
♦ This idea, once so fresh, is becoming quite a cliché nowadays.
alternatives & choices: verb
chopping block (on the chopping
block)
on the chopping block
their heads will be ~ the next election (politics)
my neck is ~ (accountability)
many social services are ~
their collective-bargaining rights are ~ (teachers)
put the school on the chopping block
officials have ~ (underperforming)
dismissal, removal & resignation: ax / blade / head / neck
fate, fortune & chance: ax / blade / head / neck
destruction: ax / blade / head / neck
chopping block (other)
keep the program off the chopping block
supporters are trying to ~
saved from the chopping block
19 schools were ~
taken off the chopping block
some bus routes will be ~
dismissal, removal & resignation: ax / blade / head / neck
fate, fortune & chance: ax / blade / head / neck
destruction: ax / blade / head / neck
chops (expertise)
chops to do the job
she proved she had the ~ (Pelosi / politics)
narrative audio chops
NPR is looking for editors with ~ (job advertisement)
Page 224 of 1574
foreign-relation chops
any candidate will have to show their ~ (election)
experience / knowledge & intelligence: music
ability & lack of ability: music
chops (lick one’s chops)
licking their chops
energy companies are ~ at the prospect of new oil pipelines
these guys are ~, they want to eat up the defense (NFL)
eagerness & reluctance: animal / bodily reaction / mouth
chord (evidence)
chord of jealousy
some Russians detect a ~ (attitudes to immigrants)
evidence: sound
chord (strike a chord)
struck a chord with her book
she clearly ~
struck a chord with the (American) public
these cases have always ~ (capital cases)
striking a strong chord
his message is ~ with voters (about corruption)
striking the wrong chord
I’m terrified of ~ (a writer and cultural appropriation)
effect / feeling, emotion & effect: sound / verb
chorus (chorus of critics, etc.)
chorus of (outraged) denunciation from liberals
the term brought a ~ (Asianization)
chorus of critics
every four years a ~ calls for an end to conventions
joined a chorus
she ~ of Democrats who have called on Mr. Barr to resign
led a chorus
Iran’s Javad Zarif ~, calling the picture inappropriate
amount & effect: music / speech
unanimity & consensus: music / speech
chorus (resemblance)
dawn chorus
birdlife, we had this incredibly vibrant ~ (extinction)
resemblance: music
christen (verb)
christened it the "green hell"
travelers ~ (Mato Grosso)
christened the plane the A320neo
Airbus ~
characterization: religion / verb
Christmas
Christmas
May is the ~ of the limousine business (proms)
Christmas list
see Christmas (Christmas list)
superlative: epithet / day
epithet: day
Christmas (Christmas list)
Christmas list of unrelated progressive spending
the bill is a ~ (politics)
amount / wants, needs, hopes & goals: day
chum (noun)
chumboxes
Outbrain and Taboola specialize in ~ (clickbait)
internet chum
he pulled up a Blogspot page bloated with ~
political chum
Biden and his allies use that as ~ (“fund the police”)
♦ “A mysterious gut doctor is begging Americans to throw out ‘this
vegetable’ now. But, like, which?” by Kaitlyn Tiffany, Vox, May 8, 2019.
♦ see also clickbait (noun)
attraction & repulsion: fish / hunting
church (noun)
church
it's my ~, it's my cathedral (Yosemite on foot in winter)
enthusiasm / reverence: religion
Churchillian (adjective)
Churchillian expressions
he was fond of ~ like “our flesh and blood...” (a Zionist)
military: epithet
comparison & contrast: affix
churn (move)
churned up the coast
a winter storm ~
churn through the (criminal justice) system
millions of people ~
movement: force / verb
force: movement / verb
churn out (verb)
churn out books
she continued to ~, among other pursuits (comic)
churn out so much content
there is pressure to ~ (films post-COVID)
churn out (unneeded advanced) degrees
Page 225 of 1574
universities continue to ~
churn out jobs
small firms also ~ (economy)
churns out (around six and a half gallons of) milk
the cow ~ a day
churns out misinformation
the rumor mill ~
churning out the (popular) model
Boeing has been ~ at a breakneck rate (a plane)
churn out products
factories ~
churn out great product
I ~ (Questlove)
creation & transformation: manufacturing / tools &
technology / verb
Cinderella
Cinderella of Tech
she was hailed as the ~ (Sophia Amoruso)
Cinderella story
T.M. Landry school has become a viral ~
♦ This story relates to unjust oppression and triumphant reward.
♦ “T.M. Landry school has become a viral Cinderella story, a small
school...whose predominantly black, working-class students have
escaped the rural South for the nation’s most elite colleges. A video of a
16-year-old student opening his Harvard acceptance letter las year has
been viewed more than eight million times.” (“Louisiana School Made
Headlines for Sending Black Kids to Elite Colleges. Here’s the Reality”
by Erica L. Green and Katie Benner, The New York Times, Nov. 30,
2018.)
oppression / success & failure: allusion
allusion: books & reading
circle (predation)
circling
his rivals are ~ (politics)
the vultures are already ~ on the web (health of official)
behavior: animal / bird / predation / shark / verb
circle (a circle can close)
circle is closing
the ~ (around Saddam's regime / Iraqi Freedom)
a ~ (memories of Holocaust dim)
a ~ (Israeli Holocaust survivor returns to free Berlin)
♦ This expression seems to relate to the completion of a development, to
something being finished.
development / fate, fortune & chance: geometry / shape
reconciliation, resolution & conclusion: geometry / shape
circle (full circle)
comes full circle
this week she ~ (ends career where it started)
development: geometry / shape
circle (run circles around somebody)
running circles around us
China is ~ (in technology)
superiority & inferiority: verb / walking, running & jumping
circle (go in circles)
going in circles
we're just ~
failure, accident & impairment / progress & lack of
progress: direction / journeys & trips / movement / verb
circle back (return)
circle back to something
let’s ~ you mentioned, Marcia... (talk show)
circle back to the United States
I want to ~... (changing the subject, talk radio)
circle you back to the question
so let me ~ I posed at the onset (talk radio)
coming, arriving, staying, leaving & returning: direction /
journeys & trips / movement / verb
past & present: direction / journeys & trips / movement /
verb
circle back (judgment)
circled back to you
this has all ~ (sex abuser gets long sentence)
judgment / responsibility / reversal: justice / verb
circled
circled by a (jogging) trail
the park is ~
circled with (high) walls
the towns are ~ (Palestine)
configuration: shape
circuit breaker (noun)
circuit breaker
a ~ is a short period of tightened restrictions (COVID)
circuit breakers
can ~ stop rumors on Facebook or Twitter
used as “circuit breakers”
lockdowns should be ~ (pandemic)
control & lack of control: electricity / tools & technology
curtailment: electricity / tools & technology
circus (media circus, etc.)
circus
this case was a ~ (O. J. Simson trial)
the ~ that is now our political system (New Age candidate)
circus of the literary circuit
Page 226 of 1574
he found the ~ insufferable
circus act
he's a ~ and he's killing boxing (a troubled boxer)
2019 circus
the ~ led directly to casualties (crowding on Mt. Everest)
travelling circus
the heavyweight division is little more than a ~ (boxing)
walking circus
he is seen as a ~ by some (a flamboyant boxer)
media circus
he became the attention of a ~
publicity circus
he is a one-man ~ (Richard Branson)
unbelievable circus
most Americans won’t watch this ~ (government hearing)
♦ “The heavyweight division used to be the pinnacle of the sport but now
it’s little more than a travelling circus where the ring masters behind the
scenes lift your wallets by putting on a clown show.” (Captain Y-Fronts,
on BBC’s HYS about the Fury-Schwarz fight.)
♦ “The thing that keeps the whole circus moving is money.” (The English
Premier League / soccer.)
behavior / performance / resemblance: circus
attention, scrutiny & promotion: circus
citadel (the Citadel, etc.)
Citadel LLC
~ is one of the world’s largest asset managers ($35 billion)
the Citadel
~, the Military College of South Carolina
Operation Citadel
~ was the German attack that initiated the Battle of Kursk
proper name: fortification
citadel (noun)
citadel of our democracy
the Capitol is the very ~
citadel of segregation
whites detected a crumbling in the ~ (the South)
citadels of free inquiry
universities are supposed to be ~ but... (campus censorship)
attacks on citadels
this was only one of Valla’s ~ of orthodoxy
protection & lack of protection: fortification / military
civil war (noun)
civil war within the world
it’s nothing less than a ~ football (proposed ESL league)
conflict: military
claim (stake a claim)
staking his claim to be the moderate
he is ~ (a politician)
laid claim to the feminist mantle
she has ~
possession: boundary / ground, terrain & land / surveying
claim (kill)
claimed (an estimated) 10,000 lives
a killer heat wave ~ (France)
claimed (more than) 16,000 lives
the virus has ~
death & life: euphemism
claim (take)
claimed another big scalp
Palace ~ (victory against Tottenham Hotspur)
claim a seat
the drive was on to ~ at the table (minority poets)
claimed victory
he ~ in a photo finish (Mathieu van der Poel)
taking & removing: hand / verb
fictive possession: hand / verb
clamor (verb)
clamoring for an investigation
they have been ~ of the investigators (politics)
clamor for playlists and show lineups
listeners ~ that reflect diversity (Blacks, gays, etc.)
attention, scrutiny & promotion / conflict / resistance,
opposition & defeat: sound / verb
clampdown (noun)
clampdown
flights have been cancelled since the ~ began (eruption)
clampdown by the authorities on credit
a new ~ could hurt domestic demand
clampdown on opponents
the arrest are part of a broader ~
government clampdown
the ~ includes a strict curfew
major clampdown
security forces engaged in a ~
vicious clampdown
the ~ has estranged millions from the regime
promoted a clampdown on intellectuals
the government ~
pressure: tools & technology
Page 227 of 1574
coercion & motivation: pressure
oppression: pressure
clamp down (verb)
clamp down on criminal activity
we must ~ in the informational sphere (ransomware)
pressure: tools & technology / verb
coercion & motivation: pressure / verb
oppression: pressure / verb
clap back (verb)
clapping back at criticism
she is ~ of her looks (an actor)
claps back at critics
Kristin Davis ~
♦ Tagged at Wiktionary as African-American Vernacular and gay slang.
resistance, opposition & defeat: sound / verb
clarity (adjective)
clarity on how
we need full ~ such a tragedy happened (Flight 752)
clarity of purpose
without scrutiny, there could be no ~ (war)
concealment & lack of concealment: eye / light & dark
clash (verb)
clashed with the network
but he ~ and resigned (a reporter
clashes with these local laws
what happens when free speech ~ (Twitter in India, etc.)
conflict: sound / verb
clash (noun)
clash
the ~ showed how a small spark could ignite another war
clash with Henry Kissinger
he left government after a ~
generational clash
this is a ~ between two progressives (politics)
maritime clash
the ~ has hardened opinion
wild clash
a ~ erupted during a motorcycle rally
conflict: sound
claw (verb)
fought and clawed
once you’ve ~ your way up the tenure ladder (academia)
scratch and claw
she is going to ~ for the maximum she can get (politics)
conflict / difficulty, easiness & effort: animal / verb
behavior / conflict: animal / verb
claw (noun)
claw of the pincer
he wanted to see the southern ~ on the map (war)
tooth and claw
Nature, red in ~
pursuit, capture & escape: animal / hunting / predation
clay (noun)
soft clay
he is ~, you can manipulate him (politics)
creation & transformation: materials & substances
character & personality: materials & substances
clean (verb)
clean the cesspool
they are trying to ~ (of the Web)
clean our shame
kill yourself and ~ or we will kill you first (honor killing)
amelioration & renewal: hygiene / verb
clean (come clean)
came clean
he ~ and confirmed what many had suspected
come clean
if you're a sinner, ~ (a preacher)
instead of letting the questions fester, why not ~
come clean about the origins
they have refused to ~ of the coronavirus
come clean with the information
they should ~ they have (nuclear power plant)
concealment & lack of concealment: hygiene / verb
amelioration & renewal: hygiene / verb
sincerity, lack of sincerity & honesty: hygiene / verb
clean (a clean record, etc.)
clean
my name is ~ (falsely convicted, then exonerated)
she has been ~ for two years (an addict)
clean of corruption
he is widely viewed as ~ (government)
clean (final) draft
the writer finally produced a ~ (on a typewriter)
clean, evocative prose
he crafts imaginative narratives using ~
clean (driving) record
I have a ~
flaws & lack of flaws: hygiene
Page 228 of 1574
clean out (verb)
clean them out
if there are any VC in there, that will sure as hell ~
dismissal, removal & resignation: hygiene / verb
cleanse (make clean)
cleansed his rhetoric of cliche
the murk of the trenches ~ (Wilfred Owen)
cleansed him of this sins
being Obama’s vice-president ~ (Joe Biden)
dismissal, removal & resignation: hygiene / verb / water
amelioration & renewal: hygiene / verb / water
cleanse (violence)
cleanse the area of agents
we must ~
cleanse the Foca area of Muslims
the purpose of the Serb campaign was “to ~”
cleansing their enemies
they are ~ (government loyalists against protestors)
violence: euphemism / hygiene / verb
cleansing (ethnic cleansing)
victims of ethnic cleansing
they claim they are the ~
violence: euphemism / hygiene
clean up (speech)
cleaned up the language
they have ~ to make Mark Twain available to schools
speech: hygiene / verb
clean up (improve)
clean up your act
you need to ~
clean up your document
review and ~ (text document)
clean up its image
in a drive to ~, the club holds charity events (bikers)
clean up the mess
he has had to ~ the previous administration created
we need to ~ in government (politician)
cleaning up this mess
we're ~ (diplomacy)
clean up (Mexico's human rights) record
Fox has promised to ~, but…
clean up her reputation
if the book is seen as an attempt to ~…
clean up their resumes
even engineers have learned to ~
clean up the sport
it may be impossible to ~ of cycling (Tour de France)
clean up the (education) system
it will be difficult to ~
amelioration & renewal: hygiene / verb
cleanup (military)
cleanup operation
she was a victim of a government ~ against the rebels
violence: euphemism / hygiene / military
clear (crystal clear)
crystal-clear
it was ~ that…
crystal clear
the Second Amendment is ~
crystal-clear (m)
the trouble is the show doesn't have a ~ message
certainty & uncertainty: eye / light & dark
comprehension & incomprehension: eye / light & dark
clear (perception)
clear picture
confused parents have no ~ of their kids
clear seeing
the crystal was the symbol of the mind and of ~ (Navaho)
perception, perspective & point of view: eye / light & dark
comprehension & incomprehension: eye / light & dark
clear (clear conscience)
clear conscience
you can sell them to widows and orphans with a ~
guilt: light & dark
clear (in the clear / into the clear)
out of the woods and into the clear
we are not ~ yet (pandemic)
♦ An ABC news reader, speaking about a resurgence of COVID, warned,
“Another reminder that we are not out of the clear just yet.” Surely, she
meant, “out of the woods and into the clear.”
♦ “You can only go halfway into the darkest forest, then you are coming
out the other side.” (Chinese.)
danger / obstacles & impedance / survival, persistence &
endurance: forest / journeys & trips
clear (unambiguous)
clear
it was not ~ how many would take the advice
it is not ~ if…
it's not ~ how long the warming cycle will last
make it ~ that it was nobody's fault
as many writings of the frontier era make ~
Page 229 of 1574
the specific target of the threats was not ~ (terrorism)
dirty air is often blamed, but its role isn't ~ (asthma)
the cause of the blast was not immediately ~
clear to him
what was ~ was invisible to others (native tracker)
clear how
it's not ~ one would deter an attack like 9/11
clear whether
he did not make ~ he supported a timeline or a deadline
clear if
it is not ~ they are using any sterile technique at all
clear directions
the nurse must give ~ (when delegating tasks)
clear evidence
we see ~ that…
clear goal
the decisive use of force with a ~ (military)
clear indication
the results from this testing provided the first ~ of…
clear link
no ~ between thimerosal and autism has been found
clear objectives
establish ~ (warfare)
clear (but unstated) objective
the ~ was to…
clear proof
the company had ~ the drug was dangerous
clear provenance
museums should refuse antiquities without a ~
clear sign
take it as a ~ he's not interested
clear signal
no ~s from the miners had been heard since… (cave-in)
clear strategy
we need a ~ to achieve those goals (Iraq)
clear threat
the town seemed under ~ of destruction (wildfire)
clear warnings
the pilot missed ~ and crashed (airport)
clear warnings
signs should give ~ of the end of the detour (military)
clear directions and instructions
did the nurse give ~
clear guidelines
have ~ on what behavior is not acceptable
clear, concise (m)
the commander issues ~ orders and guidance
clear, concise, and complete
make the text ~ (military message)
clear and consistent
be ~ (disciplining a toddler)
clear and convincing (m)
there is no ~ proof that…
clear and present (m)
experts see a ~ danger (terrorism / Olympics)
clear and thorough (m)
explains information in a ~ manner (nurse assistant)
clear, unambiguous (m)
provide ~ instructions (teachers)
make clear
as many writings of the frontier era ~
he did not ~ if he supported a timeline or a deadline
make it clear
~ that it was nobody's fault
made his position clear
he ~
certainty & uncertainty: eye / light & dark
comprehension & incomprehension: light & dark
clear-eyed (adjective)
clear-eyed about the risks
we are ~
consciousness & awareness: eye
clear up (verb)
clear (all) this up
he could ~ by releasing the records (controversy)
amelioration & renewal: light & dark / verb
click (verb)
clicking
the team is ~
functioning: sound / verb
clickbait (noun)
clickbait
~ is being replaced by subscriber bait (paywalls)
~ will be with us always
referred to the article as “clickbait”
he ~ (a sports controversy)
♦ ‘Explosive sex’ wins top wildlife photo award (BBC)
♦ “Do Dolphins living near Wales have a Welsh accent?” (BBC)
♦ “A Tasty Looking Moon And Sharing Caring Chimpanzees” (NPR)
♦ “Space sleeping bag to stop squashed eyeball disorder.” (BBC)
♦ “Teachers ‘should not be crawling on ice for money.’” (ABC)
♦ “Canada’s 6,000-year-old ‘Silk Road’” (BBC. The article is about the
Nuxalk-Carrier Grease Trail in British Columbia, which is 279 miles long.)
Page 230 of 1574
♦ “In the disinformation world, we know that those questioning headlines
are just clickbait.” (For example, “Can you have sex while pregnant?”
Many pregnancy apps not only spread misinformation but also have the
malign intent to make money off of pregnant people.)
♦ see also chum (noun)
attraction & repulsion / computer / pursuit, capture &
escape: hunting
cliff (glass cliff)
got pushed off a glass cliff
she ~ (set up to fail)
♦ This is a variation of the glass ceiling. It refers to putting a woman or
minority in a position of power in a bad organization, in which they are
bound to fail.
destruction: ground, terrain & land / mountains & hills
cliff (fall off a cliff, etc.)
eviction cliff
the bill will prevent them from falling off an ~ (relief)
fiscal cliff
the country is headed off a ~ of runaway spending
on the edge of the cliff
we’re ~, we don’t have much time to back away (diplomacy)
dropped off a cliff
I noticed that sales just ~ (online fake negative reviews)
fell off a cliff
but then demand ~ (poor economy)
fallen off a cliff
venture capital investing ~ (low returns)
fallen off an economic cliff
we have just ~ (recession)
going over a cliff
the economy is ~
push American off a (fiscal) cliff
political paralysis may ~
fall off a cliff tomorrow
we’re not going to ~ in terms of vaccine efficiency
(mutations)
♦ “He has put himself on a one-way road heading toward a cliff and there
is no turning back.”
decline / destruction / fate, fortune & chance: direction /
ground, terrain & land / mountains & hills / verb
climate (work climate, etc.)
climate of cooperation
a ~ between the media and police
climate of fear
there is still a pervasive ~ (Basra under Baath control)
climate of (growing) hostility
coming of age in a ~ to immigration
climate of intimidation
an election marred by low turnout and a ~
climate of violence
a ~ has always run through American politics
climate of fear and anxiety
people are living in a ~
climate of fear and intimidation
people live in a ~ (Iraq / Baath party)
climate of backlash
today in the ~ against bilingual education
Zimbabwe’s poisonous political climate
the report details ~
command climate
our ~ surveys measure toxic leadership (military)
you are accountable for true ~ (military officers)
investment climate
the nanotechnology ~ is warming up
work climate
a negative ~ is created
classroom climate
establish a ~ that supports learning
create a ~ that is accepting, comfortable, and noncompetitive
revenue-driven climate
UCLA is in a ~ (coach fired for losing record)
bitter (political) climate
the increasingly ~ ahead of elections next summer
negative (work) climate
a ~ is created
poisonous (political and rhetorical) climate
politics suffers from a ~
political climate
the increasingly bitter ~ ahead of elections
a reporter asked him if he was afraid, given the ~
racial climate
the ~ in our country today
social climate
the ~ is bad there (a black / U-Michigan)
tense climate
the ~ following the terrorist attacks
toxic (command) climate
he fostered a ~ (military)
create a (classroom) climate
~ that is accepting, comfortable, and noncompetitive
fostered a (toxic command) climate
he ~ (military)
improve (class) climate
~ through incentives or rewards (teachers)
maintain a climate
Page 231 of 1574
we struggle to ~ that meets our expectations (rape in
military)
♦ In the Chicago Tribune, on August 2, 2012, the Pulitzer Prize-winning
editorial cartoonist Dick Locher published a cartoon that relates the
weather to the US climate of violence. It shows a TV weatherman,
pointing to a weather map of the US with highs and lows. The caption
reads, "LIGHT TO MODERATE GUNFIRE WITH OCCASIONAL
SHOWERS OF AUTOMATIC WEAPON FIRE COUPLED WITH
INTERMITTENT GUN SALES ACTIVITY AND SCATTERED DRIVE-BY
SHOOTINGS.”
environment: air / atmosphere / weather & climate
feeling, emotion & effect: air / atmosphere / weather &
climate
climax (noun)
climax
antagonism reached a ~ in 1994 (illegal immigrants)
climax of the Hajj
the Standing on Mount Arafat is the ~
climax of my career
covering Hajj is the ~ (a journalist)
climax of the (religious) festival
Shia pilgrims flocked to Karbala for the ~ (Ashura)
climax of the pilgrimage
the short trek to Mount Arafat, marking the ~
marks the climax
the ceremony ~ of the summer season (battlefield)
nearing a climax
the drama is ~ (who to select as goalkeeper)
reached its climax
partisan politics ~ with the impeachment
development: theater
climb (scale)
climbed a (well-worn) immigrant ladder
Chaudri ~ (dishwasher, cab driver)
way to climb
the people of Africa have a long ~
attainment / progress & lack of progress: direction /
mountains & hills / movement / verb
climb (increase)
climbed to 612
as Los Angeles' murder count ~ for the year
climbed to 40 degrees
as the temperature ~
climbed in velocity
the wind suddenly switched in direction and ~ (ship)
climbed 21%
Nokia earnings ~
climbed to $70
the price of a barrel of oil ~
continued to climb
as gasoline prices ~ last week
continues to climb
the online population ~
started climbing
in the 1980s the numbers of TV deaths in the US ~
earnings climbed
Nokia ~ 21%
increase & decrease: direction / number / verb
climb (roads, etc.)
climbs the (green) slopes
Highway 37 ~ of Haleakala (Hawaii)
route: direction
fictive motion: verb
climb down (verb)
climbed down from his decision
he has ~ to expel US diplomats
climb down from all this
how do you ~ (diplomatic problem)
reversal: direction / verb
climber (social climber, etc.)
determined climber
he was a ~ (a young drug lord)
society: person
cling (verb)
cling on
he tried to ~ by offering new elections
cling to the belief
some parents ~ that vaccines cause autism
clings to her
it’s a deeply embarrassing episode that still ~ today (singer)
cling to hope
families ~ as the search for survivors continues
clung to his innocence
a large minority ~ (guilty verdict)
cling to their own language
in this region of China, where Tibetans ~ (Qinghai)
clinging to life
he is in the hospital, ~
he is critical and ~ (shot)
clung to the marriage
she ~ for longer than she should have
cling to the past
it's foolish to ~ (an opinion)
clinging to power
Page 232 of 1574
how is he ~ (Maduro)
cling to their language and customs
the Berbers in the Kabylia region ~
clung to the hope
some convicts ~ of a last-minute pardon
clung to the traditions
Trinidad has ~ of carnival
clung to the (fading) values
he ~ of honor and omerta (mobster)
attachment / possession: hand / verb
survival, persistence & endurance: hand / verb
clingy (adjective)
possessive and (more) clingy
he got more ~ towards her (abusive relationship)
feeling, emotion & effect / possession: hand
attachment / character & personality: hand
cloak (conceal)
cloaks itself in "Christian" values
the party cynically ~
cloak a bully's identity
the Internet can ~
concealment & lack of concealment: cloth / clothing &
accessories / verb
cloak (under a cloak)
under a cloak of secrecy
she arrived in Yemen ~ (government official)
concealment & lack of concealment: cloth / clothing &
accessories
cloak (in a cloak)
in the cloak of journalism
gossip is dressed ~
in the cloak of reform and patriotism
scoundrels shroud themselves ~
concealment & lack of concealment: cloth / clothing &
accessories
cloak (cloak of secrecy, etc.)
cloak of legality
judges twisted the law to give a ~ to crimes
cloak of respectability
a deal built on rank expediency needed a ~ (Kenya)
cloak of secrecy
the White House has reaffirmed the ~ (Area 51)
the air force hung a ~ over the mission (X-37B)
cloak for (business-friendly) politicians
reform can provide a ~ to appear respectable
invisibility cloak
Tor’s protocol is a kind of digital ~
cover themselves in the (righteous) cloak
they ~ of religion (blasphemy laws)
reformer cloak
he has donned the ~
constitutional cloak
club members wrap themselves in a ~ (men only club)
hung a cloak (of secrecy) over the mission
the air force ~ (X-37B)
concealment & lack of concealment: cloth / clothing &
accessories
cloaked (covered)
mist-cloaked
the dispute centers over the ~ region of Tawang (India)
configuration / cover: clothing & accessories
cloaked (concealed)
cloaked in the mantle
blasphemy laws are ~ of religion
concealment & lack of concealment: cloth / clothing &
accessories
cloak-and-dagger
cloak-and-dagger precautions
they took elaborate ~
subterfuge: clothing & accessories
clobbered (by rain, etc.)
clobbered by (relentless) rain
San Diego has been ~
force: storm
clock (turn back the clock)
turn back the clock
you can't ~ (return to the past)
maybe we can ~ (relationship)
we don’t want to ~ (plunging vaccination rates)
turn the clock back
how do you ~ at this point (Gibraltar and sovereignty)
turn back the clock some twenty years
one needs to ~ to understand how... (history)
turn back the clock (about) a hundred years
when we ~...
turn back the clock on aging
a wrinkle cream that promises to ~
turn back the clock on (racial) progress
they accuse him of helping to ~ (a judge)
Page 233 of 1574
turn back the clock on voting rights
they are trying to ~ (Supreme Court rejects early voting)
try to turn back the clock
are we going to stay quiet as they ~ (a protest)
past & present / time: clock / direction / verb
clock (types)
body clock
the best way to follow your natural ~
ticking (biological) clock
her pursuit to satisfy the ~
biological clock
jet lag and the ~
her ~ is ticking (motherhood)
reproductive clocks
men’s ~ are also ticking as they age (low sperm counts)
time: clock
clock (race with the clock, etc.)
in a race with the clock
we are ~
racing the clock
we are ~ trying to prevent another tragedy (serial bombs)
they were ~, tying up their oyster boat (hurricane)
timeliness & lack of timeliness: clock
competition / time: clock
clock (clock winds down, etc.)
clock is winding down
the ~ to the strike deadline
clock has run out
now the ~ (Brexit negotiations)
clock runs out
concerns about what happens when the ~ (diplomacy)
time / timeliness & lack of timeliness: clock
clock (clock is ticking, etc.)
clock in the back of your head
you have this ~ of how much time you can spend (Everest)
ticking clock
he filed the notice to gain the advantage of a ~ (legal matter)
clock is ticking
and now, the ~ (to a royal wedding)
the ~ (legal decision setting a deadline)
clock is ticking on his benefits
the ~ (unemployed)
clocks are (also) ticking
men’s reproductive ~ as they age (decreasing sperm counts)
timeliness & lack of timeliness: clock
time: clock
clock (around the clock)
work around the clock
we will ~ to fix the problem
direction: clock
clock (reset the clock)
clock has been reset
the ~ (deadline extended)
time / timeliness & lack of timeliness: clock
clock (run the clock, etc.)
run out the clock
the strategy is to punt to the courts and ~ (politics)
run the clock down
all the Giants had to do now was ~ (NFL game)
♦ “Do they think they’re winning and they just have to not screw it up, and
are they running the clock?” (Republican operative Dan Senor on Biden’s
debate strategy and election campaign.)
action, inaction & delay: clock / football / sports & games /
verb
clockwork (noun)
clockwork universe
the metaphor of a ~ (Bishop Nicole d’Oresme)
understand the (entire) clockwork
now we ~ better than ever before (Polarstern MOSAiC)
operation: mechanism
clog (noun)
clog
such ~s affect users (distributed denial of service)
clog disappeared
highway officials added one lane and the ~ (traffic)
obstacles & impedance: water
clogged
clogged with people
Mexico's courts and jails are ~ like Hurtado
clogged with rubbish
alleyways ~
clogged with traffic
the Central Artery is ~ day and night (Boston)
clogged with (cheap Chinese) motorbikes
streets are ~
clogged artery
Boston's ~ (the Central Artery)
clogged roads
he is perturbed by ~ (Seattle)
Page 234 of 1574
Mercedes-clogged
we snaked our way through the ~ streets
snow-clogged
a ~ mountain pass
keeping commuters off ~ streets and highways (blizzard)
traffic-clogged
at the intersection of a ~ street
streets are clogged
~ with cheap Chinese motorbikes (Ho Chi Minh City)
obstacles & impedance: water
amount & effect: water
cloistered
cloistered himself in his (hotel) room
he ~ (from reporters)
cloistered atmosphere
she felt secure within the ~ (psychiatric ward)
remain cloistered
the Wakhis ~ in their world of wind and ice
avoidance & separation / division & connection / isolation
& remoteness / protection & lack of protection: religion /
place
close (close to, etc.)
close to losing
I was ~ my temper
proximity: distance
close (future)
close
the deadline is ~
proximity: distance
future / time: distance
close (feeling)
close
we're very close (relationship)
close family
we’re such a ~ (ethnic Puerto Rican-American)
keeps memories of her late grandfather close
she ~
proximity: distance
division & connection / feeling, emotion & effect /
relationship / social interaction: distance / proximity
close (and close-run)
close-run thing
reaching the depots in time was often a ~ (in Antarctica)
that was a pretty ~ (death sentence commuted)
nearest-run thing
the ~ you ever saw in your life (Wellington / Waterloo)
fate, fortune & chance: proximity
competition: horse
close call (danger)
close call
I could have died, it was a ~
danger / fate, fortune & chance: proximity
close-minded (adjective)
called his critics close-minded
he ~
mind: container
close shave
close shave
it was a ~ (narrow escape)
♦ “Death is as close as your jugular vein and as far away as the ends of
the earth.”
danger: blade / hair / proximity
fate, fortune & chance: blade / hair / proximity
closet (secret)
closet homosexual
some people speculate that Hitler was a ~
closet radical
he is a ~ (accusation of one politician by another)
family closet
ghosts and phantoms from the ~
in the closet
living ~ brought her pain (a lesbian)
in O’Rourke’s closet
newly revealed skeletons have joined old ones ~ (politician)
skeletons in our closet
I knew we had ~ (newspaper's lack of coverage of…)
skeletons in its (Communist) closet
Poland exhumes ~
skeletons in the closet
all the ~ are spilling out (Turkey)
emerging from the closet
more and more gay celebrities are ~
♦ "If you autopsy anybody's personal life deep enough, everybody's got
skeletons." (A police chief under fire.)
♦ “I get that feeling too. It’s like we’ve arrived in a small town and
everybody knows everybody’s dirty secrets, and we know there are
skeletons in the closet, but we can’t find the closets.” (The General’s
Daughter by Nelson DeMille.)
concealment & lack of concealment: house / skeleton
evidence: house / skeleton
clothes (the emperor has no clothes)
emperor has no clothes
look, the ~, you got nothing (a consulting firm)
it’s been obvious for years now that this ~ (Tottenham FC)
Page 235 of 1574
substance & lack of substance: allusion / clothing &
accessories
clothes (deception)
dressed in scientific clothes
exploration now had to be ~
appearance & reality / subterfuge: clothing & accessories
clotheslined
get clotheslined
you can ~ by a fence, cable, bar, swing, or a person
failure, accident & impairment: clothing & accessories
cloud (verb)
clouded his judgment
drugs ~
consciousness & awareness: atmosphere / cloud / verb
cloud (cast a cloud)
cloud has been cast
a ~ over much of his work (fabricated data)
oppression: atmosphere / cloud / light & dark / shadow
feeling, emotion & effect: atmosphere / cloud / light & dark
/ shadow
cloud (under a cloud)
under a cloud
she has left the Olympics ~
under a cloud of suspicion
he lived ~
under a cloud of uncertainty
they continue to work ~
under a legal and ethics cloud
he is ~ because of the affair (politician)
lived under a cloud
he ~ of suspicion
get out from under the cloud
he couldn't ~ of suspicion
feeling, emotion & effect / oppression: atmosphere / cloud
/ light & dark / shadow
cloud (dark cloud, etc.)
cloud
I had a ~ over my head
there is a ~ over the White House
coronavirus storm clouds
given that these ~ have gathered...
dark cloud
there are still ~s on the horizon (economy)
economic cloud
he acknowledged ~s on the horizon
ethical cloud
he left under an ~ (government)
storm clouds
if there are some ~ on the horizon, they could come...
clouds have gathered
given that these coronavirus storm ~...
cloud has been lifted
the ~ over this presidency
cloud (hanging over the President) has been removed
the ~ by this report
♦ "I had a cloud over my head, and I knew that was a cloud that wasn't
going to go away." (Problems at work.)
feeling, emotion & effect / oppression: atmosphere / cloud
/ light & dark / shadow
cloud (resemblance)
cloud street
~s can indicate thermals (hang gliding)
~s are rows of cumulous clouds
bat cloud
radar can estimate the number of bats in a ~
resemblance: atmosphere / cloud
cloud (consciousness)
clouds of depression
antidepressants can help part the black ~
part the (black) clouds
antidepressants can help ~ of depression
consciousness & awareness: atmosphere / cloud
cloud (sign)
war clouds
as ~ gathered over the region (Iraqi Freedom)
clouds gathered
but ~ quickly
evidence: atmosphere / cloud
clouded
clouded by drugs
his thinking was ~
clouded in mystery
his past is ~
consciousness & awareness: atmosphere / cloud
cloudy (consciousness)
cloudy with drugs
his mind was ~
consciousness & awareness: atmosphere / cloud
Page 236 of 1574
cloudy (certainty)
become cloudy
news can ~ when information is controlled (rumors)
certainty & uncertainty: cloud / light & dark
clout (noun)
clout of financial journalists
the ~ can affect the corporate bottom line
Washington's clout
~ is fading (diplomacy)
economic clout
Boeing has tremendous ~ (economy, jobs, etc.)
global clout
China's ~
immense clout
the business network carried ~ with investors
power: fist / violence
cloth (cut from the same cloth, etc.)
cut from different cloth
scientists are not ~ (self-interest)
cut from a different cloth
entrepreneurs are ~
cut from the same cloth
you and he don't seem to be ~ (husband and wife)
he is ~ as Steve Jobs (entrepreneurship)
Hussein, Gaddafi, Assad, Chavez, Kim, they're all ~
you and I, we are ~
character & personality / identity & nature: cloth
taxonomy & classification: cloth
clown (verb)
clowning around
stop ~
behavior: circus / verb
clown (person)
clowns
plane was designed by ~ supervised by monkeys (Boeing)
class clown
he was the ~, always dancing, singing, and joking
he survived bullies by acting as the ~ (Richard Pryor)
overrated, overhyped clown
he’s an ~ (said by a boxer of another boxer)
character & personality: circus / person
insult / person: circus
club (boys’ club)
boy’s club
the upper echelon of music is still a ~
economics still stands alone as a ~
boys club of comedy
he wants to change the ~ (Guy Branum)
“boys club” culture
sexual misconduct and a general ~ (media company)
boys’ club network
she describes the Academy as a ~ (the Grammys)
break through the (sportswriting) boys’ club
the battle to ~
break up the boys’ club
the push to ~ at the Fed
confronted (Rock’s) boys club
they ~ (music)
group, set & collection / hierarchy / society: school &
education
coach (verb)
coached her on how to answer
the sheriff ~ to the FBI
directing: sports & games
clumsy (adjective)
clumsy term
it’s a very ~ (“systemic racism”)
clumsy writer
at first she was a ~
ability & lack of ability: movement
coal (rake somebody over the coals)
rake him over the coals
let's not ~s for a remark he made 30 years ago
punishment & recrimination: fire / verb
speech: fire / verb
coarse (speech)
coarse word
it's a ~ (asshole)
flaws & lack of flaws: materials & substances
speech: materials & substances
coast (coast is clear)
coast is clear
let’s wait 2 weeks until we say the ~ (epidemic)
danger: boat / sea
coast (coast to victory, etc.)
coasted to victory
the team ~
difficulty, easiness & effort: movement / verb
Page 237 of 1574
attainment: movement / verb
coast (noun)
third coast
Atlanta is the ~ of rap (vs. LA, NY)
♦ “Atlanta artists and producers were trying to establish the local scene
as the ‘Third Coast.’ / ‘We wanted to make y’all eat this Southern fried
chicken,’ says Breeze. ‘Not chicken cordon bleu. Not pineapple chicken.’
/ So Breeze sat down with the pen. Someone made the West wild, he
reasoned. He was going to make the South dirty. Over time Dirty South,
not Third Coast, became a banner for artists throughout the region.”
(“Derivation of Dirty South” by Tony Rehagen, Atlanta Magazine, Nov 1,
2012. The dirty in Dirty South reflects the soil of the South, the red clay,
etc.)
center & periphery: ground, terrain & land / sea
cobble together (verb)
cobbled together a living
for a while she ~ acting and waitressing
cobbled together a resume
I ~ and was invited to interview
cobbled together a video
he ~ with claims of an ‘amazing cancer cure’
creation & transformation: clothing & accessories / verb
cockroach (noun)
cockroach
he is an autocrat, a “~,” despoiling the country (a leader)
insult / violence: animal / insect
cocktail (noun)
cocktail of (psychoactive) drugs
he downs a daily ~ (mental illness)
cocktail of ash, acids, aerosols
the cloud, a toxic ~ (pollution / S. Asia)
cocktail of things
it’s a ~, it’s never one thing (what makes serial killers)
Disney’s cocktail
~ of morality, stereotypes and magic (animated films)
drug cocktail
new ~s make living with HIV a reality
toxic cocktail
the cloud, a ~ of ash, acids, aerosols (S. Asia)
mixture: alcohol / bird / food & drink
cocoon (verb)
“cocoon” in their homes
they were asked to ~ (elderly in Ireland during pandemic)
avoidance & separation / division & connection / isolation
& remoteness / protection & lack of protection: insect /
verb
cocoon (isolation)
cocoon of high expectations
it was a ~ and harsh discipline (black school)
cocoon of seclusion
she maintains a ~ through the burqa (in public / Afghan)
cocoon of sorrow, rage and despair
he began to emerge from the ~ that had enveloped him
digital cocoon
she gets lost in her ~
ideological "cocoons"
the digital age makes it easy to spend your time in ~
security cocoon
he was wrapped in a tight ~ (president)
spiritual cocoon
I was in a ~ (a nun in her pre-social justice period)
emerge from the cocoon
he began to ~ of sorrow, rage and despair
peel away the (thick) cocoon
I started to ~ I had built around my life (gay comes out)
avoidance & separation / division & connection / isolation
& remoteness / protection & lack of protection: insect
cocoon (resemblance)
cocoon of air bags
it bounced down in a ~ (Mars "Spirit")
resemblance: insect
cocooned
cocooned in privilege
a metropolitan elite ~ (Great Britain)
cocooned in a (dignified) silence
the stadium is now ~ (memorial to dead fans)
avoidance & separation / division & connection / isolation
& remoteness / protection & lack of protection: insect
coffer (noun)
campaign coffers
she’ll have to replenish her ~ quickly
money: container / sign, signal, symbol
coffin (death / actual)
coffin or the suitcase
it is the choice between the ~ (Algerian Civil War)
death & life: sign, signal, symbol
coffin (nail in the coffin, etc.)
standards coffin
the nails went into the ~ when... (education)
Page 238 of 1574
Razor Ruddock’s (career) coffin
Tommy Morrison put the final nail in ~ (boxing)
nail in the coffin of the party
the immigration issue will be the final ~
final nail in the coffin
that was the ~
nail in the coffin came
the ~ when the army dropped him (a leader)
driven “a big nail in the Coffin
Grant thought his victory had ~ of rebellion” (Chattanooga)
put the (final) nail in the coffin
he ~ when he… (sports victory)
♦ "I think that was the final nail in the coffin… that the church could no
longer offer to subsidize these schools. But that was just the final
straw…” (Decline of Catholic schools.)
♦ “I realize I’m in the crosshairs of the woke mob right now, so before the
final nail gets put in my cancel culture casket, I’d like to set the record
straight...” (The NFL’s Aaron Rodgers, employing nice alliteration.)
destruction / fate, fortune & chance: burial
cog (cog in the machine, etc.)
cog
Evans was a ~ (one of thousands of government workers)
cogs in that machine
he creates a machine and the players are just ~ (ten Hag)
cog in the (Norwegian pedagogical) machine
he thinks of himself as a ~
cogs of a (bloodthirsty) war machine
making soldiers into the interchangeable ~
cog in a (vast, capitalist) machine
everyone was just a ~, it was brutal (1930s Hollywood)
cog in the machinery
he was a fossilized bureaucrat, a ~ for decades
interchangeable cogs
making soldiers into the ~ of a bloodthirsty war machine
vital cog
Reynolds remains a ~ in the Joshua operation (boxing)
♦ Alice Evans was just a cog, a “mote among drab-seeming
thousands...only a cow bacteriologist buried away in the U.S.
Department of Agriculture... nothing more than a pleasant-looking girl
bacteriologist, anonymous among insignificant boy and girl microbe
hunters...destined to no famous end...plodding...her specialization...Fordfactoryish.” (And yet, she made an important contribution to science.
From Men Against Death (1932) by Paul De Kruif.)
♦ see also machine (publicity machine, etc.)
functioning / importance & significance / operation:
mechanism
coin (verb)
coined the term
he ~ ("virtual reality")
creation & transformation: money / verb
coin (side of a coin)
two sides of the same coin
obesity and hunger are ~ (nutrition)
affluence and poverty should not be ~
relationship: money
coin (double-sided coin)
double-sided coin
it’s a ~ (trust can help or hurt you)
relationship: money
coined
coined in the early 1980s
the term “serial killer” was only ~
creation & transformation: money
cold (feeling)
cold feeling
a ~ just came over me
cold and hard
administrators can seem ~ (high school)
cold and impersonal
the big city can be ~
cold and calculating
she is ~
emotionally cold
I'm pretty much ~ (a marine)
feeling, emotion & effect: temperature
character & personality: temperature
cold (in the cold)
left out in the cold
the West will be ~ (by Russian diplomacy)
leave (excellent) workers out in the cold
requirements for degrees ~
acceptance & rejection / dismissal, removal & resignation:
society
isolation & remoteness / society: ground, terrain & land
cold (cold case, etc.)
cold case
~s can rip open the wounds of the past
gone cold
his trail had ~ (crime)
went cold
the case ~ for a decade (murder solved by DNA)
primacy, currency, decline & obsolescence: temperature
activity: temperature
Page 239 of 1574
coldblooded (and cold-blooded)
cold-blooded one
it was a “one-off incident,” a hot-blooded crime, not a ~
seemed as coldblooded
Biden ~ as Nixon (Afghanistan / Vietnam withdrawal)
character & personality / feeling, emotion & effect: blood /
temperature
cold feet
cold feet
the Saudi leaders were getting ~
she got ~ (bride-to-be who disappeared)
cold feet about testifying
he was getting ~
getting cold feet
he was ~ about testifying
eagerness & reluctance: foot / temperature
coldhearted (adjective)
coldhearted person
she is a ~
coldhearted or cowardly
their decision was not ~ (climbers)
heart: temperature
empathy & lack of empathy: heart / temperature
feeling, emotion & effect: heart / temperature
coldly
coldly dismissed
she was ~ by the all-male institutions (explorer)
watched coldly
diplomats ~ as the family was dragged away
feeling, emotion & effect: temperature
empathy & lack of empathy: temperature
cold shoulder
cold shoulder from members
I received the ~
received the cold shoulder
I ~ from the members of the group
gave the cold shoulder to the Russians
Georgia let the US help and ~
♦ Some say this refers to offering a visitor a cold shoulder of meat, as
opposed to a more hospitable hot meal. This must have been before the
invention of the microwave.
acceptance & rejection: temperature
cold war
cold civil war
America is in a state of ~ (black vs. white history)
cold war and zero-sum
the bill is full of ~ thinking (Chinese criticism of US)
tech cold war
this ~ matters (US vs. Huawei and 5G network)
long-running cold war
a ~ between news and opinion (at Fox News)
conflict: allusion / history / temperature
collapse (verb)
collapsed mentally and physically
Cherry-Garrard had ~ (in Antarctica)
destruction: infrastructure / ruins / verb
failure, accident & impairment: infrastructure / ruins / verb
collapse (noun)
collapse
the system will reform itself or face its own ~
collapse of the (oil) boom
but with the ~
collapse of communism
since the ~ in 1991
collapse of the (cod) fishery
the ~
collapse of the (Iraqi) government
the situation could lead to the ~
collapse of (stock) prices
with the ~ (Silicon Valley)
collapse of talks
the ~ between…(two companies)
collapse of Taliban rule
since the ~ (Afghanistan)
collapse in their self-esteem
men who experienced a near ~ (financial crisis)
company's collapse
an internal probe into the ~ shows…
colony collapse (m)
a new bee problem, called ~ disorder (honeybees)
price collapse
because of the ~ of commodities (sub-Saharan Africa)
catastrophic collapse
secrecy can make a system prone to ~
economic collapse
engulfed Russia (following fall of communism)
prone to (catastrophic) collapse
secrecy can make a system ~
on the brink of collapse
the government is ~ (Northern Ireland)
Page 240 of 1574
on the edge of collapse
the air travel network teeters ~ (Unfriendly Skies)
on the verge of collapse
the provincial government is ~ (Iraq)
probe into the (company's) collapse
an internal ~ shows…
collapse engulfed Russia
economic ~ (following fall of communism)
faced collapse
the company asked for government intervention as it ~
lead to the collapse
the situation could ~ of the Iraqi government
failure, accident & impairment: infrastructure / ruins / verb
destruction: infrastructure / ruins / verb
collide (verb)
collide with (ancient) traditions
modern mores often ~ (Africa)
generations collide
when ~ at work (boomers / Gen X)
conflict: crashes & collisions / verb
collision (noun)
collision between the human and animal word
the bear’s death highlights the ~
collision of cultures
the dispute was a result of a ~ (temple bell vs. condo)
collision of (all these different) cultures
it was a ~ (1930s Shanghai)
conflict: crashes & collisions
Colonel Blimp
Colonel Blimp-ish figure
in person, Fisher cuts a ~...
♦ The cartoon appeared in 1934.
allusion: books & reading
character & personality: allusion / history
military: sign, signal, symbol
colonialism (noun)
data colonialism
this is called ~ (zero-rating WhatsApp)
digital colonialism
the company engages in “~” (WhatsApp)
control & lack of control / possession / taking & removing:
ground, terrain & land
colonize (verb)
colonize Chatwin into the gay world
she felt a gay biographer might ~ (Bruce Chatwin’s widow)
♦ “I’m seeking to decolonize the birding experience.” (Tykee James, a
“birding activist” and co-founder of Freedom Birders. From “Monuments
And Teams Have Changed Names As America Reckons With Racism.
Birds Are Next” by Jeff St. Clair, NPR, June 5, 2021.)
♦ “I’ve tried to decolonize the Thanksgiving meals by eating a variety of
food.” (A Potawatomi.)
control & lack of control / possession / taking & removing:
ground, terrain & land / verb
colonized
colonized
British English has been ~ (by American English)
♦ “Beware of the new ideological colonization that tries to destroy the
family. It’s not born of the dream that we have from God and prayer—it
comes from outside and that’s why I call it a colonization.” (“Pope Warns
Of ‘Ideological Colonization’; Praises Catholics in Caucasus” by Rebecca
Hersher, October 2, 2016. Pope Francis opposed rich countries foisting
gender theory, contraception and gay marriage on poorer countries in
return for development aid.)
control & lack of control / possession / taking & removing:
ground, terrain & land
color (verb)
color the residents (of the Gulf Coast) unimpressed
~ by the government reaction to the disaster
colors his perspective
he is a wealthy small businessman, and that ~
colors his thoughts
his negativism ~
colors his views
his vegetarianism ~ of certain countries
perception, perspective & point of view: picture / verb
color (color outside the lines, etc.)
color outside the lines
back then, you could ~ (boxing marketing)
constraint & lack of constraint: color / line / picture / verb
colored
colored by their relationship
countries' views are ~ with Iran (on an issue)
perception, perspective & point of view: picture
colorful (language)
colorful language
we learned and delighted in ~ (New York City)
I apologize for my ~ (expletives)
speech: color
colorful (politician, etc.)
colorful history
Eagles fans have a ~ (Philadelphia)
colorful language
we learned and delighted in ~ (New York City)
Page 241 of 1574
colorful (British) politician
the ~ Boris Johnson
character & personality: color
colors (true colors, etc.)
true colors
he didn't show his ~ until after the wedding (abusive)
peoples’ true colors
hardships often bring out ~
showed his true colors
he ~ with his shameful, dishonest attacks on a great man
he ~ by walking out on his team with five minutes left
♦ “Bearing on, the fleet came to anchor in the recent scene of Nelson’s
glory, the Bay of Aboukir...; the fleet consisted of 175 sail of all kinds. /
Broken and squally weather rendered the attempt to land impracticable
for a week; and in the meantime a French frigate, which, by capturing
some British ships, had become acquainted with our private signals, and
daringly accompanied the expedition as if she formed part of it, suddenly
shot ahead of the fleet, and, hoisting the tricolour, ran safely into the
harbour of Alexandria, with a reinforcement for General Menou.”
(“Alexandria, 1801” from British Battles on Land and Sea by James
Grant.)
♦ “Duncan Gordon Boyes, Royal Navy, Midshipman of Her Majesty’s
Ship Euryalus... He carried a Colour with the leading company, kept it in
advance of all, in the face of the thickest fire, his colour-sergeants having
fallen, one mortally, the other dangerously wounded...The Colour he
carried was six times pierced by musket balls.” (From the citation, in the
London Gazette, for Boyes’ Victoria Cross, for his actions at
Shimonoseki, Japan, in 1864. Born in Cheltenham, Glos., England,
Boyes joined the Royal Navy at the age of 14. He received his VC at the
age of 17. Later, he was kicked out of the navy for ill-discipline and went
to New Zealand. Suffering from depression and alcoholism, he
committed suicide at the age of 22.)
♦ “These colors don’t run.” (A T-shirt with an American flag.)
identity & nature: flags & banners
colossal (adjective)
colossal (national) disaster
the situation is a ~ (nuclear-power-plant failure)
colossal failure
it was a ~
colossal misunderstanding
the message led to a ~
colossal problem
we have ~s
size: allusion / statue
colossus (noun)
colossus
Weir was a ~, what an inspiration (Scottish Rugby)
Antarctic colossus
the ~ is melting at a rapid rate (Thwaites Glacier)
business colossus
the rise and fall of a ~ (Carlos Ghosn)
trading colossus
the East India Company was a ~
♦ A colossus was a gigantic statue. The Colossus of Rhodes was one of
the seven wonders of the ancient world.
size: allusion / statue
importance & significance: allusion / size / statue
Columbus (Chinese Columbus, etc.)
Chinese Columbus
but Cheng Ho, the ~, had no successors (isolation)
found its Columbus
in Dr. Schliemann the science of classical antiquity ~
♦ “Ali never doubted that his victory against Sonny Liston in Miami was
legitimate and repeatable. ‘In Miami I was Columbus,’ he would say. ‘I
was traveling to the unknown. I had to be cautious because I didn’t know
what to expect. Now I know.’” (King of the World by David Remnick.)
history / searching & discovery: epithet
comatose (adjective)
comatose
"~," the term for servers using energy but doing no work
comatose demeanor
his ~ at a G-7 meeting generated criticism
comatose state
the system is in a ~ (healthcare in Zimbabwe)
politically comatose
they pronounced him ~ (a politician who later revived)
activity / condition & status / consciousness & awareness /
functioning: health & medicine / mechanism / sleep
comb (verb)
combed the area on hands and knees
police ~
combed the foothills in a (futile) search
they ~ for the girl
comb (former) battlegrounds for artifacts
hobbyists ~ (Civil War buffs)
combed the (city's famed) canals for bombs
authorities ~ (Venice)
combing the roadsides for evidence
volunteers were ~ (murderers)
combed the slope for signs
Anker ~ of his missing friends (avalanche)
comb (Arabian) Desert for suspects
unmanned US planes ~
comb the seas for bluefin tuna
fishermen from New Zealand to Libya ~
comb through (decades-old) cases
detectives are beginning to ~, hoping...
comb through (international travel) records
analysts began to ~ (terrorism)
combed (abandoned) buildings
Page 242 of 1574
police ~ (for missing woman)
combed the school
the Jackson County Health Department ~ (rash)
combed the region
police ~
combed the countryside
volunteers ~, on A.T.V.'s and on horseback (for girl)
combed the foothills
they ~ in a futile search for the girl
searching & discovery: hair / verb
combat (verb)
combat the disease
he ordered a broad mobilization to ~ (SARS / China)
combat (street) homelessness
it remains the principal tool to ~ (supportive housing)
combat boredom and tension
they play Monopoly to ~ (soldiers / Iraq)
tool to combat
it remains the principal ~ street homelessness (supportive
housing)
conflict: military / verb
resistance, opposition & defeat: military / verb
combat (noun)
political combat
he relished ~ (a politician)
waging (political) combat
he has been ~ with Democrats (politics)
♦ “In our social media age, disagreement can feel like combat.” (A
cultural critic.)
♦ “Fear and filth went hand in hand.” (With the Old Breed: At Peleliu and
Okinawa by E. B. Sledge.)
conflict: military
resistance, opposition & defeat: military
combative (adjective)
got combative
he was apologetic but he also ~ at times (at a hearing)
conflict / feeling, emotion & effect: military
resistance, opposition & defeat: military
combustible (adjective)
combustible (recent Carter) interview
perhaps the most ~ aired over the weekend
initiation / speech: fire / temperature
come (winter is coming, etc.)
coming
the future is ~, whether we like it or not
a time is ~ when all will suffer under the terror...
coming our way
a new kind of war is ~
come again
it’s a time and style that will not ~ (Mississippi steamboats)
came around
I didn’t get to sleep that night till the morning ~
comes around
when the anniversary ~ every year (9/11)
come and gone
2001 has ~
a year has ~ since we heard the news about Billy Joe
coming up
a big week is ~ (politics)
coming next
what is ~ is using machine learning (medicine)
good days are coming
the worst part is behind us, we are seeing a new dawn, ~
♦ “Every year, we know it’s coming, the birds sing differently...” (Kay
Oxendine, a member of the Haliwa Saponi Tribe in North Carolina, about
the spring powwow season.)
♦ "About the year, my folks would say, "This year," or "next year," but I
couldn't discover what they meant. I used to wonder what it meant,
when they said, "A year." Sometimes they would say, "One year," or
"Two years," and sometimes, "Many years." I wondered what a year
was, and where it was. I used to think, "It must be around here." But I
couldn't see it. I always thought that the year must have arms and legs
and a head. It must have a body like an animal. I used to wish that I
could see it when it came around. But I never saw the year." (Old Man
Hat, A Navaho Autobiography.)
future / time: direction / movement / verb
coming, arriving, staying, leaving & returning: direction /
movement / verb
come (a time comes along)
came a time
then ~ when the meat supply ceased...
came along
nobody saw a virus until the electron microscope ~
comes along
just when things are improving, this new crisis ~
Knott came along
before ~, fishermen caught lobsters the same way…
psychoanalysis came along
until ~, the accepted antidote to hysteria was rest
time came
when the ~, Russian industrialization turned the tide of the
war
♦ "Like most creatures of the Wild, the grey cub early experienced
famine. There came a time when not only did the meat-supply cease, but
the milk no longer came from his mother's breast.” (White Fang by Jack
London.)
past & present / time: direction / movement / verb
Page 243 of 1574
come (development)
come
it should not have ~ as a complete surprise (oil bust)
with Empire had ~ immense problems of security (UK)
came with the airing of The Shop
the final straw ~
came with a heavy price
fame ~
comes every year
influenza is an old enemy, one that ~
♦ “It seemed like there was light at the end of the tunnel, and then the
Delta variant came along, the Omicron variant came along...”
development: direction / movement / verb
appearance & disappearance: direction / movement / verb
relationship: movement / verb
coming, arriving, staying, leaving & returning: direction /
movement / verb
come (come a long way)
come a long way
we have ~ (a business)
we have ~, but we have much further to go
we have ~, but not far enough
come a long way in race relations
we have ~, but we keep going backwards
come a long way since the 1990s
Kosovo has ~
come a long way from its (humble) beginnings
the company has ~
come a long way in four decades
the sport has ~
development / progress & lack of progress: journeys & trips
/ movement
come (to come)
to come
more hearings are ~
yet to come
there are changes ~ (global warming)
it does make you wonder what is ~ (politics)
the best is ~
sure to come
change is ~
decades to come
we are left with this legacy for ~
future to come
they are waiting for the ~, but it’s already here
generations to come
these issues will affect ~
what we do will echo through ~ (2020 election)
months to come
there will be ups and downs in the ~
more (Inside Edition) to come
there is ~
things to come
this is a sign of ~
future / time: direction / movement
come (see something coming)
saw it coming
I never ~
they never ~
nobody ~ (boy arrested)
we were caught flatfooted, we never ~
see it coming
he didn't ~ (heart attack)
♦ Shrek: My father was an ogre. He tried to eat me. I should have seen it
coming.
♦ You don't play with snakes and not expect to get bitten.
♦ "You fall when your life is over." (Mini on the death of the great freesolo climber, John Bachar, posted at supertopo.)
consciousness & awareness / development / future / time:
direction / eye / movement / verb
come (for a time to come)
for years to come
the problem will occupy botanists ~
for decades to come
he may last ~ (a leader)
for centuries to come
shrinking coastlines will be the new normal ~
future: direction / movement
come (come out swinging)
came out swinging
the president ~
she ~ against her critics
accusation & criticism / conflict / resistance, opposition &
defeat / speech: boxing
come after (and come for)
coming after our children
they are ~ (culture wars)
come after your guns
everybody’s trying to ~ (gun control)
come after their studios next
we’re going to ~ (a demonstrator)
come after you
if you speak up, the immigration system will ~ (an activist)
coming for you
we’re ~, the party is over (cops versus gang)
Page 244 of 1574
pursuit, capture & escape: hunting / verb
come along (appearance)
come along very often
opportunities like this don’t ~ (quite job for a better one)
appearance & disappearance: movement / verb
come away with (verb)
came away with
the message I ~ is that...
analysis, interpretation & explanation: giving, receiving,
bringing & returning / verb
come back (to bite, haunt, etc.)
come back
I never thought it would ~ again (convicted of cold case)
come back to haunt
what you do on the computer can ~ (queries)
come back to bite the president
a lot of that conduct and those words may ~
come back to bite us
this will ~ (no test to get driving license)
come back to haunt the Ethiopians
such tactics may ~ (torture / rebels)
come back to haunt you
gossip can ~
♦ “Be careful about sharing intimate gossip in a party situation—you may
find it comes back to haunt you...”
reversal: animal / teeth / verb
coming, arriving, staying, leaving & returning: verb
judgment: verb
come back (resiliency)
came back to level it
the defending champions ~ (Olympic basketball)
come back stronger
I'm going to ~ than ever
coming, arriving, staying, leaving & returning / resiliency /
survival, persistence & endurance: direction / movement /
verb
comeback (noun)
comeback kid
he’s not the ~, he’s Lazarus (a politician)
comeback trail
they are on the ~ after serious injuries (skiers)
the genre is on the ~ (hard rock music)
spark for his comeback
the rivalry was the ~ (a rapper)
made a comeback
he ~
coming, arriving, staying, leaving & returning / resiliency /
survival, persistence & endurance: direction
come down on (verb)
came down (hard) on his critics
President Trump ~
accusation & criticism: direction / verb
oppression: direction / verb
come forward (verb)
came forward
dozens of women ~ and said... (sex abuse)
come forward
she decided to ~, despite the publicity (accusation)
police have appealed for any witnesses to ~
come forward with allegations
4,000+ people have ~ of sexual assault (Australia)
appearance & disappearance: direction / verb
confronting, dealing with & ignoring things: direction / verb
come from (origin)
come from
where does his temper ~ (a politician)
comes from dishonesty
nothing good ever ~
♦ You don’t harvest grapes from planting thorns. (An Arab proverb.)
origin / product / relationship: verb
come from (analysis)
come from
where did all this ~ (stigmas and stereotypes)
analysis, interpretation & explanation: journey & trips / verb
come from (emotion)
coming from
he understood where their anger was ~ (an official)
I just want people to understand where you’re ~ (mom died)
feeling, emotion & effect: place / verb
come out (verb)
coming out
people ask why I’m ~ now (male on male historical abuse)
now the truth is ~ (an expose that was quashed)
concealment & lack of concealment: cloth / verb
come out (against something)
come out against anti-Semitic tropes
we felt the need to ~
resistance, opposition & defeat: movement / verb
comer (up-and-comer, etc.)
up and comer
Page 245 of 1574
I know he’s an ~ so... (Ray Mancini about Connor Benn)
up-and-comers
there’s a long list of ~ bringing fresh sounds to the city
up-and-comer from Chattanooga
in 2013, Rashad was still a relatively unknown ~
up-and-comer artist
~ Gemma Laurence (sapphic folk music / wlw)
Republican up-and-comer
from Texas underdog to ~ (Ted Cruz / politics)
♦ See up-and-coming, arrive (attainment)
primacy, currency, decline & obsolescence: direction /
movement
come to (come to an answer, etc.)
come to
what decision did they ~
came to his decision
he asked for an assessment and that’s how he ~
analysis, interpretation & explanation: journeys & trips /
movement / verb
come to (development)
coming to
impeachment is crazy, what is this ~ (politics)
come to mean
“gaslight” has ~ a type of psychological manipulation
came to a head
it all ~ in December (conflict)
development: movement / verb
come through (verb)
still came through
Italy was not at its best but it ~ (a Euro 2020 game)
came through for people
I ~ (the great Ray “Boom Boom” Mancini / Youngstown)
obstacles & impedance / success & failure / survival &
perseverance: journeys & trips
come up (appear)
come up
that’s an option that has ~
appearance & disappearance: direction / prep, adv , adj,
particle / verb
come up with (discovery)
come up with nothing
they have dug through and ~ (investigation)
searching & discovery: direction / ground, terrain & land /
verb
come up on (a date, etc.)
coming up on a new trial
he is ~
coming, arriving, staying, leaving & returning: movement
future / time: direction / movement / verb
coming (in the coming months, etc.)
in the coming months
a series of reports is expected ~
in the coming years
such events will become more frequent ~ (droughts)
future / time: direction / movement
coming out (party, etc.)
coming out party
this was his ~ to set up big money (Brit boxer fights in US)
experience: love, courtship & marriage / sex
come with (and come along with /
attachment)
comes with being
her poems involve the cultural baggage that ~
come with its territory
his book avoids the pitfalls that ~ (a biography)
come along with that
there are questions that ~ (athlete’s drug-taking)
come with the sudden wealth
leeches ~ (pro athletes)
attachment / relationship: journeys & trips / movement /
verb
command (deserve and get)
commands (an annual) rent
the space ~ of $800 a square foot
commands respect
she ~ (a veteran teacher)
commands the highest prices
sweet crude ~… (oil)
giving, receiving, bringing & returning: speech / verb
fictive communication: speech / verb
common denominator
common denominator
music is a ~ (vs. class, race, ability)
division & connection: number
commodity (noun)
most precious commodity
time was now Scott’s ~, and time was running out
Page 246 of 1574
questionable commodity
for all his talent, he is still a ~ (athlete)
scarcest commodities
time is one of your ~ (owners of small businesses)
limited and precious commodity
time is a ~
treat virginity as a commodity
men should not ~
worth & lack of worth: farming & agriculture
consumption / product: farming & agriculture
companion (noun)
companion of time
change is a constant ~ (said by a diplomat)
companion to a (bewitching) city
for me, the book was a perfect ~ (Kaplan / Kim / Lahore)
companion for 105 days
the wind was a pretty constant ~ (Antarctica)
constant companion
exhaustion is a ~ (work at nursing homes)
cruelty is their ~ (untouchables / India)
constant companions
thirst and hunger were their ~
modern life and ancient traditions are ~ (Bangkok)
a camera and tape recorder were his ~ (a filmmaker)
near companion
death was always a ~ (diseases / British Raj)
turns a poem into a companion
memorization ~ (Billy Collins)
relationship: person
compass (within / outside the compass)
within the compass of that subpoena
if there are papers that are ~
♦ “Keep within compass and you shall be sure to avoid many troubles
which others endure.” (An illustration of a virtuous woman, inside the
legs of a compass. The compass is not a nautical one, but the one used
to inscribe a circle, the drawing tool. The idea is that correct behavior is
circumscribed by precise boundaries.)
extent & scope: boundary / tools & technology
compass (moral compass)
moral compass
a friend with a stronger ~ (told police of crime)
so many are intelligent, with decent ~s (teens / dating)
~ can point you in the right direction
his own inner moral compass
he had lost sight of ~
compass had shifted
the moral ~ 180 degrees (seduction is abuse)
compass went off course
tell us about a time your moral ~
lacks a moral compass
he is a menacing creature who ~ (a dictator)
lose their moral compass
they are so mired in bad fortune they ~
♦ The metaphor of a compass is a very trendy cliche in writing and
speaking nowadays, and it is obvious that almost everyone utilizing the
word has never owned or used one. The compass doesn’t waver, the
compass needle does. The compass doesn’t go off course, the user of
the compass does. What in the world does it mean to “realign” a
compass “once wires get crossed,” or to be “tuned in to” your moral
compass? Is there really a compass or something like it inside us? Are
compasses ordinarily distinguishable as “strong” or “weak”? How can a
compass “waver off true north” when its sole job is to indicate north!
Read or listen to “Resetting Your Moral Compass After An ‘Ethical Slip,’”
NPR, Talk of the Nation, April 8, 2013.
behavior / direction: tools & technology
complex (military-industrial complex,
etc.)
celebrity industrial complex
by the 1950s, he was a big face in the ~ (Dirk Bogarde)
deadline-industrial complex
we buy in to the ~
“Lolita” industrial complex
the ~ (film adaptations, fashion shows, podcast, etc.)
media-industrial complex
the best-of-the-decade ~ (2019-2020)
prison industrial complex
the ~ is profit driven (for-profit incarceration)
tragedy-industrial complex
the printed press and its ~ (the film Ace in the Hole)
Democrat-media complex
the full ~ was on display (politics)
Democrat-Media Complex
the ~ lives in the past... (historical debate)
♦ Dwight D. Eisenhower used the term “the military-industrial complex” in
his Farewell Address to the Nation on January 17, 1961. About that, the
linguist Noam Chomsky said, “There is no military-industrial complex: it’s
just the industrial system operating under one or another pretext.”
power: allusion / history
conceived
conceived, born and raised
Nature was ~ to serve polemic purpose (the magazine)
creation & transformation: birth
concierge (person)
concierge-style
a ~ (health care) start-up with offices in...
Book Concierge
NPR’s annual literary recommendation tool ~
♦ Wealthy Bobos expect to be catered to by Sherpas, concierges,
elementary schools, universities, etc.
Page 247 of 1574
help & assistance: person
concoct (verb)
concocted such a (wild artistic and musical) gumbo
few have ~ (Van Dyke Parks)
concocted an (escape) plan
she ~ (to get away from a cult)
♦ Originally, this meant to cook together. As such, it is congruent with
cook up.
creation & transformation: cooking / mixture / verb
concoction (noun)
plot-driven concoction
State of Terror is a ~
creation & transformation / mixture: cooking / food & drink
concrete (noun)
concrete
their thinking becomes less ~ and more abstract (kids)
concrete evidence
for now, there was no ~ linking... (terror attack)
concrete examples
some ~ will illustrate this point
concrete information
he didn't give any ~ about the crime
concrete offer
I haven't gotten any ~s (job search)
concrete question
unable to answer ~s about…
concrete results
we need ~ from this conference (U.N.)
substance & lack of substance: materials & substances
concretize (verb)
concretize what’s going on
trying to ~ today (racial attitudes)
concretize (possible) approaches
steps designed to ~ to the problem of...
concretized the connection
Foucault further ~ between knowledge and power
concretized a Palestinian national identity
the Nakba ~ post-1949
concretizes it
if everybody knows about it, it ~ (death of a person)
concretize the opinion
the bumper sticker helps to ~ of the driver (or “firm up”)
concretized our solidarity
the connection ~ (Ferguson / Gaza) (BLM / Hamas)
concretize or literalize
I want to ~ something that is happening (an author)
♦ The Merriam-Webster online dictionary defines this as “to make
concrete, specific, definite.”
strength & weakness: materials & substances / verb
concretized
concretized
once a clear definition is ~ (academia)
strength & weakness: materials & substances
condemn (verb)
condemned his men to march or die
he had ~ (Robert Falcon Scott / logistics)
condemned Scott as a “sentimentalist”
Meares ~ (Antarctica)
judgment: justice / verb
conduit (noun)
conduits for contributors
Visa and PayPal refused to be ~ (to WikiLeaks)
conduit for refugees from Tibet
the passes into Sikkim became a ~ after 1950
conduit between publishers and consumers
originally the company was to be a ~ (Amazon)
communications conduit
he acted as a ~ (terrorist messenger)
media conduit
the group acts as a ~ for the ALF
vital conduit
the Gulf of Aden is a ~ for Middle East oil
route: water
confetti (noun)
turned the insulation into confetti
the machine-gun fire ~ (an aircraft)
resemblance: waste
conflagration (noun)
financial conflagration
proprietary trading added tinder to the ~ (2008)
added tinder to the (financial) conflagration
proprietary trading ~ (2008)
avoid a conflagration
the US and the UN are seeking to ~ (in Sudan)
ignite a (larger) conflagration
Somalia could ~ across the Horn of Africa
provoked a conflagration
nationalists ~
amount & effect: fire
Page 248 of 1574
confluence (noun)
confluence of agendas
a "~" between Algeria and the West (terrorism)
confluence of (natural and manmade) disasters
the ~ (war, drought, etc.)
confluence of events
the odd ~ (volcanoes erupt on same day)
the ~ occurring in Iran is very sad (Hillary Clinton)
a ~ brought the Web site down
where is this ~ taking all of us (news-show host)
confluence of factors
a ~ has contributed to the spike in lethal violence (U.S.)
confluence of (several) factors
a ~ is likely responsible (falling crime rates)
confluence of two problems
many cities struggle with the ~ (coronavirus / homelessness)
odd confluence
the ~ of events (volcanoes erupt on same day)
♦ “Many different streams of migrants were to make their confluence in
the future United States. But the British stream flowed first and remained
foremost. From the beginning its leaders were out of sympathy with the
Government at home...” (A History of the English-Speaking Peoples,
Volume 2, “The New World,” by Winston S. Churchill.)
division & connection: river
conga line
conga line of headlamps
climbers create a long ~ in the dark (Mt. Everest)
conga line of storms
a ~ is heading towards the US
coming, arriving, staying, leaving & returning: movement
connect (verb)
connect
two lonely teens meet and try to ~
connect the distant parts
migrating birds ~ of the world
social interaction: tools & technology / verb
division & connection: tools & technology / verb
conquer (verb)
conquer social anxiety
ways to ~
conquer coronavirus
how Iceland clamped down to ~
conquered (some of the world’s) deadliest diseases
the science and medical innovations that ~
conquer their fears
students ~ at the outdoor adventure center
conquer her stage fright
he helped her to ~
conquered Yosemite’s Half Dome
how two skiers ~
conquering Hollywood
digital de-aging is ~
conquered the world
he ~ of American entertainment (Marvin Hamlisch)
conquered all in Middlesbrough
she ~ (Miley Cyrus / 2019)
love conquer
can ~ travel bans (coronavirus pandemic)
success & failure: military / verb
conscious (aware)
conscious of the value
people are more ~ of relationships (post-9/11)
conscious of what
I've always been very ~ I eat, how much I exercise
conscious (and unconscious) beliefs
their ~ (stereotyping)
conscious decision
some people make a ~ to go missing, start a new life
conscious and unconscious (m)
their ~ beliefs (stereotyping)
budget-conscious
~ parents
celebrity-conscious
Los Angeles is America's most ~ town
cost-conscious
a ~ chef
ecology-conscious
an ~ audience
fashion-conscious
~ customers
party-conscious
his move could alienate ~ Democrats (politics)
safety conscious
kayakers are usually ~
safety-conscious
NASCAR is extremely ~ (auto racing)
security-conscious
this year's Academy Awards will be the most ~ ever
status-conscious (m)
~ people are stuck up
style conscious
Gabriella was ~ and had expensive taste
Page 249 of 1574
technology-conscious
in ~ San Francisco
weight-conscious
data on nearly 500 ~ women
earthquake-conscious
Japanese are the most ~ people
environmentally conscious
an ~ business
in an ~ world
ethically conscious
ethically conscious investors
consciousness & awareness: health & medicine
constellation (noun)
constellation of symptoms
the ~ at the end of life
he had another patient with the same bizarre ~ (AIDS)
configuration: astronomy
group, set & collection: astronomy
construct (artificial construct, etc.)
artificial construct
this notion of genre is an ~ anyway (Rachel Yoder)
creation & transformation: infrastructure
consume (emotions)
consumed him
guilt and shame ~ (financial infidelity)
feeling, emotion & effect: fire / verb
consume (consumption)
consumed books
Melville ~ and was consumed by them
consuming the media
people are ~ differently nowadays
consumed no news
many had ~ about the case (jurors)
consumed online
what they ~ warped and narrowed their vision of the world
consumption: food & drink / verb
consume (destroy)
consumed 4 Turkish divisions
Yemen ~ in the 19th century
destruction: fire / food & drink / predation / verb
consumed (emotion)
consumed by envy
I was not ~, but it was there (a boy)
consumed by an uncontrollable rage
someone ~ (girl stabbed 40 times)
consumed by thoughts of revenge
he was ~
feeling, emotion & effect: fire
consumed (destroyed)
consumed in confidence
your wisdom is ~
consumed by a fight
today will be ~ over the rules of the trial
destruction: fire / food & drink / predation
consumption (noun)
media consumption
~ and loneliness in the midst of hyper-connection
public consumption
everything is on social media, for ~ (a scandal)
consumption: food & drink
contagion (noun)
contagion
if the ~ spreads widely… (failing economies of states)
contagion of meaninglessness
this ~ (the word progress applied to Afghan War)
contagion of stupidity
he described what happened as a ~ (mass beach brawl)
‘turnover contagion’
a chain reaction known as ~ (mass resignations)
lead to contagion
amplification in the media can ~ (names of mass shooters)
affliction / corruption: health & medicine
contagious (emotion)
contagious
the girl's lack of ambition was ~ (to high-school boy)
feelings are ~
she had a laugh that was ~
overconfidence can be ~ (teams)
winning is ~ (sports teams)
his boldness and confidence were ~ Alex Honnold)
feeling, emotion & effect / transmission: health & medicine
contaminate (verb)
contaminated the inquiry
the media ~ (Amanda Knox)
contaminate the interrogation
interrogators can ~ by providing details
corruption: materials & substances
Page 250 of 1574
contamination
contamination
~ is the primary factor in wrongful convictions
corruption: materials & substances
contaminated
contaminated
confessions are ~ when interrogators supply details
corruption: materials & substances
contest (noun)
contest of measure and countermeasure
it's a grim ~ (IEDs / Iraq)
popularity contest
he was bound to lose the ~
grim contest
it's a ~ of measure and countermeasure (IEDs / Iraq)
lose the (popularity) contest
he was bound to ~
competition: sports & games
contour (noun)
contours of it
we know some basic ~ now (from the Muller Report)
basic contours
we already knew the ~ of both sides’ arguments (politics)
analysis, interpretation & explanation / area / environment:
ground, terrain & land
shape: ground, terrain & land
control (in control)
in control of his emotions
he is not ~
more in control
I always enjoy leading and it helped me feel ~ (kayaking)
felt (very much) in control
she ~ (a positive job interview)
feeling, emotion & effect: control & lack of control
control (out of control)
out of control
the $100 billion timber industry is ~
the perception that juvenile violence is ~
he's ~ (behavior)
our wireless bills are ~
out-of-control drivers
laws against ~
out-of-control person
an ~
out-of-control quality
a wild, nervy ~ to his writing
out-of-control rebel
the angry, ~
out-of-control shopper
an ~
out-of-control (urban) sprawl
~ (Austin)
blossom out of control
the consequences can ~ (problems on 767 jetliner)
feel out of control
badly designed intelligent technology makes us ~
getting out of control
things were ~
the situation seems to be ~
got out of control
they were away and the kids ~
spinning out of control
digital downloading and copying is ~
his personal life seemed to be ~
Nairobi is ~ (crime)
spinning (faster) out of control
Hernandez was ~
spun out of control
the argument ~
spiraled out of control
Rye's junior prom ~ (drunk teens)
spiraling out of control
in danger of ~
spiral out of control
medical expenses can often ~
his life seemed to ~ (drug addict)
restraint & lack of restraint: control & lack of control
control (under control)
under control
everything is ~
I've got everything ~
restraint & lack of restraint: control & lack of control
control (behavior)
under control
he can get his erratic behavior ~
get his (erratic) behavior under control
he can ~
behavior: control & lack of control
control (out of one's control)
out of your control
Page 251 of 1574
some things are ~
fate, fortune & chance: control & lack of control
conversation (groups, etc.)
conversation
is this mainly a ~ that takes place among a select group
there’s never a ~ about it (race and slavery in the U.S.)
conversations where
we’re having these dishonest ~ children... (race)
have these ~ people can you know choose mental health...
conversation about what
a new chapter in the American ~ racial justice / inequity...
conversation about whether
the result will provoke a ~...
conversation about race
it’s time to retire the “serious ~” (SCAR)
her work helped change the national ~ (1619 Project)
conversation about these shows or plays
collectively, the industry must have ~ that are problematic
(the rape and murder of girls and women)
conversations on Black Language education
she is a national leader in ~ (a Black academic)
conversation on police reform and race
his death jumpstarted a national ~
conversation between Black men
a ~ (ABC News with T.J. Holmes)
thousand conversations
this acutely argued book will engender a ~ (blurb)
broader conversation
there’s a ~ happening around Critical Race Theory
there’s a ~ taking place, there’s a hot debate... (CRT)
“courageous conversations”
the office hosted a series of ~ about race (education)
cultural conversation
it’s provoked a conversation that has dominated the ~
(#FreeBritney)
difficult conversation
the ~ about Bill Cosby
familiar conversations
he tells stories that follow ~ into unfamiliar territory (ad)
hard conversations
I had to have these kind of ~ with myself about... (marriage)
honest conversation
it’s time for a more ~ (linguist John McWhorter)
intentional conversations
~ between partisans could be a catalyst for national healing
national conversation
her work helped change the ~ about race (1619 Project)
the ~ has become so binary and simplistic
necessary conversation
engage in a ~ about how to avert these risks
open conversations
we have to start having more ~ about this (ageism)
public conversation
make this a public shaming and ~ (online petition site)
sophisticated conversation
society has to have an even more ~ about how the roots of...
tricky conversations
it’s important not to shy away from ~ (reintroducing wolves)
uncomfortable conversation
you have to be ready to have the ~
gatekeeper of (public) conversation
Twitter has become this ~ (India, Turkey, etc.)
part of the (national) conversation
the video became ~ over police responses
rise of conversations
with the ~ around police brutality...
weight in this conversation
it’s crazy he has ~ at all (Clooney about an investor)
conversation has (really) given us space
the ~ to say, “I don’t agree with what’s going on”
conversation go next
where does this ~ (sports and mental illness)
conversation has to translate
when ~ (policing reform)
advance the conversation
I wrote the book to encourage and ~ about race
belongs in the conversation
he will have to win to prove that he ~ (MMA)
bring families into the conversation
discretion in terms of when to ~ (school counselors)
changed the conversation
the #MeToo movement ~ around sexual assault
change the (national) conversation
her work helped ~ about race (1619 Project)
dominated the (cultural) conversation
it has provoked a conversation that has ~ (#FreeBritney)
dominating the conversation
inflation is really ~ right now (politics)
elevate the conversation
the more we ~ of how Black women are maligned...
encourage (and advance) the conversation
I wrote the book to ~ about race (Rachel Dolezal)
have this conversation
Page 252 of 1574
we think it’s time to ~
left out of the conversation
the hospitality industry has been ~ about ending lockdown
opening up a conversation
it is ~ for people (about mental health)
prompt conversations
we hope our expert report will ~ among... (a think tank)
provoke a conversation
the result will ~ about whether...
provoked a conversation
the documentary has ~ about tabloids and celebrities
provoking the conversation
I’m glad he’s asking the questions and ~ (about Bill Cosby)
retire the (“serious) conversation
it’s time to ~ about race” (SCAR)
spark conversations
the shootings should ~ about mental health, violence...
sparked a conversation
his death has ~ around the treatment of sumo wrestlers
start these conversations
workers can ~, move these conversations, ignite that fire
stays in the conversation
making you wonder is how he ~ (politics / Trump)
add something (of substance) to the conversation
journalist scrutiny would ~ (Ronan Farrow)
take on this (national) conversation
as we continue to ~ about systematic racism and...
♦ see also talk (talk about something / groups, etc.)
♦ “We do support the independence of museums and heritage
organizations, this is just the start of a conversation about working
together to protect heritage.” (Government statement after it threatened
to withhold funds from museums and was rebuked by the Museums
Association.)
♦ “[Her case] is opening up this space to have these conversations
where people can you know choose mental health over you know
necessarily you know showing up to work when they’re feeling
miserable.” (ABC, “Naomi Osaka Steps Away.”)
♦ “I think it’s more than a conversation now, I think it’s a movement.
(Osaka, Biles, etc.)
♦ “It does open up a conversation because it’s her using her voice and
her platform to really call out systemic change, which she has done
before. I think she can show other girls and women who look like her
how to empower them to stand up for themselves in ways that I think we
haven’t always been able to see.” (C. Vaile Wright, PhD, a clinical
psychologist and the American Psychological Association’s Senior
Director of Health Care Innovation, about Naomi Osaka and mental
health.)
♦ “Much of the conversation about antisemitism has nothing to do with
antisemitism, it’s actually about influencing and controlling the
conversation inside the Jewish community. It’s an arms race to define
what is antisemitism in the Jewish community, which is, of course, stupid
and it’s a waste of resources.” (Andres Spokoiny, president of the Jewish
Funders Network. From “Dark money, questionable partners behind new
group fighting antisemitism” by Arno Rosenfeld, The Forward, April 22,
2021.)
♦ “[W]e are spending a lot of time on erasure, and these are great
conversations to have with children...” (“‘Born on the Water’ puts the
‘1619 Project’ into kids’ hands,” NPR, All Things Considered, February
17, 2022.)
♦ “The ‘good’ conversation versus the ‘sexual assault’ conversation.”
(About Bill Cosby.)
♦ “Of course, one man’s negotiation is another man’s conversation is
another man’s ransom.” (“A Metaphor Meltdown At The White House,”
NPR, It’s All Politics, Ari Shapiro, October 10, 2013.)
♦ “Why It’s Time To Retire The ‘Serious Conversation About Race,’” with
Damon Young, 1A, WAMU, NPR, July 16, 2020.
♦ “We should have that conversation; We need to have that
conversation; What an interesting idea, I think we should have that
conversation...” (Excellent ways not to say yes or no, to make no
commitment, while at the same time sounding sympathetic.)
♦ “it is becoming an idiotic buzz word.” (johnSchreiber) (2011.)
♦ “It’s time for a more honest conversation.”
inclusion & exclusion: society
convert (person)
backcountry converts
many are ~ (at Bluebird Back Country skiing resort)
out for converts
he is a culinary evangelist ~ (chef)
won many converts
he ~ to his ideas
message / enthusiasm: person / religion
person: religion
conveyor belt
conveyor belt of assistants
a ~ rotates in and out (an abusive Hollywood assistant)
talent conveyor belt
he is just one to come off the club’s ~ (Lochend boxing)
♦ The Lochend Boxing and Fitness Club welcomes anyone. It has
produced many fine boxers, Josh Taylor being but one.
movement: mechanism
creation & transformation: manufacturing
coming, arriving, staying, leaving & returning: mechanism /
movement
convulse (verb)
convulsed in a spasm
for 3 minutes the casino ~ of violence (biker riot)
convulsing with change
Ethiopia has been ~
convulsed India
globalism and capitalism has ~
convulsed the country
waves of anti-foreign sentiment ~ (China)
affliction: health & medicine / movement / verb
activity: health & medicine / movement / verb
convulsed
convulsed by nationwide protests
the US has been ~
Page 253 of 1574
convulsed by (ethnic) strife
the area is ~
affliction: health & medicine / movement
activity: health & medicine / movement
convulsion (noun)
financial convulsion
a breakup of the EU would cause a ~
affliction: health & medicine / movement
activity: health & medicine / movement
cooked up
cooked up at Eglin Air Force Base
the planes were armed by a new bomb ~
creation & transformation: cooking
cookie jar (noun)
cookie jar of jobs, concessions, contracts
Daly wants to protect the ~ (politician)
got caught with his hand in the cookie jar
he ~ (corruption)
money: sign, signal, symbol
cook up (verb)
cooked up a plan
he and Tomaz ~ to climb Nuptse by a new route
cooked up the story
they ~ to get the reward (murder case)
creation & transformation: cooking / prep, adv, adj, particle
/ verb
cool (cool off / activity)
cool off
his career began to ~ (a singer)
activity: temperature / verb
cool (feeling)
maintain their cool
they need to ~ (a team)
feeling, emotion & effect: temperature
cool down (verb)
cool down
I got a postponement, it will give things a chance to ~
♦ “Let me take my own advice and cool the temperature in the room a
little bit.” (An upset Michael Van Der Veen at the impeachment trial in
2021. He paused, sighed, and then continued in a less emotional tone of
voice.)
feeling, emotion & effect: temperature / verb
coolheaded (and cool-headed)
coolheaded killer
he is a ~
feeling, emotion & effect: head / temperature
character & personality: head / temperature
coolly (adverb)
coolly
she looked at me ~
feeling, emotion & effect: temperature
cool off (verb)
cooled off
he regrets what he did now that he has ~
feeling, emotion & effect: temperature / verb
cooped up
cooped up in the White House
an active man, he felt ~ (President Grant)
cooped up (in his study) since six o’clock
he’s been ~ this morning
cooped up indoors
he loved the outdoor life and hated being ~
isolation & remoteness: bird
copybook (noun)
copybook case
it was a ~ of child abuse (born with cleft palate)
script: school & education
copycat (noun)
copycat of a terrorist attack
the shooting was initially feared to be a ~
copycat acts
officials feared publicity would trigger ~
copycat films
The Omen (1976) inspired sequels and ~
copycat threats
students charged in rash of ~ after Oxford High shooting
♦ Merriam-Webster identifies the first known use as 1896. Others identify
first use as 1887. The idea of a copycat crime seems to come from the
1960s and seems to have achieved acceptance by the 1980s.
repetition: cat
core (basis)
at its core
~, this issue all boils down to money
bases: center & periphery
corkscrew (verb)
corkscrewed above the airport
he took off and ~ until we reached 8,000 feet (plane)
direction / movement: shape / verb
Page 254 of 1574
corkscrew (shape)
corkscrew ascents and descents
~ to evade fire (Iraqi Airways)
direction: shape
corner (spring is just around the
corner)
Halloween is around the corner
~ and guess what that means
victory is around the corner
officials insist ~ (war)
spring is just around the corner
~ and I can’t wait
just around the corner
planting season is ~
Christmas is ~
proximity: corner / distance
future / time: corner / distance
corner (in remote corners, etc.)
in the corners of the internet
the theories began ~ and made it into mainstream news
in the dark corners of cyberspace
~ (child pornography)
in some corners of the humanities
there is resistance to such analysis ~
in the (more) paranoid corners of the Internet
he posted messages ~
in many corners of the West
uranium mining boomed ~
in some corners of the book world
there is opposition ~
area: center & periphery / corner
corner (other)
from all corners of the (political) spectrum
he received criticism ~
shines light into some of the darkest corners
the book ~ of M15
ventured into remote corners
he ~ (a photographer)
area: center & periphery / corner
corner (turn the corner)
turned the corner
we have ~ (economic upturn after downturn)
this month he ~, and made a profit (businessman)
so has America finally ~ (economic downturn)
turned a corner
United fans hoped their club had ~ (loss after 3 wins)
turn the corner on unemployment
we are beginning to ~
beginning to turn the corner
we are ~ on unemployment
progress & lack of progress: corner / verb
development: corner / verb
corner (in a tight corner, etc.)
tightest corner
United somehow got out of the ~ in Paris (soccer win)
backed ourselves into a corner
we've sort of ~ (war strategy)
boxed himself into a corner
he has ~ on tax increases (a politician)
painted himself into a corner
he has ~ (world leader)
movement: corner
constraint & lack of constraint / situation: boxing /
container / corner / movement
corner (in one's corner)
in my corner
she supports me, she's ~
allegiance, support & betrayal: boxing / corner
corner (cut corners)
cut corners
oil companies ~ to maximize profits
cut any corners
in this business we don’t ~ (helicopter tours)
difficulty, easiness & effort: corner / distance / journeys &
trips
corner (corner cases, etc.)
edge and corner
it doesn’t take long to find ~ cases (grammar rules)
division & connection: boundary
cornered (adjective)
felt cornered
the boss ~ and that person ended up quitting (pay dispute)
♦ “If you bait a cornered dog, he will bite.”
pursuit, capture & escape: hunting
cornerstone (noun)
cornerstone of the collection
the painting will be the ~ (a new museum)
cornerstones of the economy
blue-chip companies, once considered ~… (recession)
Page 255 of 1574
cornerstone of identity
Egyptians increasingly emphasize Islam as the ~
cornerstone of (US) policy
Egypt is the ~ in the Middle East
cornerstones of terrorism
unemployment creates one of the ~ (Prince Talal)
cornerstone of (addiction) treatment
Alcoholics Anonymous remains the ~ in the US
cornerstone of Roma life
child marriage is a ~ (tradition)
cornerstone of academic culture
peer review is a ~ (publishing)
cornerstone of the scientific method
replication is a ~
emphasize Islam as the cornerstone
Egyptians increasingly ~ of identity
bases: infrastructure
cornucopia (variety)
cornucopia of (political) books
this fall’s ~ features two kinds...
cornucopia of candidates
the debates have featured a ~ (Democratic politics / 2020)
cornucopia of goods
a ~ flooded the American marketplace (post-WWII)
cornucopia of (educational) opportunities
colleges have traditionally offered a ~ (in good times)
cornucopia of shit
it’s a ~ basically (dialogue from Words On Bathroom Walls)
make a cornucopia
climate change could ~ out of frigid, unproductive land
♦ From cornu, Latin for horn, and copia, plenty: the horn of plenty. Based
on a Greek myth involving the goat Althea who nursed the infant Zeus.
alternatives & choices / amount: allusion / food & drink
group, set & collection: allusion / food & drink
sufficiency, insufficiency & excess: allusion / food & drink
coronation (noun)
veritable coronation
the Chicago convention was a ~ of Grant (Republicans)
achievement, recognition & praise: royalty
corral (verb)
corralled her family
she ~ (husband and 8 kids / and fled house / war)
corral multiple fires
fire crews rushed to ~
corral him
Georgia has to find a way to ~ (Bryce Young / football)
corral the far left
can she ~ in her party (politics)
corral all 50 members
he is still trying to ~ to agree... (politics)
corral their models
scientists need real-world data to ~ (for realistic outcomes)
corrals (a range of) voices
Women on Food, a book that ~ (Charlotte Druckman)
corral wildfire
winds frustrate effort to ~ near lake Tahoe
corralled politicians, executives, and officials
for nearly six months, she ~ (Deborah Birx / pandemic)
paywalls corral readers
~ like cattle into the subscriber pen
conflict / control & lack of control: animal / cows & cattle /
horse / verb
corralled
corralled in left field
the speedy cat was ~
♦ “The speedy cat evaded the grounds crew before being corralled in left
field.” (Yankees vs. Baltimore Orioles at Yankee Stadium.)
control & lack of control: animal / cows & cattle / horse
corridor (route)
commuter corridors
the ~ have become the “covid corridor” (East Coast)
“covid corridor”
the commuter corridors have become the ~ (East Coast)
drug corridor
Interstate 44 is a ~ (Missouri)
migration corridor
the Bering land bridge served as a ~ for people
travel corridor
the region is a ~ for illegal immigrants
I-95 corridor
heroin travels down the ~ to secondary markets (from NYC)
route: infrastructure
transmission: infrastructure / route
corridor (area)
wildlife corridor
nature preserves provide a ~ for birds and animals
high-technology corridor
the metro services Northern Virginia's ~
commercial corridor
the Metro revitalized the sagging ~ between…
green corridor
in places the ~ is only 50 feet wide (along river)
Page 256 of 1574
strategic corridor
Georgia is a ~ for Western oil companies
31-mile corridor
deforestation occurs in a ~ on either side of roads
tiny corridor
oil exports are squeezed through this ~ (Strait of Hormuz)
area: shape
corridor (Siliguri Corridor, etc.)
Gansu Corridor
the ~ between Suchow and Chang ‘an (Xi’an / Silk Road)
“Lachin corridor”
the ~ links Stepanakert to Armenia
Siliguri Corridor
the ~ is also known as the Chickens Neck
National Heritage Corridor
the Blackstone River Valley ~
Wakhan Corridor
the ~ (Afghanistan)
proper name: infrastructure
corridor (corridors of power)
corridors of power
ordinary Americans are kept out of the ~ (politics)
Australia’s corridors of power
allegations of a toxic work culture in ~
in the corridors of power
the religious right is flexing its muscles ~
the fine line between persuasion and intimidation ~ (politics)
access to the corridors of power
the reporter has unrivalled ~ (Bob Woodward)
he loved his ~ (a media person)
gain admittance to the corridors of power
once women ~
kept out of the corridors of power
ordinary Americans are ~
power: infrastructure / sign, signal, symbol
corrosive (adjective)
corrosive for democracy
rich contributors are ~ (money)
corrosive effect
corruption was perhaps the most ~ of communism
corrosive role
the ~ of money in politics (rich special-interest groups)
feeling, emotion & effect: chemistry / materials &
substances / sensation
corrupting
corrupting force
the tabloids portrayed her as a ~
corruption: health & medicine
corruption (noun)
moral corruption
TV and radio promote ~
corruption: health & medicine
coruscating (adjective)
coruscating observations
he had room to make his ~ (TV)
superlative: light & dark
cost (verb)
cost them
the editor knew all along it would ~ (controversy)
cost me my hand
one tiny wound ~ (a firefighter)
cost him his job
the revelation ~ (child porn on computer)
his failure to deliver on his promise ~ (a coach)
costs you nothing
it ~ but your time (a free Internet program)
costing teachers their jobs
budget cuts are now ~
cost him his life
his drug habit very nearly ~ (a musician)
his diligence ~ (a police officer)
cost the climbers a shot
helping the other group ~ at the summit
cost him his (boxing) title
his refusal to serve ~ (Muhammad Ali)
cost Unsoeld his toes
that night ~ (high-altitude bivouac)
cost the state thousands of jobs
his economic policies have ~
cost you an arm and a leg
this vacation getaway won't ~
cost the team big time
the mistake ~
cost the lives
the civil war ~ of 100,000 Maya Indians (Guatemala)
cost her votes
the proposal could ~ in a general election (politics)
cost & benefit: money / verb
Page 257 of 1574
cost (at a cost)
at the cost of his life
Sfc. Ashley's bravery ~ was in the highest traditions of...
at enormous cost
gold is wrung from the earth ~
even at the cost
they are desperate to flee their country ~ of their lives
cost & benefit / judgment: money
cost (at all costs, etc.)
at all costs
Czech hedgehogs symbolized “defense ~” in the USSR
protect (passengers) at all costs
air marshals must ~
hold Stalingrad at any cost
we are to ~, Comrade Stalin knows best
commitment & determination / cost & benefit / resistance,
opposition & defeat: money
cost (cost time, etc.)
cost drivers 15 minutes
construction delays on I-15 ~
time: money
cost (other)
costs of Vietnam
the ~ remain with us (troubled vets, sons, etc.)
cost of his life
absorbing the grenade blast at the ~
cost of war
let us not forget the terrible ~
costs of war
the ~ and the price of peace (soldiers)
costs of gambling
the hidden ~ (divorce, etc.)
cost to having
there is a ~ an overload of choice
hidden costs
the ~ of gambling (divorce, etc.)
environmental cost
war has not only a human cost, but a tragic ~ as well
gold is wrung from the earth at enormous ~
human cost
war has not only a ~, but a tragic environmental cost
political cost
both leaders are paying a ~ at home for… (foreign policy)
reputational cost
the wars have carried a ~ (civilian casualties)
tragic (environmental) cost
war's ~
financial and human cost
the ~ was enormous (the Ugandan Railway)
cost & benefit / judgment: money
costly (adjective)
costly
you have laid so ~ a sacrifice… (Lincoln)
politically costly
it's ~ to criticize Jews (US elections)
cost & benefit: money
couch (casting couch)
casting couch
Hollywood’s seedy underbelly, the ~
spoke out against the casting couch
she ~ (Maureen O’Hara)
sex: euphemism
cough up (verb)
cough up more money
the US wants its allies to ~ (for world defense)
giving, receiving, bringing & returning: bodily reaction
countdown (noun)
countdown
the ~ starts now (ad for big game in future)
timeliness & lack of timeliness: clock / number
counted out (boxing)
counted out
he was ~, but... (Trump wins Republican primary)
resistance, opposition & defeat / starting, going, continuing
& ending: boxing / sports & games
counterattack (verb)
cold counterattacked
then the ~... (Antarctica temperatures fall)
resistance, opposition & defeat: military / verb
counterattack (noun)
counterattack
the Embassy began a ~
the besieged politicians have started a ~ (politics)
preparing a counterattack
the gas industry was ~
conflict / resistance, opposition & defeat: military
counterbalance (verb)
counterbalance his dependence
Page 258 of 1574
he is trying to ~ on the US by dealing with China
counterbalance Western media
Al Jazeera was founded to ~
equilibrium & stability: scale / verb
amelioration & renewal: equilibrium & stability / scale /
verb
counterbalance (noun)
counterbalance to industry
the FDA is the ~
counterbalance to the presidency
the Supreme Court is a ~
counterbalance to the US press
Al Jazeera is an excellent ~
counterbalance to the liberal Western order
he wants to establish Russia as a ~ (Putin)
counterbalance to corporate power
unions are a ~
generational counterbalance
the mothers of nominees provided ~ (Academy Awards)
liberal counterbalance
she will serve as a ~ to the conservative wing
amelioration & renewal: equilibrium & stability / scale
equilibrium & stability: scale
counterweight (noun)
counterweight
the international media is biased, there must be a ~
counterweight against Britain and France
he needed a ~ (Bismarck at the Berlin Conference)
counterweight to Iran
US forces remain as a ~ (on the Arabian Peninsula)
political counterweight
he was there to serve this ~ function (Joe Biden)
amelioration & renewal: equilibrium & stability / scale
equilibrium & stability: scale
count on (count on me, etc.)
count on me
you can always ~
♦ “You can always count on me, for sure, that’s what friends are for.”
(Dionne Warwick with Gladys Knight, Stevie Wonder, and Elton John.
137 million views and counting.)
♦ “A friend in need is a friend indeed.” (This means, “A friend who helps
you when you are in great need is a friend indeed. For example, if you
need money. But the true friend is the one who will die for you.)
allegiance, support & betrayal: number / verb
coup (power)
coup
I was fired, it was basically a ~ by... (political job)
the impeachment process is a ~ (President Trump)
boardroom coup
the son deposed his father in a ~ (Budweiser beer)
parliamentary coup
the opposition leaders are calling this a ~ (Venezuela)
dismissal, removal & resignation / power: military
coup (achievement)
publicity coup
Kipchoge’s achievement is a ~ for Ineos (marathon)
diplomatic coup
the conference was a ~ for Iran
great coup
workers hailed the decision as a ~ (unionization)
pulled off a (massive) coup
the Clippers ~, by signing... (the best free agent / NBA)
achievement, recognition & praise / success & failure:
military / violence
coup de grace (deathblow)
coup de grace
facing down Biden was the ~ on her evening (politics)
courtroom coup de grace
his political adversaries were hoping for a ~ (report)
destruction: death & life / violence / weapon
coupled
coupled with love
high expectations ~ is a gift (child-rearing)
division & connection: tools & technology
relationship: tools & technology
courage (groups)
courage not to go
it’s about ~ to the Vietnam War... (Ken Burns on Ali)
in awe of my courage
many said they were ~ to follow my dream (female blogger)
find the courage
they had to ~ to come forward (female gymnasts)
♦ “My children can have an example of what courage looks like in real
time, not in history.” (Dr. Carl L. Hart of Columbia University, author of
Drug Use for Grown-Ups, about being a regular heroin user.)
♦ A “crass exploitation play... I think this is just a play to pump up the
audience, the way lots of things are put on television to attract eyeballs—
not because of the validity but because of whatever the kind of gawker
factor is.” (Bob Costas on Caitlyn Jenner receiving the 2015 Arthur Ashe
Courage Award.)
♦ The mascot of the North Carolina Courage, currently based in Cary,
North Carolina, is a lioness, to “reflect the team as a group of
professional women.”
inclusion & exclusion: society
courageous (groups)
“courageous conversations”
Page 259 of 1574
the office hosted a series of ~ about race (education)
visible, courageous and present
LBGQT folks have been so ~
call courageous
she put on a performance I think it’s safe to ~ (Simon Biles)
inclusion & exclusion: society
courageously
courageously sharing
the NFL family is proud of Carl for ~ his truth (gay)
inclusion & exclusion: society
course (over the course / time)
over the course of the next month
Alabama will experience a steep increase in cases ~
over the course of a month
anxiety following a trauma that fades ~ isn’t depression
time: journeys & trips / movement
course (run its course, etc.)
run its course
Carley’s relationship with Russ had ~
starting, going, continuing & ending: movement / route /
verb / walking, running & jumping
course (on course)
on course for victory
they looked ~ when... (sports)
direction: journeys & trips
course (on a collision course)
on a collision course
the two countries are ~
on a collision course
people and the natural world are ~
on a collision course with his boss
he was ~ (Navy top brass)
on a collision course with the clerics
the royal family is ~ (Saudi)
on a collision course for the finals
they are ~ (two teams)
conflict: crashes & collisions
course (change course, etc.)
course correction
the country is heading in the wrong direction, we need a ~
we can't move forward without a ~ (bribery scandal)
this could create a real ~ in the tech industry (fraud trial)
fresh course
helping convicted felons chart a ~
changed the course
their testimony has ~ of the investigation (police)
chart a (fresh) course
helping convicted felons ~
charted a new course
he has ~ and tacked to the center (politician)
corrected course
the agency has ~ on asylum detentions
change course
he didn't hesitate to ~ (a politician)
we are skeptical that Iran will ~ (diplomacy)
direction: boat / journeys & trips / map / verb
starting, going, continuing & ending: boat / journeys & trips
/ map / verb
course (stay the course)
stay the course
he vowed to ~ (general leading war)
it is unacceptable to ~ (pandemic response)
stays the course
once he makes up his mind, he ~ (businessman)
direction: boat / journeys & trips / map / verb
starting, going, continuing & ending: boat / journeys & trips
/ map / verb
course (reverse course)
change course
he was forced to ~ (government policy)
reversed course
Iran ~ and reopened its nuclear labs
the President ~ and grounded the plane (Boeing problem)
reversal: direction / boat / journeys & trips / map / verb
direction: boat / journeys & trips / map / verb
starting, going, continuing & ending: boat / journeys & trips
/ map / verb
course (development)
course of the conflict
we cannot predict the length or the ~ (military)
course of the disease
we can sometimes slow the ~
the challenge is to identify patients earlier in the ~
course of HIV infection
the ~ is characterized primarily by latency
course of the war
during the ~ (Gulf War)
disease course
we are here to help them through the ~
relentless course
as the epidemic follows its ~ (AIDS)
length or the course
Page 260 of 1574
we cannot predict the ~ of the conflict (military)
follow its (relentless) course
if we sit back and let the epidemic ~…
run its course
the common cold will ~ within seven days
slow the course
we can sometimes ~ of the disease
development: journeys & trips / route
course (course of action, etc.)
course of action
we thought the best ~ was to…
I could think of no other ~
is this the right ~ (government policy)
similar course
see if other schools should follow a ~ (sex ed)
safest and wisest course
the ~ to follow (alcohol and pregnancy)
follow a (similar) course
see if other schools should ~ (same-sex classes)
took the (politically risky) course
he ~ of prosecuting a member of government
direction: journeys & trips
course (course of justice, etc.)
course of justice
he was charged with perverting the ~
take its course
the law must ~
operation: journeys & trips
court (verb)
courting Hispanics with (Spanish) advertising
the company is ~
courting danger with his rhetoric
he is ~ (racist stereotypes)
courting rebellion by pushing ahead
he is ~ with his plan (political party)
courted adventure
when she was young she ~ (hitchhiking, etc.)
court controversy
he has been known to ~ (Joe Rogan)
court (resource-rich) countries
China, India ~ like Nigeria and Kazakhstan
courted death
he ~ with his use of drugs and wild lifestyle
courting (economic) disaster
we are ~
courting its favor
both Democrats and Republicans are ~ (N.R.A.)
courting veterans
for-profit colleges are ~
court the Black vote
Democratic politicians ~ and then fail to follow through
courting (younger) voters
the party is ~ (politics)
courted and won
he ~ popular acceptance (a musician)
actively courted
they ~ publicity (two feuding pop stars)
aggressively courting
he has been ~ endorsements (running for office)
assiduously courted
he has ~ mainstream support (a politician)
feverishly courting
she has been ~ black voters
publicly courting
the president has been ~ him (a politician)
quietly courting
he has been ~ contributors (for a political run)
attraction & repulsion / pursuit, capture & escape: love,
courtship & marriage / verb
court (in the court)
in the world court
they have been convicted ~ of public opinion (doping)
in the (world) court of public opinion
they have been convicted ~ athletes / doping)
tried in the court
he has been ~ of public opinion
judgment: justice
court (other)
court of public opinion
the ~ condemned him
judgment: justice
court (the ball is in someone’s court)
ball is in Russia’s court
(see ball (the ball is in somebody’s court)
action, inaction & delay / confronting, dealing with &
ignoring things / position, policy & negotiation /
responsibility / social interaction: ball / sports & games
courthouse (Devil's Courthouse, etc.)
Devil's Courthouse
the first person to climb ~ (a rock outcropping)
Page 261 of 1574
Majlis al Jinn
the ~ (the assembly of the devils, a cave in Oman)
proper name: infrastructure
courtship (noun)
courtship of Africa
both India and China have stepped up their ~
stepped up their courtship
both India and China have ~ of Africa
attraction & repulsion: love, courtship & marriage
pursuit, capture & escape: love, courtship & marriage
cousin (relationship)
cousin
open-wheel racing and its stock-car ~, NASCAR
cousin of Ebola
Lassa fever is sometimes described as a ~
cousin of estrogen
BPA is a chemical ~
cousin to smallpox
Vaccinia, a ~ which can cause illness
cousin of Turkish
Uighur is a ~, but it’s an Arabic script (the language)
dictionary's cousin
it's like the ~ (the thesaurus)
American cousins
our ~ speak the wrong kind of English (Brits)
British cousins
tell our ~ I’ll meet them in Eindhoven (WWII)
Nepali cousin
K2 and its ~, Mount Everest
potato cousins
incredible ~ still survive in the Andes (wild potatoes)
chemical cousin
BPA is a ~ of estrogen
EPO and its ~s became rampant in sports
closest cousin
denial is associated with its ~, addiction
distant cousin
it’s a ~ of true cinnamon (bark of cassia tree)
larger cousin
the mudpuppy looks a lot like its ~, the Eastern Hellbender
older cousin
archaeology and its far ~, tomb robbing
ugly cousin
sarcasm is anger's ~
xenophobic cousin
the lab-leak hypothesis is a ~ to anti-vaxxism and ...
♦ “The mudpuppy is relatively rare and looks a lot like its larger cousin,
the Eastern hellbender. (WNC anglers: Seen any mudpuppies lately?” by
Karen Chavez, Asheville Citizen-Times, USA TODAY Network, Sunday,
December 27, 2020. Hellbenders are also known as “snot otters” and
“water dogs.”)
person / relationship: family
cover (under cover)
under cover of darkness
the attacks began ~
the convoys move both in daylight and ~ (Iraq)
living under cover
Al-Khilewi, who was granted asylum, is now ~
concealment & lack of concealment: cloth
covered up
covered up
his pedophilia had been known for years but ~ (priest)
concealment & lack of concealment: cloth
subterfuge: cloth
cover up (verb)
cover up his crime
he smashed his own head and face to ~
covers up violations
Saudi Arabia ~ of human rights abuses
covered up (security) shortcomings
the FAA ~ for years (airports)
covered up (widespread) doping
officials ~ by... (sports)
cover up the killing
their attempts to ~ were unsuccessful (Saudi police)
covered up for the (cheerleader) coach
cops allege the school's principal ~
covered up for him
when they finally did land in court, she ~ (abuse)
cover up for "honor killings"
deaths are ascribed to suicide in order to ~
covered it up
the Army ~ (contamination from weapons depot)
tried to cover up
they ~ what they had done... (tribal vengeance)
he also ~ the crime... (tribal vengeance)
concealment & lack of concealment: cloth / verb
subterfuge: cloth / verb
coverup (noun)
cover-up
a ~ to conceal the affair
cover-ups and corruption
investigations marred by official ~ (Mexico)
Page 262 of 1574
government coverup
charges of a ~
failed cover-up
prison terms for colluding in the ~ (mine disaster / China)
politically motivated cover-up
a ~
official coverups
investigations marred by ~ and corruption (Mexico)
allegations of a cover-up
officials will investigate the ~ (China / storm)
charges of a (government) coverup
they have been ~
mystery and cover-up
dealing with the UFO ~
denied a cover-up
local officials have ~ (no typhoon warning)
concealment & lack of concealment: cloth
subterfuge: cloth
covey (group)
covey of bureaucrats
what’s needed is a ~ to better govern the country
covey of (industry) tycoons
a ~ and their wives assembled
group, set & collection: animal / bird
cow (cash cow)
cash cow for universities
online education is a ~
cash cow for publishers
textbooks are the last ~
cash cow of (American) ballet
the Nutcracker is the ~
Boeing’s (long term) cash cow
~ is the 737
company's cash cow
the drug is the ~
Microsoft's cash cow
Windows is ~
as a cash cow
he needed Clay ~ and recruitment vehicle (boxer)
♦ “It’s bye bye cash cow.” (A reference to a boxing promoter and his
fighter’s shock defeat.)
♦ Asa W. Morris in California owned the legendary Tilly Alcartra, known
as “the Queen of Holsteins” for her milk production. Was she a victim of
an anthrax outbreak, destroyed and buried along with thousands of
others to prevent the spread of that disease?
worth & lack of worth: animal / cows & cattle
cowboy (person)
Cocaine Cowboys
the cartels’ ~ turned the market (1970s Florida)
person: animal / cows & cattle / horse
behavior / character & personality / control & lack of
control: history / person
cower (verb)
cower in the face of (NCAA) abuses
universities ~ (sports)
cowered before demands
the publishing industry has ~ to cancel books
♦ If a dog can’t bite, it licks. (An insult.)
dominance & submission: standing, sitting & lying / verb
courage & lack of courage: bodily reaction / verb
coy (adjective)
coy about the idea
China has been ~ (of an East Asia Community)
coy about the year
she is ~ of her birth
coy on the subject
he has been ~ (about retiring)
a bit coy
he's a ~ about how much he can raise (a politician)
surprisingly coy
politicians can be ~ about asking direct questions
being coy
she is not ~ about wanting to win (a politician)
playing coy
many possible candidates are ~ about running
remaining coy
most potential candidates are ~ for now (presidency)
eagerness & reluctance: love, courtship & marriage
coyote (predation)
gangs of "coyotes"
~ smuggle people in from Mexico
character & personality: animal / person / predation
cozy (adjective)
cozy with Boeing
the FAA was too ~
cozy relationship
he has a ~ with the prince
too cozy
the agency was ~ with the company
feeling, emotion & effect: proximity / temperature
relationship: proximity / temperature
Page 263 of 1574
social interaction: proximity / temperature
crab (crab in a bucket, etc.)
crabs in a barrel
oh, ~, I say, to hell with them all (St. Simons Island)
crab mentality
~ is, “If I can’t have it neither can you”
crab-basket quarrels
he had managed to avoid the ~ and ignore the slights
crab bucket syndrome
when others hold you back is the ~
♦ Filipinos notice this behavior in the Philippines. Crabs in a bucket or pot
instinctively grab at things above them. Thus, no crabs can climb out of a
pot.
behavior / sanctioning, authority & non-conformity /
unanimity & consensus: animal
crack (attempt)
crack at it
we'll take another ~
attempt: sound
crack (verb)
cracked
their relationship ~ under the pressure
failure, accident & impairment: materials & substances /
verb
crack (verb / emotion)
cracked
I ~ under the pressure
feeling, emotion & effect: materials & substances / verb
crack (division)
crack
the ~s could widen into a chasm (politics)
crack in the coalition
the Arab League statement is a worrying ~ (Libya)
cracks in (military) solidarity
there have been few ~ (Venezuela political unrest)
division & connection: ground, terrain & land
crack (flaw)
cracks
the ~ were beginning to show (troubled corporation)
cracks in Bierenbaum’s façade
~ started to appear (surgeon convicted of murder)
flaws & lack of flaws: materials & substances
crack (fall through the cracks, etc.)
dropped through the cracks
Cho had ~ of the university bureaucracy
dropped through the cracks
Cho had ~ of the university bureaucracy
fell through the cracks
she ~ (foster system)
slipped through the cracks
he has ~ (terrorist)
many sex sites have ~ (Internet)
failure, accident & impairment: ground, terrain & land /
verb
crackdown (noun)
crackdown on corruption
the government has launched a ~
crackdown against (unlicensed) Internet Cafes
authorities kicked off a nationwide ~ (China)
draconian crackdown
he has presided over the most ~ on leaks in US history
coercion & motivation: violence / whip
punishment & recrimination: violence / whip
oppression: violence / whip
crack down (verb)
cracked down on the opposition
the government has ~
cracking down on immigration
they are ~
cracking down on both men
judges are ~ (investigation)
coercion & motivation / oppression / punishment &
recrimination: verb / violence / whip
cradle (strangled in the cradle, etc.)
kill any (climate-change) bill in its cradle
he will ~ if he has a chance (legislator)
strangled in its cradle
Bolshevism must be ~ (Winston Churchill on Russia)
strangle the experiment in its cradle
if nobody watches, it will ~ (TV show)
curtailment / destruction: baby
cradle (cradle of Islam, etc.)
coronavirus cradle
Wuhan, the ~, has partially reopened
“Cradle of (U.S. Navy) Aviation”
Pensacola is known as the ~
cradle of Islam
Saudi Arabia is the ~
cradle of civilization
Page 264 of 1574
the Caucasus was a ~
cradle of (ancient) civilizations
the plateau is a ~
cradle of (Chinese) civilization
Hubei and Henan provinces, the ~
the Yellow River is known as the ~
cradle of (Serbian) civilization
Serbs claim Kosovo as the ~
cradle of independence
Dolores Hidalgo is known as the ~ (Mexico)
epithet: baby
origin: baby / birth / epithet / sign, signal, symbol
cradle (symbol)
cradle-to-grave
the ~ work force
from the cradle to the grave
she gave advice on problems people face ~
death & life: sign, signal, symbol
craft (ringcraft, etc.)
icecraft
the subtle science of snow and ~ (Sir Edmund Hillary)
junglecraft
he was very adapted at ~ (a Tamil Nadu bandit)
ringcraft
the ~, the intelligence, the mentality... (a boxer)
stagecraft
he is vigilant about the ~ of statecraft (SecDef)
spellcraft
her rigor and ~ (Karina Longworth / podcaster)
spycraft
technology is redefining ~ for a new era
tradecraft
some of the ~ was damn sloppy (CIA)
witchcraft
villagers said it was ~ (Prey Rognieng / Cambodia)
♦ “The ringcraft, the intelligence, the mentality, just think about it.”
(Oleksandr Usyk’s performance against Anthony Joshua.)
ability & lack of ability: affix
crank up (verb)
cranked up the pressure on the manager
a defeat would have ~ (soccer)
increase & decrease: mechanism / verb
crap (noun)
dog whistle crap
he called concerns about Afghan refugees “~”
♦ ”He called worries about Afghan refugees ‘dog whistle crap.’” (Gov.
Tony Evers of Wisconsin, about the Afghan refugees at Fort McCoy,
after 2 refugees were charged with crimes.)
worth & lack of worth: waste
crash (crash and burn)
crash and burn
so what role did he play in making it all ~ (politics)
crashed and burned
you know the Democratic Party has ~ when...
destruction: crashes & collisions / fire / flying & falling /
plane / verb
crash (car crash)
car crash of an interview
this was a ~ (sexual abuse)
walked away from more car crashes
he has ~ than any other sitting president
destruction: crashes & collisions
failure, accident & impairment: crashes & collisions
crash (crash down)
came crashing down
she was the youngest female billionaire before it all ~
his empire ~ (a company)
destruction: direction / infrastructure / ruins / verb
crash (crash course, etc.)
crash course
an eight-day ~
he took a ~ in genetics
crash diet
~s can be dangerous
haste: crashes & collisions
crash (population crash, etc.)
crash and bleed-out
what they call the ~ (Ebola virus)
computer crash
the data disappeared after 2 ~s (voting records)
population crash
a ~, part of the natural cycle
likely to cause an unprecedented ~
stock-market crash
the ~
ecological crash
you're going to see an ~ (marmots / Mongolia)
failure, accident & impairment: crashes & collisions
functioning: crashes & collisions
Page 265 of 1574
crash-land (verb)
crash-landed on (hard) facts
his theory ~ and common sense
failure, accident & impairment: crashes & collisions / plane
/ verb
crater (verb)
cratered
demand and prices have ~ (oil)
cratered oil prices
massive supply with almost no demand ~ (pandemic)
travel cratered
global ~ during the pandemic
decline: direction / flying & falling / plane / verb
increase & decrease: number
crave (fans crave the bout, etc.)
craved it
the media wanted it, fans ~ (a boxing matchup)
crave stories, memories, (behind-the-scenes) morsels
fans crave ~ (podcasts by athletes)
enthusiasm: addiction / food & drink / health & medicine /
verb
crave (verb)
so craves
the legacy he ~ will suffer (sports doping)
craved fame
he ~
enthusiasm / wants, needs, hopes & goals: addiction /
food & drink / health & medicine / verb
crawl (activity)
crawling with reporters
our hotel was ~
activity: animal / insect / verb
crawl (time can crawl, etc.)
crawl
boredom makes time ~, interest makes it race
minutes crawled by
the ~
speed: movement / verb / walking, running & jumping
movement: speed / verb / walking, running & jumping
time: movement / speed / verb / walking, running &
jumping
crawl (skin can crawl, etc.)
crawling
my skin is ~ (disgust)
feeling, emotion & effect: skin, muscle, nerves & bone /
verb
crawl (noun)
crawl to (Aug.12) peak
Perseid meteor shower begins slow ~
crawl phase
having accomplished the ~ (military training)
crawl, walk, run (m)
instruction should follow a ~ sequence (military)
news crawl
run a ~ across the bottom of the screen (TV)
slow crawl
Perseid meteor shower begins ~ to Aug. 12 peak
slowed to a crawl
the market for initial public offerings has ~
the storm’s movement has ~
slow to a crawl
the ambush was set where the convoy had to ~
brought to a crawl
traffic was ~ in Cincinnati (snow and ice)
movement / speed: walking, running & jumping
craze (noun)
craze of the 80's
the cocaine ~
craze in the 1920s
tree sitting was a national ~, like phone-booth stuffing
craze in Japan
platform shoes are the ~
craze in clothes, music, illegal drugs
the latest teen ~
craze for (sudoku) puzzles
the worldwide ~
cocaine craze
the ~ of the 80's
crossword craze
the First World War was the start of the ~
dance craze
the mambo fueled a brief but intense American ~ (1940s)
fitness craze
cash in on the ~
teen craze
the latest ~ in clothes, music, illegal drugs
cowboy craze
the '80s ~ (urban cowboys)
snake meat craze
snakes are disappearing due to the nationwide ~ (China)
Page 266 of 1574
tail-fin craze
the designer behind the ~ (cars)
extreme sports craze
encouraged by the ~
Internet craze
the ~ is causing distortions
worldwide craze
the ~ for sudoku puzzles
skateboarding craze
a few years later the ~ was over
current craze
the ~ is tread and shred (exercising)
international craze
its triumph as a full-blown ~ in the 60's (folk music)
latest craze
the ~ is… (sports)
national craze
tree sitting was a ~ in the 1920s, like phone booth stuffing
new craze
platform shoes are the ~ in Japan
behavior / enthusiasm: mental health
crazed (sex-crazed)
sex-crazed
college students are often portrayed as ~
sex: mental health
crazed (crazed fans, etc.)
crazed fan
~s scoured the Web ("Blair Witch Project")
cricket-crazed
the ~ countries of the former British Empire
media-crazed
the ~ public…
soccer-crazed
the World Cup is a huge even in ~ countries
seafood-crazed
in this ~ country, tuna is king (Japan)
behavior / enthusiasm: mental health
crazy (behavior)
crazy
you must be ~…
are you ~ or what…
crazy to do
you have to be a little ~ it (ice canoeing / Quebec City)
crazy boss
coping with a ~
crazy and hostile
Boston Celtic fans are ~ (NBA)
crazy and wild
it was ~ (wedding in non-traditional location)
a little crazy
you have to be ~ to do it (ice canoeing / Quebec City)
too crazy
his ideas were rejected as ~ by the grant process (a scientist)
stupid, crazy or not cool
"gay" as an adjective to describe anybody ~
wild and crazy
he was ~, young and dumb
wild and crazy
the NFL has its ~ side
act crazy
scream and run or ~ (date-rape-prevention strategies)
acting crazy
you got so many kids out here ~ (South LA gangs)
drive me crazy
I need a lover who won't ~
drive you crazy
I like to tease you and ~
driving me crazy
the itch is ~
rejected as (too) crazy
his ideas were ~ by the grant process (a scientist)
behavior: mental health
control & lack of control: mental health
crazy (enthusiasm)
crazy about that dog
she's ~ (a woman and a pit bull)
crazy about her
I'm ~ (man about his female friend)
crazy about hunting
he was ~ and loved to gather trophies
Internet-crazy (m)
~ Americans
boy crazy
girls may become "~" (preadolescence)
goes crazy
while the rest of the world ~ over the World Cup
♦ The word balletomane comes from the Russian for ballet and mania.
behavior / enthusiasm: mental health
crazy (and mad / adverb)
Crazy Delicious
he served as a judge on Netflix’s ~
Page 267 of 1574
mad funny
he called him a snake ~ bc (because)...
superlative: part of speech
crazy (as noun)
in between the crazy
~, she likes to... (biography of mom with 3 kids)
battled his crazy
AB’s talent has constantly ~ for years (NFL player)
understand crazy
you can’t ~ (Nashville suicide bomber)
character & personality: part of speech
cream (superlative)
cream of (Irish country music) artists
Daniel O’Donnell introduces the ~
France’s intellectual crème de la crème
~ have attended the elite Ecole Nationale d’Adminstration
superlative: food & drink
creature (creature of habit, etc.)
creature of his era
he was a ~ (Frank Kameny)
creature of habit
he is a ~
creature of Fleet Street
a former ~ … (a new TV interviewer)
creature of the theater
he was a ~ (George M. Cohan)
creatures of their own time
like Luther, they were ~ (slavery and Southern Baptists)
funny creatures
actors are ~ (“My dear boy, why don’t you try acting?”)
rare creature
she’s a Beethoven figure, a genius, a ~ (precocious student)
unique creature
he was a ~ in absolutely every department (Marlon Brando)
♦ “Crowds are very dynamic creatures and can change rapidly.” (A bullet
point on a Minneapolis Police training slide.)
character & personality / identity & nature / taxonomy &
classification: animal / creature
creature comfort
creature comforts
our campsite and all its ~ (Mt. Everest guided trip)
wants, needs, hopes & goals: creature
creep (mission creep, etc.)
mission creep
there’s a real ~ in what tech companies are doing
"torture creep"
interrogators get sneaky, thus ~
♦ In Churchill: Walking With Destiny, Andrew Roberts says that Churchill,
in 1940, “vigilantly guarded against mission-creep.” That phrase struck a
very wrong note with me. Luckily, Wikipedia has an entry: “The phrase
first appeared in 1993, in articles published in the Washington Post and
in the New York Times concerning the United Nations peacekeeping
mission during the Somali Civil War.” Roberts could have put the phrase
in quotation marks, or added “in what is today called X,” as he rightly did
when he used “groupthink” in another part of his book, but for some
reason he didn’t. This is an example of presentism.
increase & decrease: movement
starting, going, continuing & ending: movement
creep (verb)
creep westward
the storm continues to ~ at 1 mph (hurricane)
movement: verb / walking, running & jumping
speed: verb / walking, running & jumping
creep up (numbers)
crept up
gradually the thermometer ~ towards -20 degrees C.
increase & decrease: number
crescendo (noun)
crescendo of anti-abortion legislation
the Alabama law tops a ~
steady crescendo
the ~ of questions led him to release a statement...
amount & effect: music / sound
development: music / sound
cricket (sound)
clackers or "crickets"
whistles, bells, sirens, ~, and horns (military signals)
sound: insect
crickets (silence)
crickets
no blacks were involved, so ~
crickets chirping
hello, where are you on this violence, ~ (criticism)
crickets on the Supreme Court
but after the decision, it was essentially ~ (gun rights)
♦ The slang expression “crickets” has come to mean silence, based on
the sound of crickets in films to indicate dead silence.
♦ Bailey Olive: “In the last two days there has been a mass shooting in
Chicago and Philadelphia, too but they are, like this one, not one white
involved, so crickets.” / Bluejay to Bailey Olive: “Did you hear that from
voices in your head?” / bibleeexpert to Bailey Olive: “So crickets? Then
how did you find out about them?”
♦ “But after the landmark decision and an adjunct case two years later, it
was essentially crickets at the court on the subject of how far states may
go in regulating guns.” (Nina Totenberg, “High Court To Hear 1st Major
Gun Rights Case In More Than A Decade, NPR, Morning Edition, April
27, 2021.)
Page 268 of 1574
♦ “As Carole sat down at the grand piano... and curled her hands over
the keys, the noise receded to cricket-hearing silence.” (The great Carole
King. From Girls Like Us by Sheila Weller.)
sound: film / insect
cri de coeur
wake-up call, cri de coeur, call to arms
his book is a ~ (about language)
appeal: heart / sound / speech
sincerity, lack of sincerity & honesty: heart / sound /
speech
crime (fashion crime, etc.)
no crime
it's ~ to be selfish sometimes
it’s ~ for those who were right to feel a little superior
fashion crime
wearing socks with sandals is considered a ~
judgment: crime / justice
cringe (and cringe-worthy)
cringe
the writing is usually ~ (by non-specialists)
cringe comedy
~, without the laughs (a review of a movie)
cringe-worthy
the ~ beginnings of a relationship
the video was criticised as being tone deaf and ~
so cringe
this is ~ (Kahn pose in NYT mag photo)
laugh and cringe
what makes you ~ reveals your hidden biases
makes some cringe
a 9 /11 key chain ~ (9/11 Memorial’s store)
feeling, emotion & effect: bodily reaction / gesture
cripple (verb)
cripples networks
they sow malware that ~ (ransomware gangs)
crippled the city
23 inches of snow ~
cripple his presidency
Biden’s critics say this will ~ (Afghanistan withdrawal)
crippling our society
unemployment is ~
functioning: health & medicine / movement / verb
crippled
crippled by (economic and political) troubles
Zimbabwe remains ~
crippled reactor
the damage at the ~ is worse than thought
remains crippled
Zimbabwe ~ by economic and political troubles
functioning: health & medicine / movement
crippling
crippling blow
his death dealt a ~ to his network (a terrorist)
crippling fear
~s of loss and disaster (children of divorce)
crippling poverty
the ~ among mountain people (United Nations)
crippling, paralyzing (m)
I do not favor ~ sanctions (Russian President)
feeling, emotion & effect: health & medicine
crisis (mid-life crisis)
unpredictable mid-life crisis
democracy isn’t dying, but it’s having an ~
growth & development: death & life
Cromwellian (adjective)
Cromwellian air
his railings lent a ~ to his leadership (mixed swimming)
oppression: allusion / history
comparison & contrast: affix
crooked (adjective)
crooked
the election was ~
crooked books
crooked auditors certified the ~
crooked business
insurance is a ~
crooked cops
the force must root out ~
crooked dealer
~s take advantage of young soldiers (autos)
crooked employers
~ pay less, and make workers work more
crooked governors
two ~ in a row have been sent to prison (Illinois)
crooked politician
~s steal our money
straight and crooked
he knew the difference between ~ work (a farmer)
behavior / character & personality: direction
sincerity, lack of sincerity & honesty: direction
Page 269 of 1574
crop (noun)
crop of (American) offspring
the first postwar ~
good crop
we’ve got a ~ that’s just behind her (boxing prospects)
growth & development / product: farming & agriculture
crop up (verb)
cropped up in its Proton rockets
the Russians must fix problems that have ~
problem cropped up
the ~ just hours before liftoff (space shuttle)
questions crop up
legal ~, too
continually crop up
look for keywords that ~ in ads
appearance & disappearance: farming & agriculture / plant
/ prep, adv, adj, particle / verb
cross (a bridge can cross)
bridge crosses the river
a ~ there
fictive motion: verb
crossfire (noun)
rhetorical crossfire
the purpose of the bill has been lost in the ~
conflict: weapon
cross hair (in the cross hairs)
in the cross hairs
another Arab dictator is ~ (Bashar al-Assad of Syria)
he is ~ (a wanted terrorist)
in the crosshairs of a (Justice Department) lawsuit
Google is ~
in the crosshairs of the woke mob
I realize I’m ~ right now (NFL’s Aaron Rodgers)
in the crosshairs of the NCAA
it’s not the first time USC’s basketball program has been ~
in regulators' crosshairs
the firm is ~ (for fraud)
in the (trade war) crosshairs
the company is ~
in our crosshairs
he's ~ (a pedophile)
found himself in the crosshairs
he has ~ between the left and the right over… (economy)
end up in the crosshairs
I don’t want to ~ of somebody who wants to clean house
♦ In 2011 in the US, the figurative versus literal meaning of this word
caused a political controversy when the politician Gabby Giffords was
shot. The opposition had indicated her district on a map with a crosshairs icon. In 2019, Roger Stone apologized to Judge Amy Berman
Jackson for posting an Instagram photo of her next to a rifle scope’s
crosshair. In 2022, a court heard a case involving the original icon and
The New York Times. The USS Gabrielle Giffords is named after Gabby
Giffords, and her husband is Mark Kelly, astronaut. The original shooter
was mentally ill, with access to a gun.
♦ “Trump in the Crosshairs: Will the former President be prosecuted?” by
Jane Mayer, A Reporter at Large, The New Yorker, March 22, 2021.)
target: weapon
cross-pollination
cross-pollination
there’s so much ~, hyping each other (Black Hollywood)
cross-pollination of languages
the natural ~ where they intersect
growth & development / transmission: insect / plant
crossroad (Crossroads of the World, etc.)
Crossroads of the World
the ~ was packed with tourists and revelers (Times Square)
place: epithet
crossroad (at a crossroad)
at a crossroads
his career is ~
the South was ~ (Civil War)
South Sudan is ~ (elections for secession)
America is ~ (midterm elections)
at a political crossroads
he finds himself ~ (president)
at a crossroads of his presidency
he is ~
at the (strategic) crossroads of Europe and Asia
Adrianople, ~
stands at a crossroads
the US ~ (support or non-support for dictators)
♦ “We’re at a crossroad, and there is a right side.” (Wearing masks
during the COVID pandemic.)
alternatives & choices: journeys & trips
development / direction: journeys & trips
crossroad (other)
crossroads in his life
he'd reached a gloomy ~
crossroads moment
the government is at a ~ (crisis)
gloomy crossroads
he'd reached a ~ in his life
reached a (gloomy) crossroads
he'd ~ in his life
Page 270 of 1574
alternatives & choices / development / direction: journeys
& trips
crow (verb)
crowed that
he ~ he had forced the president to decide (politics)
crowing about its (online holiday) sales
the company was ~
♦ “Kahgahgee, the King of Ravens, / With his band of black marauders.”
(“The Song of Hiawatha.”)
speech: bird / verb
crown (superlative)
‘worst traffic’ crown
~ passes from L.A. to new city (New York-Newark)
jewels in the crown
they are the ~ of public education (elite NYC high schools)
contending for that crown
Don Bongino is ~ (king of right-wing media)
primacy, currency, decline & obsolescence / superlative:
royalty
crowned (verb)
crowned at the (party) convention
the eventual Democratic nominee will be ~ in July
sanctioning, authority & non-conformity royalty
crown jewel
crown jewel of their empire
the building is the ~ (a business)
crown jewel of the system
Banff is the ~ (Canadian National Park)
superlative / worth & lack of worth: royalty
crucible (noun)
crucible of anxiety
how to handle the ~ (college admissions)
crucible of power
Kandahar has been the main ~ in Afghanistan since…
crucible of suffering
in this ~ (Arctic exploration)
crucible of (free-market) thought
he got his degree from the University of Chicago, the ~
crucible of (Nobel Prize) Winners
the Institut Curie became a ~, producing 4 more
crucible for young actors
it was a noted ~ (the Pasadena Playhouse / Hoffman, etc.)
war's (hottest) crucible
the British were sent into the ~ (Sangin, Afghanistan)
environment: container / fire / manufacturing /
temperature
crucified
crucified by the media
she has been ~
♦ “In the old days, Yamamoto would have had to commit ritual
disembowelment.” / “No, he wouldn’t have been given the honor! He
would simply have been crucified!” (“The Emperor’s Code: Breach Of
Protocol Spurs Debate in Japan” by Lucy Craft, Nov. 13, 2013.)
accusation & criticism: religion / violence
punishment & recrimination: religion / violence
crucify (verb)
crucify him
the media will be quick to ~ when his form dips (soccer)
crucify me
they are going to ~ this season (on a reality show)
I feel like this town is gonna ~ (murder trial)
accusation & criticism: religion / verb / violence
punishment & recrimination: religion / verb / violence
crude (speech)
crude language
he used ~ to deride the investigation (politics)
he used unusually ~ for a public appearance (politician)
flaws & lack of flaws / speech: materials & substances
cruel (adjective)
cruel disease
it’s a ~, but it was especially cruel to him (AIDS)
cruel sea
they face the ~
cruel sport
it’s true, it’s a ~ (a boxing career)
Cruel Way
Everest the ~ by Joe Tasker (a book)
cruel and absurd
life is ~
unjust, cruel
an ~ world
character & personality / oppression: person
crumb (amount)
crumb of comfort
if the team were looking for a ~... (loss)
amount: food & drink
crumble (verb)
crumbled
their relationship has ~ (enmity)
in 1968, the Democratic Party ~ (Nixon elected)
Page 271 of 1574
crumbling
the regime is ~ (protests)
life crumbled
my ~
marriage (to Charlie) was crumbling
her ~ (the great Carole King)
began to crumble
in the off-season, his world ~ (troubled pro athlete)
his world ~ last October, when...
decline / destruction / failure, accident & impairment:
erosion / ruins / verb
crunch (crunch time)
crunch time
in terms of the school year, it's ~ (tests)
as we head into November, ~ (college football)
it was ~, end of the month (military recruitment)
this is ~, we’re in the home stretch (election campaigning)
crunch time in the fields
it’s ~ (harvesting Christmas trees)
crunch time in college football
it’s ~
comes down to crunch time
I think when it ~ he will choose... (athlete must pick college)
situation: pressure
timeliness & lack of timeliness: pressure
crunch (cash crunch, etc.)
budget crunch
most states are in the middle of a horrific ~
cash crunch
the agency found itself in a ~
power crunch
the ~ has eased (after previous rolling power outages)
stave off a cash crunch
options to ~ include bankruptcy protection
sufficiency, insufficiency & excess: pressure
timeliness & lack of timeliness: pressure
crunch (crunch the data)
crunch the data
the pandemic may have peaked, depending on how you ~
analysis, interpretation & explanation: verb
crusade (on a crusade)
on a crusade to document
he is ~ underage model sites (porn)
campaign: Middle Ages / religion
message: Middle Ages / religion
crusade (in a crusade)
act in (his anti-government) crusade
it was the final ~ (Oklahoma City bombing)
engaged in an (undercover) crusade
she has ~ to document teen porn sites
campaign: Middle Ages / religion
message: Middle Ages / religion
crusade (noun)
crusade to improve
her ~ the city parks she loved (M.M. Graff / NYC)
crusade of violence
a ~, intimidation and harassment (animal rights)
crusade for a bargeway
the ~ on the Red River
crusade for Ms. Katz
finding terrorists has become a ~ (on Internet)
mothers' crusade
the ~ (to find serial killer of their daughters)
anti-government crusade
it was the final act in his ~ (Oklahoma City bombing)
anti-bullying crusade
an ~ (schools)
anti-cockfighting crusade
successful ~s in Missouri and Arizona
moral crusade
a harsh and intolerant ~
personal crusade
he used his seniority to further his ~s (politician)
political crusade
a grieving mother's ~ (son killed in Iraq)
signature crusade
he made health-care reform the ~ of his career
successful (anti-cockfighting) crusade
~s in Missouri and Arizona
undercover crusade
she has engaged in an ~ to document… (teen porn)
unlawful crusade
stop an ~ of violence, intimidation, harassment
harsh and intolerant (moral) crusade
a ~
crusade has sparked a backlash
his ~ (make school lunches more healthful)
engaged in an (undercover) crusade
she has ~ to document… (teen porn)
campaign: Middle Ages / religion
message: Middle Ages / religion
Page 272 of 1574
crusader (role)
crusaders for change
articulate ~ (victims of child abuse by clergy)
crusader for peace
she is a ~ (against war in Iraq)
crusader for human rights and harmony
he was a ~ among creeds and races (Tutu)
crusader for miners' rights
Mother Jones, a ~
environmental crusader
Erin Brockovich, the ~ who…
anti-drug crusader
Angela Dawson was an ~ (East Baltimore)
campaign: Middle Ages / person / religion
message: Middle Ages / person / religion
person: religion
crush (love)
crush on him
I had the biggest ~
feeling, emotion & effect: force / love, courtship & marriage
crush (destroy)
crushed Brazil 3-0
France ~ in the final (soccer)
crush (Chechnya's) bid
the latest campaign to ~ for independence
crush dissent
the government justifies the tactics it uses to ~
crushed (political) protest
he has ~ (King Mswati)
crush the rebels
Ethiopian officials vowed to ~ (Ogadenis)
crush the rebellion
the government vows to ~ (in Darfur)
crushed the revolt
Hussein's loyal military units ~ (Iraq / Shiites)
crush the uprising
a swift military response would ~
vowed to crush
Ethiopian officials ~ the rebels
destruction: fist / hand / verb
crush (confidence, spirit, etc.)
crushes (a child's) confidence
nothing ~ faster than unkind words
crush the human spirit
realities in life that almost ~
feeling, emotion & effect / oppression: destruction / hand /
verb
crush (verb / accomplishment)
crushed it
he is like the first famous Cuban in the US that ~ (Desi
Arna
